I shall inform him after he has awakened.” Kasyapa said, ‘You may wake up the king.” The gatekeeper said in reply, “The king must not be woken up. 
If he is awakened, he will be greatly enraged; and once he is enraged he will punish me.” The Elder Kasyapa said to the gatekeeper, “When the king has been awak­ ened, you should inform him that Kasyapa has come here, wishing to enter nirvana. 
That is why I want to see the king.” Then Kasyapa went into the city to beg for food. 
After having begged for food, he went to Kukkuta Mountain, which broke into three portions. 
On the mountain he spread some grass on the ground and pondered, while saying to his own body, “Formerly the Tathagata covered you with a robe made of cast-off rags. 
You should stay till the time of the Dharma-pito&a of Maitreya.” He also uttered the following stanza: 
With my supernatural powers, I shall keep this body, Covered with this robe of cast-off rags, Till the emergence of Maitreya Buddha. That Buddha, using this body, May edify his disciples. At that time Kasyapa contemplated on three matters. 
First, after entering nirvana his body should be dressed in his robe of cast-off rags and buried under the three portions of the mountain, like a child in his mother’s womb, without being lost or injured, and be kept till the time of the Dharma-pitaAa of Maitreya. 
Second, if Ring Ajatas'atru comes, the mountain should open. 
Kasyapa thought, “If King Ajatasatru could not see my body, he would vomit hot blood and die.” Third, if Ananda comes, the mountain should open. 
When he emerged from his contemplation, he forsook his life and entered nirvana. 
After his nirvana, the earth quaked in six ways. 
Sakra and innumerable heavenly beings presented various heavenly flowers as offerings to the body of Kasyapa. 
The three portions of the mountain closed together to bury his body. 
As Sakra and the other heavenly beings were separated [from Kasyapa], they felt sad and regretful, and uttered the following stanza: 
The whole world has nobody To depend upon. Now this Kasyapa, The second Buddha, is extinct. The right Dharma has collapsed like a landslide; 112The Transmission of the THharma-pitaka The ship of the right Dharma is tossing; The tree of the right Dharma has withered; The sea of the right Dharma is turbulent; To the delight of the king of Maras, Who enjoys this disaster of the Dharma. After having said this, they suddenly disappeared. 
When Ananda was in the city of Rajagrha and had not yet come out, Kasyapa entered nirvana. 
The Elder Ananda, having begged for food in the city of Rajagrha, meditated on imper­ manence, while King Ajatasatru dreamed that his maternal clan had perished. 
He was startled by the dream and awoke in terror. 
The gatekeeper reported to the king, saying, “Kasyapa has been here, wishing to see the king. 
He was going to enter nirvana.” Upon hearing these words, the king fainted and fell to the ground. 
After worshipping him, he stood up and wept sor­ rowfully, saying, “I have just heard that the Elder Mahakas'yapa has entered nirvana.” Ananda said in reply, “The Great Strenuous One has entered nirvana.” At that time, King Ajatasatru said to Ananda, “Let me see Kasyapa’s body; I wish to make offerings to it.” Ananda then took the king to Kukkuta Mountain. 
Ananda saw that many Raksasas were guarding the body of Kasyapa. 
King Ajatasatru saw the same, and he also saw that Kasyapa’s body was covered with heavenly flowers. 
Having seen this sight, he raised his hands to pat his own head and prostrated himself at full length, like a tree pushed down by an elephant, to worship at the feet of the body. 
After worshipping the body, he wished to get some firewood to cremate it. 
At that moment, Ananda said, “Great King, what do you wish to do?” The king replied, “I wish to burn the body of Kasyapa.” Ananda said in reply, “Do not bum it! 
Do not burn it! 
This body is preserved by divine power. 
When Maitreya Buddha attains supreme enlightenment, he will come here, surrounded by ninety-six crores of disciples, to take Kasyapa’s body and show it to them. 
Maitreya will say, ‘This Kasyapa was a disciple of Sakyamuni. 
He was the foremost in contentment, with few desires, and he also collected the Dharma-pfta&a of Sakyamuni.’ Then he will utter the following stanza: 
This recluse bhiksu surnamed Kasyapa, A great disciple of Sakyamuni Buddha, Whose supreme good views benefitted the world, Accepted and upheld the Bhavma-pitaka of that Buddha. i54b “Maitreya’s disciples will think, ‘In those days, the human body was so small! 
Was the body of Sakyamuni the same as this or larger?’ When Maitreya Buddha sees his disciples, he will say to them, ‘The samghati robe made of cast-off rags in which Mahakasyapa’s body is wrapped was the samghati robe of Sakyamuni, the Worldhonored One.’ Upon hearing this, his disciples will feel sorry and disappointed, and thus his ninety-six crores of disciples will attain arhatship. 
They will also achieve the merits derived from the observance of disciplinary rules and moral conduct. 
They will then build a stupa on top of the mountain.” King Ajatasatru returned to his city, and the three portions of the mountain closed together and covered the body again. 
King Ajatasatru built a stupa to which he offered different kinds of incense and flowers. 
The Causes of Ananda When the Elder Kasyapa had entered nirvana, King Ajatasatru worshipped at Ananda’s feet and said, “Elder, when the Buddha entered nirvana, I did not see him, and when the Elder Mahakasyapa entered nirvana, I did not see him either. 
If you, Elder, wish to enter nirvana, I hope you will come to see me.” Ananda said in reply, “Let it be so.” /_ Now Sanakavasin, the lord of merchants, returned from over­ seas. 
After storing away his treasures in his house, he went to the Bamboo Grove. 
The Elder Ananda was then standing at the door 114The Transmission of the Dharma-pito&a of the preaching hall. 
Sanakavasin went up to Ananda, wor­ shipped at his feet, and sat to the side. 
Sanakavasin then said to Ananda, “Elder, may it be known to you that I have returned safely from overseas and wish to hold the quinquennial assembly in order to earn merit from the Buddha and all the monks. 
Where is the Buddha now?” Ananda said in reply, “The World-honored One has entered nirvana.” Upon hearing this, Sanakavasin fainted and fell to the ground, but when his attendants sprinkled water on him he soon regained his senses. 
Then he said, “Where did the Elder Sariputra enter nirvana?” And he also inquired where Mahamaudgalyayana, Mahakasyapa, and some others entered nirvana. 
After making the inquiries, he said again, “Elder, I wish to hold the quinquennial assembly in order to gain merit.” Ananda said, “You may do so as you wish.” And he did so, as has been extensively related. 
After the conclusion of the great assembly, Ananda said to him, “Now you have completed the quinquennial assembly in order to gain merit from the Dharma-pita&a of the World-honored One. 
Sanakavasin also made a great vow, saying, “I shall always wear this sana garment till my death.” The Elder Ananda received and retained eighty-four thou­ sand Dharma teachings, all that the Buddha and the arhats had spoken. 
Sanakavasin also received and retained them all. 
He completely possessed the three clear insights and was well-versed in the Tripitaka. 
At that time, the Elder Ananda was residing at the Bamboo 154c Grove, and there was then a bhiksu who recited a stanza in the following way: 
A man lives up to a hundred years Without seeing a heron. Another man lives for only one day, But he has seen a heron. This man has much more wisdom and fame Than the one of a hundred years. 
He said to him, “The stanza you are reciting was not spoken by the Buddha. 
You should say, ‘If one man lives for a hundred years without perceiving the rise and fall of things, and if another lives for only one day but perceives the rise and fall of things, this man possesses much more wisdom than the one who lives a hundred years.’ Moreover, there are two kinds of people who slander the Buddha. 
One kind of people are infidels who slander the Buddha out of hatred and resentment. 
The other kind, though believers, do not properly accept and understand the meanings of the Sutras and are also considered slanderers of the Buddha. 
Just as a man with no feet and no mouth is useless, these two kinds of people are useless, as they cannot understand the proper meanings o f the words jati and aristaka mentioned in the Sutra.” And he also uttered the following stanza: 
An ignorant man has no wisdom; His actions are useless. If a wise man does not accept the Dharma, His wisdom is like poison. By hearing the recitation of right knowledge, One may gain the fruit of liberation. The bhiksu who recited the stanza returned to the place of his teacher and said, “Ananda said, ‘The World-honored One spoke thus: 
“If one man lives for a hundred years without perceiving the rise and fall of things, and if another lives for only one day and perceives the rise and fall of things, the second man is much better than the one who lives a hundred years.” The teacher said to his disciples, “Ananda is getting old. 
116The Transmission of the Dharma-ptfa&a If a man reaches senility, He loses his power of memory. His wisdom and vigor Also grow old. He also said to his disciple, “Recite as you do. 
Do not follow his words.” When Ananda went again to that place, he heard reciting the same stanza. 
The Elder Ananda said to him, “I have told you, this was not spoken by the Buddha.” He answered Ananda, saying, “My teacher said that Ananda was getting old and that his memory had become poor.” Ananda reflected and wished to go to the teacher to tell him the meaning. 
Then he considered the mind of the teacher: 
He saw in his mind that the teacher would not accept the meaning. 
He thought again: 
Was there any other bhiksu who could tell the teacher? 
And he saw that nobody could tell him. 
Ananda considered the matter, “If the Buddha were in the world, I would report the matter to him and to Sariputra, Maudgalyayana, Kasyapa, and others. 
But the Buddha and all the others have entered nirvana. 
I also wish to enter nirvana. 
By the power of the Buddha, the Dharma will abide for one thousand years.” He also uttered the following stanza: 
I am now thinking of myself As a bird wafting in the wind. They have entered nirvana, Having cleared all impurities and bonds. They were lamps in the world That dispelled the darkness of ignorance. O f those great energetic ones Who observed numerous rules and ceremonies, I am the only one surviving, Like one tree remaining in a forest. 
Then Ananda enjoined Sanakavasin, saying, “The World-honored One, after having transmitted the Dharma-pfta&a to Mahakasyapa, entered nirvana; and Mahakasyapa, after having transmitted it to me, entered nirvana. 
Now I wish to enter nirvana, and you should accept and guard this Dharma-pifo&a of the Buddha. 
In the country of Mathura there is a mountain named Urumanda. 
In the country of Mathura there is a wealthy person who has two sons named Nata and Bhata, whom the Buddha predicted would construct a monastery on that mountain. 
Again, in the country of Mathura there is a perfumer named Gupta who will have a son named Upagupta. 
He will be a Buddha without the characteristic marks of a Buddha, as was predicted by the World-honored One, who said, ‘A hundred years after my nirvana, he will perform the functions of a Buddha.’ ” Sanakavasin said in reply, “Let it be so.” Having transmitted the Dharma-pfta&a to Sanakavasin, the Elder Ananda rose early in the morning, dressed himself in his robes, and went to the city of Rajagrha to collect alms of food. 
He thought, “I promised that at the time of entering nirvana I should go to see King Ajatasatru.” Ananda then went to the royal palace and said to the gatekeeper, “I am here wishing to see the great king. 
You may go into the palace to inform the king about it.” The gatekeeper said in reply, “The king is now sleeping. 
I shall inform him after he has awakened.” Ananda said, ‘You may wake up the king.” The gatekeeper said in reply, “The king must not be woken up. 
If he is awakened, he will be greatly enraged; and once he is enraged, he will punish me.” The Elder Ananda said to the gate­ keeper, When the king has awakened, you should inform him that Ananda wishes to enter nirvana. 
That is why I have come to see the king.” 155b Ananda then went into the city to collect alms. 
After having collected alms, he reflected, “If I enter nirvana at this place, King Ajatasatru will not give a portion of my remains to the people of Vaisali; and thus the people of Vaisali will certainly bear a grudge against King Ajatasatru. 
If I enter nirvana in the country of Vaisali, the people of Vaisali will certainly not give a portion of my 118The Transmission of the Dharma-pifo&a remains to King Ajatasatru; and thus King Ajatasatru will also certainly bear a grudge against the people of Vaisali. 
Therefore, I shall enter nirvana in the middle of the Ganges.” Then the Elder Ananda went to the Ganges. 
Meanwhile, in his sleep King Ajatasatru dreamed that the handle of his canopy was broken, but the canopy did not fall down. 
He was startled by the dream and woke in fear. 
The gatekeeper reported to the king, saying, “Ananda has been here, wishing to see Your Majesty. 
He is going to enter nirvana.” Upon hearing these words, the king fainted and collapsed onto the ground. 
When he had just recovered a little consciousness, he thought, “Where will the Elder Ananda enter nirvana?” At that moment, a divine being in the grove said to King Ajatasatru, “The Elder Ananda, a prince of the Buddha-dharma, protected the Dharma-pitaka and with a mind of resolve has brought his existence in the triple world to an end. 
With a quiet and tranquil mind he has gone to the country of Vaisali to enter nirvana.” King Ajatasatru then assembled his four divisions of troops— elephants, horses, chariots, and footmen— and proceeded to the bank of the Ganges. 
In the country of Vaisali there was also a divine being, who uttered the following stanza to the people of Vaisali: 
This recluse Ananda Has dispelled the darkness of ignorance. To all the multitude of the world He shows equally the mind of compassion. He has come to the country of Vaisali With the intention of entering nirvana. 
At that moment, Ananda was sailing in a boat to the middle of the Ganges, when King Ajatasatru arrived and saluted Ananda, uttering the following stanza with his hands joined palm to palm: 
The son of the Buddha enters nirvana With a mind of equality toward the triple world. The Buddha whose face resembled a lotus flower Has already entered nirvana. You are the one under whom we take refuge. You should never leave us or abandon us. 
At that time, the people of Vaisali worshipped at Ananda’s feet and said to him, At this place you are remembered by men and heavenly beings, but now you wish to realize extinction. 
In this world Gautama was the supreme one with perfect wisdom and with eyes resembling lotus flowers. 
For the benefit of the forlorn and solitary, you should embrace the world.” The Elder Ananda thought in this way, “If I enter the country of Magadha, the people of Vaisali will be vexed and annoyed. 
But if I enter the country of Vaisali, the king of Magadha will be vexed and annoyed. 
Today I must think over what is appropriate for me to do.” Knowing that it was the proper time, he uttered the following stanza: 
i55c May half of the merit of the Dharma Be given to the king of Magadha; The other half of the merit, To the masses of Vaisali. Thus the two peoples May make offerings properly. When the Elder Ananda was about to enter nirvana, the earth quaked in six ways. 
There was then a recluse possessing the five supernatural powers who was living in the Snow Mountains with five hundred disciples. 
The recluse wondered why the earth quaked, and then he perceived that Ananda was about to enter nirvana. 
Thus he went with his five hundred disciples to Ananda, and upon arriving there he worshipped at bis feet and said with his hands joined palm to palm, “I shall obtain from the Elder the Dharma as spoken by the Buddha and become a fully ordained monk to lead a pure life of celibacy.” 120The Transmission of the Dharma-pito&a Then a conception arose in the mind of the Elder Ananda, All my disciples should come.” When he had this idea in his mind, all of his five hundred disciples, being arhats, came together to the assembly. 
The Elder Ananda rotated this earth with his super­ natural powers, and the recluse with his five hundred disciples became fully ordained monks. 
At the first karman (act of the ordination ceremony), the recluse and his five hundred disciples attained the fruition of srota-apannas (those who have entered the stream of holy living); at the second karman they attained the fruition of sakrdagamins (those who will be reborn only once more); at the third karman they attained the fruition of anagamins ; and at the fourth karman they attained the fruition of arhatship, free from all afflictions. 
As the recluse and his disciples became monks in the middle of the Ganges, he was named Madhyantika. 
After having done what he wished to do, Madhyantika worshipped at Ananda’s feet and said these words, “Just as the World-honored One converted Subhadra as his last disciple, and Subhadra entered nirvana before him, you, being my upadhyaya, should also allow me to enter nirvana before you, as I do not wish to see my teacher entering nirvana.” The Elder Ananda said to Madhyantika, “The World-honored One transmitted the Dharmapitaka to Mahakasyapa and entered nirvana; and Mahakasyapa transmitted it to me and entered nirvana. 
Now I wish to enter nirvana and you should receive and maintain the Dharma-pito&a. 
The Buddha has said, ‘The country of Kasmira is the best place for a monastery of meditation. 
One hundred years after my nirvana there will be a bhiksu by the name of Madhyantika who will uphold the DYi&rma-pitaka in the country of Kasmira. 
Therefore you should take the Dharma-pitaka to that country.” Madhyantika said in reply, “Let it be so.” Having transmitted the Dharmapitaka to Madhyantika, the Elder Ananda manifested his supernatural powers and made eighteen transformations, walking, standing, sitting, lying down in midair, and entering the fire samadhi. 
After the conclusion of the samadhi, his body issued rays of various colors—blue, yellow, i56a red, and white—with flames coming out of the upper part of his body and water flowing from the lower part, or water flowing from the upper part and flames coming out of the lower part. 
At that time, the body of Ananda was upright and dignified, like a famous mountain out of which pure water flowed and upon which different kinds of flowers grew. 
Ananda reflected that he wished to give half of his body to the king of Magadha and the other half to the people of Vaisali. 
Then, with his supernatural powers, he fulfilled this wish to be an almsgiver. 
By the Diamond of Wisdom he cut his mountain-like body in two and gave half of it to the kingdom of Magadha and the other half to the people of Vaisali. 
After Ananda entered nirvana, King Ajatasatru and all the heavenly beings venerated one half of his remains, while the people of Vaisali venerated the other half. 
Two stupas were erected, one in the city of Rajagrha and one in Vaisali. 
The Causes of Madhyantika When the Elder Ananda had entered nirvana, Madhyantika thought, “My teacher instructed me to bring the Buddha’s Dharma-pfra&a to the country of Kasmira.” Madhyantika then went to the country of Kasmira, where he sat upon a rope couch and thought again, “As this country of Kasmira is a possession of the Naga king, if I do not subjugate him he will not come into my realm. 
I should enter the samddhi of suchness.” With the power of the samddhi of suchness, he caused the country of Kasmira to quake in six ways, so much so that the Naga king could not rest. 
Thus the Naga king came to Madhyantika, who then entered the samddhi of compassion. 
The Naga king raised a gale but could not stir even a corner of robe. 
Then he started a thunderstorm, but Madhyantika transformed the thunderstorm with his divine power into heavenly blossoms such as utpala (blue lotus), kumuda , pundarika , and other flowers, all of which dropped to the ground. 
He also tried to injure Madhyantika with various weapons, which were turned by divine 122The Transmission of the Dharma-p itaka power into heavenly flowers. 
He also used a big mountain to press onto Madhyantika, and the big mountain became a heavenly blossom. 
Then the following stanza was uttered in the air: 
A big wind was blowing, But it could not stir a corner of his robe. Thunderstorms and weapons were turned Into celestial blossoms, As snow on a mountain, Under the light of sunshine, Is melted altogether Without any remnant. When he entered the samadhi of compassion, Fire could not burn him; Weapons and poisonous injuries Could never approach him. Thereupon, the Naga king was frightened, and he then went to Madhyantika and said to him, “Holy man, what do you instruct me to do?” Madhyantika said, “Give this place to me.” The Naga king said in reply, “It is impossible.” Madhyantika said, “It has been predicted by the Buddha that a most superior place for meditation i 56b would be initiated in this land, namely, the country of Kasmlra.” The Naga king said again, “Is this predicted by the Buddha?” Madhyantika replied, “It is so.” The Naga king said again, “How much land do you wish to have?” Madhyantika said, “I wish to have a place as large as a couch.” The Naga king said, “Such I shall give.” At that time, Madhyantika enlarged his couch by super­ natural power to the size of a kutaru-navaka covering the great earth. 
The Naga king said again, “How many people will follow you?” Madhyantika said, “There will be five hundred arhats.” Again, the Naga king said, “If there is one less than five hundred arhats, I shall retake the residential place.” Madhyantika wondered whether there would be five hundred arhats in the Dharma-pitaka. 
Then he perceived that there would be no less, nor even more, than that number. 
So he answered the Naga king, saying, “Let it be so.” The Elder said again, “If there are almsreceivers, there must be almsgivers. 
I shall bring white-clothed lay believers to the country of Kasmira.” The Naga king said, “Let it be so.” Madhyantika then brought a large number of white-clothed lay believers to the country of Kasmira, where they founded vil­ lages and towns. 
The lay believers said to Madhyantika, “How shall we sustain ourselves in this place?” Madhyantika then, by his supernatural powers, brought the lay believers to Gandhamadana Mountain. 
After arriving there the lay believers dug kunkuma , which they brought back and planted in Kasmira. 
At that time all the Naga kings at Gandhamadana Mountain became angry, and Madhyantika converted and subjugated them. 
The Naga kings asked Madhyantika, “How long will the Worldhonored One’s Dharma-pzto&a stay ?” Madhyantika said in reply, “It will last one thousand years.” The Naga kings promised that so long as the Buddha-dharma stayed in the world, they would allow him to stay in their country. 
Madhyantika said in reply, “Let it be so.” Madhyantika brought the turmeric back to the country of Kasmira and planted it. 
While the World-honored One’s Dharmapitaka remained, Madhyantika widely spread it and manifested various supernatural powers. 
He studied the Buddha-dharma together with the almsgivers, so as to make them understand and comprehend its meaning. 
Then he entered nirvana, like a fire extinguished by water, and his body was cremated with ox head sandalwood and other fragrant woods. 
His sarira were collected, and a stupa was erected for them. 
The Causes of Sanakavasin When the Elder Ananda had entered nirvana, Sanakavasin went to the country of Mathura. 
On the way there was a monastery named Pindavana, in which Sanakavasin spent a night. 
In the monastery there were two old bhiksus, who were discussing a stanza: 
124The Transmission of the Dharma-pfta&a “Non-violation is the first precept; The best learning is the selection of the Dharma.” The bhiksus believed that * / _ _ . This was spoken by Sanakavasin. i 56c Sanakavasin said to the two bhiksus, “The idea you uttered was not spoken by me. 
What I said was ‘the harmony of the right Dharma.’ Elders, once in the past there was a lord of merchants in the country of Varanasi, who intended to sail on the great sea with five hundred traders. 
On the way they met with apratyekabuddha who was sick. 
The lord of merchants detained the traders to look after tine pratyekabuddha, and he personally attended to him with the medicine prescribed by a physician. 
When tine pratyekabuddha became a little better, the lord of merchants took out a sana garment. 
It had been rough and coarse but was made soft and smooth by treatment with washing and dyeing. 
After bathing the pratyekabuddha, he offered the garment to him, saying, ‘Worldhonored One, that garment of yours is rough and coarse. 
May the World-honored One accept mine after taking a bath. 
I shall now enter nirvana in this same garment.’ The lord of merchants said, ‘Do not enter nirvana. 
When I return from the sea, I shall offer to you, World-honored One, garments, food, drink, bedding, and medicine so long as you do not enter nirvana. 
I shall now sail on the sea and cannot stay here.’ The pratyekabuddha said, ‘Now I must enter nirvana. 
You have done great meritorious deeds, for which you should feel happy.’ Then the pratyekabuddha showed the eighteen transformations to the lord of merchants; and after showing the supernatural transformations, he entered nirvana. 
“The lord of merchants made offerings to the body and made a vow, ‘I have performed various meritorious deeds for this bhiksu. 
With this good root I shall obtain what I ought to obtain.’ The lord of merchants at that time was myself. 
That is why I have met with a supreme teacher who caused me to gain the Way. 
I wore this sanavasa when I became a monk in the Dharma-pifa&a of the World-honored One. 
With this sanavasa covering my body, I gained the Way, and with this sanavasa covering my body, I shall enter nirvana. 
I have always worn this sanavasa; even when I was a lay believer clad in white I also wore this garment. 
That was why I was named Sanakavasin. 
I received full ordi­ nation, and after the completion of the fourth karman I also received the greater precepts. 
Even before entering nirvana, I shall always wear this sanavasa. 
That is why again I am named Sanakavasin.” At that time, the Elder Sanakavasin gradually proceeded to the country of Mathura and went to Urumanda Mountain, where he sat on a rope couch. 
On Urumanda Mountain there were two Naga kings, who were brothers, followed by five hundred Nagas. 
Sanakavasin reflected, “If I do not subjugate them, I shall not be able to edify them.” Thus he shook the mountain with his super­ natural powers. 
Being enraged, the two Naga kings went to the place of Sanakavasin, started a strong storm, and set a fire. 
i57a Sanakavasin entered the samadhi of compassion, which could keep the storm and fire away from his body, and transformed the water and fire into celestial blossoms, namely, utpala, kumuda, pundarika, and other flowers, which all fell to the ground. 
The Nagas again caused a thunderstorm, which was also transformed into celestial blossoms by supernatural powers. 
They also tried to throw various kinds of weapons at Sanakavasin, and these were again transformed into celestial blossoms. 
They tried to press Sanakavasin with a big mountain, and he also transformed the mountain into a heavenly flower. 
Then the following stanza was uttered in the air: 
A strong gale and storm Could not hurt him; Thundering, lightning, and weapons Turned into celestial blossoms, As snow on a mountain, 126The Transmission of the Dharma-pito&ci Under the light of sunshine, Is melted altogether, Without any remnant. When he entered the samadhi of compassion, Fire could not burn him; Weapons and poisonous injuries Could never approach him. Then the two Naga kings went to Sanakavasin and said to him, “Holy man, what do you instruct us to do?” Sanakavasin said in reply, “I wish to build a monastery on this mountain. You should listen to me.” The Naga kings said in reply, “It is impossible.” The Elder said, “Such has been predicted by the World-honored One, who said, ‘A hundred years after my nirvana, a monastery with the name Natabhatika shall be constructed at the best quiet and calm place on Great Cream Mountain.’ ” The Naga kings said again, “Is it predicted by the World-honored One?” The Elder said in reply, “It is so.” The Naga kings said, “If it has been predicted by the World-honored One, we shall listen to you.” Then the Elder meditated and observed whether the almsgivers of Natabhatika Monastery had been born or not, and he saw that they had been born. 
Sanakavasin rose early in the morning, dressed himself in his robes, carried his alms bowl, and went to the country of Mathura to collect food. 
After having collected food, he went to the place of the almsgivers Nata and Bhata. 
The two men said in reply, “If it is predicted by the Buddha, we shall construct the monastery.” Then the two of them built a monastery on the mountain, fully provided with garments, dec­ orations, and other articles. 
This monastery was thus named Natabhatika. 
i57b The Causes o f Upagupta / _ When Sanakavasin had constructed the monastery on Great Cream Mountain, he contemplated whether the perfume dealer named Gupta had been born or not, and he saw that he had been born. 
He then contemplated whether son Upagupta, who would, as the World-honored One had predicted, be a Buddha without the characteristic marks of a Buddha and who “will per­ form the functions of a Buddha one hundred years after my nirvana,” had been born or not, and saw that he had not yet been born. 
With his power in expedients, Sanakavasin taught the per­ fume dealer to be energetic. 
One day Sanakavasin went to house with a large number o f disciples; on another day he went to his house with only one disciple; and on still another day he went to his house alone. 
Gupta was performing Buddhist functions, and when he saw that Sanakavasin came to his house alone, he asked, Holy man, why are you alone without any disciple following you?” The Elder said, “I am an old man; how can I have anybody following me? 
If somebody is energetic and takes delight in becom­ ing a monk, then I shall have a follower.” Gupta said, “I take delight in the enjoyment of the five desires at home, and I cannot leave my home to become a monk. 
But if a son is born to me, he will follow the Elder.” The Elder said, “Let it be so! 
Let it be so! 
Forever keep this promise and never go back on your word.” A son was then born to Gupta and was named Apagupta. 
When he had grown up, Sanakavasin went to Gupta and said to him, “Formerly you promised me, ‘If a son is born to me, I shall give him to the Elder. 
Now a son has been born to you. 
You should allow him to follow me to become a monk.” Gupta said, Now I have only one son. 
When the second son is born, I shall give him to the Elder.” Then Sanakavasin pondered whether this child was Upagupta or not, and he saw that he was not. 
So he said to Gupta, “Let it be so.” When the second son was born, he was named Dhanagupta. 
After he had grown up, Sanakavasin went to Gupta and said to 128The Transmission of the Dharma-psta&a i 57c him, “Formerly you promised that when your second son was born you would give him to me. 
Now that the child is born, you should allow him to follow me to become a monk.” Gupta said, “May the Elder not feel displeased. 
I have two sons to manage my family properties together. 
I order one to procure wealth and one to safeguard it. 
If a third son is born, I will give him to the Elder.” Then Sanakavasin pondered whether this child was Upagupta or not, and he saw that he was not. 
So he said to Gupta, “Let it be so.” Then the third son was born, a child with handsome features and very lovable. 
As his pleasant appearance surpassed that of other men and was second only to that of heavenly beings, he was named Upagupta. 
When this child had grown up, his father kept him to make a lawful living and gained much profit. 
Then Sanakavasin went to Gupta and said to him, “Good man, formerly you promised that when your third son was born, you would give him to me. 
Now that this child is born, you should allow him to follow me to become a monk.” Gupta said in reply, “I vowed to order him to make a living. 
If he neither gains nor loses, he will be allowed to become a monk.” Then the king of Maras caused all the people in Mathura to purchase his goods, so that he gained profits. 
Sanakavasin went to Gupta’s place when Upagupta was sell­ ing perfume. 
The Elder said to him, “Do you know what is good and what is bad in your mind and mental activities?” Upagupta said in reply, “I do not know what is good and what is bad in my mind and mental activities.” The Elder said, “The mind and mental activities that tally with greed, hatred, and ignorance are bad; and if they tally with non-greed, non-hatred, and non-ignorance, they are good.” At another time the Elder went again to Upagupta and said to him, “Good man, how are your mind and mental activities? 
Are they good or bad?” He replied, saying, “I do not know what is good and what is bad in my mind and mental activities.” The Elder said, “If you wish to know what is good and what is bad in your mind and mental activities, you should accept the Way and eliminate what is bad in your mind and mental activities. 
I shall do some­ thing.” Then the Elder made some pills with black and white clay and said to him, “If an evil mind arises, you may take one black pill, and if a good mind arises, you may take one white pill. 
You should practice the contemplation of impurity and be mindful of the Buddha, as well as meditate on him as has been said.” At that time, Upagupta intended to do good in his mind and mental activities, but he collected many black pills without even a single white one. 
Then he thought that he should try to get two-thirds black pills and one-third white ones. 
He thought again that he should get half black pills and half white ones. 
He further thought that he should get two-thirds white pills and one-third black ones. 
And he even thought that he should have only a good mind, so that the pills he took were all white ones. 
There was then in the country of Mathura a courtesan named Vasudatta, whose maidservant once went to the place of Upagupta i58a to purchase perfume and received more than she had bought. 
When she returned, her mistress asked her, “Where did you get so much perfume? 
‘You may tell him that I desire to have enjoyment with him.” When the maidservant told this to Upagupta, he said, ‘You may tell her that this is not the time for me to see her.” The maidservant returned and told this to her mistress, who said, “He cannot afford to give me five hundred silver coins, so he would not come.” Then she sent again her maidservant to go and tell him, “I need no money. 
I only need you to come and have enjoyment with me.” The maidservant again went to the place of Upagupta and told him this message. 
There was then a merchant coming from northern India to the country of Mathura with five hundred horses and various kinds 130The Transmission of the Dharma-pita&a of merchandise. 
An intimate friend of the rich man’s son discovered his body in the filthy place and reported the matter to the king. 
The king said to him, “You will seize Vasudatta, amputate her hands and feet, cut off her ears and nose, and scatter her body in the wilds.” As ordered by the king, her hands and feet were cut off and scattered in the wilds. 
Upon hearing that Vasudatta had had her hands and feet cut off and scattered in the wilds, Upagupta thought, “Formerly I did not wish to see her and enjoy the five desires with her, but now I wish to see her and have a look at her hands, feet, ears, and nose.” And then he uttered the following stanza: 
158b In the best of clothes was she formerly clad; With different jewels was she decked; Such were the things with which Her person was adorned. One who takes delight in liberation, Who wishes to leave the world with detestation, Should not go to see her then, When she was decked with precious jewels, But should go to see her now, Without joy and without arrogance. Her beauty is in its original form; The sight of her arouses disgust and repugnance. 
Upagupta, accompanied by a boy holding an umbrella, went into the wilds. 
The maidservant, in remembrance o f her mistress’s kindness, stayed beside her to drive away the crows, not allowing them to attack and peck her. 
It is really a great pain. 
Now I am on this ground smeared with blood and my whole body is red. 
Such being my body, how can anyone have a lustful mind at the sight of it?” Then she said to her maidservant, “Collect my hands, feet, ears, and nose and put them in one place, so that he may not see them.” The maidservant placed them together and covered them with a piece of cloth. 
Then Upagupta arrived and stood looking at Vasudatta. 
Formerly when my body was capable of enjoying the five desires I sent for you, but you said that it was not the time. 
Why do you come now when my hands and feet have been amputated and I am in a bloody mire?” And she uttered the following stanza: 
Formerly this body of mine Resembled a lotus flower; I wore a precious garment O f great price for its adornment. But devoid of merit I could not see you. “Such as I am now, why do you come? 
This body of mine is without ornaments and without joy, smeared with blood for scented oint­ ment. 
It is for the sake of contemplating lustful desire and impurity that I have come.” And he also uttered the following stanza: 
Upon hearing these words, Vasudatta deeply feared rebirth, and when she heard about the virtues of the Buddha, she changed her mind and took delight in nirvana. 
In reply to Upagupta, she uttered the following stanza: 
This is so, this is so; This is as you have said. You are truly intelligent and wise And possess great kindness. You should tell me more now About the Buddha’s wonderful Dharma. 
Upagupta then preached the Dharma, namely the four noble truths, point by point. 
He also contemplated the body, and through the contemplation of the body he realized the detestability of the world of desire. 
As he himself preached the Dharma, he thoroughly comprehended the four noble truths and attained the fruition of an anagamin, while Vasudatta attained the fruition of a srota-apanna. 
At that time Vasudatta said to Upagupta, “Excellent! 
Mahasattva , it is by your power that the three evil ways and the places of great sufferings are closed, and that the path leading to heaven and nirvana is opened. 
Now I take refuge in the Tathagata, the one worthy of worship and fully enlightened, as well as in his Dharma and Sangha.” And she also uttered the following stanza: 
I go to take refuge in the Buddha, The Most Honored One among bipeds, 134The Transmission of the Dharma-pita^a Whose eyes resemble blue lotuses, And who is praiseworthy among men and heavenly beings; And also in his pure Dharma, free from desires; As well as in the supreme arhat Sangha. 
Having made her happy through his preaching of the Dharma, Upagupta returned to his own place, and shortly after his depar­ ture Vasudatta died and was reborn in the heavens. 
At that time, the heavenly beings informed the people of Mathura that she had been reborn in the heavens. 
After hearing this, the people made offerings to her remains. 
Upagupta thought that he was unskillful and blunt in measurement and calculation. 
Sanakavasin went again to Gupta and said to him, “This son of yours has been predicted by the Buddha, who said, ‘A hundred years after my nirvana he will perform a Buddha’s functions.’ You should allow him to follow me and become a monk.” Then Gupta allowed him to become a monk. 
At that time, the Elder Sanakavasin brought Upagupta to the Natabhatika Monastery and made him a fully ordained monk. 
At the moment of the first karman, he got rid of all bondages and attained the fruition of arhatship. 
Sanakavasin said to Upagupta, “Good man, you have been predicted by the Buddha: 
‘A hundred years after my nirvana, there will be a bhiksu named Upagupta who will be a Buddha without the characteristic marks of a Buddha and will perform a Buddha’s functions.’ And he also said that among the Buddha’s disciples, you would be foremost in edifying others. 
Good man, you should perform beneficial deeds for the Buddha-dharma.” Upagupta said in reply, “Let it be so!” And Sanakavasin taught him to preach the Dharma. 
When all the people of Mathura heard that a bhiksu named Upagupta, who was a Buddha without the characteristic marks of a Buddha, was going to preach the Dharma, innumerable thou­ sands of people wished to go to listen to him. 
The Elder Upagupta then contemplated in samädhi and saw that when the Buddha preached the Dharma, his audience, consisting of the four groups of devotees, sat in a group shaped like a crescent moon. 
He contemplated again: 
In what order did the World-honored One teach the Dharma? 
And he saw that the order was the taste of desire, the faults of desire, the outlet of desire, the four faiths, and so on, one by one up to nirvana. 
Upagupta also preached the Dharma in the same way. 
At that time, the king of Maras rained pearls on the assembly to distract the minds o f the people. 
As the people in the assembly were distracted, none of them could understand the four noble truths. 
Upon seeing that the minds of the people were distracted, Upagupta thought to himself, “Who is doing this to distract the minds of the assembly?” Then he found that it was being done by the king of Maras. 
On the second day the people who came doubled in number, and Upagupta again preached the true Dharma o f the four noble truths point by point. 
At that time, the king of Maras again rained 159b gold to distract the minds of the assembly, and none of the people could understand the four noble truths. 
Upon seeing that the minds of the people were distracted, Upagupta thought to himself, “Who is doing this to distract the minds of the assembly?” Then he found that it was being done by the king of Maras. 
On the third day the people who came doubled in number, and Upagupta again preached the Dharma, while the king of Maras again rained pearls mixed with gold, to the accompaniment of heavenly music performed by apsaras . 
As the people in the assembly were not free from desire, their minds were excited by the sight of the beauties and the sounds of music, and they listened no more to the preaching of the Dharma. 
The king of Maras then put a garland around the neck of Upagupta. 
Upagupta thought, ‘W ho is doing this?” He found that it was being done by 136The Transmission of the Dharma-pito/za the king of Maras. 
He pondered in his mind, “As this king of Maras always caused disturbance to the Dharma-pjta&a of the Worldhonored One, why did the World-honored One not edify him?” Then he thought to himself, “I may edify him, as the Buddha predicted that I would be a Buddha without the characteristic marks of a Buddha to edify people and convert them.” Then he considered, “Is this the right time for me to edify him?” He saw that the time had arrived for the king of Maras to receive edification. 
At that time, the Elder Upagupta took three corpses, the first of a dead snake, the second of a dead dog, and the third of a dead man. 
With his supernatural powers, he transformed the three corpses into garlands and took them to the place of the king of Maras. 
At the sight of Upagupta, the king of Maras was greatly pleased, , “Upagupta has accepted my edification.” And he stretched his body to receive the garlands. 
Upagupta tied him up with his own hands, fastened the dead snake on his head, and fixed the dead dog and dead man under his neck. 
Upagupta said to the king of Maras, “As you first insulted me with unrighteous flowers, now I return you by fastening corpses upon you. 
Now you are dealing with a son of the Buddha. 
If you have any supernatural power, show it to me.” Just like a gale that agitates the water of the sea into waves but cannot stir Malaya Mountain, so the king of Maras wished to free himself from the corpses but could not do so even though he tried with utmost effort. 
He was as helpless as a gnat trying to move a mountain. 
Greatly enraged, the king of Maras rose up into the air and uttered the following stanza: 
If I cannot free myself From the corpses on my neck, I may be freed by other divine beings With powers greater than mine. The Elder Upagupta also uttered the following stanza: 
You may go to take refuge under Brahman, / The sun, the moon, and Sakra; You may go into fire and the great sea; The corpses will not be burned, rotted, or loosed. I have bound these corpses Tightly on your neck. It was done by supernatural power, And none can detach them. The king of Maras went to Mahesvara and Sakra in the Thirtythree heavens as well as to the Four Heavenly Eings, trying to get rid of the corpses, but he could not free himself from them. 
Then he went to Mahabrahman. 
It is like water that cannot break the shore of a great sea.” He also uttered the following stanza: 
159c If Snow Mountain is bound With fibers of lotus root, It can be lifted up Without much difficulty. It is by the power of divinity That corpses are fixed on your body. I do not have the ability To rid you of them. All the powers possessed By me and the heavenly beings Cannot surpass those of the Tathagata And his disciples, As other lights are inferior To the light of fire, As the light of fire is inferior To the light of the sun. 
As a man has to stand up from where he has fallen, you have to stand up through his supernatural powers, since your downfall was caused by his supernatural powers.” Then the king of Maras realized that the 138The Transmission of the Dharma-pitaAa supernatural powers of a son of the Buddha were great. 
He pon­ dered over the matter and uttered the following stanza: 
If Mahabrahman takes refuge In the Buddha, his disciples, and the Dharma, Who else can estimate and measure The divine powers of the Tathagata? The Tathagata’s divine powers Really could have subjugated me. But out of pity and compassion He did not subdue me. “Now I have come to know the powers of the Buddha, and it needs no extensive reiteration.” He also uttered the following stanza: 
Now I understand That the World-honored One is compassionate, And that his mind is free from impurities, Comparable to a golden mountain. Because of my ignorance, I disturbed the Buddha everywhere And did evil at all places; But he did not subdue me by force. Then the king of Maras, who was the lord of the world of desire, had no place to escape from Upagupta and pondered over the matter. 
He gave up his arrogance, went to Upagupta, and wor­ shipped at his feet, saying, “Elder, since the time of the Bodhi tree up to the present day, the evils I have committed against the World-honored One are immeasurable and innumerable. 
Once I caused the Buddha to have no food to eat when he went to the house of a Brahman in the country of Sala. 
That was done by me. 
For the evils I committed, the Buddha did not blame me. 
Some­ times I changed myself into a dragon, a snake, a wicked demon, or various kinds of fearful things to frighten him, but the Worldhonored One never blamed me. 
Elder, today you are pitiless and cause the whole world of heavenly beings and Asuras to blame and sneer at me, making me feel ashamed.” i 60a Upagupta said to him, “You are unwise and do not know how to think of things, trying to compare the merit of the compassion of the Tathagata with that of a bhiksu. 
It is like comparing a grain of mustard seed with Mount Sumeru, or equating a glowworm with the sun, or taking a scoop of water and putting it on a par with the great sea. 
The compassion of a sramana is not comparable to that of the compassionate Buddhas of the ten quarters. 
That was why the Buddha could endure the evils you committed.” The king of Maras said, “The Buddha had cut off all delusions and dissolved all doubts and had great patience. 
As I was wicked and had passions, I was always ready to annoy the Buddha. 
The World-honored One protected me with his compassion. 
That was why the Buddha did not subjugate me. 
Elder, you should instruct me. 
Upagupta said in reply, “Good man, now listen to me! 
You committed so many evils and did so many bad things toward the Buddha that unless you cherish a mind of faith and respect for the Tathagata, you cannot be absolved from your misdeeds. 
As the Buddha had foresight far into the future, he did not subjugate you.” He also uttered the following stanza: 
Your mind has lacked deep respect, But the Tathagata has initiated it. From smallness it will increase to greatness Until you gain the fruit of nirvana. Of all the evils you have committed, Only a brief part has been told. You should wash away the defilement of passion With the water of the wisdom of recollection. 
He also uttered the following stanza: 
Many things I did To vex the World-honored One, But he was not angry. I wish to be compared to a son 140The Transmission of the Dharmapitaka Whose guilt and faults are forgiven By his father’s pardon. At that time, the king of Maras spent much time in meditating on the beneficence of the Buddha, and as he remembered the Buddha his mind was cooled down. 
He worshipped at the Elder’s feet and uttered the following stanza: The Elder today Has accepted me And enabled me to revere The World-honored One. Now these corpses Are bound on my neck As my ornaments. May the great recluse, By the power of compassion, Remove them for me. 
i 60b The Elder Upagupta said, “If you can make a promise, I shall remove them for you.” The king of Maras inquired, “What prom­ ise?” Upagupta said, “From now onward you should never annoy bhiksus.” The king of Maras said in reply, “Let it be so! 
But you should teach me how to do it.” The Elder answered, saying, “The Dharmapitaka of the World-honored One should be widely spread, and that is what I am doing.” Being amazed, the king of Maras said again, “Teach me how to do it!” The Elder said in reply, “You should know that I became a monk one hundred years after the Tathagata entered nirvana. 
I have seen the Dharmakaya of the World-honored One, but I have not seen his Rupakaya . 
As you are now accepted by me, you should show me the Rupakaya of the Tathagata. 
I now take delight in nothing else except in seeing the body of the Buddha.” The king of Maras replied with the following stanza: 
When you see what I appear to be, The material body of the Tathagata, You must not worship me. Only to the All-wise One Should homage be paid. If the Elder paid it to me, I should be destroyed. Now I am not qualified To bear the worship of a holy man, Just as the bud of an airavata tree Cannot bear the weight O f the tusk of an elephant. 
Thus we should make this agreement. 
I shall not worship you.” The king of Maras said again, “Just wait a few moments. 
I shall enter the grove and transform myself into the form of the Buddha with brilliant golden hues and a halo as bright as sunlight, just as I did once in the past to mislead a wealthy man named Sura. 
Such a material body was wonderful. 
I shall now appear as it, so that all those who see it may have faith with joy.” Then the Elder Upagupta said in reply, “Let it be so.” And he removed the three corpses, as he wished to see the physical body of the Tathagata. 
Then the king of Maras went into the grove and transformed himself into the body o f the Buddha. 
Having assumed the form of the Buddha, he came out of the grove, just as a woman goes behind a screen to adorn herself and comes out again after having dressed up. 
The physical form of the Tathagata was incomparable, and none of the people who saw it was not pleased to see it. 
It was like a colored painting with different hues. 
When the king o f Maras had glorified the grove with his transformed body, he also appeared as Sariputra at the right side and Maudgalyayana at the left. 
Again, he appeared as Ananda holding an alms bowl at the back and as Mahakasyapa, Aniruddha, Subhuti, and so on, as one thousand two hundred fifty great sravakas surrounding the transformed Buddha in a group shaped like a crescent moon. 
After having made these trans­ formations, he went to Upagupta. 
Being greatly delighted to have 142The Transmission of the Dharma-pito&a seen the Buddha’s physical form, Upagupta rose from his seat and watched the physical form of the Buddha without turning his eyes away from it for a moment. 
And he uttered the following stanza: 
Impermanence is merciless; It ruined the Tathagata’s material form. Impermanent was the Tathagata; He dissolved his form and entered nirvana. Upagupta fixed his attention on the Buddha, and his mind could not part from him. 
“Now I see this transformed body, and it is the same as seeing the real Buddha.” With a concentrated mind, he put his hands palm to palm and uttered the following brief stanza in praise of the Buddha: 
160c His face is superior to a lotus flower, His eyes, better than the bloom of the utpala. His color outshines a grove of many blossoms And also surpasses real gold. He is more lovely than the moon; His light is brighter than the sun. His wisdom is deeper than the sea; Steadier than Mount Sumeru is his immovability. 
It was created by his own deeds And was not made by others. For countless and innumerable kalpas He cultivated pure deeds of body and speech And practiced the six paramitas perfectly As ornaments for his unhindered body. All those who see him are overjoyed; He is admired even by his enemies. Now, as I see the Tathagata, How can I not feel joyous? 
As he was thinking of the Buddha, Upagupta did not sense that it was Mara and prostrated himself at full length at the feet of the king of Maras like a great tree with its roots broken falling on the ground. 
Being startled, the king of Maras said, “Elder, you should not break your promise.” The Elder said in reply, “What promise?” The king of Maras said, “We made an agreement that when I appeared as the Buddha, you would not worship me. 
Why do you worship me now?” The Elder rose from the ground and replied in a low voice, “I am not unaware that the Tathagata entered nirvana like fire extinguished by water. 
But I saw the physical body of the Tathagata, it was so wonderful that I worshipped it; I did not worship you.” The king of Maras inquired, “You prostrated yourself with your head touching my feet; how can you say that you did not worship me?” Upagupta said, “I neither worshipped you nor did I break my promise. 
Now listen to me. 
Suppose there is a Buddha image made of clay; the worshipper thinks of it as the Buddha and not as clay. 
Now, as I see you, I think of you as the Buddha and not as a Mara.” Then the king of Maras ceased to assume the appearance of the Buddha, made offerings to Upagupta, and returned to his own place. 
Four days later, the king of Maras struck a bell with his own hands to make an announcement to all people: 
“Those who wish to be reborn in the heavens and attain nirvana should go to Upagupta to seek advice and receive the right Dharma from him. 
Those who have not seen the Buddha should go to Upagupta.” Then the king of Maras uttered the following stanza: 
i6 ia Those who wish to enjoy wealth and nobility And do not like to live in poverty, Who wish to enjoy heavenly bliss And the great happiness of nirvana, Should listen to and accept the Dharma And ponder over its meanings and main points. 144The Transmission of the Dharmapitaka Those who have not seen The supreme one among bipeds, The great teacher possessing compassion Who spontaneously gained the holy Dharma, Should all go to Upagupta. He is the man acting as a bright lamp For this world. At that time, his voice was heard throughout the country of Mathura. 
After Upagupta had subdued the king of Maras, the Brahmans and all the other people in the country of Mathura went to Upagupta. 
He was sitting on a lion seat and preaching the Dharma for the congregation without any fear in his mind, like a lion. 
He uttered the following stanza: 
A man without intelligence Can never ascend the lion seat. If he ascended the high seat, He would be deeply struck with great fear. Only a man as fearless as a lion, Who can refute the theories of the heretics, Is competent To ascend the lion seat. 
Upagupta preached the Dharma point by point, namely, the four noble truths, which were first spoken at the beginning. 
At that time, innumerable people attained the fruition of a srota-apanna, a sakrdagamin, or an anagdmin, and eighteen thousand persons renounced their homes and attained arhatship through the prac­ tice of meditation and the strenuous cultivation of the Way. 
On Urumanda Mountain there was a cave eighteen cubits long and twelve cubits broad. 
At that time all the disciples had done what they ought to do, and the Elder Upagupta said to them, “I have taught all my disciples to attain arhatship. 
Each of you who have attained arhatship should put a chip four inches long into the cave.” In one day’s time eighteen thousand arhats put chips into the cave. 
It became widely known throughout the great earth up to the seaside that in the country of Mathura there lived Upagupta, who was the foremost in teaching and converting the people as the Buddha had predicted. 
The Causes of Sanakavasin’s Attainment of the Way i6 ib /_ When Sanakavasin had made Upagupta a monk and Upagupta converted and subdued the king of Maras, Sanakavasin thought for the sake of converting living beings, “I have already received the right Dharma, and now I wish to proceed to the country of Kasmira to enjoy the bliss of samddhi, as it was predicted by the World-honored One that the county of Kasmira would be a firstrate place for sitting in meditation.” Then Sanakavasin went there and entered a cave to enjoy the bliss of samddhi. 
When a gust of cool wind blew on his body, he realized arhatship and enjoyed the bliss of emancipation. 
Then he uttered the following stanza: 
Wearing a sana garment, Keeping contact with five kinds of samddhi At the best place on the mountain, I sit erect in meditation. 
The Causes of Upagupta’s Disciples The Causes of the Son of a Tigress When Upagupta was residing at Natabhatika Monastery on Great Cream Mountain in the country of Mathura, a tigress gave birth to a cub not far from the monastery. 
As she could not go to seek food, she died of starvation. 
With a mind of beneficence and compassion, Upagupta fed the cub. 
Upagupta had five hundred disciples who had not gained the fruition of the Way. 
They said to their teacher, “Why do you feed a living being bom in an unfor­ tunate state of existence?” Their teacher said in reply, “Good men, it is for the cause of its emancipation.” Upon hearing these words, his disciples were amazed and had doubts in their minds. 
“How can a living being born in an unfortunate state of existence acquire the cause of emancipation?” The cub had a short span of life, and when it was about to die, Upagupta said to it, “All deeds are impermanent, all things are devoid of an ego, and nirvana is quietude. 
You should have faith in me and abhor the way of rebirth as an animal.” Then the cub cherished a mind of faith and respect toward the Elder. 
After having had faith and respect it died and was reborn among human beings in the country of Mathura. 
When he reached the age of seven, he was converted by Upagupta and became a monk, and in i6 ic seven years he attained arhatship. 
With his supernatural powers he plucked different kinds of flowers to offer to Upagupta. 
Upagupta was surrounded by his disciples as the arhat dis­ ciple came through the air and stood before him. 
The five hundred disciples who had not gained the Way said to their teacher, “This is our schoolmate. 
He is still young, so how could he have gained the merits of supernatural powers?” Their teacher said in reply, “He was the cub in his previous life, and you asked me why I should feed such a living being as he. 
It was because he had seen me and heard the Dharma that he gained his present fruition.” Then Upagupta preached the Dharma to his five hundred disciples. 
And so they got a deep sense of shame, cut off their passions, and attained arhatship. 
The Causes of Gorasa In southern India there was a man who became a monk in the Buddha-dharma and always feared rebirth but was unable to attain nirvana. 
He thought in his mind, “Who can preach the Dharma to edify me? 
If anybody can preach the Dharma to edify me, I shall attain nirvana.” Then he heard that in the country of Mathura there was a disciple named Upagupta, whom the World-honored One had predicted would be the foremost in edification. 
Having heard this, he went to Upagupta in the country of Mathura . 
Upon reaching there, he worshipped at his feet and said with his hands joined palm to palm, “Elder, the Buddha has entered nirvana. 
Elder, you should now perform the Buddha’s functions and preach the Dharma for me.” When Upagupta saw that this was the monk’s last reincarnation, that he feared the pains of rebirth, and that he came from a distant place with a thin and extremely weary body, he said, “Good man, rest yourself for a while.” The man was used to living on milk and curds, but in the country of Mathura there was food and drink of every description except milk and curds, so Upagupta asked him to proceed by another path. 
On the other path the man met with a group of women carry­ ing milk, curds, beverages, and ghee. They were coming from another country with the intention of entering this country. 
The women asked the Elder why he was so weak and thin. 
He said in reply, “Sisters, I was born in southern India and always lived on milk and curds. 
But in this country of Mathura there is food and 148The Causes of Upagupta’s Disciples drink of every description except milk and curds, and that is why I am weak and thin.” Then, to make him strong, all the women gave him milk, curds, and ghee for several days. 
Upagupta then preached the Dharma for him; and he prac­ ticed it with diligence and attained arhatship. 
Upagupta said to him, “Take a chip and put it into the cave.” He followed the instruction. 
The Causes of a Southern Indian i 62a In southern India there was a man who had immoral relations with the wife of another man and often went to her house. 
His mother, not wanting to allow him to do so, said to him, “If a man commits this evil deed, he will stop at nothing in doing evil.” Out of anger, that man murdered his mother; and after committing the crime he went to another country. 
As he could not satisfy his five desires in that country, he felt so deeply vexed and miserable that he became a monk in the Buddha-dharma. 
Then he thoroughly mastered the Tripitaka and became a man of great erudition. 
Surrounded by his disciples, he went with them to Upagupta at Natabhatika Monastery in the country of Mathura. 
Upagupta observed him in contemplation and saw that he had murdered his mother and that on account of this felony he could not perceive the truth or gain the fruit of the Way. 
Although he came from a distant 1 place, did not greet him with comfort. 
The bhiksu then went far away from there with a mind of shame. 
Upagupta’s five hundred disciples who had not gained the Way witnessed the incident and felt displeased with their teacher. 
He would preach the Dharma for an old bhiksu with a dull and stupid mind but would not preach for this bhiksu who is clever and intelligent, well-versed in the Tripitaka, and followed by his retinue.” Upagupta saw that his disciples harbored a feeling of anger against him, and he also saw that their minds had to be con­ verted and quelled by his upadhyaya Sanakavasin. 
At that time Sanakavasin was residing in the country of Kasmira; and when he observed whether Upagupta was performing the Buddha’s func­ tions or not, he saw that his five hundred disciples were indignant with him and did not show respect to their teacher. 
Having seen this, he reflected, <cWhy does Upagupta not edify them?” Then he i 62b made a deeper observation and saw that they could not be edified by Upagupta and that they should be edified by him. 
Sanakavasin went to that monastery by his supernatural powers while Upagupta was rambling outside. 
Sanakavasin then entered the monastery with a long beard and long hair and wear­ ing a coarse garment. 
Upon seeing him, the disciples of Upagupta said to him, “Ignorant old man, where did you come from with a long beard and long hair and wearing a coarse garment to our teacher’s monastery? 
Our upadhyaya did not preach the Dharma to an intelligent bhiksu well-versed in the Tripitaka who came here before. 
How can he preach it for you, an old and dull man?” When Sanakavasin entered the monastery, he sat on the seat of Upagupta. 
Upagupta’s disciples were angry at seeing it and tried to drag him off with their hands, but he was as immovable as Mount Sumeru. 
Then they intended to rebuke him, but they lost their voices. 
So they reported to Upagupta, saying, “A poor old bhiksu has come into the upadhyaya’s monastery and is sit­ ting on the upadhyaya’s seat.” Upagupta said to his disciples in reply, “Nobody except my upadhyaya can sit on my seat.” When Upagupta returned to the monastery, he made offerings to his / upadhyaya Sanakavasin with the utmost veneration and took a small seat, sitting on it beside his teacher. 
The name of the samadhi that is comprehended by the wisdom of a pratyekabuddha is unknown to Sariputra. 
The name of the samadhi that / is comprehended by the wisdom of Sariputra is unknown to Maudgalyayana. 
The name of the samadhi that is comprehended by the wisdom of Maudgalyayana is unknown to Mahakasyapa. 
And the name of the samadhi comprehended by the wisdom of my upadhyaya is unknown to me.” Sanakavasin said again, “Good man, at the time of my nirvana, the Dharma of all these samadhis will be lost. 
Moreover, the Jataka stories of the World-honored One with their seventy-seven thousand names will also be lost. 
Ten thousand Abhidharmas will be lost, too.” When the disciples of Upagupta heard this, they felt sorry and vexed, and then they thought, “The wisdom of this bhiksu is superior to that r i 62c _ of our upadhyaya.” Thus their arrogance vanished. 
Sanakavasin preached the Dharma to edify the disciples, and all of them attained arhatship. 
At that time, the Elder Sanakavasin said to Upagupta, “Good man, the World-honored One transmitted the Dharma-pitaka to Mahakasyapa and entered nirvana; Mahakasyapa transmitted it to my upadhyaya and entered nirvana; and my upadhyaya trans­ mitted it to me and entered nirvana. 
Now I transmit it to you and shall enter nirvana. 
You should guard and protect this Dharmapitaka. 
In this country of Mathura, a man will be born with the name o f Dhltika. 
He will become a monk, and you may transmit this Dharma-pitaka to him.” When the Elder Sanakavasin had transmitted the Dharmapitaka to Upagupta, he rose into the air by his supernatural powers, appeared in the four respect-inspiring postures, and entered the fire samddhi. 
After the conclusion of the samddhi, different kinds of flowers, blue, yellow, red, and white, emerged from his body. 
Water flowed from the upper part o f his body and fire spurted from the lower part. 
Fire also spurted from the upper part while water flowed from the lower part. 
His body was as upright and dignified as a mountain, with water coming out from one side and fire from the other. 
With his various super­ natural powers, Sanakavasin made the bhiksus and lay support­ ers happy and free in their minds. 
After having made such transformations, he entered nirvana like a fire quenched by water. 
At that time, Upagupta and eighteen thousand arhat disciples made offerings to the body, for which they built a stupa and a temple. 
The Causes of a Northern Indian When Upagupta was residing at Natabhatika Monastery in the country of Mathura, there was a good man in northern India who became a monk in the Dharma of the World-honored One. 
He was well-learned and intelligent, and he thoroughly mastered the Tripitaka. 
He preached the Dharma so well and in such a good way that wherever he went he was invited by the people to preach the Dharma. 
Thus he preached the Dharma in three ways for the people. 
He often thought to himself, ‘W ho can preach the Dharma for me, so as to enable me to gain the Way?” He heard that in the country of Mathura there was a bhiksu named Upagupta who was foremost in edification and had been predicted by the Buddha to be a Buddha without the characteristic marks of a Buddha. 
After hearing this, he went to that country and reached Nata­ bhatika Monastery. 
Elder, you are now performing the Buddha’s functions. 
May you preach the Dharma for me.” Then he uttered the following stanza: 
152The Causes of Upagupta’s Disciples The Buddha, who had great compassion, Has already entered nirvana, And you are now performing the functions of the Buddha. For the ignorant, blind, and dull in the world, You are the light of wisdom, Illuminating the world like sunlight. There is no other teacher in the world. You are the only one to be our teacher, The best one in edifying disciples. 
Why did he not obtain the holy Dharma in his previous incarnation? 
He saw that it was because the conditions were incomplete. 
Upagupta provided the conditions to make them com­ plete. 
He also saw that the man’s mind took delight in the bliss of sitting in meditation and did not wish to preach the Dharma. 
Upagupta said to him, “Good man, if you can accept my instruc­ tion, then I shall preach for you.” He said in reply, “I shall do so. 
Upagupta said, ‘You should preach three kinds of Dharma.” He i 63 a asked again, ‘W hat Sutra shall I preach?” Upagupta said, “The five merits of learnedness: 
Now I have taught you the three kinds of Dharma.” Then the monk preached the Dharma according to the sequence, and after having preached the Dharma he attained arhatship. 
Thus he took a chip and threw it into the cave. 
The Causes of Devaraksita When the master merchant Devaraksita, who was in the country of the Nakulas and who always took delight in alms-giving and had faith in the Buddha, intended to sail overseas, he announced like a lion’s roar, “If I return safely from the seas, I shall sponsor the quinquennial assembly o f the Buddha-dharma.” All the heavenly beings heard and remembered his words, and all the people in the country came to know about it, saying, “Devaraksita, the master merchant, has made a lion’s roar, saying, 'When I return from the seas, I shall sponsor the quinquennial assembly of the Buddha-dharma.’ ” There was then living in that country an arhat bhiksuni. 
She observed in her meditation whether Devaraksita would safely return from the seas or not, and she saw that he would safely return. 
She also saw that after his return he would sponsor the quinquennial assembly of the Buddha-dharma. 
She again tried to see how many monks would join in the assembly, and she saw that the number would be eighteen thousand arhats, twice as many learners, and innumerable ordinary persons. 
Who would be the Presiding Elder of the assembly? 
She saw that the Elder would be named Asadha. 
Then she observed whether the Elder Asadha would be an arhat, an anagamin, a sakrdagamin, or a srotaapanna, and she saw that he would be an ordinary person. 
She again observed whether that person would be energetic or indolent and saw that he would be energetic. 
Then she contemplated with the intention of inquiring whether he was acting for his own benefit or for the benefit of others, and she saw that he was acting for his own benefit. 
Why am I still not in strict propriety?” He looked at himself again and saw that his garments were coarse and shabby, and so he asked a young disciple to have them washed and dyed. 
After having his garments dyed and tidied, he wore them and sat straight. 
The bhiksunl thought again, “Does the Most Virtuous One understand my words?” And she saw that the most virtuous monk did not understand what she meant. 
For the third time the arhat bhiksunl went to the monastery, worshipped the monks in due order, and said, “Most Virtuous One, you are not in strict propriety.” The most virtuous monk said angrily, “I have shaved i 63b my beard and hair and have washed and dyed my garments. 
Why do you say I am not in strict propriety?” The bhiksunl said to the most virtuous monk, “How can you think that these are the proprieties of the Buddha-dharma? 
If you can attain the four fruitions, then they are the proprieties of the Buddha-dharma. 
Furthermore, Most Virtuous One, the master merchant Devaraksita has made an announcement like a lion’s roar: 
W hen I return safely from the seas, I shall sponsor the quinquennial assembly of the Buddha-dharma.’ Have you heard that?” The most virtuous monk said in reply, “I have heard it.” She asked again, “Most Virtuous One, do you know the number of monks who will join in the assembly?” “I do not know,” was the reply. 
Then the bhiksunl said of her own accord that the number of monks would be eighteen thousand arhats, twice as many learners, and innumerable ordi­ nary persons. 
“Most Virtuous One, an ordinary person will be the Presiding Elder and will be the first to receive offerings in the assembly of arhats. 
Upon hear­ ing these words, the most virtuous monk wept sorrowfully. 
The bhiksunl said, “Why do you weep?” “Sister,” answered the monk, “I am getting old. 
I am not competent to do anything. 
The bhiksunl uttered the following stanza: 
The Tathagata’s Dharma can be perceived At no fixed season and occasion. 
“Again, Most Virtuous One, you should go to Natabhatika Mon­ astery, where lives the bhiksu Upagupta, whom the Buddha pre­ dicted would be the foremost in edification among his disciples.” Then the elderly bhiksu went stage by stage to Natabhatika Monastery in the country of Mathura. 
He has come to greet you, Most Virtuous One.” The bhiksu was glad to hear this and washed his feet. 
Upagupta edified him and found him some lay supporters to look after his bath, food, and drink with various offerings. 
He also said to the karmadana , “Now we have a bhiksu who has gained the two liberations coming to our place of meditation.” All of the eighteen thousand arhats entered the place of meditation, while the bhiksu came and sat on the chief seat at the place of meditation and fell asleep. 
The karmadana took a lamp and placed it in front of him with a snap of his fingers. 
The bhiksu was awakened and wished to take up the 163c lamp. 
Then Upagupta entered the fire samadhi, and thus all of the eighteen thousand arhats also entered the fire samadhi. 
The bhiksu was glad to see this sight and uttered the following stanza: 
All the bhiksus are sitting Cross-legged on the ground Like dragons in coils, Brilliant as trees of lamps. 
Upagupta edified him by preaching the Dharma, and then the bhiksu strenuously practiced meditation and attained arhatship. 
Having done what he wished to do, he returned to his own country. 
Upon seeing that the bhiksu had arrived, the arhat bhiksuni went to the monastery and worshipped him, saying, “Most Virtuous One, you are today in strict propriety.” The bhiksu said in reply, “Sister, it is all due to your effort.” 156The Causes of Upagupta’s Disciples When the master merchant Devaraksita safely returned from the seas, he sponsored the quinquennial assembly. 
At that time, eighteen thousand arhats joined the assembly, and there were twice as many learners and innumerable ordinary persons making strenuous efforts. 
The most virtuous Elder said the following mystic prayer to Devaraksita: 
“Tavatah yavantah evambhavantah bhavantah bhavisyati.” [Such as it is now, may it be so in the future.] And he repeated the same prayer at the conclusion of the meritorious quinquennial assembly. 
Devaraksita, the master merchant, inquired of the Elder, “The World-honored One has preached various Dharmas. 
Are they any different from what the Elder has said in Tavatah yavantah evambhavantah bhavantah bhavisyati?” The Elder said in reply, “Good man, I said the prayer in consideration of your merits. 
Once in the past, ninety-one kalpas ago, we were both master merchants and managed a big ship, which we sailed overseas to obtain precious things. 
When the ship was fully loaded, we sailed back to Jambudvipa. 
On the sea we encountered a hurricane, and the ship was blown aground on a sandy beach. 
We collected sand and built a stupa in honor of Vipasyin Buddha, the fully enlightened one, and offered precious things to the stupa. 
At that time the heavenly beings showed us the way and we re-equipped our big ship. 
The heavenly beings said, Tn seven days there will be a high tide, which will take your ship to Jambudvipa.’ On the seventh day the high tide came and took our ship to Jambudvipa. 
On account of our construction of the 164a sand stupa, I was not reborn in the evil ways of existence for ninety-one kalpas, and on account of that cause I was able to attain arhatship, while you were able to make offerings to eighteen thousand arhats and twice as many learners as well as innu­ merable ordinary persons making strenuous efforts. 
As you have made offerings to the Three Treasures, I said the prayer: 
Moreover, my good man, the pains of rebirth are limitless, and you should renounce your home to become a monk in the Buddha-dharma.” Thereupon, Devaraksita became a monk and attained arhatship. 
The Causes of the Brahman with the View That the Ego Is Real When Upagupta was residing at Natabhatika Monastery in the country o f Mathura, there was in Mathura a Brahman who always held the view that the ego is real. 
He asked a Buddhist disciple, “Is there any being who can create birth and death?” The Buddhist disciple said in reply, “Brahman, please go to Natabhatika Monas­ tery, where a bhiksu named Upagupta is always preaching the Dharma of egolessness.” The Brahman went accordingly to that monastery when Upagupta was preaching the Dharma for the four groups of devotees. 
Upon seeing the Brahman, Upagupta uttered the following stanza of non-ego: 
There is no ego in the world And nothing that is mine; There is no personality and no life, Except the concept of birth and death. Upon hearing the Dharma of egolessness, the Brahman cut off his view that the ego is real and became a monk at the place where Upagupta was. 
then preached the Dharma to him, and through the energetic practice of meditation the Brah­ man attained arhatship. 
Having done what was to be done, the Brahman took a chip and put it into the cave. 
The Causes of Sleepiness When Upagupta was residing at Natabhatika Monastery in the country of Mathura, a good man who relied upon him became a monk. 
However, this man was fond of sleep and would fall asleep even when Upagupta was preaching the Dharma. 
Upagupta asked him to go to a place of meditation; and he went there and sat cross-legged under a tree, but he still fell asleep as before. 
With his supernatural powers, Upagupta caused pits one thousand cubits deep to appear at the four sides of the bhiksu to frighten him. 
Upagupta then made a road by magic power for him to i 64b follow. 
The bhiksu followed the road and came to Upagupta, who asked him to go back to the place where he had been sitting. 
The bhiksu said in reply, “Upadhyaya, there are pits one thousand cubits deep there.” Upagupta said, “Those deep pits are small; the biggest pits are those of rebirth. 
They are known as the pits of birth, old age, disease, death, sorrow, grief, suffering, and vexa­ tion. 
If one does not know the four noble truths, one falls into them.” The bhiksu then went back to sit cross-legged under the tree in meditation, and as he feared the deep pits he did not fall asleep again. 
With a feeling of dread he meditated energetically, got rid of all passions, and attained arhatship. 
Then he took a chip and put it into the cave. 
The Causes of the Provisor When Upagupta was residing at Natabhatika Monastery in the country of Mathura, a good man who was a native of the Eastern Country became a monk in the Buddha-dharma, and as he was able to act as a provisor, whichever monastery he stayed in the bhiksus always asked him to be their provisor. 
So he went to that place, and upon arriving there he worshipped at his feet and said, “Most Virtuous One, the Buddha has entered nirvana, and you, Most Virtuous One, are performing the Buddha’s functions. 
May you preach the Dharma to me.” Upagupta con­ templated and saw that this was last reincarnation and that he feared rebirth. 
He contemplated again why he did not gain the Holy Way, and saw that it was because conditions were incomplete. 
What were the expedients by which to make them complete? 
If he could act again as a provisor, the conditions would be complete. 
But he also saw that the man was extremely tired of it and did not wish to act as a provisor. 
The bhiksu also asked, “How many monks are there in this monastery?” The Most Virtuous One said in reply, “There are eighteen thousand arhats, twice as many learners, and innumerable energetic ordinary persons.” Then the bhiksu acted as a provisor to all the monks so that they might concentrate their minds on the practice of the Way. 
The provisor bhiksu rose up early, dressed in his robes, and with alms bowl in hand went into the country of Mathura. 
There was then a wealthy man coming out of the country of Mathura, and he met the bhiksu on the way. 
He had never met him before; it was the first time he had seen him. 
Upon seeing him, he worshipped at his feet, and after worshipping him he asked, “Most Virtuous One, are you coming from a far distance or from somewhere near here?” The bhiksu replied, “I come from the Eastern Country.” The wealthy man asked him, “For what business have you come here?” The bhiksu said in reply, “I came to Upagupta with the intention of hearing the Dharma. 
But Upagupta asked me to be provisor to the monks. 
I do not know who are zealous and who are not zealous among the people of Mathura.” The wealthy man said, ‘You need not worry about this matter. 
I shall be the provisor in your stead. 
I shall provide all the monks with all their food, drink, clothes, and medicine.” Then the bhiksu and the wealthy man jointly provided food and drink and other things as offerings to the monks for the three months of the retreat during the rainy season. 
The bhiksu 160The Causes of Upagupta’s Disciples contemplated the merits he had achieved and attained arhatship. 
So he took a chip and put it into the cave. 
The Causes of the Artisan There was then in the Eastern Country a good man who became a monk in the Buddha-dharma, and as he was a good artisan, wherever he went the monks would ask him to construct monas­ teries and build houses. 
As he did so every day without ceasing, he was greatly tired of the task. 
So he thought to himself, “I wish to sit in meditation and contemplation. 
The Buddha has said that all bhiksus should sit in meditation to cultivate the Way and should not be lazy and indolent.” And he reflected, “Who can preach the Dharma to edify me?” Then he heard that in the country of Mathura there was a bhiksu by the name of Upagupta whom the Buddha had predicted would be foremost among the disciples in edifying others. 
So he went to him, worshipped at his feet, and said, “Most Virtuous One, the Buddha has entered nirvana, and you, Most Virtuous One, are performing the Buddha’s functions. 
May you preach the Dharma to me.” Upagupta saw that this was the monk’s last reincarnation and that he feared rebirth. 
He contemplated again why he did not obtain the Holy Way and saw that it was because causes were incomplete. 
What were the expe­ dients by which to make them complete? 
He saw that if the man acted again as an artisan, the causes would be complete. 
But he saw that the man was extremely tired of it and did not wish to act as an artisan. 
Upagupta said to him, “Good man, if you follow my instruc­ tions, I shall preach the Dharma to you.” “Let it be so,” was the reply. 
And so he got up early, took up his alms bowl, and went into the country. 
There was then a wealthy man coming out of the country of Mathura. 
He met the bhiksu on the way, whom he had never seen before; it was the first time he had seen him. 
I shall make various preparations for the bhiksus.” Then the bhiksu and the wealthy man intended to build a monastery at a place where there was no monastery. 
Working together with the wealthy man, the bhiksu held a rope to measure the ground. 
Before the rope touched the ground, he contemplated the merits he had achieved therefrom and got rid of all passions. 
After having attained arhatship, he took a chip and threw it into the cave. 
The Causes of Food and Drink In the country of Mathura there was a good man who became a monk at the place where Upagupta was, and as he was greedy for food, he could not gain the Way. 
Upagupta said to him, “I shall give you some food tomorrow.” On the following day he filled a vessel with gruel and placed it together with an empty vessel in front of him, saying, ‘You may take the food and empty the vessel.” He also said, “Cool the gruel and eat it slowly.” As the bhiksu was greedy for food, he wished to eat more. 
So he blew on the gruel to make it 162The Causes of Upagupta’s Disciples cool. 
This he did once or twice, and then he said to the upddhydya, “I have cooled it down.” Upagupta said, “Although you could cool the milk gruel, your mind is hot with the fire of desire and love. 
You should also cool the heat of your greediness and wash away the heat in your mind with the water of the contemplation of impurity. 
If you are fond of food and drink, you should consider them as if you were taking medicine.” When the bhiksu had taken all the gruel, he vomited it and filled up the empty vessel. 
Upagupta said, ‘You should eat it up.” The bhiksu said to the upddhydya, “This vomit is unclean; how can I eat it?” Upagupta said again, ‘You should now con­ template that all things are impure like snot and spittle.” Then Upagupta preached the Dharma to him, and after hearing the Dharma the bhiksu diligently practiced meditation and attained arhatship. 
He took a chip and put it into the cave. 
The Causes of Contentment with Few Desires There was a good man in southern India who became a monk in the Buddha-dharma and was contented, with few desires, taking i 65b no delight in earthly glory, never rubbing his body with ghee, never bathing in warm water, and never eating ghee, for he was always in fear of rebirth. 
As his constitution was weak in the four ele­ ments, he did not gain the Holy Way. 
He thought in his mind, “Who can preach the Dharma to me?” Then he heard that in the country of Mathura there was a bhiksu by the name of Upagupta whom the Buddha had predicted would be the foremost among his disciples in edifying others. 
So he went to him and worshipped him with hands joined palm to palm, saying, “Most Virtuous One, the Buddha has entered nirvana, and you, Most Virtuous One, are performing the Buddha’s functions. 
May you preach the Dharma to me.” Upagupta saw that it was his last reincarnation and that he feared rebirth. 
He contemplated again why he did not gain the Holy Way, and he saw that he was weak in his four elements, and so he always took delight in crudeness and simplicity and did not wish for earthly glory. 
Upagupta said to him, “Good man, you should follow my instructions, and I shall preach the Dharma to you.” “Let it be so,” was the reply. 
In order to edify him, Upagupta asked the lay supporters to prepare various foods and drinks and baths for the monks. 
He also said to a young bhiksu, “You should help this bhiksu to take a bath.” The young bhiksu then rubbed the man’s body with ghee and bathed him in warm water. 
At mealtime, different kinds of delicious food were provided for him, and the bhiksu finished all the food. 
In a few days, when his body had gained strength, Upagupta preached the Dharma to him. 
Through energetic meditation the bhiksu attained arhatship, and then he took a chip and put it into the cave. 
The Causes of the Raksasas In the country of Mathura there was a man who asked permission of his parents to become a monk. 
He went to Upagupta, and upon reaching him he worshipped at his feet and said, “Most Virtuous One, may I renounce my home to become a fully ordained bhiksu in the Buddha-dharma? 
On the way he thought, “If I reach home I might be detained and not allowed to become a monk.” Midway there was a Deva temple, and so he went in to spend the night there. 
Upagupta produced two Raksasas by his supernatural powers, one of whom carried a corpse into the temple and the other of whom went in empty-handed. 
In the temple the two of them contended for the corpse. 
One said, “I obtained this corpse.” The other one also said, “I obtained this corpse.” In this manner the two Raksasas competed with each other for the corpse without coming to a decision. 
They asked the man, ‘W ho carried this corpse into the temple?” The man reflected, “If I tell the truth, then the one who came in empty-handed will 164The Causes of Upagupta’s Disciples certainly kill me. 
If I do not tell the truth, the one who came with the corpse will kill me. 
But I would rather die than tell a lie.” So he said to the devils, “He carried it here.” The devil who came empty-handed grasped his arm and intended to eat him, but the devil who came with the corpse helped him to free himself from the grip. 
The devil again got hold of his foot and intended to eat him, and the devil who came in with the corpse again helped him to free himself from the hold. 
In this 165c manner they struggled for a long time until sunrise. 
Two days later, the man came to Upagupta, and upon reaching there he was made a monk. 
He practiced the Way diligently and attained arhatship. 
Then he took a chip and put it into the cave. 
The Causes of the Tree In the country of south India there was a good man who became a monk in the Buddha-dharma but was bound to his body by a feeling of affection. 
He rubbed his body with ghee, bathed it in warm water, and nourished it with various kinds of food and drink. 
As he was so much attached to his body, he could not attain the Holy Way. 
So he thought, ‘W ho can preach the Dharma to me?” When he heard that in the country of Mathura there was a bhiksu named Upagupta, who had been predicted by the Buddha to be the foremost among his disciples in edifying others, he went to Upagupta in the country of Mathura. 
Upagupta then brought him to the mountains, where he produced a big tree by his super­ natural powers, and he said, “You should climb up this big tree.” The bhiksu then climbed up the tree. 
Under the tree a large pit one thousand cubits in depth and width was also produced by miracu­ lous power. 
Upagupta said to the bhiksu again, “Put down your feet one by one.” The bhiksu accepted the instruction and put down his feet. 
He said again, “Let go of one hand.” This the bhiksu did as he was instructed. 
He said again, “Let go of the other hand.” The bhiksu said in reply, “If I let go of the other hand, I shall drop into the pit and die.” Upagupta said, “You have agreed with me that you will accept all my instructions. 
Why do you not accept my words now?” At that moment the affection of the bhiksu for his body van­ ished, and when he let go his hand and dropped down, he did not see any pit under the tree. 
Upagupta preached the Dharma to him, and he diligently practiced meditation. 
Thereupon he attained the fruition of arhatship. 
Then he took a chip and put it into the cave. 
166a The Causes of a Miser In the country of Mathura there was a good man who became a monk at the place where Upagupta was, but he was a great miser. 
Due to his stinginess he could not gain the Holy Way. 
You should also offer the Dharma to others. Even the food and drink you have received in your begging bowl should be given to others as alms. 
If you cannot give extensively, you should share the food the moment you receive it with the two persons sitting beside you.” On account of his illiberality, the man did not share his food with others for one day and even for two days. 
The two persons who sat beside him were both arhats. 
Only on the third day, when he had received a large amount of food and drink, did he share it with the two persons. 
Then Upagupta edified him by preaching the Dharma to him, and through meditation he attained arhatship. 
Then he took a chip and put it into the cave. 
166The Causes of Upagupta’s Disciples The Causes of the Ghost Once in the country of Mathura there was a good man who became a monk at the place where Upagupta was, but he was fond of sleeping. 
Upagupta preached the Dharma to him and brought him to a forest, where he fell asleep in the course of practicing medita­ tion under a tree. 
In order to frighten him, Upagupta transformed himself into a ghost with seven heads. 
Holding the branch of a tree, he suspended the ghost’s body in the air before the bhiksu, who was startled from sleep and had a great fear of it. 
He rose from his seat and returned to his original place, but Upagupta ordered him to go back to the place of meditation. 
The bhiksu said, “ Upadhyaya, in that forest there is a ghost with seven heads holding the branch of a tree and suspending its body in the air before me in a very fearful manner.” Upagupta said, “Bhiksu, there is nothing fearful in the ghost. 
What is most fearful is the mind of sleepiness. 
If a bhiksu is killed by a ghost, he will not enter rebirth, but if he is killed by sleepiness, he will experience endless birth and death.” The bhiksu then returned to the place of meditation and saw the ghost again. 
As he feared the ghost, he dared not sleep. 
Then the bhiksu diligently practiced meditation and attained arhatship. 
So he took a chip and put it into the cave. 
The Causes of Being Bitten by Vermin Once in the country of Mathura there was a good man who became a monk at the place where Upagupta was. 
Upagupta preached the i66b Dharma to him, and the bhiksu practiced meditation diligently with the intention of just gaining the fruition of a srota-apanna. 
As he was not indolent in his practice, he might be able to rid himself of the fear of being born in the evil ways of existence and then would be reborn seven times in the heavens and seven times among human beings. 
Then, after having enjoyed the bliss of men and heavenly beings, he would enter nirvana. 
Having perceived his intention, Upagupta went with him to the country of Mathura to collect alms from house to house. 
They came to the house of a candala , whose son had gained the fruition of a srotaapanna but suffered from a nasty disease; his whole body was bitten by vermin, and he had foul breath. 
Upagupta said to his disciple, “Look at this child. 
Though he is a srota-apanna, he still suffers such pains.” And he uttered the following stanza: 
Born in the caste of candalas, Attached to the pleasures of the three realms, With vermin biting his body, He loved pleasure freely, and so He fell into the pains of the three realms. Look at this son of the Buddha. He has gained the Way And was able to overthrow the three evil ways; But as he was idle and thoughtless, He was born in the caste of candalas. You should not cherish such an idea But should meditate upon the pains of the three realms. 
The bhiksu inquired, saying, ‘W hat were the deeds by which this person attained the stage of a srota-apanna but has to suffer such pains?” Upagupta said in reply, “In a previous life, he became a monk in the Dharma o f Sakyamuni Buddha, and he was a karmadana while the monks were sitting in meditation. 
Among the monks there was an arhat who suffered from such a malignant disease that he scratched noisily. 
So he thought to himself, ‘I have now attained the fruition of a srotaapanna, and there is no need to be energetic any more.’ The child today is the karmadana of the past. 
As he scolded the arhat, took him out, and sent him to the place for candalas, he is now receiving the retribution.” When the bhiksu heard about this matter, he had deep fear and cultivated devotion diligently, whereby he attained the frui­ tion of arhatship. 
Upagupta also converted the candala’s son, who abhorred the Kamadhatu and attained the fruition of an andgamin. 
Thereupon he passed away and was reborn in the five Pure Dwelling heavens. 
A chip was taken and put into the cave. 
166c The Causes of Contemplation on a Skeleton In the country of Mathura, there was a good man who became a monk at the place where Upagupta was. 
Upagupta taught him the contemplation of impurity and so on, and by the contemplation of impurity he suppressed his passions so that they could not arise. 
Upagupta said, “Good man, you should be energetic; do not be idle and negligent.” said in reply, “I have done what is to be done and have attained arhatship.” Upagupta said, “Good man, have you seen the woman wine seller named Stonecutter who lives in the domain of the country of Gandhara? 
This woman claims to have gained the Way, just as you do, and says that her passions have been cut off while they are not cut off. 
This is undue self-conceit. 
You should observe whether this woman has gained the Way or not.” The bhiksu said, “I cannot see her.” He wished to go to that country, and his teacher gave him permission. 
He rose early in the morning, put on his robe, carried his alms bowl, and entered the village to collect food. 
The wine selling woman took out some food and intended to give it to the bhiksu, but at the sight of the woman his mind was excited by lustful desire. 
He took some grits and butter out of his own alms bowl to give them to the woman. 
At the sight of him, the woman’s mind was also excited by lustful desire, and she smiled, revealing her teeth. 
Before touching her body or even exchanging a word with her, the bhiksu’s mind was excited. 
But when he saw the woman smiling and revealing her teeth, he contemplated im­ purity and perceived that her whole body was nothing but a skel­ eton. 
After making this contemplation, he attained arhatship. 
Having done what was to be done, he uttered the following stanza: 
An idiot is ignorant; On seeing external beauty, He craves it with attachment. A man who has wisdom Perceives the internal ugliness And may obtain liberation. The ignorant one is bound By outward appearance. One who is wise is not bound By external appearance. 
The bhiksu returned to Upagupta in the country of Mathura, and Upagupta asked him, “Did you see that woman?” said in reply, “I saw her according to the Dharma.” Then he took a chip and put it into the cave. 
170The Causes of Upagupta’s Disciples The Causes of Avarice i67a In the country of Mathura there was a householder who was enormously rich at the beginning but gradually became poor after­ wards, having only five hundred silver coins in his possession. 
He thought in his mind, “I wish to become a monk in order to cultivate the Way in the Buddha-dharma. 
In case I need medicine and robes after becoming a monk, I may use this money to purchase them.” So he went to become a monk at the place of Upagupta and ordered his servant to guard the money every day. 
Upagupta said, “Good man, according to the Dharma of becoming a monk, one should be contented and with little desire. 
What is the use of these five hundred silver coins? 
You should offer them to the Sangha.” The bhiksu said in reply, “This is the money for me to buy medicine and the three robes.” Upagupta asked him to go into his room, where he produced by miraculous power one thousand silver coins, and said to him, “This money is given to you for buying medicine and the three robes.” When the bhiksu heard this, he gave up his five hundred silver coins as alms to the Sangha. 
Upagupta preached the Dharma to him. 
The bhiksu then practiced meditation dili­ gently and attained arhatship, and so he took a chip and put it into the cave. 
The Causes of a Bamboo Brush In the country of Mathura there was a good man who became a monk to cultivate the Way at the place where Upagupta was. 
Upagupta preached the Dharma to him, and the bhiksu practiced meditation diligently, attaining the fruition of a srota-apanna. 
So he thought in his mind, “I have overturned the evil ways of existence and have done what ought to be done.” Upagupta said, “Good man, you should be energetic; do not be idle and negligent.” The bhiksu said in reply, “I have already attained the fruition of a srota-apanna and have overturned the evil ways of existence. 
I shall not be idle and negligent again but shall be reborn seven times in the heavens and seven times among human beings to enjoy the bliss of men and heavenly beings, and then I shall enter nirvana.” Wishing to arouse his fear , Upagupta rose early in the morning, put on his robe, took up his alms bowl, and went with the bhiksu to the country of Mathura to collect food from house to house. 
They came to the house of a candala, whose son was a srota-apanna but suffered from a malignant ulcer. 
The physician said to him, “You should brush the ulcer with a bamboo brush to make it bleed, and I shall apply medicine to the wound.” Upon hearing this advice, the man brushed his body often every day with i67b a bamboo brush. 
On seeing this sight, Upagupta showed it to his disciple and said, “Good man, did you see this srota-apanna suffer­ ing from such pains?” The bhiksu said in reply, “Upadhyaya, what were the deeds that produced such pains?” Upagupta said in reply, “This person became a monk in the /_ Dharma of right enlightenment of Sakyamuni Buddha. 
There was then a bhiksu who acted as a karmadana to supervise those who were sitting in meditation. 
Among the monks there was an arhat who came to sit in meditation at the place for meditation; and as he suffered from scabies, he scratched himself. 
The karmadana said to him, ‘Most Virtuous One, why don’t you take a bamboo brush to brush your body so that you can make a noise?’ He took him by the hand and led him out of the place for meditation, saying, You ought to go to the house of a candala and not disturb the monks!’ The arhat said in reply, ‘Good man, you should be energetic; do not be idle and negligent so that you suffer the pains o f birth and death.’ Upon hearing these words, the karmadana repented before the Most Virtuous One, and when he had repented he attained the fruition of a srota-apanna. 
The bhiksu then thought in his mind, ‘I have overturned the evil ways of existence, and there is no need to be energetic any more.’ ” Upagupta said to his disciple, “The karmadana at the place of meditation in a previous life is now this candala’s son. 
Because he said to the arhat in his former life, ‘Why don’t you brush your body with a bamboo brush?’ he is now receiving this retribution that 172The Causes of Upagupta’s Disciples requires him to brush his body with a bamboo brush today. 
In his former life he also said to the Most Virtuous One, “You should go to the house of a candala.’ Thus he was born in the caste of candalas in his present life.” When Upagupta’s disciple heard these words, he had fear in his mind. 
He practiced meditation diligently and attained arhatship. 
Upagupta also preached the Dharma to the candala’s son, who abhorred the Kamadhatu. 
He attained the fruition of an anagamin, whereupon he passed away and was reborn in the five Pure Dwelling heavens. 
A chip was taken and put into the cave. 
The Causes of Parental Sentiment In the country of Mathura there was a householder to whom a son was born; but the child died at the age of one. 
He was reborn in the house of another householder and died at the age of two. 
He was again reborn in the house of still another householder and died at the age of three. 
In this manner he was reborn in a fourth, fifth, sixth, and seventh place. 
At the seventh place he had lived to the age o f seven when a thug kidnapped him and took him to the mountains. 
Upagupta saw in contemplation that this was the last reincarnation of the child, and in order to convert him he went to the mountains and sat cross-legged. 
There he produced by miraculous power the four divisions of troops—elephants, horses, chariots, and footmen. 
As the thug was frightened, he went to Upagupta who, withdrawing his miraculous power, preached the Dharma to him. 
Upon hearing the Dharma, the thug perceived the four noble truths and became a monk. 
He practiced the Way in the Buddha-dharma and handed over the child to Upagupta. 
Upagupta asked the child to renounce his home and preached the Dharma to edify him. 
Through the diligent practice of meditation the child attained arhatship. 
Having gained sainthood, he contemplated and saw that his parents were in great distress. 
So he returned to his parents and said, “Parents, do not be distressed.” On seeing that their son had 167c come back, the parents were greatly delighted. 
The child arhat preached the Dharma to his parents until they attained the frui­ tion of srota-apannas. 
Then he went to his sixth parents and said to them, “Parents, do not be worried. 
I was your son, once born and reared by you, and died at the age of six.” His parents were greatly delighted to hear this, and when he had preached the Dharma to them, they attained the fruition o f srota-apannas. 
In this manner he preached the Dharma and edified his fifth, fourth, third, second, and first parents until all of them attained the fruitions of srota-apannas. 
Then he took a chip and put it into the cave. 
The Causes of the River In the country of Mathura there was a good man who became a monk at the place where Upagupta was, and as Upagupta preached the Dharma to him he cultivated himself diligently and attained the four stages of dhyana. 
When he reached the first stage of dhyana, he had the impression of being a srota-apanna; at the second stage of dhyana, he had the impression of being a sakrdagamin; at the third stage of dhyana, he had the impression of being an anagamin) and at the fourth stage of dhyana, he had the impression of being an arhat. 
The bhiksu was greatly frightened when he saw that the robbers were coming to kill him, and then he thought, “I am not an arhat. 
If I were an arhat, I would have no fear. 
I may be an anagamin.” 174The Causes of Upagupta’s Disciples Among the merchants there was the daughter of a house­ holder who had lost her companion and had no friend. 
Upon seeing the bhiksu, she worshipped at his feet and said to him, “May the holy person take me along and travel with me.” The bhiksu said, “The World-honored One has made a rule that should not travel with a woman alone. 
You may follow me at a distance as far as if I were a lion.” Upagupta then produced a big river, and the bhiksu, intending to cross the river, waded through the water at the lower reaches of the stream, while the woman waded through the water at the upper reaches. 
When the bhiksu saw that the woman was nearly drowning in the middle of the river, he thought, “The World-honored One permitted a monk to drag a woman out of the water when she was about to be drowned; he does not commit an offense thereby.” Having thought so, he pulled her out of the water, and when the woman had been pulled out, a lustful desire was aroused in his mind. 
Then he thought again, “I am not 168a an anagamin. 
An anagamin is free from lustful desire. 
I may be a sakrddgamin or a srota-dpanna.” When the woman was brought ashore, he thought, “Now I wish to cast away all the disciplinary rules to cohabit with this woman.” Upagupta withdrew his miraculous power and stood before the bhiksu, saying, “Good man, are you an arhat?” At that time the bhiksu repented in the presence of Upagupta, who preached the Dharma to him. 
The bhiksu practiced meditation diligently and attained arhatship, and then he took a chip and put it into the cave. 
The Causes of a Whim in Meditation In the country of Mathura there was the son of a householder. 
The bhiksu accepted the instruc­ tion and went to the mountains, where he sat cross-legged under a tree. 
Before becoming a monk, the bhiksu had a wife with regular features, and when he was sitting in meditation, he thought of his former wife. 
Upagupta transformed himself into the form of the bhiksu’s ex-wife and stood before him. 
Upon seeing the transfor­ mation, the bhiksu said to her, “Why did you come?” The woman said in reply, “You called for me.” The bhiksu said, “I was sitting here and never said anything. 
How could I have called for you?” The woman said in reply, ‘You called for me mentally while in meditation for enlightenment though not orally.” The woman then uttered the following stanza: 
A shameful thing is of two kinds, One is oral and one is in the mind. Of these two kinds, A mental shame is worse. Without awareness in the mind, There could be no oral utterance. 
Upagupta withdrew his miraculous power and returned to his own form, and standing before the bhiksu he uttered the following stanza: 
If you were not delighted To look at that woman, And did not wish to see her, You would not think of her. If you have relinquished desire, You should take no such delight. What one has vomited One should never eat again. 
Upagupta further preached the Dharma , who practiced meditation diligently and attained arhatship. 
Then he uttered the following stanza: 
The upadhyaya has seen reality And has edified me. As I venerated him, I have gained the Holy Way. Then he took a chip and put it into the cave. 
176The Causes of Upagupta’s Disciples The Causes o f the Cowherds i68b Once Upagupta was going to the country of Central India, and on the way there he saw five hundred cowherds. 
Upon seeing Upagupta, the five hundred cowherds went to him, and Upagupta preached the Dharma to them. 
When they had heard the Dharma, they perceived the four noble truths. 
Thus they offered their cows to Upagupta and became monks at his place, practicing the Way. 
Upagupta preached the Dharma to them, and all of them attained arhatship. 
They took chips and put them into the cave. 
The Causes of the Transformed Person In the country of Mathura there was a good man who became a monk at the place where Upagupta was in order to practice the Way. 
Upagupta preached the Dharma to him, and after having heard the Dharma, he reached the four stages of worldly dhyana. 
At the first stage of dhyana, he had the impression of being a srota-apanna; at the second stage of dhyana, he had the impres­ sion of being a sakrdagamin; at the third stage o f dhyana, he had the impression of being an anagamin; and at the fourth stage of dhyana, he had the impression of being an arhat, saying, “I have done what is to be done.” And so he became idle and indolent and was no longer energetic. 
Upagupta said to him, “You should be energetic; do not be lazy and negligent.” The bhiksu said in reply, “I have done what is to be done and have even attained arhatship.” Upagupta asked him to go to the mountains to sit in medita­ tion, and he also transformed himself into another bhiksu in order to sit with him in meditation and give him advice. 
the transformed bhiksu taught him the methods of meditation and also asked him, ‘W ho accepted you to become a monk, and who is your upadhyaya?” The bhiksu said in reply, “Upagupta is my upadhyaya, and he accepted me as a monk.” The transformed bhiksu said, “It is a great merit for you to have Upagupta, a Buddha without the characteristic marks o f a Buddha, for your teacher.” He also inquired, “What scriptures are you reading and reciting? 
From the Sutras, the Vinaya, and the matrka have you gained anything of the Buddha-dharma?” The bhiksu answered, saying, “I have attained the fruition of a srotaapanna and even arhatship.” The transformed person asked again, “By which way did you attain them?” The bhiksu said in reply, “I attained them by the worldly way.” The transformed person said, “What you have attained is but the way of worldly truth. 
You have not gained the Holy Way.” Upon hearing these words, the bhiksu was deeply vexed with grief. 
So he went to Upagupta and said to his upadhyaya, “I am but an ordinary person. 
May the upadhyaya preach the Dharma to me.” Upagupta accordingly preached the Dharma to him, and through diligent practice of meditation the bhiksu attained arhat­ ship. 
He took a chip and put it into the cave. 
The Causes of Taking No Delight in the Dwelling Place 168c In the country of Mathura there was the son of a householder. 
Not long after he had taken over the family properties, he cherished the desire to become a monk and said to his parents, “Permit me to become a monk to practice the Way.” His parents said in reply, “We have no child except you. 
We are still living, so how can you leave us behind to become a monk?” When the son heard what his parents had said he was vexed with grief, and for six days he refused to take food. 
After having become a monk, he thought to himself, “I have previously promised my parents that after becoming a monk I would go to see them frequently.” So he said to his upadhyaya that he was going to his parents. 
Wait for some time. 
I wish to know your intention, and when your intention is satisfied, you may give up the disciplinary rules.” Then he ordered him to go to the country of Mathura, and he transformed himself into the corpse of the bhiksu’s former wife being carried by four persons out of that country. 
The bhiksu was then going back to see his parents when he saw a corpse being carried out midway . 
He asked the corpse bearers, “Who is this person?” They said in reply, “This is the corpse of the wife of so-and-so, the son of a householder, who recently became a monk. 
She died of vexation and despondence. 
We are removing it to the sitavana .” Having heard this, the bhiksu went with them, wishing to see the body. 
Upagupta caused the corpse to emit many worms and blood. 
Upon seeing this sight, the bhiksu entered into the contemplation of impurity, and through diligent practice of meditation he attained arhatship. 
When he had done what was to be done, he went to Upagupta and worshipped at his feet. 
Upagupta said, “Did you see your wife?” He answered, saying, “I saw her in accordance with the Dharma.” Then he took a chip and put it into the cave. 
The Causes of a Monk’s Pewter Staff In the country of Mathura there was a good man who became a monk at the place where Upagupta was. 
Upagupta preached the Dharma to him, and after having heard the Dharma the bhiksu gained the four stages of worldly dhyana. 
The bhiksu thought to himself, “I have done what is to be done. 
There is no need to be energetic any more.” Upagupta said to him, “Good man, you should be energetic; do not be lazy and negligent.” The bhiksu said in reply, “Upadhyaya, I have done what is to be done and have attained arhatship.” i69a The upadhyaya ordered him to rise early in the morning, dress himself in his robes, hold his alms bowl, take up his pewter staff, and go into the presence of the monks before entering into the country. 
There were then five hundred upasakas following behind him with food and drink in their hands. 
Upon seeing them, the bhiksu knew that they respected him, and he claimed to be a man of superior merits. 
Thus he had a feeling of self-conceit, and then he reflected, “I am not an arhat. 
May you preach the Dharma to me.” Upagupta accordingly preached the Dharma to him, and through the practice of meditation the bhiksu attained arhatship. 
Then he took a chip and put it into the cave. 
The Causes of Sudarsana In the country of Kasmira there was a bhiksu by the name of Sudarsana who had gained the four stages of worldly dhyana and was esteemed by the Naga king. 
Then a drought with scorching heat occurred in the country of Kasmira, and all the people asked the bhiksu to pray for rain. 
Upagupta reflected, “I wish to edify Sudarsana, and it is time now.” For the sake of expedient edifica­ tion, Upagupta caused that there should be no rain for twelve years, and when the heretics saw this phenomenon they said to the people, “There will be rain after the lapse of twelve years.” The people, being worried and distressed to hear these words, went to Upagupta and asked him to pray for rain. 
Upagupta said, “I should not pray for rain. 
In the country of Kasmira there is a bhiksu by the name of Sudarsana, and you may go to beseech him.” Then the people of Mathura sent a messenger to Sudarsana, asking him to pray for rain. 
As Sudarsana possessed the mirac­ ulous powers of the four stages of dhyana, he went to the country of Mathura by divine power, and the people asked him to 180The Causes of Upagupta’s Disciples pray for rain. 
Then Sudarsana prayed for rain, which poured down on the earth, filling the whole of Jambudvipa. 
The people thought, “Since the bhiksu Sudarsana was able to cause such a torrential rain, he is superior to Upagupta.” At that time, Sudarsana, followed by many people, was going out of the country of Mathura, while Upagupta, followed by a few people, was coming into the country of Mathura. 
When the bhiksu Sudarsana saw that many people were following him while only a few people were following Upagupta, he had a feeling o f selfconceit, and then he reflected, “I am not an arhat. 
An arhat should have no self-conceit.” So he went to the place o f Upagupta, and upon arriving there he worshipped at his feet and said, “The Buddha has entered nirvana. 
Most Virtuous One, you are perform­ ing the Buddha’s functions. 
May you preach the Dharma to me.” Upagupta said, “You are not keeping the precepts in the right way as taught by the Buddha, and you claimed superiority over me, giving rise to arrogance and self-conceit. 
Where did the Buddha say that he allowed his bhiksus to pray for rain?” Upagupta preached the Dharma to him, and upon hearing the Dharma the bhiksu diligently practiced meditation and attained arhatship. 
So he took a chip and put it into the cave. 
169b The Causes of the Fief for a Monastery Upagupta constructed not one but a hundred monasteries in the country of Mathura. 
At that time the king of Mathura was named Citraketu, a man who had no faith but troubled and disturbed the monks as well as their attendants and almsgivers. 
Then the innumerable monks together with their attendants and alms­ givers went to Upagupta and told him about this matter. 
I must go in person.” By miraculous power, Upagupta suddenly disappeared in a wink from Natabhatika Monastery and reached Kukkuta Monastery in the city of Pataliputra. 
Upon hearing that Upagupta was coming, King Asoka deco­ rated the frontier with incense and flowers, arranged dancers and musicians with various kinds of adornment, and went with his ministers and people of the country to welcome Upagupta. 
The reigning King Citraketu of that country has no faith but troubles and disturbs the Buddha-dharma. 
It befits Your Majesty to ask him to protect the Buddha-dharma.” King Asoka then ordered his minister Radhagupta, saying, Y ou will dispatch a man immediately to kill that king.” Upagupta said to King , “Do not kill that king. 
Let Your Majesty just instruct him not to trouble and disturb the Buddha-dharma again hence­ forward.” King Asoka then wrote a letter with his own hands, marked it with his teeth, and handed it to a Raksasa. 
After taking the letter, the Raksasa instantly reached that country. 
King Citraketu received the letter respectfully and read it, and after reading the letter he struck a drum and made an announcement that thence­ forth all people in the country should not trouble or disturb the Buddha-dharma. 
Then King Asoka prepared various kinds of offerings, and after having accepted the offerings Upagupta suddenly disappeared from Kukkuta Monastery and returned to Natabhatika Monastery. 
182The Causes of Upagupta’s Disciples The Causes of Dhitika Upagupta contemplated whether Dhitika was born or not and saw i69c that he was not yet bom. 
Thenceforth he went to the place of parents every day. 
One day he went to their house with many b h i k s u s , another day he went there with only two b h i k s u s , and on still another day he went alone. 
The householder, seeing that Upagupta came alone to his house, asked him, “Holy man, why do you not have any disciples following you?” The elder said in reply, “I have no disciple.” The householder said, “I take delight in living at home and would not like to become a monk. 
If a son is born to me, I shall give him to you, Most Virtuous One, to be your disciple.” Then a son was born to the householder, but he died shortly afterwards. 
When the second son was born, he also died soon. 
When the third son was born, he was named Dhitika and given to Upagupta to become a monk. 
Upagupta made him a fully ordained monk. 
At the moment of performing the first k a r m a n , he attained the fruition of a s r o t a a p a n n a , and at the moment of performing the fourth k a r m a n , he attained arhatship. 
This cave, which is eighteen cubits in length and twelve in breadth, is already filled up with chips four inches long. 
Now I wish to enter nirvana; you should safeguard and protect this p a r in ir v a n a ; Dharma-p i t a k a .” Seven days later, when Upagupta was about to enter nirvana, various heavenly beings made the matter known to all the people in the whole of Jambudvlpa, among whom there were a hundred thousand arhats, while harmonious learners, energetic ordinary bhiksus, and white-clad lay people were innumerable and count­ less. 
When the time arrived for the nirvana of Upagupta, he rose up into the air by supernatural powers and made different kinds of miraculous transformations in the postures of walking, stand­ ing, sitting, and lying down. 
When he was in the samadhi, various colors—blue, yellow, red, and white—issued from his body. 
When water flowed out from the upper part of his body, fire spurted from the lower part; when water flowed out from the lower part, fire spurted from the upper part. 
With various divine powers he aroused a feeling of great happiness in the minds of his fellow monks and all human and heavenly beings and enabled them to gain emancipation. 
Then he entered nirvana, like a fire quenched by water. 
The chips collected were used to cremate his body, and a stupa was built to which offerings were made. 
At the time of Upagupta’s nirvana, a thousand arhats also sacrificed their lives and entered nirvana. 
When Dhitika had 170a safeguarded and protected the Dharma-pifo&a, he also entered nirvana. 
This is the end of the Causes o f Upagupta. 
The right Dharma always abides For a long time without dying. The stupa containing sariras Will also last like this. May the people who uphold the Dharma Enjoy happiness illimitable. May they live in the same way, Always abiding and imperishable. 
From the “Causes of King Asoka” up to the nirvana of Upagupta, there are altogether thirty-one hundred verses, each consisting of thirty-two syllables in the foreign . 
The number of disciples is twenty-eight persons. 

xviiiTHE COLLECTION FOR THE PROPAGATION AND CLARIFICATION OF BUDDHISM VOLUME I Compiled by Shi Sengyou at Jianchu Temple in Yangdu during the Liang dynastyFascicle One Preface The awakening is as boundless as the ocean. 
The wisdom is as completely illuminating as a mirror. 
The law dominates beyond the world in which we cling to language; therefore it created the Duke of Zhou and Confucius, just as if fashioning clay into ﬁgures. 
Nevertheless, the greater the Way is, the more difﬁcult it is to believe; the higher the tone of the music, the fewer there are who can sing it harmoniously. 
Mount Sumeru is lofty and steep, where very strong winds (Skt. 
Treasures accumulate in a depository and then theft occurs. 
Once upon a time, when the Tathāgata resided in this world, his ediﬁcation shook the trichiliocosm, and yet the four devils harbored grudges and the six masters embraced poisonous thoughts;1 not to speak of today, the last phase of the period of the Semblance Dharma. 
Almost ﬁve hundred years have passed since the time the Great Dharma reached the east. 
Those who have right views propagate and support , and those who are evil and deluded slander . 
As for perverse Confucianists who abide by literature, they keep their distance [from Buddhism] because it is considered heathen. 
3 The hedan bird screeches in the night , yet it cannot split the darkness for broad daylight. 
This will cause those of weak and inﬁrm natures to follow false debates and go astray for a long time, and those who have disordered logic to pursue heretical doctrines and indulge in everlasting . 
This is why it is easy to fall into hell and difﬁcult to ascend to the pure state. 
I, Sengyou, am of superﬁcial learning, but I am deeply bent on propagating and guarding . 
Thereupon, making use of short intervals of medical treatment or spare moments while dwelling in the mountains, I have compiled intelligent writings of ancient and modern times and collected polished essays by Buddhist clergy and laypeople. 
In addition, among written records and literature by distinguished scholars of former ages, I have compiled all those that are advantageous as well. 
They are classiﬁed and arranged in fourteen fascicles. 
The Way is propagated by people, and the teaching is clariﬁed by literature. 
Therefore, it is called the Collection for the Propagation and Clariﬁcation . 
At the same time, led by my shallow thought, I append my own discussion at the end. 
However, my learning is solitary and uncultivated and my knowledge is limited. 
I am ashamed of being narrow-minded. 
Wellversed expert gentlemen, please grant your aid to enlarge this compilation. 
Mouzi’s the Elucidation of Delusions , or the Exposition by Mouzi Bo, Governor of Cangwu Prefecture4 Mouzi has already studied the Classics, commentaries on them, and all philosophers’ works. 
Regardless of the size or length, there was no book he did not like. 
Although he was not delighted with books on the art of war, he still read them. 
He read books on the immortals and immortality, but restrained himself and never believed ; he considered them to be preposterous. 
In the time after Emperor Ling had passed away, the world was in turmoil. 
Only Jiaozhou was relatively peaceful. 
People of the heterodoxy moved en masse from the north to settle there. 
Many practiced the art of the immortals, abstaining from grain to prolong their life spans. 
There were many contemporary people who learned . 
Mouzi always rebuked them by the Five Classics. 
None among the Daoists and practitioners of the heterodox arts dared respond to . 
compared this with the case where Meng Ke drove off Yang Zhu and Mo Di.5 Before this, Mouzi ﬂed with his mother to Jiaozhi . 
At the age of twenty-six he returned to Cangwu and took a wife. 
The governor heard that Mouzi abided by learning, and visited him to ask him to become a civil ofﬁcial. 
At that time, was just in the prime of his youth, and had intensely set his heart on learning. 
He did not accept the offer after all. 
During this period, all the provinces and prefectures were suspicious of each other and isolated from one another, without communication. 
Since had profound learning and great knowledge, the governor [of Cangwu prefecture] wanted to send him as a diplomatic envoy to pay homage to Jingzhou . 
Mouzi believed that while it is easy to decline honor and rank, it is difﬁcult to shirk a mission. 
As it happened, the regional governor of the province Mouzi was a well-educated recluse and summoned him. 
Again Mouzi feigned illness and excused himself. 
5 A younger brother of the regional governor, the governor of Yuzhang prefecture , had been murdered by the Leader of Court Gentlemen Ze Rong . 
The regional governor then planned to send the Commandant of Cavalry Liu Yan, who commanded troops and who was about to head to . 
was afraid that would provoke reciprocal suspicion from the outer world and the troops would not be able to proceed. 
So he asked Mouzi, “My younger brother was killed by a rebel. 
My great indignation about this, [as his brother who shares] the same ﬂesh and bones, arises from the bottom of my heart. 
I am about to send the Commandant of Cavalry Liu there, I am afraid that the outer world is in turmoil and travelers cannot get through. 
Now I would like you to oblige us by giving your consent to going to Lingling and Guiyang and to making their roads available for our passage. 
At this point, his mother suddenly passed away and he was not able to make the trip. 
Therefore, he ﬁnds approval as noble.” Then Mouzi had the earnest intention the Buddhist Way, and concurrently studied Laozi’s Five Thousand Words . 
He took in the profound subtle meanings as if they were wine and drink, and played on the Five Classics as if they were the Chinese zither and the reed organ. 
Many common people condemned him, thinking that he had gone against the Five Classics and turned to a heterodox way. 
Even if he wished to engage these people in disputation, it was not the Way. 
Even if he wanted to keep silent, he was unable to do so. 
Consequently, he spent time with brush and ink to brieﬂy cite the words of the sages and wise ones in order to make a testament of with explanations. 
This is called Mouzi’s the Elucidation of Delusions . 
A person asked, “From whom was the Buddha born? 
Does he or does he not have ancestors and a country ? 
What does he look like?” Mouzi replied, “You have big questions. 
I have heard the state of the Buddha’s transformations. 
It is impossible to record his chronicle, since he accumulated moral conduct for several hundreds of billions of years. 
Nevertheless, when he came into [the existence in which he would become] the Buddha, he was born in India, in the provisional form of the son of , the queen of King Śuddhodana. 
Once, while taking a midday nap, she had a dream that she rode upon a white, six-tusked elephant. She was very delighted and accordingly felt that she had become with child. 
On the eighth day of the fourth month, was born from the right armpit of his mother. 
He landed upon the ground, took seven steps forward, and said, raising his right arm, ‘There is no one in Heaven and Earth who goes beyond me.’ At that time, Heaven and Earth quaked tremendously and the palace became bright all over. 
On the same day, a servant of the royal family also gave birth to a child, and a white horse in the stable bore a white colt. 
The king instructed them to always attend the prince. 
“The prince had thirty-two major marks and eighty minor marks of physical excellence. 
He was one zhang and six chi tall, and his body was of a golden color all over. 
He had a protuberance on the top of his head. 
His jaws were just like those of a lion. 
His tongue [was so long that it] could cover his face. 
His palms had the pattern of a thousandspoked wheel. 
The light radiating from the top of his head illuminated everything for ten thousand li. 
“When was seventeen years old, his the king, chose as consort a girl from a neighboring state. 
Whenever the prince 7 seated himself, he moved his seat away from her. 
When he slept, he did not share a bed with her. 
The Way of Heaven is, quite evident; yin and yang had relations . 
Consequently she conceived a son, who was born six years later. 
The king regarded the prince as invaluable and extraordinary, and he built palaces for him and arranged female entertainers and precious amusements in a row in front of him. 
But the prince did not wish for worldly pleasure; his intention lay in morality. 
“At midnight on the eighth day of the fourth month of the year [the prince] turned nineteen years old. He called Chandaka, had him put the bit and bridle on Kaṇṭhaka, and mounted the horse. 
Spiritual beings helped them, lifting them up, and ﬂew out of the palace. 
“The next day were found empty and no one knew where was. 
There was none among the king, the ofﬁcials, and the people who did not sob, . 
They pursued and caught up with him in a ﬁeld. 
The king said , ‘Before you were born, I prayed and asked the gods . 
Now I already have you, you who are just like a precious stone or a jade tablet. 
What are you going to do?’ The prince replied, ‘All things are impermanent; any existence will pass away. 
I would like to learn the way and liberate all sentient beings in the ten directions.’ The king realized that was steady and ﬁrm. 
So the king rose and returned . 
The prince promptly departed. 
He contemplated the Way for six years, and ﬁnally attained buddhahood. 
There are altogether twelve kinds of scriptures he authored, eight hundred and forty million fascicles in all. 
Among them, a large fascicle contains less than ten thousand words and a small fascicle consists of more than a thousand words. 
The Buddha gave the teaching all over the world and liberated the people. 
Accordingly, on the ﬁfteenth day of the second month, he entered nirvana. 
“His teaching and precepts continuously exist. 
If we follow [the teaching and precepts] and are capable of practicing them, we will be able to attain wuwei as well, and happiness will be passed on to later generations.8 “Those who observe the ﬁve precepts have six puriﬁcation days in a month. 
On the day of puriﬁcation, one concentrates his or her mind, repents, and turns over a new leaf. 
Śramaṇas observe two hundred and ﬁfty precepts and have puriﬁcation every day. 
Their precepts are not what laymen (Skt. upāsaka) are not able to learn. 
Their proper deportment and course of action are not different from those of the classical rites of antiquity. 
Throughout the day and night, they talk about the Way and recite sutras, and do not take part in worldly affairs. 
What is the meaning of ‘buddha’?” Mouzi replied, “The word buddha is a posthumous title, just as the Three Augusts are called gods and the Five Thearchs are called sages . 
The Buddha is the founder of morals and the originator of divinities. 
The term buddha means awakened. 
is beyond our sensory perception; he can transform into and manifest as various entities; he sometimes appears and sometimes disappears; he can become smaller or larger; he can be a round or a square shape; he can become old or young; and he can hide and reveal himself. 
He goes through ﬁre without being burned. 
He steps on a sword without being injured. 
He can be in ﬁlth without being soiled. 
Even if he experiences a calamity, it has no effect on him. 
When he wants to travel, he ﬂies through the air, and when he sits, he emits light. 
Therefore, his title is Buddha.” A person asked, “What is called the ‘Way’? 
What category is the Way?” Mouzi replied, “The term ‘Way’ means to lead. 
It leads people to wuwei. 
Pull it forth and it does not advance. 
Pull it back and it does not retreat. 
Lift it and it does not ascend. 
Lower it and it does not descend. 
Look at it and it has no shape. 
Listen to it and it has no sound. 
Outside of the visible world is vastness, meanders beyond it. 
Therefore, it is called the Way.” A person asked, “Confucius considered the Five Classics to be the teaching of the Way, which should be recited while folding one’s hands before 9 2b one’s breast and practiced. 
Now, the Way you explain is the absolute vacancy and beyond our sensory perception. 
Why is it different from what the sage said?” Mouzi replied, “You cannot consider what you are familiar with to be important and what you are unfamiliar with to be trivial. 
You are confused by matters of the outside world and lose yourself in the mind. 
In doing something, you should not lose morality. 
It is just as in the case that one should not lose gong and shang when tuning the strings of a musical instrument.10 The Way of Heaven is regulated with the four seasons and the ways of human beings are regulated with the ﬁve cardinal virtues. 
Laozi said, ‘There was something mixed, coming into existence before Heaven and Earth. 
It can be considered as the mother of the world. 
I do not know its name, but if I dare to give a name to it, it is called the Way.’11 The Way helps people in being able to serve their parents at home, helps those who govern the state in ruling over the people, and helps those who establish themselves without the assistance of others in harnessing themselves. 
If you practice , it will ﬁll the universe. 
If you reject and do not practice it, it will disappear and yet will not leave you behind. 
You do not understand this. 
Why it is different from [the Way of which Confucius speaks]?” A person asked, “The greatest reality does not look adorned, and the highest level of expression has no polished . 
concise words that is comprehensible is elegant. 
Things that require less work and yet achieve a goal are clever. 
“Therefore, pearl and jade are rare and yet valuable, while rubble is common and worthless. 
The sages established the foundation of the Seven Classics, which consist of less than thirty thousand words and within which all issues are treated. 
The Buddhist scriptures are numbered at some ten thousand fascicles, whose words are in the hundreds of millions, which is more than one person is able to sustain. 
I think they are troublesome and unimportant.” Mouzi replied, “The reason large rivers and oceans are different from a pool of water on a street is because they are deeper and wider. 
The reason the Five Sacred Mountains are dissimilar to mounds is because they are taller and bigger. 
If are not extremely higher than mountains and hills, even a crippled sheep could climb up to the peaks. 
If are not extremely deeper than small streams, even a small boy could take a bath in the abysses. 
Qiji (a legendary ﬁne horse capable of covering a thousand li in a day) does not live in a garden, and a ﬁsh that swallowing a boat does not swim in mountain streams that are several ren deep. 
If you break open a three-cun large oyster to look for a pearl a bright moon, or if you try to ﬁnd a brood of Chinese phoenixes in a nest of thorny brambles, it will certainly be difﬁcult to ﬁnd them. 
This is because the minor cannot contain the great. 
“The Buddhist scriptures expand issues for hundreds of millions of years in the past, and still state main points for all ages. 
When the primordial substance had not yet arisen, when the primal beginning had not yet been produced,12 and when Heaven and Earth began to rise, their slightness could not be grasped, and their minuteness could not be entered. 
the Buddha governed over them all, even the vast world outside , analyzed within the profound and subtle world, and missed nothing to record about them. 
Therefore, the scriptures are counted in some ten thousand fascicles, with words in the hundreds of millions. 
Why it is unimportant? 
Even though cannot be sustained by one person, it is like the case where you drink water when arriving at a river. 
The sun and moon are both bright, but each has its own time to shine. 
Each of the twenty-eight constellations has its own place over which it rules. 
Multifarious medicinal herbs grow equally, but each of them has its own effect to heal sickness. 
Fox-fur robes are worn to protect against coldness, while linen clothes are worn to keep out heat. 
A boat and a carriage travel different routes from each other, though both of them transport travelers. 
The reason Confucius did not take the Five Classics to be perfect and further wrote the Spring and Autumn Annals and the Canon 2c of Filial Piety is simply because he wanted to propagate the means of the Way by which people may act freely. 
Even though Buddhist scriptures are numerous, result in one. 
Although the Seven Classics are different from each other, the esteem in which they hold morality, benevolence, and righteousness results in the same, too. 
Why there is something to dismiss?” A person asked, “If the Buddhist Way is the most august and the greatest, why did Yao and Shun, the Duke of Zhou, or Confucius not cultivate it? 
No expression is found in the Seven Classics. 
Master, you have already indulged in the Book of Odes and the Book of History , and have been delighted with the Book of Rites , and the Book of Music . 
Why are you also fond of the Buddhist Way and happy about this foreign method? 
How could surpass the Classics and their commentaries and be better than the sages’ works? 
If I were you, I would not accept it.” Mouzi replied, “It is not necessarily that only books of the words of Confucius are , just as medicines do not have to be prescribed by the great doctor Bian Que . 
Whatever meets righteousness is followed, and whatever heals sickness is good. 
Gentlemen extensively take all that is wholesome in order to complement themselves. 
Zigong said, ‘What necessity was there for my master to have a regular master?’13 Emperor Yao served Yin Shou, Emperor Shun served Wu Cheng, Dan studied with Lü 
,14 and Confucius studied with Lao Dan (i.e., Laozi), but none of these are found in the Seven Classics. 
Even though these four masters are sages, when compared with the Buddha they are like white deer compared with a kylin, or swallows compared with a Chinese phoenix. 
Emperor Yao and Emperor Shun, the Duke of Zhou, and Confucius still studied with them. 
“Moreover, the Buddha has the marks of physical excellence, he can transform, he has supernatural powers, and he has no set pattern. 
In the items and meanings of the Five Classics, there are some lacunae. 
As for the fact that the Buddha is not mentioned , how worthwhile is it to be doubtful and suspicious?” A person asked, “It is said that the Buddha has thirty-two major and eighty minor marks of physical excellence. 
Why is he so different from people? 
I am afraid that this is an extravagant expression and a description of unreality.” Mouzi replied, “As the saying goes, ‘The fewer chances to see, the more suspicious .’ A man sees a camel and says that it is a horse with a swollen back. 
Emperor Yao’s eyebrows were of eight different colors, each of Emperor Shun’s eyes had double pupils, the mouth of Gao Yao was a crow’s beak, King Wen had four nipples, Yu had three oriﬁces in each ear, the Duke of Zhou was hunchbacked, Fuxi had a nose a dragon’s, and Confucius had a depression on the top of his head. 
Laozi had a sun-shaped lump and the mark of a moon on his forehead, and two nose bridges. 
He held the Chinese characters of the Ten [Celestial Stems] in his hands, and treaded upon the two and the ﬁve .15 These men are not different from people, are they? 
How worthwhile is it to be doubtful of the Buddha’s marks of physical excellence?” A person asked, “The Canon of Filial Piety says, ‘Your body, hair, and skin are received from your parents. 
Do not dare to damage them.’16 When Zengzi was about to die, he said, ‘Uncover my feet, uncover my hands!’17 Now, śramaṇas shave their heads. 
Why do they go against the sage’s words? 
They do not follow the way of ﬁlial piety. 
You are always fond of discussing right and wrong and correcting wrong to right, yet on the contrary, it is alright , don’t you?” Mouzi replied, “It is not benevolent to slander sages and virtuous people. 
It is not intelligent that correction is not much to the point. 
How can you cultivate virtue being neither benevolent nor intelligent? 
How can I easily discuss with ? 
“Once upon a time a man of Qi crossed a large river by boat, and his father fell into the water. 
If he had cultivated himself as is usual for a ﬁlial son, folding his arms , his father would have died by drowning. 
Confucius said, ‘If you can be faithful to the Way with them, you may not yet take measures suited to the occasion with them.’18 This refers to acting in what is considered a proper manner at the time. 
“Moreover, the Canon of Filial Piety says, ‘Kings of previous times had the highest virtue and the essential points .’ Taibo, however, had his hair cut off and his body tattooed following the custom of the Wu-Yue region , disregarding the righteousness toward one’s body, hair, and skin [stated in the Canon of Filial Piety]. 
Nevertheless, Confucius praised him , ‘ may be said to be a man of the highest virtue.’19 Confucius did not defame Taibo for having his hair cut. 
It can be said that the utmost concessions are that śramaṇas give up their family property, abandon their wives and children, do not listen to music, and do not look upon worldly things. 
Why they go against the sage’s words and do not follow ﬁlial piety? 
Yu Rang swallowed charcoal and lacquered his body . 
Nie Zheng ﬂayed the skin of his face and punished himself [after committing a successful assassination]. 
Gentlemen consider that these people were brave and died for righteousness; I have heard no one slander their self-mutilation or suicides. 
Compared to the actions taken by these four people, śramaṇas’ shaving their beards and hair is not far removed from them.” A person asked, “There is no happiness beyond having posterity, and there is no impiety greater than having no posterity. 
Śramaṇas abandon their wives and children and give up wealth, or they never marry for their entire lives. 
Why do they carry out practice against happiness and ﬁlial piety? 
They themselves suffer and yet they have nothing wonderful. 
They exhaust themselves and yet they have nothing marvelous.” Mouzi replied, “One who is strong on the left must be weak on the right. 
One who formerly had the extensive must later have the narrow. 
[Confucius says,] ‘Meng Gongchuo is excellent as a chief retainer of the Zhao or Wei , but he is unﬁt to be a high ofﬁcial of Teng or Xue.’20 Wives, children, and belongings are extra in secular life. 
Purity and wuwei are the wonders of the Way. 
Body or wealth, which do you think more valuable?’”21 Again said, “One may observe customs handed down from the three preceding dynasties , read the arts of the ways of Confucians and Mohists, recite the Book of Odes and the Book of History, cultivate etiquette, respect benevolence and righteousness, and consider cleanliness . 
The people of the world will hand down virtuous works to the next generation and he will brim over with fame. 
“Such are what mediocre people perform, and what people of peace and non-worldly desire do not seek. 
Therefore, if in front of you there is a pearl like that of the Marquis of Sui22 but there is a tiger behind you, even though you may see you will run away. 
“Xu You lived in the nest of a tree. 
yi and qi starved on Shouyang. 
The sage Confucius praised their virtues and said, ‘They are the ones who sought benevolence and attained it.’23 I have never heard them ridiculed for not having posterity or property. 
Śramaṇas cultivate morality instead of having worldly pleasures, and return to virtuous wise people, having given up the joys of having wives and children. 
In addition, said, ‘ adjusts his clothes and cap, and imbues his appearance with dignity.’26 Even though Yuan Xian was poor, he did not take off his cap made of birch bark. 
When Zilu encountered danger, he did not forget to tie the chin-straps of his cap. 
Today śramaṇas shave off their hair and wear undyed cloth. 
When they come across other people, they make no decorum of kneeling and standing up. 
Those who possess the lowest degree of virtue how not to lose it, and therefore they do not possess virtue.’27 During the times of the Three Augusts, the people ate meat, wore animal-skin clothing, and lived in nests in trees or caves. 
Why would they need zhangfu caps or furs woven with adornments?28 the people of that time are said to have been virtuous, honest, trustworthy, and wuwei. 
If you have a good faculty of hearing, you will not be deluded. 
Emperor Yao and Emperor Shun, the Duke of Zhou, and Confucius cultivated worldly affairs, while the Buddha and Laozi pursued wuwei. 
Confucius traveled to more than seventy states. 
Xu You heard that there was to be an abdication of the throne , and he then washed his ears in a gulf [because he thought the abdication was so foul that it polluted his ears]. 
The way to be a gentleman is sometimes to go out and sometimes to remain in seclusion, or to sometimes remain silent and to sometimes speak out. 
He does not let his emotions overﬂow and he does not give full sway to his nature. 
Therefore, the reason why the way is noble lies in the purpose for which it is employed. 
What reason is there in rejecting them ?” An inquirer said, “In the Way of the Buddha, it is said: 
He has died. 
What then is trying to call back?” A person replied, “ tries to call the spirit of the dead back .” Mouzi asked, “If the spirit returns, he revives, if it does not return, what is the spirit then called?” replied, “It becomes a spiritual being .” Mouzi said, “That is correct! 
Without doubt, the spirit does not perish. 
Only the physical body decays and becomes rotten. 
The body is just like the roots and leaves of the ﬁve major grains, and the spirit is compared to the seeds and kernels of the grains. 
The roots and leaves come into existence and then inevitably die. 
attain the Way and only their bodies perish. 
Laozi said, ‘The reason we have great calamity is because we have a body. 
If we did not have a body, what calamity would we have?’29 He also said, ‘When the work is done, retiring into obscurity is the Way of Heaven.’”30 Someone said, “Those who practice the Way die and those who do not practice the Way also die. 
If one attains the Way, even if he dies, his spirit returns to Heaven. 
If he has committed evil conduct, after death his spirit inevitably receives retribution. 
Ignorant people are in darkness about the established facts, while intelligent people foresee things that have not yet germinated. 
Comparison between practicing the Way and not practicing the Way is just like that between gold and grass. 
Having wholesomeness and being given happiness are the comparison between white and black. 
How could there not be a difference? 
Nevertheless, you ask what is the difference .” A person asked, “Confucius said, ‘While you are not able to serve human beings, how can you serve the spirits? 
While you do not know life, how can you know about death?’31 The sage declined to answer this . 
Now Buddhists always speak of matters of 3c life and death, as well as of the affairs of spiritual beings. 
I am wondering if this goes against the words of sages and saints. 
Those who follow the Way ought to make the mind absolutely vacant and simple, and return to the principle of simplicity. 
Why, then, do disturb our will by talking about life and death? Why do they speak unnecessary words about spiritual beings?” Mouzi replied, “It appears that your words are, so to speak, like those who observe the outside and yet are not aware of the inside. 
Confucius deplored the fact that Zilu did not consider the whole issue from beginning to end. 
The Canon of Filial Piety says, ‘Build the ancestral shrine . 
Offer sacriﬁces in the spring and autumn, thinking of them.’ It continues, ‘Devote yourself to loving and respecting them while they are alive. 
Devote yourself to mourning after their death.’32 Did not teach people to serve the spiritual beings and to know about life and death? 
“The Duke of Zhou begged for Emperor Wu’s life and said, ‘I, Dan, am versatile and able to serve spiritual beings.’33 What does this mean? 
Isn’t the tenor of life and death stated in the Buddhist scriptures of this kind? 
The essence of the highest Way is to truly esteem solitude. 
Why would Buddhists be fond of debate [about life and death]? 
Can there be a bell or a drum that makes a sound by itself? They only produce sounds when struck.” A person asked, “Confucius said: 
It may be said that you see the elegance of ceremonial forms and yet lack knowledge about the truth of morality, or that you catch a glimpse of the light of a torch or candle but you have not yet seen the sun in the sky. 
What Confucius spoke of are the ways to correct social customs or practices. 
Formerly wishing to live in the region of the nine barbarian tribes of the east, Confucius said, ‘If a gentleman dwelled among them, what vileness would there be?’38 When Confucius could not ﬁnd an ofﬁcial position in the states of Lu and Wei, and when Mencius was not employed in the states of Qi and Liang, how could they have taken service in the states of the barbarian tribes of the east and north? 
“ Yu is from Qiang, the barbarian tribe in west China, and yet he was a sage. 
You Yu was born in Di [to the north of our great land], and yet Qin establish hegemony. 
Guan and Cai came from the basin between the Yellow River and the Luo River, but they spread a false rumor . 
“A commentary says, ‘The polestar is located in the middle of the sky, in the north above us.’ Seen from this point of view, the land of Han (i.e., China) is not necessarily the center of the universe. 
According to what the Buddhist scriptures state, all sentient beings of the entire universe belong to the Buddha. 
What reason do I have to abandon the way of Emperor Yao and Emperor Shun, the Duke of Zhou, and Confucius? 
Gold and pearl never impair each other. 
You say that other people are deluded, yet it is you yourself who is deluded!” A person asked, “It cannot be said to be charitable to give away one’s father’s property to a stranger. 
Nowadays a Buddhist scripture states that Prince Sudāna gave his father’s property to complete 4a strangers, granted a precious elephant belonging to the state to its enemies, and his own wives and children to others.39 It is said to be uncivil to not respect one’s own parents and yet to respect others. 
It is said to be immoral to not love one’s own parents and yet to love others.40 Prince Sudāna was neither ﬁlial nor kind, but Buddhists respect him. 
Isn’t this peculiar?” Mouzi replied, “In the doctrine of the Five Classics, the ﬁrst son [from the legal wife] is designated as heir. 
Yet the Great King saw Chang’s ambition. 
he moved his youngest son [Jili, who was Chang’s father, up in the succession] to become his heir. 
Consequently, the enterprise of the Zhou dynasty was achieved, and by means of this a peaceful world was realized. 
In the custom of marrying a woman, a man must inform his parents . 
Emperor Shun married without telling [his parents]. 
People of integrity must be invited for service and talented vassals wait to be drafted for public services. 
Ning Qi knocked on horns to beseech [Lord Huan of] Qi . 
With King Tang won the throne, and with Qi state attained hegemony. 
“According to etiquette, a man and a woman should not put their hands on each other, if the wife of one’s elder brother is drowning, it is an expedient way in emergency to put one’s hands on her [in order to pull her out of the water]. 
Why should a great person comprehend ordinary matters? 
Prince Sudāna saw that the world is impermanent, and money and property were not real treasures for him. 
Therefore, he donated at his will, and by doing so he achieved the Great Way. 
His father’s kingdom received the blessings, and enemies were unable to invade [his father’s kingdom]. 
When attained buddhahood, his parents and brothers were all able to attain liberation as well. 
If this is not a ﬁlial and benevolent , then what is benevolent and ﬁlial?” A person asked, “In Buddhism, wuwei is of value, giving alms is pleasurable, and observing the precepts requires as much caution and attention as if one were approaching an abyss. 
Today, śramaṇas give themselves up to wine. 
Some have wives and children, or purchase at a low price and sell at a high price . 
They devote themselves to such swindles. 
This is a great hypocrisy in the world.41 Is this what is called wuwei in Buddhism?” Mouzi replied, “Gongshu [Ban, a master carpenter in Lu state during the Spring and Autumn period,] was able to give people a hatchet, an ax, and an ink line , but he was not able to make them as skillful as himself. 
Sages are able to impart their ways to others, but they cannot make others follow and perform them. 
Gao Yao was able to punish thieves, but he couldn’t make greedy people become Boyi and Shuqi. 
The ﬁve penalties can punish villains, but they cannot regenerate such evil people to be Zeng Shen and Min Ziqian. 
Emperor Yao was not able to educate Dan Zhu, and the Duke of Zhou was unable to admonish Guan and Cai. 
Wouldn’t Tang’s teaching be clear? 
Wouldn’t the Duke of Zhou be possessed of morality? 
Nevertheless, there was no help for bad people. 
“Figuratively speaking, if people who are well versed in the Seven Classics are smitten with money and women, can it be said that the six arts [that these people have mastered] are depraved and lustful? 
Hebo, even though he is the god , cannot drown people who stay on land. 
A violent wind, though it blows swiftly, cannot ﬂing dust onto the surface of deep water. 
How can you say that Buddhism has vice?” A person asked, “Confucius said, ‘Luxury leads to haughtiness, and frugality to meanness. 
It is better to be mean than to be haughty.’42 Shusun said, ‘Frugality is respectful. 
Luxury is the worst among evil acts.’43 Today Buddhists consider donating all one’s property to be honorable and giving all one’s money to others to be valuable. 
Neither case prohibits making donations. 
When 21 Shun tilled on Mount Li, his benevolence did not reach even the neighboring area. 
Taigong butchered cows ,45 but his kindness did not extend to his wife and children. 
For those who have abundant property and plenty of money, it is valuable to give alms to others. For those who live in poverty and who are often poor, it is valuable to follow the Way. 
Boyi was not contented to take the reins of the state. 
Yu Qing gave up a ﬁef of tens of thousands of households, and gave relief to destitute people in a crisis. 
Needless to say, if you sink in fortune in order to give rise to good intentions, your merit and virtue are as lofty as Mount Song or Mount Tai, and as vast as a great river or the ocean. 
Those who embrace a compassionate heart are rewarded with happiness, and those who harbor evil receive misfortune as retribution. 
It has never happened that those who have planted rice will harvest wheat, or that those who have caused disaster will obtain happiness.” A person said, “Among qualities, nothing surpasses sincerity; in speech, nothing goes beyond truth. 
Laozi eschewed artful expressions and showed respect for simple words. 
Buddhist scriptures, do not directly indicate the matter and yet extensively take allegories in vain. 
Allegory is not the essence of reason. 
Even though have numerous expressions and extensive words, they are similar to a cart full of fragments of jade pieces, which are not considered to be treasure.” Mouzi responded, “Things that both have seen can be explained with the real thing, but things that only a speaker has seen are difﬁcult to explain in exact words. 
Formerly a person who had not seen a kylin asked someone who had seen one, ‘What kind is a kylin?’ The one who had seen it answered, ‘A kylin is just like a kylin.’ The questioner said, ‘If I had seen a kylin, then I would not have asked you the question. 
How can I understand this?’ The one who had seen a kylin said, ‘The kylin has a body like a roe deer, a tail like a cow, hooves like a deer, and a back like a horse.’ The questioner understood right away. 
The Analects of Confucius states, ‘He who takes the reins of government by means of virtue can be compared to the north polestar.’51 Here, a celestial body is referred to and compared to a human being. 
Zixia said, ‘It is just as all plants have differences .’52 The three hundred chapters in the Book of Odes , collecting events and arranging them into each category. 
In writings by the thinkers of the numerous schools and books about the occult, up to books classiﬁed for sages, there is none that does not employ allegories or use parables. 
The Yellow Emperor considered the ﬁve kinds of meat (i.e., beef, lamb, pork, ﬁsh, and venison) to be the best to keep us in good health. 
Confucius said, ‘He does not detest ﬁnely cleaned rice and ﬁnely minced meat.’53 Nowadays śramaṇas put on red robes, have only one meal a day, and shut off their six sense organs throughout their lifetimes. 
If they are like this, what fun do they have?” Mouzi replied, “ ‘Wealth and high position are what people desire, but if a gentleman does not obtain them in the proper way, he would not place himself there. 
Poverty and meanness are what people detest, but if a gentleman cannot avoid them in the proper way, he would not abandon them.’54 Laozi said, ‘The ﬁve colors cause people to become blind. 
The ﬁve notes 23 cause people to become deaf. 
The ﬁve ﬂavors cause people’s tastebuds to be paralyzed. 
Going at full speed in the wild while hunting makes people crazy. 
Rare goods distract people from having conduct. 
sages take care of their bellies and not their eyes.’55 How could these words be false? 
Hui of Liuxia did not change the way he acted even after he was offered a position as one of the three highest-ranking ofﬁcials.56 Mu of Duangan did not barter his body for the wealth offered by Lord Wen of Wei state.57 Xu You and Chaofu lived high up in a tree, which they said was more peaceful than the imperial palace. 
Boyi and Shuqi starved on Mount Shouyang, but they said they were more satisﬁed than King Wen and King Wu. 
Why [do you say that śramaṇas] have no fun?” A person asked, “If Buddhist scriptures are profound and extravagant, why do you neither talk about them at court nor discuss them with your superior and father? 
You cultivate only at home and relay to your friends. 
Why do you also study the Classics and commentaries and read various philosophers’ works?” Mouzi replied, “You have not yet reached the origin, and yet you ask about the streams . 
“Laozi said, ‘When scholars of the highest class hear about the Way, they diligently practice it. 
Scholars of the middle class, when they hear about the Way, keep only half in their mind. 
Scholars of the lowest class, when they hear about the Way, have a great laugh at it.’59 Since I am afraid that will burst into laughter, I will not talk [about Buddhism]. 
When one is thirsty, he does not necessarily drink the water of a large river. But how can he be dissatisﬁed with the water of wells and fountains? 
was greatly delighted with this. 
Next day, he asked of the entire body of ministers, ‘What god is this?’ Fu Yi, a well-read, greatly experienced person, answered, ‘I have heard that in India there was a man who had attained the Way. 
He could ﬂy in the air and had sunlight on his body. 
I am worried that that god.’ Then the emperor came to realize this and dispatched eighteen people, including the Inner Gentleman Cai Yin, the Gentleman of the Palace Guard Qin Jing, and the Disciple of the Erudite Wang Zun. 
They copied the Buddhist scripture the Sutra of Forty-two Chapters , in [the country of] Dayuezhi . 
The sutra was deposited in the fourteenth cubicle of the Lantai stone chambers . 
Then, outside the Yong gate to the west of Luoyang a Buddhist temple was built. 
On the walls was painted an illustration of a large military group of mounted soldiers circumambulating a pagoda thrice clockwise. 
Furthermore, buddha images were made and placed on the Qingliang Tower of the southern palace and on the Kaiyang Gate of the city wall. 
During his reign, Emperor Ming had his mausoleum called Xianjie constructed in advance. 
Illustrations and images of the Buddha were made and placed on it as well. 
At that time, the nation was rich, the people enjoyed peace, and barbarians in distant regions admired our morality. 
Why do they talk about right and wrong and take up right and wrong for discussion? 
I think that these commit the theft of virtue.” 25 Mouzi replied, “Suppose you are afraid that next spring there will be a serious famine, so you do not eat in the autumn . 
Although these actions are taken in order to be fully prepared beforehand, it is unavoidable that you look stupid. 
Laozi’s maxim refers only to those who have attained the Way. 
What do those who have not attained the Way know? 
When the Great Way is explained in one word, the whole world is joyful. 
Isn’t this great eloquence? 
Śramaṇas of today have not yet attained the Way. 
How can they help but to speak? 
Even Laozi, [who said ‘those who know do not speak, still made speeches. 
If he remained silent, how could he give the account of the Five Thousand Words ? 
“It is all right if one knows and does not speak it. 
But if one is unable to know and furthermore unable to speak it, he is just stupid! 
Consequently, he who is able to speak but unable to carry it out is the teacher of the nation. 
He who is able to carry out but unable to speak it is the force of the nation. 
He who is able to carry out [the Way] and also speak it is the treasure of the nation. 
Each of these three types of people has an applicable point. 
How then could they commit the theft of virtue? 
Spoken language and discussion have their own proper and adequate times. 
It is said about Qu Yuan , ‘When the Way prevails in the world, he is straightforward. 
When the Way does not prevail in the world, he can roll up and keep them close to his heart.’64 About Ning Wuzi, it is said , ‘When the Way prevailed in the world, he displayed his intelligence. 
When the Way did not prevail in the world, he behaved like a stupid person.’65 Confucius said, ‘Not to talk to one with whom you may talk is to waste a person . 
To talk to one with whom you may not talk is to waste your words.’66 Therefore, to be intelligent or to behave like a stupid person both have their proper times. 
speech and discussion serve several purposes. 
Why we debates and discussion without carrying out ?” A person asked, “Why do you say that Buddhism is the most esteemed and the happiest teaching of wuwei and freedom from avarice? 
Many people and scholars in the world slander , saying that ‘Its words and theory are vague, difﬁcult to take up , and absolute emptiness is hard to believe.’ Why ?” Mouzi replied, “The most delicious food does not satisfy every palate. 
Great music is not familiar to every ear. 
Even if Xianchi is played, Dazhang is set forth, Xiaoshao is set out, and the music is sung nine times, no one joins in the chorus. 
if music from a stringed instrument of Zheng and Wei is played, or if current popular songs are sung, unexpectedly clap their hands on the beat without fail. 
Therefore, Song Yu, said, ‘A visitor sang in Ying, . 
When he performed simple and crude folk songs, those who joined in the chorus numbered a thousand people. 
“Han Fei criticized Emperor Yao and Emperor Shun from a narrow viewpoint, as if looking at through a tube. 
To hear the clear note shang and say that it is the note jue is not the fault of the player but due to the listener’s poor faculty . 
To see He’s jade and call it a stone is not because the jade is ignoble but due to the beholder’s lack of knowledge.69 A snake with supernatural powers can regenerate its body into one even if it is cut into many pieces, but cannot cause people not to cut it apart. 
A turtle with mysterious powers appeared to Lord Yuan of Song state in a 27 5c dream, but could not evade the net of Yu Qie.70 The Great Way is wuwei, which is neither what ordinary people understand, nor what may increase its value by praise, nor what may lose its value by slander. 
Whether or not it is employed is up to Heaven. 
Whether or not it is believed is up to fate.” A person asked, “You interpret the Buddha’s teaching with the Classics and their commentaries. 
Your expressions are rich, and the meanings are clear. 
Your compositions are energetic and the explanations are beautiful. 
Isn’t this due to your rhetorical skill rather than being the truth?” Mouzi replied, “No, it is not. 
Even though I recited the Five Classics, I just considered them to be ﬂowery and had not come to realize their truth. 
Now I see the doctrines of the Buddhist scriptures, read the essentials of the Laozi , abide by the nature of tranquility without worldly desires, and contemplate the practice of wuwei. 
When I come back to view the affairs of the world, I feel as if I am stealing a glance at a gorge from high above the earth,71 or as if I am ascending Mount Song and Mount Dai to look over the small foothills. 
The Five Classics are just like the ﬁve ﬂavors and Buddhism is just like the ﬁve grains . 
Since I heard the Way, I have been in a condition that is just like clouds opening up to reveal the sun, or entering into a dark room holding a torch.” A person asked, “You said that scriptures are [as deep as] great rivers and seas, and the words are brocade and embroidery. 
Why do you respond to my questions referring to [the Classics such as] the Book of Odes and the Book of History instead of using Buddhist scriptures? 
A hungry man does not need the granary of Mount Ao to ﬁll his stomach. 
The Way is established for the wise. 
Debate is well constructed for knowledgeable people. 
Books are transmitted for those who understand them. 
Things are clariﬁed for people of insight. 
I refer to phrases since I think that you know the meanings. 
If I speak with the words of Buddhist scriptures and discuss the essentials of wuwei, it would be like explaining the ﬁve colors to the blind, or playing the ﬁve notes for the deaf. 
Even though master Kuang was artful, he could not strum a Chinese zither that had no string. 
Although fox and badger furs are warm, they cannot warm the dead. 
“Gongming Yi played the musical piece Cao in the note qingjue for a cow, but the cow just bent her head down and ate as before. This does not mean that she did not listen to , but [the music] did not meet her ears. 
On the other hand, if there were the buzz of a mosquito or gadﬂy or the lowing of an orphaned calf, she would promptly swish her tail, strain her ears, and stamp on the ground, listening to it. 
This is why I only respond to your questions referring to the Classics.” A person asked, “Once when I was in the capital, I entered Dongguan Library and studied at Taixue National University, where I saw what talented scholars regulated and I listened to what the circle of Confucian scholars discussed. 
However, I never heard that to cultivate Buddhism is considered valuable and that to damage one’s appearance by oneself is considered superior. 
When you get lost, alter the route! 
One who is versed in the Way cannot be surprised by strange things. 
One who discerns tones in words cannot be deluded by words. 
One who understands righteousness cannot be swayed by proﬁt. 
Laozi said, ‘Fame harms oneself. 
“It is needless to speak of the highest Way, which is vast and what sages of the highest class practice. 
is as expansive as the sky and as deep as the sea. 
It is not suitable for people who peep over a wall or for those who consider a several ren-high wall to be tall. 
This is proper, as a matter of course. 
see the gate , while I 6a see the room . 
They seek perfection, while I preserve the One. 
You should change course immediately! I ask you to follow . 
You have not been aware of what the causes of fortune and misfortune are like.” A person asked, “With the words of the Classics and their commentaries and the splendid doctrines, you praise the Buddha’s conduct and extol his virtue, which is lofty, as it rides the high clear clouds, and is wide, as it goes beyond the end of the earth. 
Can it be that exceed the essential qualities and surpass the reality ? 
My praises are just like adding a speck of dust to Mount Song and Mount Tai, or collecting the morning dew and throwing it into a large river or the sea. 
Your slanderous words are like using a ladle and goblet to attempt to reduce a large river or the sea, or plowing by foot to attempt to lower Mount Kunlun, or raising a hand to block the sunlight, or lifting a lump of earth to block the ﬂow of the Yellow River. 
My praises cannot make the Buddha loftier and your slander cannot bring him low.” A person asked, “Is the issue of longevity stated in the talisman registers of Wang Qiao, Chisongzi, and the eight immortals, and in the one hundred and seventy fascicles of Divine Book , the same as that in the Buddhist scriptures?” Mouzi replied, “A comparison [between these texts of the immortals and the Buddhist scriptures] in category is just like comparing the ﬁve powers with the Five Thearchs , or comparing Yang Huo, with Confucius himself. 
A comparison in shape is just like comparing foothills with Mount Hua and Mount Heng, or small creeks and ditches with large rivers and seas. 
A comparison in elegance is just like comparing a tiger hide with a sheepskin, or mottled hemp with brilliant and beautiful embroidery. 
There are ninety-six different teachings, but the most esteemed among them is none other than Buddhism. 
The texts of the immortals, when we listen to their words, sound great and ﬁll our ears, but when we seek their efﬁcacy, it is like grasping at wind or trying to catch a shadow. 
Hence, [the texts of the immortals] are not upheld in the Great Way and are not valued in wuwei. 
How could they be the same?” A person asked, “Some among the practitioners of the Way avoid grain and do not eat it, yet they drink wine and eat meat. 
They say also that this is the way of Laozi. 
In Buddhism, however, to drink wine and eat meat are the heaviest violations to the precepts, and yet do eat grain. 
Why do they contradict each other?” Mouzi replied, “There are extant about ninety-six various teachings in total. 
So far as having no worldly attachment and wuwei are concerned, nothing is more esteemed than Buddhism. 
I have inspected the two volumes of the Laozi and have learned that this scripture prohibits the ﬁve ﬂavors, but I have never seen any word to proscribe against the ﬁve major grains. 
The sage formulated the writings of the seven canons in which there is no mention of a prohibition against eating grain. 
Laozi wrote the Five Thousand Words and yet the issue of abstaining from grains is not indicated. 
The sage said, ‘Those who eat grain are intelligent. 
Those who eat grass are silly. 
Those who eat meat are violent. 
Those who eat vapor have a long life.’74 The people of the world do not understand this matter; they see that the six kinds of birds stop breathing and do not eat in the autumn and winter seasons, and then they try to imitate them. 
They do not know that each thing or being has its own true nature. 
It is just as a magnet attracts iron and yet it cannot pull a hair.” A person asked, “Should we rather stop eating grain or not?” Mouzi replied, “Before I understood the Great Way, I once learned [the way of abstaining from grain] too. 
There are several thousand and several hundred methods to abstain from grain. 
When I practiced them, they were not effective at all; when I performed them, there were no signs at all. 
Therefore, I just gave up . 
I observed the three teachers with whom I studied. 
They described themselves to be seven hundred, ﬁve hundred, and three hundred years old , but in less than three years after I had begun to study with them, they all died. 
The cause of their deaths is probably that they abstained from grain, did not eat it, and ate various fruits; they went back for second and third servings when they enjoyed meat; they had an entire barrel of wine when they drank; their spirits 6b were muddled and delirious; the energy of grain did not ﬁll ; and their ears and eyes were deluded and were not debarred from lewdness and evil. 
Thereupon, they all died before reaching the age at which one may know the decrees of Heaven .76 Even Emperor Yao, Emperor Shun, the Duke of Zhou, and Confucius were all unable to live to a hundred years of age. 
Nevertheless, foolish and deluded people of these latter days want to seek inexhaustible longevity by ingesting drugs and the avoidance of grain. 
How sad!” A person asked, “Those who practice the Way say that they can prevent disease and do not get sick, or that they can recover from illness without acupuncture and medicine. 
Why do Buddhists recommend acupuncture and medicine when someone becomes ill?” Mouzi replied, “Laozi said, ‘When things reach their prime, they begin aging. 
This may be said to be the deviation from the Way. 
Anything that deviates from the Way soon comes to an end.’77 Only those who have attained the Way will not be reborn. 
Since they are not in the prime, they will not age, either. 
Since they do not age, they will not become ill. 
Since they do not become ill, they will not decay. 
Shen Nong tasted [the ﬂavors of the various] grasses and he was about to die several tens of times.81 The Yellow Emperor bowed with his head to the ground and received acupuncture from Qi Bo. 
How could these three sages be inferior to Daoist practitioners of the present time? 
Why do you distinguish them from each other, arrange them, and indicate their differences? 
Furthermore, you cause those who learn the teaching to be suspicious. 
I am afraid that this is wasteful and futile.” Mouzi replied, “Although we call all of them ‘grass,’ the natures of various grasses cannot be distinctively explained. 
We call them all ‘metal,’ but the natures of various kinds of metals cannot be distinctively explained. 
All things are just so. 
Why would this not be so only in regard to teachings? 
In bygone days Yang and Mo blocked the path of a group of Confucianists. 
Their carts could not advance, and people could not make progress. 
It was not until Mencius opened up that the people came to know what to follow.82 master Kuang played his Chinese zither, waiting for someone who could understand his tune to appear in later ages.83 Sages formulated the model decorum, hoping that gentlemen would see it in the future. 
Buddhism is not incorrect, but numerous private teachings obscure its justice. 
Thereupon, I distinguish and differentiate . 
The intelligence of Zang Wen and the uprightness of Weisheng were what Confucius was very stern about.86 All of his words were to correct [the vices of] the world. 
Why is it wasteful and futile [to distinguish teachings from each other]?” A person asked, “It is all right if you slander the immortals, repress unusual things, and do not believe that there is a way to immortality. 
Why do you believe that it is only Buddhism by which one should attain liberation? 
The Buddha lived in a foreign land. 
You have not set foot on that soil, and have not yet seen the place. 
You have only read the writings and trust in what did. 
He who sees a bright aspect is unable to know the reality. 
He who sees a shadow is unable to discern the form. 
[What you believe] is almost untrue.” Mouzi replied, “Confucius said, ‘See what a man does, observe what he has done, and examine with what he is content. 
None could respond to me and they all backed down. 
Many of them corrected their resolution and changed their intention. 
Why do you alone have difﬁculty reforming yourself?” Mouzi replied, “When light feathers meet with wind high above, they are blown away. 
When ﬁne stones get into the ﬂow of water from a mountain stream, they are carried down. 
Mount Tai alone remains unmoved in a whirlwind. 
Massive rocks are not swept away even by a rapid current. 
When plum trees are nipped by the frost, they become leaﬂess, but pines and cypresses are hardly withered. 
Consequently, they humbly backed down. 
You, are not going to vanquish even a stupid person such as myself, not to speak of those who are well versed in the Way. 
You do not reform yourself and yet want to change others. 
I think that this should be considered respectful and valuable, and I am afraid that Buddhism is not as good as .” Mouzi said, “Pointing to the south when it is in fact the north, one says to himself that he is not confused. 
Considering west to be east, he says to himself that he is not stupid. 
Being a owl, he laughs at phoenix. 
Holding mole crickets and earthworms, one ridicules turtles and dragons. 
Cicadas do not eat, but gentlemen do not value them. 
Frogs and pythons hibernate, but sages do not attach importance to them. 
Confucius said, ‘Of all life between Heaven and Earth, human beings are the noblest.’93 I have never heard that he respected cicadas and pythons. 
Nevertheless, among the people of the world there are inherently those who eat sweet ﬂag and discard cinnamon and ginger, and who decline to drink sweet dew but sip unreﬁned vinegar. 
The ﬁne hair on the skin, although it is small, can be examined if you look at it . 
Mount Tai’s loftiness cannot be seen if you turn your back on it. 
It is a matter of whether or not you pay attention to it, or whether or not you are careful. 
In Lu state the Ji family was respected and Confucius was viliﬁed.94 In Wu state, Great Steward Pi was considered to be capable and zi Xu was not considered to be good.95 So, [given these situations,] your questions reasonable.” A person asked, “The school of Daoism says, ‘Emperor Yao and Emperor Shun, the Duke of Zhou, Confucius, and seventy-two of his disciples did not die and became immortals.’ The school of Buddhism says, ‘All people die and no one can avoid death.’ Why?” Mouzi replied, “These are absurd statements, not what the sages said. 
Laozi said, ‘Even Heaven and Earth cannot last long. 
How much less can human beings?’96 Confucius said, ‘Furthermore, withdraw from the world.97 Those who are benevolent and ﬁlial permanently exist.’ For as long as I have read books of the six arts and looked at biographies and records, Emperor Yao passed away; Emperor Shun was on the mountain of Cangwu; there is Emperor Yu’s mausoleum at Guiji; Boyi and Shuqi have their tombs on Mount Shouyang; King Wen died before he could put King Zhou to death; King Wu could not wait for King Cheng to grow to adulthood but he passed away; there is a chapter regarding the reburial of the Duke of Zhou; Confucius had a dream two pillars ; 35 there is a record for the age of Bo Yu, when he died before his father (i.e., Confucius); there is a record that Zilu’s was salted; there is the expression of , ‘It is fate!’ for Boniu;98 there is Zeng Shen’s expression , ‘Uncover my feet!’;99 and there are the records for Yan Yuan that said, ‘Unfortunately, he was short-lived’100 and then composed the parable of a young plant that does not go on to ﬂower.101 All these are written in the Classics, and are the utmost signiﬁcant words by sages. 
The people of the world take as testimony and say did not die. 
I wonder, however, why your responses are arranged in thirty-seven sections. 
Is there any model for this?” Mouzi replied, “ rolling mugwort, wheels were invented, and driftwood, boats and oars were devised.102 spider’s webs, nets were invented. 
bird tracks, written language was created. 
Therefore, it is easy to accomplish something if there is a model, while it is difﬁcult to accomplish anything without a model. 
I read the essentials of the Buddhist scriptures, which list thirty-seven elements .103 The Laozi Daojing consists of thirty-seven chapters as well.104 Thereupon, I modeled after these .” Then the deluded people who heard became reverent and nervous; they turned pale. 
They stood up, folding their hands in salute. 
We dared to make stupid statements without worrying about fortune and misfortune. 
Now we have heard your instructions and very rapidly, just as hot water melts snow. 
We wish to receive the ﬁve precepts and become Buddhist laypeople.” The Discourse to Correct Faulty Accusations by an Anonymous Writer There was an idiosyncratic person who brought a false charge against the Buddha. 
He said, “Yin Wenzi is a man who possessed supernatural power. 
Moreover, he had a disciple who had attained the Way to transform, and so on. 
Moreover, he made prohibit from destroying life, forbade their style of marriage, and proscribed them from having offspring. 
And so forth.” I corrected this, “The accuser already said that the Buddha does not exist. 
Furthermore, he said that Wenzi had supernatural power. 
He also said that there was a disciple who attained the Way, who could transform, who was broadminded, and who completed the marvelous principles. 
These are superﬁcial and heartless words. 
Now, Yin Wenzi is precisely a disciple of Laozi. 
Laozi is namely a disciple of the Buddha. 
Therefore, it is stated in the sutra, ‘I have heard it said that in Zhugan there was an old teacher who thoroughly entered nirvana and who eternally and everlastingly remains there without beginning or end.’105 Zhugan means India. 
If the Buddha was not before Laozi, how could call the one who was born before himself ? 
If Laozi was not before Yin Wen, how could ask for the Daodejing? 
Inferring from this, the Buddha was formerly Wenzi’s ancestor, and the original of all sages. 
How could it happen that a disciple can supernaturally transform and his teacher cannot? 
“Moreover, when a sage governs the world, he certainly rules over it with morality. 
If the people in remote regions do not submit , he 37 paciﬁes them with civil culture and virtue. 
He uses weapons only if compelled to out of necessity. 
He is one who will remove violence, stop ﬁghting, save the people, and carry out a minor killing in order to stop mass murder. 
Consequently, in the Spring and Autumn period, when feudal lords subjugated , they took actions relying on [the principles of] justice and order. 
If their hostile state had a fault, they assuredly beat a drum in order to make known, and assembled troops of justice in order to deal with those who caused the fault. 
They did not punish others for ambiguous reasons. 
Therefore, when their enemies were subjugated, they soothed in a soft and gentle manner, and neither inﬂicted punishment indiscriminately nor used armed force excessively beyond all reason. 
When they won, they performed the rite of mourning [for those who had lost their lives in battle]. 
When they killed, they wept with grief for those who had been killed. 
Accordingly, to arrest by means of temptation was severely censured, and causes of extermination were strongly restricted. 
“To appease evil in order to quell injustice, and to use the road [of the other state] in order to carry out an atrocity ,106 are variants of the Classics and their annotations. 
Therefore, when met the feudal lords at Song state for a treaty of alliance, the reason gave priority to Jin state and restrained Chu state is because he hated who were deceptive and wore armor under their clothes [in order to wage a surprise attack on the people of Jin], and he respected the virtue of honesty.107 “Resentment and benevolence toward an enemy should not affect the descendants . 
Heavy punishment should not be recklessly dispensed. 
This is a clever system for all rulers to follow and an excellent law for governing a country. 
Generals and jingoistic fellows of later ages, when they were troubled by the degeneration of morals, began to compete with each other depending on their cunning powers, and indulged their ravenous minds with deceptive plots. 
When they did battle in a ﬁeld, they were unrestrained in attacking and killed everything in sight. 
When they annihilated a city, they completely buried [the inhabitants] alive, to the last person. 
Therefore, Bai Qi , [who had buried alive many people of Zhao state who had surrendered,] cut off his own head at Duyou.108 Dong Zhuo , [a tyrannical vassal of the Later Han dynasty,] was slaughtered at a palace gate.109 “Gentlemen know that such inevitably come to ruin. 
The whole world grieves when are slaughtered. 
The harm of armed might reaches this point. 
This is what we should be distressed by, and why we should sigh deeply . 
How could there be a sage who wants to indulge in cunning and exterminate common people? 
Moreover, ten households a wise person can be found, not to speak of a vast area, mile after mile. 
Zhonghua was born in the eastern barbarians. 
Wenming was from the western barbarians. 
How could there be a ﬁxed place from which sages and wise people emerge? 
“How could there be a sage who hates the enemies’ power and wants to exterminate them without even a single survivor? 
how different is this from the case where once a pestilential vapor runs rampant, it cannot be purged by any clear and good thing, or that once a ﬁre is set in the center of a ﬁeld, orchid and caryopteris divaricata (a water plant with a foul smell that lasts very long) are both burned? 
Wasn’t the tyranny of King Jie and King Zhou just like this? 
To engage in argument referring to these is sufﬁcient to abuse others with slander and to confuse ignorant and inexperienced people. 
How could it be a rebuke is kindhearted, logical, and thoughtful?” Again, the accuser said, “Yin Wenzi deceived ; he told them that there are thirty-two levels of Heaven, and so on. 
Moreover, he recklessly quoted the Loutanjing, ‘ heavenly palaces is two hundred and forty thousand li in circumference. 
One side [of the heavenly palace] has a hundred gates, and the gate is ten thousand li wide,’ and so on.”111 39 I replied, “The Buddhist scriptures state that in realms of the heavens and the earth there are stages from high to low. 
Nevertheless, the accuser has exaggerated and either fabricated a false statement or was confused and misled and could not investigate the reality. 
How could there be a land two hundred and forty thousand li in circumference, containing gates four million li wide in total? 
This case serves as an example for the rest , and it is enough to clarify that he made many mistakes. 
Even slaves and herders may know that this is not so, not to speak of intellectuals. 
wants to show his erudition and yet only reveals his stupidity.” Again, the accuser said, “The Buddha also went all around the ﬁve realms of existence . 
He committed many transgressions and atrocious acts, yet he still attained buddhahood. 
This is not a law to frighten those who do evil. 
Moreover, in counting people, there are few good people but many bad people. 
When bad people die, they would ﬁll up the realm of the six domestic animals. It has been a long time since the creation of the world up to the present day. 
, then animals would occupy nine-tenths and the human race would already be rare.” I corrected this, “It is indeed as you said that the Buddha was once evil, too. 
The reason he attained buddhahood is because he corrected his mistakes and followed what is good. 
If he had grown evil, if he had never reformed himself, and if he had been deluded and consequently had kept going , he would have received suffering for a long, dark period; he would have transmigrated in the ﬁve realms of existence without the means for liberation. 
was able to dig up the saplings of various evils, extinguish the ember of the three poisons, cultivate the wholesomeness of the ﬁve precepts, and accomplish the excellence of the ten wholesome acts.112 He practiced like this kalpa after kalpa. 
Even when he was tired, he never stopped. He completely understood the ultimate state of things and clariﬁed that the three periods (i.e., past, present, and future) are empty. 
Thereupon, he was able to liberate himself from the illusory world of birth and death, and go beyond to the place of wuwei. 
“In counting the number of insects in the world, we cannot reach a calculation. 
people who reside in China are like [the number of] extremely small ﬁne hairs that grow on a horse’s body. 
How could it be said that nine-tenths ? 
It is not a book like those the Three Augusts and the Five Thearchs, or words of instruction and admonition. 
The words of the ancestors older by three or ﬁve generations [recorded in the Sequel Scripture of No Spirit] are similar to those of the petition to the Celestial Thearch. 
This itself nearly reveals a fabrication, without question. 
I will now deal with it for the time being. 
“Generally people of the world frequently say, ‘If a person dies, he will perish without the numen and the spirit .’ In that case, if there is no numen, there is no Celestial Ofﬁcer; and if there is no spirit, then there is no place where gather. 
If one’s descendant who believes in the Buddha traces back to what his ancestor did and ﬁnds fault to reproach, even if one’s ancestor was a wise person or gentleman, if he did not necessarily do the same thing as his descendant while he was alive, then the Celestial Ofﬁcer will take him into custody. 
[The Celestial Ofﬁcer] orders the corpses of Yan and Ran to suffer the pain of slaying, and benevolent ancestors to have powerful poisons added to their esteemed bodies. 
How could this be done by an intelligent, upright, and honest spiritual being ? 
Then, if could not be done , it 41 8b must be done by a fox, a badger, an evil spirit of mountains and rivers, or a lewd and ﬁerce ghost. 
How could such a being overpower the spirits of both kindhearted and wise people, and trouble those who observe the Buddhist precepts? 
This is extravagant and futile, and so on.” I corrected this, “In teaching there are both depth and shallowness. 
All of this was already stated completely in the beginning section. 
Let me repeat it. 
No one surpasses Yao and Shun in being respectful to others and humble about themselves. 
Therefore, the Spring and Autumn with Commentary by Zuo Qiuming states, ‘The bells of a carriage horse make known publicly. 
The images comparable to each other by the ﬁve colors make the differences of things known publicly.’116 Therefore, the residences of monarchs require the Gate of Gold , the steps of white jade leading to the throne , an astronomical observatory for the emperor , and a gate of the imperial palace in order to distinguish them from of the common people and make clear between the noble and the humble. 
Consequently, ‘when hears the sound of his drums and tambours’ and sees the shape of a feather banner, ‘he thinks of his leaders and commanders.’ ‘When hears the sound of the Chinese zithers ’ and sees stately manners, ‘he thinks of his ofﬁcers of the court.’117 When we change standpoint and viewpoint, both our internal feeling and external appearance become different. 
Now, of the fellows who spend days in leisure, those who see forms and yet do not reach the Way all respect noble status and disregard humble status. 
Therefore, all Buddhists admire and respect relics and try to keep the image of him in their hearts. 
“Consequently, they inscribe and display illustrations and images [of the Buddha], extend respect to him, and donate curios of great value in order to enhance the temple of worship. 
First his ears and eyes are pleased, and gradually he may be led to the principles of justice. 
[Sentient beings] are pulled out from the three lowest realms of existence, and no one is left behind. 
It is just as when a container is ﬁlled with water; it adapts to the volume . 
If a hole is bored into the bottom , or if it has no bottom, it simply cannot hold . 
“Moreover, persistently makes a false charge that [the teaching of] weal and woe was made by the Buddha. 
It should be said that he does not understand the foundation . 
I will again brieﬂy explain it. 
“ good or ill fortune and virtue or vice is similar to shadow or sound and form or voice. 
The Buddha, the Duke of Zhou, and Confucius, however, all clariﬁed loyalty, ﬁlial piety, truthfulness, and obedience. 
Those who follow these principles have good fortune and those who go against them experience bad luck. 
When the way to cross over water has been shown, by using a boat and oars, but it is impossible to cross over by foot. 
The way to instruct people and the skill to save people from distress and death are also similar to Shen Nong ate grain to satisfy his hunger and the Yellow Emperor hung down his garments in order to control coldness and heat. 
If someone wishes to be sated while his mouth is closed, or if he asks for warmth while he remains naked, we cannot grant upon him by force. 
The reason Bian Que was called a good physician is because he prescribed medicine according to the disease, and simply did not lose the proper way. 
No one blames him for causing people not to die. 
Furthermore, Bian Que said, ‘I am able to cause people who ought to live not to die, but I am unable to cause people who ought to die to live longer.’118 8c “If the master were in the position of a son, he would be impious to his parents, and if he were in the position of a vassal, he would be disloyal. 
He is offered good medicine but he does not take it. 
Accordingly, he experiences woes, and on the day he dies he will further blame the sages and deeply resent the good physician. 
is just like ‘ who runs toward the east’ and through his own force throws himself into a trap.”119 Again, the accuser said, “Among śramaṇas, those who reside in the capital city and Luoyang are numerous, but I have not heard that they could lengthen the emperors’ life spans. 
To a great degree, cannot harmonize yin and yang in order to cause a year of abundance, enrich the people, prevent calamities, cure epidemics, overcome and suppress disturbances, and so on. 
To a lesser degree, cannot avoid grain in order to breathe pure , protect life, surmount difﬁculty, prolong life, stay young forever, and so on.” I corrected this, “That is not so. 
Zhuangzhou says, ‘Those who thoroughly understand the conditions of life do not strive after what they cannot do in life.’120 This is a case of having ascertained that the life span cannot be changed. 
If one’s lot in disposition and life could be sought by means of wisdom and virtue, then that of the two sons Fa and Dan would have been sufﬁcient to cause their father Wen to live until a thousand years old. 
When Yanzi died, said, ‘Heaven is destroying me!’121 lamented greatly over . 
The misfortune that happens once every one hundred and six years will occur whenever the time arrives. 
Therefore, Yao had a big ﬂood, as if water had ﬁlled the sky.122 Tang had a drought. 
In Zhuolu there was bloodshed enough to ﬂoat a large shield.123 In Banquan corpses covered the wilds.124 Why did not dispel while sitting on their thrones, and rescue before happened? 
To anticipate a long life doing these things is a sort of ‘there was still something for which he had to wait’ .125 Yet even if like this, it is still possible to die young when the time comes. 
No one can live forever. 
From a śramaṇa’s viewpoint, [immortals such as Chi]song and qiao are just like infants who have not yet become young boys. 
Why, for the sake of longevity, would they rack their brains, perform at the common level, and compete with Juan and Peng? 
The one who criticizes improperly wants to develop the debate by covering his fault. 
He stands on an aggressive position and refuses to listen to counsel, his words have no constancy, and his memorial to the throne makes no distinction between sovereign and subject. 
I hate that [the compound color] green takes over yellow.126 That excessive noisy sound has never been arranged. 
I will exclusively follow the example set by my late teacher , who did not answer [questions about life and death].” Again, the accuser said, “At the end of the Han dynasty, there was Ze Rong , who gathered an army and became a dependent of Tao Qian , the governor of Xuzhou. 
Qian had him supervise the transportation. 
Nevertheless, although Rong earlier believed in Buddhism, he dared to seize government freight for his own proﬁt, he built Buddhist temples, and so on. 
He gave away wine and food to all passersby, and so on. 
He was later attacked by Liu You and killed, and so on.” I corrected this, “This criticism does not need a rope to bind ; he is bound by himself. 
The Buddha’s teaching leads with benevolence and humanity, not killing; faithfulness and honesty, not boasting; incorruptibility and virtue, not stealing, as the most important principles. 
Laozi said, ‘Arms are ominous instruments.’127 Those who are close to them are evil. 
He committed murders, [which is a violation 9a of] the ﬁrst . 
He accepted a mission , took advantage of it, and did not repay his master, . 
He seized government property in order to proﬁt himself. 
stealing, the third . 
The Buddhist scriptures state not to give wine as charity, but Rong did so freely. 
drinking intoxicants, the fourth . 
If one violates all the precepts, he is working toward death. 
This can be compared to the case where a ofﬁcial, who perverts and tyrannizes without restraint after resigning from ofﬁce, can be easily put down by a ﬁve-foot-tall boy. 
He was addicted to drink and arbitrarily exceeded his authority without restraint. 
Speaking of his natural abilities, he had an average advantage. 
Regarding his virtue, he did not have any at all. 
He is just like a worldly person who appears virtuous and yet whose mind is wicked, whose appearance is stern and yet whose innermost heart is weak, whose mouth praises Yu and Tang and yet whose acts match those of King Jie and Zhi. 
He brought disaster on himself. 
Again, whose fault would it be?” Again, the accuser said, “Zhou Zhongzhi believed in the Buddha and was diligent, too. 
Nevertheless, he did not receive any fortune after all, and so on.” I corrected this, saying, “Now that I think of his words, seems to rejoice in others’ calamities; are not logical. 
Even though Zhongzhi had an inclination toward the Way, he did not make the decision to receive the precepts and become a disciple . 
He had a superiorlevel of talent but he also had a streak of obstinacy. 
He had not yet been united with the Daoist principle of an infant.128 On this account, it is reasonable that he was defeated and suffered a downfall when he met a powerful man who was jealous of those better than himself. 
Even if were just as the accuser says, there are those who, even though they are diligent, are still killed. 
How does this differ from the case of Yan and Xiang [Tuo, a genius who at only seven years old was a teacher of Confucius,] both of whom died young; or the case of yi and Shu, who starved to death; or the case of Bi Gan, who was faithful to , yet sank to the misfortune of having his heart cut out;129 or the case of Shen Sheng, who was very ﬁlial and yet ended in the sorrow of hanging? 
Comparisons like these are too many to mention. 
Confucius said, ‘The virtuous are long-lived130 and people of justice are prosperous.’ Nevertheless, even they cannot escape . 
Be sure to be aware of the testimony of your former lives. 
It is truthful!” Again, the accuser said, “Families who serve Buddhism are pleased with death and hate life. 
If he cannot, why does he speak conversely? 
A Buddhist scripture states, ‘He who considers himself to have attained the Way is capable of abstrusely seeing that others are the same as himself, and of equalizing merits and demerits.’ When such a person experiences the change from life to death, is indistinct and there is no emotional sign [for him]. 
When he walks in the land of weal and woe, he remains calm and is not distressed. 
He is delighted with the laws of nature, and he knows his life. 
This is why to enhance their sincere . 
Therefore, [the Buddha] has the justice of the universal vow of great compassion. 
We feel sympathy and sorrow even for an enemy’s death, recompense his enmity with virtue, and forgive his past misdeeds. 
Could it be possible that there is no sorrowful and mournful feeling, since the heartbreak of our own ﬂesh and blood spontaneously ﬂourishes? 
Those who love their parents and relatives do not dare hate others they are deeply afraid to put others in the same situation as themselves. 
Everyone thinks that he cannot examine himself , and has no time to be concerned about himself in regard to a later existence. 
these are all outstanding, wonderful, transcendent, clearly seen, true in reason, and real phenomena. 
How could those who have become accustomed to hearing [a folk song such as] “Yellow Flowers” enjoy the melody of “Cloud Gate,” ? 
Moreover, people of the world value classical books written by the Duke of Zhou and Confucius. 
From the time of Emperor Yao to the Han period, the nine provinces never inﬂuenced foreign regions. 
What was it that moved Emperor Ming of the Han dynasty? 
What virtue did he possess that he alone was illuminated by supernatural light? 
All people’s feelings like these are entirely involved with long-established custom, and people cannot be free of worries and petty notions and cannot see by means of the profound eyes. 
Consequently, truth is not far away, but people give rise to suspicions and sink in . 
How sad it is! 
Gentlemen of the Middle States are versed in [the subjects of] ceremony and righteousness, but they are inexperienced in knowing the human mind.132 How then could they know the mind of the Buddha? 
Now 49 9c in worldly affairs and familiar matters—not to speak of in your spirit, the self—if your plan is not good, you will still be visited by vicissitude. 
If you are successful the spirit, you will be ennobled without limit. 
If you are unsuccessful, you will eternally fall without end. 
Moreover, want to follow the view, [just like] a frog in a well, and they recklessly repress the Great Way. 
They end up only entrapping their spirits at the bottom of the heavenly snare. 
Now, with unenlightened knowledge, they try to illuminate what is profound. 
Therefore, they cannot ﬁnd even their own failure by themselves. 
How then could they clarify what they have to attain? 
They should clarify the direction in which their dark spirits and seek the wholesome way. 
They should ﬁrmly cultivate themselves, taking Buddhist scriptures as their guide. 
Those Buddhist scriptures contain the virtue taught in the Five Classics; they are deeply enhanced with very promising reality; they include the void by Laozi and Zhuangzi; and they completely emphasize the teaching that all phenomena are empty . 
With lofty words and real principles, reverently move one’s spirit. 
They shine as brightly as the sun and they are as clean as wind. 
Except for a sage, who can expound them? 
I will sincerely look into the views of people of the world, juxtapose those views with the Buddhist doctrines, and clarify . 
The Discourse states: 
Now if the mind leaves one’s whole body from the heels to the crown of the head and goes up through the air, it will go on without stopping. 
Then the four directions and the upper and lower directions are all boundless. 
Life is not created all by itself. It certainly transmits what has been saved up. 
If we trace what is transmitted, there is non-beginning. 
What is produced repeatedly without ceasing for successive generations is non-ending. 
Regarding the body, every day we all make use of the essence that is limitless and came intimately from nonbeginning, and that will, furthermore, be ceaselessly transmitted into the future. 
Then, into the immeasurable and boundless vastness for eternal time from non-beginning to non-ending, people originally throw themselves one after another and spread out. 
declare that there are three thousand suns and moons, and twelve thousand worlds arranged in the universe. 
They count as many countries as there are grains of sand in the Ganges River and put in order as many kalpas as there are ﬂying particles of dust. 
Why do doubt the other side (i.e., Buddhists), while being content with themselves? 
Therefore, what people of the world think great is what the Way considers to be minor. 
What has been said, “The time before Xuanyuan (i.e., the Yellow Emperor) is remote antiquity,”133 possibly seems like yesterday in the lofty view of those who have mastered the Way of Heaven. 
It is said that the Book of History is to know distance, but it is not beyond the time of Tang and Emperor Yu . 
Phrases composed in the Spring and Autumn Annals are limited to kingcraft. 
There is piety in the Book of Rites, goodness in the Book of Music, warmth in the Book of Odes, and cleanliness in the Book of Changes . 
Now, in inﬁnitude, if we display three thousand shining suns and moons and correctly see the twelve thousand arranged worlds, then we will know that what the Duke of Zhou and Confucius wrote are possibly just like responses to the vulgar demand to rule over in a region [as small as a snail’s tentacles, where] Chu state and Man state .134 Moreover, would be rather insufﬁcient and only about the matters of one’s present life. 
What exists beyond life has been left as it is, and never discussed. 
If this is not the case, why do they emphasize having a physical body as the beginning and leave out being a spirit after death? 
“ climbed up Mount Meng when Lu state looked 10a small . 
went up Mount Tai when the world appeared small [to him].”135 These mark the boundaries between [Confucianism and Buddhism]. 
In addition, the f en (i.e., the books written by Fuxi, Shen Nong, and the Yellow Emperor) and the dian (i.e., the books by the Five Thearchs) have already been lost. 
Compilations by scholars of shallow learning are exclusively comprised of tracts on governing . 
If there were transcendent remarks , some were scattered and lost in historical records, and some were destroyed at [the time of the incident of] burning and burying . 
The ways of Laozi and Zhuangzi and the arts of all the perfected, such as song and qiao, can truly cleanse our minds and nourish our bodies, but none of these are collected in the Six Classics, either. 
Accordingly, scholars merely stick to the incompleteness of literature, which relieves only triﬂes. 
This, too, is sad! 
They are just like those who, when walking under a stratus cloud, do not believe that the sun and moon exist. 
The expressions “ in alternating yin and yang is called the Way” and “The unforeseen movement in alternating yin and yang is called a spirit”136 possibly mean that the ultimate of nonexistence is the Way, where both yin and yang are integrated. 
Therefore, it is said “[The successive movement] in alternating yin and yang.” That which descends from the Way enters into vigorous spirits, which exists beyond yin and yang, and which is not examined by these two factors. 
Hence, it is simply said that “The unforeseen movement in alternating yin and yang.” Junping’s theory that “‘one produces two’ refers to the spiritual intelligence” indicates this.137 If these two phrases do nothing to clarify , then with what is the vigorous spirit clearly deﬁned? 
Moreover, although the spirits of all sentient beings are ultimately equal, transmigrates following the conditions they met, and forms a dull or ingenious consciousness. 
In addition, and its root are free from decay. 
Now, even though Shun was born as the son of Gu, the spirit of Shun is certainly not something that Gu passed on to him. 
Nor is the spirit of [Shun’s unworthy son,] Shangjun, what Shun gave to him, either. 
Before birth, there is generally of dullness or ingenuity . 
Since the root is established before birth, we know that is immortal after death. 
Furthermore, if are immortal, they are different from each other. 
Accordingly, the stupid and the sacred are distinct from each other. 
We know that the distinctions between the stupid and the sacred and between birth and death do not change the immortal status of the spirits. 
Therefore, it is said that “The vigorous spirit receives a physical body and transmigrates all over the ﬁve realms of existence while Heaven and Earth are formed and destroyed innumerable times.”138 The physical body had the double-pupil eyes when he was born the ignorant man Gu. 
The stupid and the sacred naturally should separate from each other. 
Wouldn’t it be that the spirit of Zhonghua was dull a long time ago, but he established a cause kalpas ago and consequently conditions met after a myriad of transformations? 
Now his spirit solitarily separates from others, but in remote antiquity there was a chain of transmigrations of the dull spirit. 
Accordingly, is the completion of the reﬁnement . 
These three issues: 
If the formation of a physical body the formation of the spirit, and if the cessation of a physical body the cessation of the spirit, then when the body is injured, the spirit should be damaged as well, or when the body falls ill, the spirit should also be fatigued. 
It is reported that there are people whose bodies are perishing, or who are about to die, and yet whose spirits and consciousnesses are calm and perfect. 
When took hold of hand through the window,139 was extremely ill. 
Nevertheless, there was no change as a person of virtue. 
This is simply a testimony to the immortality . 
Even if we accept that there is spirit there, the mountains are simply large piles of soil and the rivers are merely accumulated water. 
How could “the spirit that attained the One” (i.e., the origin of all phenomena) be produced from such coarse materials as water and soil?141 works upon rocks and streams and entrusts itself there, and is solemnly united with them. 
If the mountains fall to pieces or the rivers dry up, certainly does not go to ruin together with the water and the soil . 
The spirit is not what the form makes. 
So it is in the case of human beings. 
“The spirit is the word to express more ingenious than all things under the sun.”142 If is created availing of the form and perishes following the form, the form is considered to be the origin . 
“The vigorous spirit goes forth in all directions, ﬂowing on boundlessly, reaching to Heaven above, and wreathing round the Earth beneath.”143 Sages “search out exhaustively what is deep” and wise people “investigate what is the minutest.”144 As for people such as Zai , Zi, Zhuang, Ji , zha of Wu, and Zifang, wherever the operation of their vigorous directs their course, [their spirits go fast even though] they do not hurry, and without going;145 they penetrate the universe from their own place. 
[All these sages, wise people, and virtuous people] are the same as common foolish people in that their bodies rot and stink or that they delight in tasty food. 
Could there be a reason why receive the bodies [of common people] to be born, and perish following ? 
We must think of this, too. 
The Duke of Zhou offered a sacriﬁce to Heaven and Earth for [Minister of Agriculture] Houji, and performed a sacriﬁce to the ancestors for [his father,] King Wen. Some people of the world say that this was a waste of ﬁlial piety. 
If there is no reason for it, the spirits of King Wen and Houji cannot be said to have perished. 
“If perform puriﬁcation for three days, they must see those for whom the puriﬁcation has been performed.”146 Can we conclude that the Duke of Zhou did not see [King Wen and Houji], since ordinary people do not see them? 
When buried between Ying and Bo, he said, “ bones and ﬂesh have returned to earth, but his spiritual vapor goes wherever it likes.”147 He meant the immortality . 
The most virtuous administration follows Heaven. Great turmoil ﬁlls Heaven. This is essentially what the mind and the spirit do. 
It does not mean that Jie did not know Yao’s virtue. 
The desires of his physical body went against his spirit. 
The consciousness capable of knowing Yao and his ruin from vice was always contained in his spirit. 
If had not taken the throne and lived a thousand years, when he did evil, he might be visited by pain successively, or when he did a minor good act, he might become somewhat magnanimous. 
Couldn’t he have overthrown his evil and cultivated his virtue little by little? 
What his spirit contains, as before, includes the consciousness to know Yao, which must have had at least a chance to be used. 
Moreover, if life span had increased to a thousand years and he had not ceased , it would be possible that his desires would have all been paciﬁed and his spirit would have become as exquisite as that of Yao. 
As the new moon and the full moon take turns, oysters and clams respond to each of . 
Generally all beings are equally created by mysterious changes. 
10c How could it be that only several matters are so, and myriad changes are exactly not so? 
Therefore, those who are put to death on the charge of murder, who are punished on the charge of inﬂicting injury upon others, who are put in jail, who do not commit a crime now, or who are guilty and yet are [as free from punishment as those who are innocent], have all ﬁrst established conditions in the unseen world and now the reason of the human world reveals [the results of these conditions]. 
Hiding and revealing are one and the same. 
If a sin is formed in hiding, an abomination reveals itself clearly. 
There is nothing at all strange in this. 
He who has done evil evidently gets the worst of it in hiding. 
Why is this strange? 
With the immortal spirit that contains the consciousness to know [the virtue of Emperor] Yao, appear and disappear in countless generations. 
Suffering initiates evil, and pleasure leads to good. 
In addition, there is the foundation of the sun and moon that bestows light to shine brightly. 
Rather than being afraid of being Jie and Zhou in remote antiquity, all people should gradually become Tang and Wu in the future, not to mention the young people of reﬁned taste who let their minds ﬂoat on a limpid stream. 
When you see from this standpoint, it is clear, too, that people are able to become buddhas. 
Life arises entirely from the germination of feeling .149 “when a male and a female unite their essences , all creatures are incarnated” completely refers to that their essences are united through feeling.150 When feelings meet selves, various spirits receive physical bodies. 
It greatly appears as if feeling is the foundation of life. 
Even though the Five Thearchs and the Three Augusts transcended feeling and probed into the spirit, they still have to follow all principles. 
Even met the conditions a long time ago, and now they have to condescend to enter incarnation through the essence, be born mutually following , and produce numerous offspring, to say nothing of feelings are linked to their spirits, and whose bodies become extinct. 
How would it be possible that they will not receive bodies again and will not go through the transmigration of birth and death innumerable times? 
If the consciousness is able to clear the foundation of immortality, receives the training of diminishing one’s actions from day to day, “diminishes it, and again diminishes it, and certainly arrives at wuwei,”151 there will be no feeling to lead to desire. 
Only the spirit will shine and then there will be nothing equivalent to life. 
When there is no life, there is no body. 
There is no body and yet there is the spirit. 
This is the meaning of dharmakāya. 
The Yellow Emperor, Yu Shun, Duke Ji , and Confucius are admired and trusted by the people of the world. 
When we see that ascended to Heaven was given the reins, that was like a hidden dragon and like a soaring bird, that [the sincerity of the Duke of Zhou] raised a headwind that lifted up the fallen rice plants, and that sang a song with stringed accompaniment while he had nothing to eat, that all took their ultimate spirit as their essence, and consequently became what the function of their spirits manifested as responses of a free and easy manner. 
Even though the law of manifestation is external, it just appears and disappears following the movement [of numinous powers]. 
There must be also something beyond the human tether. 
The chart emerged from River, and writing came out from the Luo .152 The bush of luck-tea grew vigorously without being planted . 
[Within one night the trees grew so large around that] one could encircle them with both arms, and then suddenly vanished.154 [When Emperor Wu of the Zhou dynasty was subjugating King Zhou of the Yin dynasty,] a ﬁreball ﬂew over the palace and became a raven.155 A large three-legged caldron became light, while a small one became heavy, [in accordance with the virtue of the rulers].156 All these events suddenly happened and the changes occurred, being affected by numinous powers. 
11a At the culmination of dharmakāya, numinous powers ingeniously touch sentient beings and transform in order to manifest. 
shines upon the spirit and its achievement brightens all things. 
What wonder could it not exhibit? What change could be limited? 
Why would it merely ascend to the nine heavens, walk like a dragon in the underworld, inhale wind, or abstain from grain? 
Regarding the obscure appearance and disappearance of various auspicious omens, which were mentioned above, they have already left form and entered into the spirit, and they are the same as the profound metaphysical agency. 
Why do the people only believe in this (i.e., Confucianism) and restrain themselves from that ? 
The Dharma King who was deeply awakened is pure, just, lofty, and bright. 
Truly there is testimony for this. 
He is just in front of you, without the least distance, yet ignorant people are not aware of it. 
How sad it is! 
The “various signs” stated in the Hongfan chapter , that is to say, the corresponding auspicious and inauspicious , are all derived from the mind. 
The sorts , such as a white rainbow piercing the sun, Venus entering into the Pleiades, a variety of millet plants growing in a cold ravine, city walls collapsing, or frost falling , are entirely caused by human feelings and remotely presented as natural phenomena. 
And just as there is no shape without shadow or no voice without sound, there is no human feeling without reward or retribution. 
How could apply only to the sorts piercing the sun or frost falling ? 
All minutely respond to various human feelings; no one can escape from phenomena [that manifests due to the law of reward and retribution]. 
Sometimes, however, is formed over and above one’s physical body, and sometimes it is cast on incidents. 
Various extraordinary things ﬁll the world and numerous phenomena reach our eyes. 
Therefore, the Buddhist scriptures state that the forms of all existences are produced from thought. 
Moreover, [the scriptures] say that the mind is the origin of existences; the mind makes Heaven and the mind makes Hell. 
The meanings derive from those [mentioned above]. 
Hence, those who have a virtuous mind and pure feelings will certainly be reborn in the outstanding and magniﬁcent state. 
Those who have corrupt feelings and who commit impure acts will be eternally deluded in the region of the three lowest realms of existence. 
Isn’t this what has the law of truth yet is straightforward, cleanses our spirits, uplifts our thoughts, and causes us to sincerely make up our minds with awe ? 
Even though a myriad of feelings all mutually constitute conditions and form consciousnesses that move and make phenomena, in fact the nature [of feelings] is nonexistence. 
Since the time opened the ferry for enlightenment, his solitary voice enables us to extinguish worries in a ﬂash, but no one has reached this point. 
I will further explain and clarify it. 
Sacred spirits shine abstrusely and yet they have no consciousness for thinking. 
This is because there is severance between the mind and things and only the spirit exists there. 
Now, if the mind and things interact and it is not the state of spirit only, even if you are as subtle as was Yanzi , you will certainly be intent on looking up to , be fond of benevolence, be delighted with mountains, “nearly attain to , and be often empty of avarice,”160 . 
This is all because the mind is exerted and gives rise to consciousness. 
For sure, the functions subtly make contact with each other, and the consciousnesses cleverly follow one after another, just as ﬂames come together, resulting in a big blaze. 
11b If by means of the realization of emptiness the mind is set at rest, the function of the mind ceases and feeling and consciousness become exhausted, and the spiritual intelligence is perfect. 
How could constantly exist? 
the good cook Ding, who was shown an ox, yet he certainly was not looking at the whole body of the ox .161 It is what the Buddhist scriptures state: 
the law of changes and dispersions, and the nature of phenomena and consciousness, are empty; a dream, an illusion, a shadow, an echo, a bubble, or the moon reﬂected on water. 
Isn’t this so? 
Yanzi was aware of like this. 
Therefore, he dealt with existence just as he did with nonexistence, he touched a real thing just as he did an unreal thing, and he did not perceive existence to offend him and consequently did not respond to it.162 Now, when we observe Yanzi’s “being often empty of avarice,” we see that in fact existence is nonexistence. 
Although they go toward the Great Way in haste, they are called insane, just the same as those who pursue a demented person who is running toward the east.163 They all defy the principles, trespass against the beneﬁcial activity , go against Heaven, and act recklessly. 
is not true existence, not to speak of touch, taste, sound, and color and shape ; they are also mere shadowy apparitions falsely made by feeling. 
In addition, even if a boat is hidden in a narrow ravine, can be moved [by a person of great strength].164 Changes happen more quickly than lightning. 
The future has not yet come, the past has already vanished, and the present does not stay. 
Even in the instant of the blink of an eye or an intake of breath, nothing can be grasped. 
What are you going to abide by and consider as existence? 
It is astounding that false existence covers up the spirit! 
there is a mirror. 
When it is covered with dust, if there is only a little shines fuzzily, but when accumulates it shines dimly; when piles up more thickly still shines but it is rather dark. 
Since original nature is bright, even if [the mirror] is covered by dust it still shines. 
Although from dimness to darkness the essential point follows the mirror, it is not extinguished. 
When we discern things with [such a dusty mirror], it is certain lose more and more, according to the amount of dust , and make mistakes. 
The principle of the spirit of a human being is similar to this. 
When the false existence implicates the spirit, exquisite or coarse consciousness arises. 
The consciousness clings to the spirit. Consequently, although [a person] dies, does not perish. 
If it is permeated with emptiness, the repeated permeation certainly leads to the exhaustion , and then the original spirit is probed. 
We follow , and open and clear them with emptiness. 
How could those people with pure minds not be delighted by the exhaustion ? 
Therefore, in ancient times took advantage of the void and entered the Way. 
Even if those who have attained buddhahood are as numerous as grains of sand in the Ganges River, has not yet reached the point where they are too numerous. 
Why is it imbued with all things in the phenomenal world and why does it make a relationship with them? 
Furthermore, is equal in being primarily void. 
Why is it divided into the ignorant and the sacred? 
Again, it has already been said that the mind makes all things in the phenomenal world. 
Before all things in the phenomenal world were created, what implicated the mind and made it move to produce them?” I answered, “The spirit is subtle while the physical body is coarse, but both make interactions. 
Now, although an ignorant person is mean, he is essentially able to know about the past in the present and to think of other places while being here. 
All this is due to the fact that the spirit has functions, so if we can completely train , we will know that is basically equal 11c and void. 
I have explained that the mind makes all things in the phenomenal world. 
When we observe reality based on this view, that these three issues are assuredly true. 
The reason they are so is, however, derived from non-beginning. 
How could there be the beginning of non-beginning? 
How could it be an issue whether or not those who learn understand? 
“A sage is indeed a coagulum , who simply gives up [the physical body], and who ‘is simply moved and later responds.’168 is beyond our comprehension, namely outside of the universe, where there is nothing by which we are moved. 
Therefore, left it intact and did not discuss it. 
“Now we live together, treading upon Earth under the canopy of Heaven. 
Outside of upon which we tread and under which we reside, could there be ﬁnality? 
The reason Yu assisted the ﬁve regions (i.e., Dian, Hou, Sui, Yao, and Huang) and governed no more than the nine provinces probably means that simply the areas that are reached by worldly inﬂuences. 
How could such borderlands be discussed? 
Now, we inferred from upon which we tread and under which we reside, and have ﬁnally reached what we cannot discuss. 
is, therefore, the same as this. 
In the case where we infer the function of the spirit of the present, seek the beginning point in the past, and ﬁnally reach what the sage left intact and did not discuss, an element of truth simply threads together, too. 
How could we discuss it alone? 
“All are derived from conditions made in the unseen world and following the universe they are eternal, but because what people’s senses feel is limited. 
People’s minds receive the sacredness by which they form the consciousnesses. 
It is just as when people’s eyes meet with sunlight, by which they come to see. 
Now, if very tiny hairs are spread a thousand steps away from us, weak-sighted people cannot see them even availing of , yet they have no shortcomings in perceiving the tiny hairs and avoiding danger. 
Why is the tiny hair a hundred xun away questioned on the basis of the vagueness of a thousand steps away? 
Those who do not master the foundation of conditions that give rise to phenomena and who lack feeling have no chance to meet sacredness, but they have no shortage in knowing and reaching the ferry that leads to the Way. 
Why is the teaching that was already clariﬁed questioned due to the vagueness of the beginning of conditions that give rise to phenomena?” A person asked, “People of today say that since they do not understand the beginning of conditions that give rise to phenomena, they cannot believe in the Buddha. 
Is this not affections of the mind? 
Why doesn’t the sage clarify it?” I answered, “What is called affections of the mind is a state of harboring or of exciting , and there is still an incomprehensible point in reason. 
We ought to avail ourselves of the sacredness in order to understand it thoroughly. 
Therefore, if people enjoy themselves being impeded by existence, then clariﬁes with the signiﬁcance of suffering and emptiness. 
If love without distinction is not propagated, then he shows benevolence through the act of diving into . 
Those [who practice the teaching] do not necessarily reach all together. Accordingly the three vehicles are established. 
Since acts vary, cultivations differ from each other. So the six pāramitās are elucidated. 
There is not even a single lack in the responsive activity for the ferry and the bridge to . 
It can be said ‘ is simply moved and later responds.’169 12a “Consequently, the heavenly beings who listened to the teaching on Vulture Peak were entirely relieved. 
those who arrived at the ultimate state were numerous. 
Would they have further questioned the beginning of conditions that give rise to phenomena and later arrived at the principle? 
The clear instruction is adequate. If you cultivate as said, what would be deﬁcient? 
Otherwise, how different are those who still certainly do not believe in and in the end have excessive doubts about what is beyond our comprehension from those who get a fatal disease and yet do not take medicine that is offered, or from those who are struck by a stray arrow and yet do not take the shaft out, bearing the pain, and who demand to know the basics of the construction of the arrow and the medicine, and so on, and end up in death? 
“This is entirely because those who have cultivated from ancient times and yet have not attained great good fortune cause the people who believe in today to absurdly doubt . 
How could this be considered to be real affections of the mind based on reason? 
The unreasonable movement of the mind [full of] absurd doubt assuredly has nothing to move the sacredness and to be able to elucidate. 
If we sincerely go with faith, awakening will come later in accordance with the response. 
Once we attain awakening, what is aroused can ﬁnally reach the acme of the unseen world. 
Those who stick to absurd doubt, who do not return to purity, and who do not straighten themselves out will precisely fall into the disaster of delusion for a long time. 
To turn one’s back on differs slightly from facing it, but to go up is greatly separated from falling into . 
Shouldn’t you be careful?” A person asked, “Confucius teaches: ‘ will not seek to live at the risk of injuring their virtue. 
In the Buddhist scriptures, too, the practices for bodhisattvas are prescribed. 
Laozi elucidates the utmost of wuwei, that is to say, the culmination of nirvana. However, have never spoken about supernatural power and the attainment of buddhahood. 
Could there be something Confucius and Laozi have left out? By clarifying the Way, do you want to stir up among people and cover up the real for attaining the Way? 
How can I stop giving rise to the question that there is no reality [in Buddhism]?” I answered, “In the origination of ediﬁcation, each teaching depends on to what it responds. 
When the pure wind became becalmed, the two chapters [of the Daodejing] were compiled in order to stop the movement. 
If Yan , Ran , Zai , Zigong, Yin Xi, and Zhuangzi were externally commended in the conduct of Confucianism and the profound learning in order to lead to the height of what people of the world feel, and they internally received the learning of nonarising in order to specialize in seeking the principle of the spirit, who in the world would know it? 
As for the class of people such as Ran Qiu, Ji Lu, Zixia, Zisi, Mencius, Linzong, Kangcheng, Ge Gong, Yan ping, Ban Si, and Yang Wang, some played their part within ethical education, some ended up by themselves, living an easy life free from worldly matters, and they were not delighted with the Buddhist teaching. 
All stopped within their scarce conditions and ﬁnally did not go any further. 
Therefore, Confucius and Laozi spoke out and instructed. 
“Confucianism promulgates benevolence and Daoism restrains activity. 
Even though the benevolence and good , the inactivity , and what the Buddha spoke of are common, regarding the dharmakāya and nirvana express nothing. 
Therefore, are simply obscure. 
Moreover, generally it is said that ‘ does nothing , but there is nothing that it does not do’172 and ‘The dharmakāya has no form and universally enters into all things.’173 Aren’t the same in tenor? 
Thereupon, even though the three teachings 12b of Confucius, Laozi, and the Tathāgata are different courses from each other, they are all of a piece in learning wholesomeness.” A person asked, “From the time of the Three Augusts and the Five Thearchs up to the time of Confucius and Laozi, there must have been people who cleansed their minds by the Buddhist teaching. 
Why is this?” I answered, “I have already made clear my intention about this in my previous discussion. 
Scholars of shallow learning exclusively compiled the vestiges of political affairs. 
If there were otherworldly statements, some were dispersed into historical records, and some vanished at the time of burning and burying . 
Now I will repeat and express what I have in my mind. 
“[It is stated in Kong Anguo’s preface to the Book of History (Shangshu xu) that] the writings by the Three Augusts are called the Three Ancient Books, which speak about the Great Way. 
At that time ﬁlial piety and benevolence were fully practiced. 
Why would they have had to teach humanity and justice ? 
The people did not leave behind simplicity and honesty. 
How could such as Laozi and Zhuangzi incite them to do so? 
If it is not clariﬁed that the foundation of the spirit is nonarising and the nature of all things is empty in order to illuminate the culmination, what is considered to be the Great Way? 
This writing has disappeared. 
Who in the world could know about it? 
“The historian Qian talks about the Five Thearchs. 
resided on the hill of Xuanyuan, climbed up Mount Kongtong, and ascended Mount Wan and Mount Dai.178 went to Youling and Panwu,179 and his outstanding vestige is beyond waves . 
How could we know that were not derived from the Way of the Tathāgata? 
“During the long-lasting period of the Five Thearchs, Yao reigned for one hundred years and Shun for only seventy years. 
In the style of Guang Cheng, Dawei, Hong Yai, Chao, Xu , Zhifu, the northerner , and the four immortals of Mount Gushi, the profound manners were accumulated and brimmed over at that time. 
Of the books by the Five Thearchs, however, there are only two compositions extant: the Tang and the Yu , which are not complete. 
How can we accept that it is entirely false [that there were Buddhist practitioners in ancient times] just because the ﬂourishing of the highest path is not found in these incomplete compositions? 
“Now, here we see the ruler of spiritual intelligence who roamed in the great and vast world, the seven sages who all together went to Mount Juci,181 and a holy man seen on Mount Gu Ye.182 They were beings in transformation. 
How could we know that what sublime words elucidate is not the spirit that went to extremes beyond numerous kalpas? 
Guang Cheng said, ‘The essence of the ultimate Way is deeply obscure.’183 He means the ‘heroic valor concentration’ . 
‘He who attains my Way will be the August at the highest, or a king at the lowest’ means that one can ascend or descend according to the ediﬁcation; he is similar to the Flying Emperor, the wheelturning noble king . 
‘He who fails in attaining my Way will see the light for the highest, or he will become the earth for the lowest’184 refers to those who transmigrate in Heaven and in the human realm. 
“ he sensed the great lofty air , called him the Heavenly Master, and withdrew from that place.185 is also the ten epithets . 
The Way was deeply practiced at that time. 
Thereupon, what the various schools of thinkers collected seems understandable but it is obscure. 
Furthermore, the learned among government ofﬁcials do not say that are elegant and instructive. 
Consequently, the result is that those who follow the worldly way and who do not deeply master the Way depend on history books that restrain them from reaching the doctrines, disregard the profound ediﬁcation complying with immediate feelings, and put their vigorous spirits in eternal trouble. 
“Boyi said in the Book of Mountains and Seas , ‘In the country of Tiandu the people are very dear to others and love each other.’186 In Guo Pu’s commentary on the book it is said, ‘The country we formerly called Tiandu is Tianzhu where Futu originated, and the expression “to be very dear to” means “to love.”’ also a model of the Tathāgata’s great benevolence. 
Originally was known in the times of the Three Augusts and the Five Thearchs. 
Although the national statute records do not impart , this is insufﬁcient to cause doubt. 
“Generally, how can we surmise things that happened from the three dynasties to the time of Confucius and Laozi, which were not recorded in books of history? 
Confucius asked about rites and Laozi responded to . 
Now, when the existence of various writings for a hundred generations is uncertain, there is nothing fully complete in reason. 
How could we judge solely by our observation that Confucius and Laozi had no exchange ? 
“Replying to a question of Emperor Wu of the Han dynasty, Dongfang Shuo advised him [to ask a man from Central Asia about the black ashes he had obtained, which, Zhu Falan later said, were the remains] burned in ﬁre at the time of the exhaustion of a kalpa.188 Liu Xiang’s Biographies of Arrayed Transcendents states that seventy-four men are found in the Buddhist scriptures. 
Again, it was not Emperor Ming of the Han dynasty that began . 
Nevertheless, those who exercise their spirits and stick to mundane matters are many and evident, while those who form sincerity in the tranquil and subtle state are rare and inconspicuous. 
Therefore, the fact to secretly be grateful is simply not exposed in sentient beings. 
“The eminent Buddhist monk Fotudeng was a kindhearted sage at the time of Shi Le and Hu. 
told Shi Hu that ‘In the city of Linzi county there is the old site of the King Aśoka Temple where there is still a image, and the dew basin is buried in the earth, twenty zhang under a big tree in a deep forest.’189 An envoy of Hu looked for them, relying on the illustration, and found everything had mentioned. 
Recently, when Yao Lüe’s uncle was a king of Jin, he saw a bright light at the site of the King Aśoka Temple, so called by the elders, in Puban of Hedong. 
Seeking , he had [his men] dig there and obtained relics of the Buddha in a silver case inside a stone container. 
Today bhikṣus live in a new temple . 
“From the observation of these facts, a long time has passed since Buddhist practices were transmitted to the land of Qi and Jin. 
The reason was not mentioned in the three commentaries is similar to the reason why in the history books written by Gan Bao and Sun Sheng (i.e., the Jinji and the Jinyangqiu) there are no remarks about the Buddha. 
During the Jin period, ﬂourished in the Jiangzuo area .” A person asked, “If all buddhas actually exist, understand thoroughly all phenomena, and are able to do all things freely with their awesome supernatural powers, why do they not brightly manifest themselves today? 
Why 13a do they not cause those of exquisite and those of weak equally to have faith and awaken them to the truth? 
Why do they not make the class of gentlemen see Buddhism? 
“Accordingly, people do not equally believe in , and they fall down together into the suffering of an icchantika. 
Among the people of the states of Qin and Zhao, six hundred thousand were buried by Bai Qi and Xiang Ji in a day.190 Actually, all people of good ethics of all ages, and all those who were buried neither necessarily have the conditions from previous lives for great wholesomeness, nor do they accumulate great evils without any conditions. 
Nevertheless, had no chance to see the Buddha’s mercy and were buried together on the same day. Sadly, this misery is completely equal . watched this extremely cruel from their seats, and never responded. 
What can be considered to be their mercy? 
“The condition does not overturn one’s fate, and virtue does not cause people to leave the world; that is to say, cannot save people. 
On what basis can it be considered that supernatural power is free and wonderful? 
Marquis Yang of Lu state put off the sunset [by guiding the sun with a spear when he fought Han state].191 Geng Gong welled out water .192 Song of Jiujiang, . 
, tigers kept out of Jiujiang and locusts were held back at the state boundary.193 Since they all thoroughly employed the power of their minds freely, they could mysteriously move non-human beings . 
It goes without saying that the Buddha’s supernatural power to pacify Qi’s mind and tame Ji’s mind is in order to save the lives of a million people. 
Moreover, among Buddhists, there are those who become śramaṇas and burn their bodies, those who renounce moral laws and cut the six feelings, and those who suffer from labor, or squander their fortunes in order to serve a temple and images. 
It is a pity! 
“If it is said that the response will come in the future, the six hundred thousand people mentioned previously were different the goodness and evil of their actions, and yet they were equally killed through injustice. 
Even if good and evil acts differ from each other, why is there difference only in what they undertook after death? 
The future is vast and restless. What are we supposed to expect there? 
Are we supposed to be afraid that there is really no future? 
“A sutra says: 
‘As toes touch the earth, all triple-thousand buddha lands appear, and all people, even to the extent of the blind, the deaf, the dumb, prisoners, and those who are suffering, attain peace.’195 Regardless of distance, life or death, and observance of the precepts (i.e., Buddhist or non-Buddhist), the Buddha is equally benevolent to everyone. 
If has the benevolent mind, he should see people’s suffering, and he should give peace to them in the same manner as in this . 
Moreover, Buddhist scriptures have many words like this, to make us happy. 
In fact, somewhat unexpectedly there is no immediate response. 
If you actually look at the path from above, you will not see anything difﬁcult. 
Nothing, in its regular course, is the Way.196 The Buddha simply established the Way by means of the spirit. 
13b Hence, virtue and the Way are one. 
The spirit and the Way are two [different issues]. 
Since they are two , they illuminate in order to lead to transformations. 
Since one, they always have causality and yet nothing to create. 
“Each of myriad transformations certainly follows causality, and is created in the Great Way. 
The reason we call him the Buddha is because he is free from all existing things and is beyond comprehension; it is not because he can save people absurdly, apart from conditions they created in their previous existences. 
Guidance of the spiritual function entirely pervades, just like complying with a precipice. 
What part is illuminated is simply unthinkable. 
“The Buddha is probably none other than the Way of sages. 
It is just as with Yao’s distinguished corresponding manifestation that when causality is ripe, even without doing anything, his achievement spontaneously manifested . 
The reason the tones of a bell move non-humans, [just as the tunes of Zou Yan’s music caused a variety of millet to grow in a cold ravine,] is because the mind profoundly corresponds ,197 not to mention ingenious sages who consider the principle of the spirit as virtue. 
“Generally, all those who have encountered each other in a far buddha land have a strong will and a pure spirit that have increased in brightness through many kalpas. 
Thereupon, they are able to take in and understand him thoroughly. 
The result is that Śākyamuni emits light that shines throughout the ten directions, Prabhūtaratna caused a to spring up ,198 and the world of Merupradīparāja Tathāgata was moved into Vimalakīrti’s room .199 How could the Buddha manifest himself alone ? 
can see [the Buddha]. 
“As for people like the gentlemen here today, they were not born in the fortunate of the Arhat but live within the land governed by Yu . 
Since in sincerity they all went against in their former , they meet perversity in their present . 
Even if a person is as upright as yi and qi, or as dutiful as Liu and Ji, as long as what he sets his mind on is against , how can he feel and see the Buddha? 
‘The gentleman among men is, in fact, the small man of Heaven.’200 On what basis could one who contains the highest spirit respond to the affections of their minds? 
They themselves do not see . 
“If some people were born following a condition and have the sincerity to practice the six pāramitās due to acts made in their previous life, they feel and see brightly by themselves. 
There must be such people time after time. 
If so, and if there are Buddhist clergy and laypeople side by side, how do we know the difference between them? 
Hence, whether or not one sees [the Buddha] is due to the difference in the response . 
How could you doubt the existence of the Buddha because you are not clear about the glorious appearance ? 
“There are numinous beings between Heaven and Earth. It is clear that the vigorous spirit is not perishable. 
Now, the spirits of the people of the states of Qin and Zhao arose together with the universe. 
Even if Heaven and Earth are settled and corrupted, are imperishable. 
How could the two generals Qi and Ji destroy six hundred thousand spirits at once? 
Spirits are unable to be exterminated; what are exterminated are physical bodies. 
Just as the Buddha says, what is usually perishable are the physical bodies of sentient beings. 
How can we make this clear? 
“ ‘The method of Qian is to change and transform, so that everything obtains its correct nature as appointed .’201 All lives, extending to those of birds, pigs, dogs, and sheep, are treated equally in the hexagrams and the six diagrams for divination . 
People eat other living creatures in order to support themselves. 
They are as cruel as spiders that spin their webs . 
Hawks and tigers cannot survive unless they catch and eat , but people can on cooked grain and vegetables. Even so, [people still kill and eat other living creatures]; they are very ferocious. 
The Way of Heaven is extremely fair; what it disseminates is life. 
How could it allow people to oppress the lives and suppress a response from the unseen world? 
Even though the six hundred thousand people must have been dissimilar to one another in character—some were good and some were bad— I am afraid that they did not differ in mercilessly eating other sentient beings. 
The good is different from the bad. 
Therefore, they received in their lifetimes should have certainly been dissimilar. 
they were all equal in harming sentient beings. 
Consequently, they should assuredly have received detriment on the same day. 
“Daoist sayings and what people of the world say are nothing new. 
Regarding Lord Yu and Bing Ji, their virtuous conduct of rescuing and making others happy was later rewarded.202 On the other hand, Yan Yannian , Tian Fen [of the Wei dynasty], and Emperor Xuan of the Jin dynasty murdered and received retribution in turn. 
These are all found in books of history of the Han and Wei dynasties as what was believed in the world. 
“ to save the lives of others will pass on blessings to his descendants, not to speak of the case where one’s vigorous spirit becomes the subject to save or destroy others’ lives; he will have reward or retribution in his later existence. 
If we destroy or save others’ lives, we ourselves will certainly receive retribution or reward. 
Needless to say, if one satisﬁes or frustrates the spirit of others, he will ascend or fall in his own spirit. 
Those killed by Yannian were all ordinary small people, while Dou Ying, [who was killed by Tian Fen,] and Wang Ling, [who was driven to commit suicide by Sima Zhongda, who later became Emperor Xuan,] were talented people; a prime minister and a loyal ofﬁcial [of the Wei dynasty]. 
were dissimilar in their intelligence and social status, but were equal in receiving retribution. 
“In respect of receiving retribution, it is regardless of excellence or humbleness; there is no difference between a general, a minister, and an emperor of the Jin dynasty. 
Isn’t it the case where the Way of Heaven is extremely fair, the children regardless of the distinction of their mental faculty, or where the principle lies in a person’s life, not in their nobility or humbleness? 
Even though a hog and a ﬁsh are humble, each of their lives is correctly based on the Way of Heaven. 
When we observe a large bird circling in the air, a small bird chirping, the ox whose lowing Gelu recognized,203 and the deer who moved Xi Ba ,204 is deeply affectionate toward the fellow animals of its kind. 
“ there are a pregnant woman and a young child. 
If a person cuts open and scoops out , or roasts [the young child], this is called an unjust and grievous offense, one at which Heaven shudders. 
To hunt pregnant animals in spring or to roast or salt down a lamb and a young bird are the same in the Way of Heaven. 
How could there be no retribution? 
Nevertheless, following the proper in which people drank blood, we now cannot suddenly stop hunting and ﬁshing. 
“Therefore, a sage king educated by ‘keeping away from the slaughterhouse and kitchen.’205 This is probably because he tried to lessen the harm, submitting to the fact that people slaughter . 
If one walks into a slaughterhouse and hears cries, he cannot bear . 
To set up hunting seasons in accordance with the wolf, and the otter, is done because it is hateful to injure pregnant animals at the inappropriate time. 
“Since the former kings relieved the masses and helped meet an urgent need, they had very deep benevolence, but they could not exercise strict control over immediately. 
Therefore, he values equally the lives in the ﬁve realms of existence, and set forth the abandonment of the destruction of life as the ﬁrst of many precepts. 
King Bimbisāra received retribution a white hare. 
the Śākya clan was ruined because yellow ﬁsh.207 indicate the natural features of retribution. 
“If had been able to listen to the Way and had cultivated the teaching and the precepts with respect, they would certainly not have fallen into a pit at Changping and been buried alive [as were the soldiers of] Lord Mafu .208 Even after falling into the pit, if they had believed in the teaching [and had been able to practice] thoroughly, they would have surely transcended their impending difﬁculties. 
If the sin caused by the condition in a previous existence is heavy, it is hard to receive the reward for his former , but the virtue he earns by observing the precepts arrives later, and he will surely not be buried alive again in his next existence. 
What you said about dispersing the spiritual function over the distressed in order to remove them from suffering injustice is just such a case as this. 
It is the highest benevolence. 
If one who is good in secular values and yet who does not have faith in the Way destroys the lives of many living creatures, retribution exposes him to danger. 
This is just as it should be. 
“The Buddha avails himself of the principle , lives up to the very nature of things, and saves people through the Dharma. He cannot unreasonably save those who do not follow the Dharma and the principle. 
How could the Buddha be unreal? 
This can be compared to the case of Bian Que, . 
Even though he tried to cure a sick person with medicine, if did not trust him and did not take the medicine, the disease would not be cured. 
“The reason Yang of Lu state put off the sunset [by guiding the sun with a spear when he fought Han state], Geng Gong [of the Later Han dynasty] welled out water [by adjusting himself and vowing twice in the land of Xiongnu], and the distant ancestor Jiujiang had virtue by which locusts and tigers were kept out of the area, is entirely because their strong sincerity moved . 
That the Way of the Spirit is moved is precisely the same as that the Buddha is moved. 
If [those who could have moved the Way of the Spirit] had been in the states of Qin and Zhao, they would surely not have fallen into trouble. 
That is to say, all those who fell into trouble had no sincerity. 
By what could they have moved the Buddha and harmonized and softened Qi and Ji? 
“Since those who possessed supernatural power congregated at the hall of a thoroughly educated one , it was possible to see Mount Sumeru in a mustard seed. 
Moreover, although they were now a tiger and a dove, they might have been human beings in their previous existences. 
They had once had the formation of a condition. 
Therefore, they met the Buddha and received the good fortune of sacriﬁcing his physical body to save the tiger and cutting off a piece of his thigh to give instead of the dove . 
‘The cessation of blowing sounds from the myriad apertures completely attributes to each of their own causes.’209 Why do you doubt the Buddha? 
“If your determination is ﬁrm, when you think of him, you will see him, and when you speak to him, he will listen to you. 
Confucius met the Duke of Zhou in a dream.210 [Emperor Gaozong of the Yin dynasty] saw the ﬁgure of Fu Yue and Fu Yue in fact came to him.211 there is a long interval between the time of the Duke of Zhou and that of Confucius, and Fuyan, is a long distance away . [The separation in time and distance,] however, did not obstruct these profound 14b meetings. When we presume from this point, we should believe that if we purify our thoughts and perceive , we will see Amitābha Buddha beyond myriad worlds without any effort. 
Why do you say that there is no difference and the bare, empty sky? 
“The Way lies in training the spirit, not in having the physical body exist. 
Hence, śramaṇas shave their heads, burn their bodies, encourage their spirits, and cut off association . 
The spirit is imperishable, and it is capable of traveling quickly to wherever it is going. 
“ strive for principles of human relationships and are distressed with their six feelings. 
If they sincerely take the tonsure by themselves and cut off , they will diminish from day to day, and through the puriﬁcation they will actually draw close to the Way. Even if they made strenuous effort to make a good reputation for themselves or expended all their fortune to build a fabulous residence, if they die soon after that, what they receive in name and reality does not go beyond ‘robbers and boasters,’ [just as is stated in the Laozi Daodejing].212 If they construct a mansion where images of deities are placed and where it is profound, tranquil, and solemn, their physical bodies will comply with its subtlety and their spirits will follow the profundity. 
If [the physical body] is subtle, the response will be pure. 
to be ‘robbers and boasters’ or to be close to the Way? 
If they go secretly and are united with the spiritual intelligence, happiness and prosperity will manifest in their later existences. 
How can we see what they will obtain ? 
“Activities in human affairs are certainly linked to the Way of the Spirit. In the phenomenal world nothing exists irrationally; everything must have a reason to exist. 
If profound and unseen reward or retribution is not like what I have said above, for what reason were the six hundred thousand people buried alive? 
Now, among people of the Warring States period, there were those as ingenious as An Qi, those as profound as the four white and bright men [of Mount Shang], and the man who became an emperor by having a noble face and who became a monarch by giving a part of his ﬁefdom to feudal lords (i.e., Emperor Gaozong of the Han dynasty). 
Wouldn’t this be a corresponding manifestation of reward from each person’s previous existence? 
“Inasmuch as happiness in this existence is the result of actions made in a previous existence, it is clear that the actions one makes in this existence will result in reward and retribution in his next existence. 
Now, the difference of personality in this existence is made clear by the previous existence, so why is only what one accepts in his next existence allowed to be exceptional? 
According to what a sutra expresses, ‘To take the chance to see the Buddha’s ediﬁcation is entirely due to the fact that there was originally an excellent condition . 
Therefore, when one meets , he feels as if he has met before.’214 [Nevertheless, you said that] there has been no sudden corresponding manifestation of response and all faults have nothing to do with . 
You should fear the offense of disgracing the Sage. 
I venture to ask you: 
Is the one who made up the ﬁctitious idea a sage, a wise person, or a small person? 
“The Sage does not have an invariable mind of his own. 
It is probably because he educates the masses, following their natures, and has them fulﬁll . 
If the spirit perishes when the body dies, should just devote themselves to do their best with the Confucian teaching to the ends of their lives. 
Again, what is the matter? 
try to delude people by saying that the spirit is immortal, and deceive them by telling about the attainment of buddhahood. 
induces people to take the tonsure and burn the skin, and causes married couples to divorce. 
There are innumerable people who have refrained from having offspring. 
What are these ﬁctitious ideas good for? The harm they cause is much more painful. 
We know that this is not what sages and wise people did. 
“If the person belongs to a group of people like Fan Xu, 215 he restrains himself out of fear that the Duke of Zhou and Confucius may consider him a heretic and does not venture to act recklessly. 
If he is below the level of that group, he is merely one of the good-for-nothings. 
“Five hundred years , people like Nāgārjuna, Āryadeva, Aśvaghoṣa, Kātyāyanī, Dharmaṣresthin, Vasubhadra, and Dharmatrāta respectfully explained the teaching of the Way in the Dazhidulun, the Zhonglun , the Bailun, and a group of the Abhidharma discussions. 
These people had a genius for supernatural powers. 
The eight wise men, such as Jīvaka and Jiantuole,216 about whom Sun Chuo recently composed a hymn, and those whose portraits Zhi Daolin drew together with a eulogy, such as Dharmarakṣa, Yu Falan, Daosui, and Que Gon, have the spirit that shines over the Chinese nation. 
Zhu Faxing of China was compared to the Director of the Imperial Secretariat Yue (d. 
304) by his contemporary . 
Śrīmitra of the Jiangsu area [during the Eastern Jin dynasty] was highly evaluated for the outstanding and lofty state of his mind by all the princes. 
Guo Wenju was broadminded, profound, and sincere, and he had faith only in Buddhism. 
“Generally since the time of Nāgārjuna, could there be people who entirely incur danger caused by the deceit of those good-for-nothings mentioned above? 
In that case, wouldn’t the matter of Master Yellow Face be undoubted? 
“The image, relics, teeth, hair, other articles, and remaining footprints of the Buddha are still luminous in his homeland. 
This fact is also evidence of the Way. 
There are many people in the foreign land who have keen natures for examining things and who are intelligent. 
In addition, their sensual desires are generally deep. 
Since the time their ancestors stood in front of the Buddha, all of them have accumulated acts, intimately transmitted in the world, and relied on the facts. 
The image, the relics, and the legacy brightly educate the people, and their harmonious relationship is clear. 
Hence, the descendant kings bade the whole nation to observe the precepts. 
The four kinds of Buddhist disciples devote themselves wholeheartedly to ascetic . They will have no regret even if they were to die . 
If the doctrines are peculiar and vague, and if there is nothing real and wonderful in these events, would be willing to exert themselves to control their carnal desires in order to respect the Invisible One? 
If the image and the articles are not real, and if rumors are circulating, why do people, both of the past and of present times, torment themselves to leave behind carnal desires in order to make progress toward the goal? 
“I would like to argue . 
The reason why from former times is not evident for those who study the Way is because lies in holding onto life, but suffering arises from [holding onto] life. 
Therefore, all buddhas enlighten them by means of suffering, and lead them by means of non-birth. 
non-birth cannot be quickly realized. 
If one collects merit and sublimates himself more and more, he can be led to the clear, serene culmination. 
For this reason, the Way is as vast as a blue sea. 
No matter how small, there is nothing that is not ferried across, and no matter how large, there is nothing that is not led. 
“Even though is very much opposed to [the teaching of] striving after making a living and holding onto life, it also teaches the ﬁve cardinal duties and induces people to practice and assist ethical education. 
The reason why people of the world say that weal and woe are not well timed in the Way of Heaven is similar to the reason why the historian Qian had deep emotion about Boyi.217 First of all, why would the sage Confucius have made a reckless statement? 
Shangchen died a natural death in old age, [even though he had murdered his father, King Cheng,] and his son King Zhuang was sagacious and assumed the hegemony. 
Generally these matters cannot be entirely understood in reason, but could there be anything that is not understood in reason? 
“We cannot help believing the teaching that [if one accumulates enough good deeds,] he will have blessings in his later existence, and he will have misfortune in the three lowest realms of existence. 
Even though the physical body has life and death, the vigorous spirit will certainly receive responses to [what one has done in his lifetime]. 
Causes and conditions, however, have a sequence. 
It is just as there are early or later manifestations of fortune or misfortune in one’s lifetime. 
If are encompassed within the framework of one hundred years, there is no one, wether young or old, who is not included. 
Even whose hair has faded and turned to yellow and whose back is hunched over and covered with spots, like the blowﬁsh, still feel that the time they have lived is ﬂeeting, not to mention those who have lived for a shorter time. 
Moreover, time never stops and the movement is everlasting. 
The time that has already passed is incalculable and limitless. 
Why is it difﬁcult to come up to one hundred years by accumulating moments that are as brief as the blink of an eye? 
“People’s attachment to their physical bodies, which are [as short-lived as] morning dew, has mostly nothing in the reality of the clean and remote . 
Why do they content themselves a water clock with become rotten and stink, abuse the eternally existing spirit, and not themselves cast obstructions to the remote wind? 
Since they merely wander in the realm of human beings, and are noisy on the worldly path, they simply feel that the human way is prosperous and belittle the idea of spirits. 
the clear spaciousness of the universe and the wonder of the sun and moon shining through. 
Could it be possible that there is no dignity of awesome numinous beings of various sages there, and there is only a multitude of people who busy themselves with worldly matters? 
Certainly, we will think of the eternal in order to open the thought of the Way of the Spirit, and feel tranquility in order to elucidate the corresponding manifestation of numinous beings. 
“In the past in Lu state Confucius wrote the Five Classics, by which he educated the people of the world. 
When he looked down from the top of Mount Tai and Mount Meng, both the world and Lu state appeared small [to him].219 Doesn’t this indicate that his spirit united with the universe and consequently he transcended this world? 
If this is so, the Five Classics were probably written merely to respond to trivial requests for a momentary lifetime. 
How is it possible that the people of the world block the Buddhist Dharma and do not believe in it? 
Is the reason you do not believe in [the Buddhist Dharma] because there is no spiritual intelligence but the multitude, or because that there is spiritual intelligence but there is no buddha? 
If there is no spiritual intelligence at all but the multitude, then who ordered the swallow to cause the Shang dynasty to be born into the world?220 Who left the footprints of a giant that caused to have a feeling and give birth to Qi ?221 The Han, Wei, Jin, and Song dynasties all had an auspicious decree from Heaven . 
If there are the principles of spirits, there must be the subtle zenith. If ‘he who is marvelous since 83 15b he has gotten the One’ is not the Buddha,222 who else could he be? 
Why is it necessary to deceive the people and later teach them? 
In that case, it is not open to question that the Dharma is real and the teaching is truthful. 
Therefore, by law all beings respond to the spirits who have reached the profound culmination. In the case of Yao, various kinds of animals that lived far away danced, being impressed with his virtue.223 Isn’t this the manifestation of moving [and responding between Yao and the animals]? 
The Buddha is the foundation of various manifestations of moving and responding. 
For the sun, moon, the seas, and the high mountains, there are the morning and evening rites and the signiﬁcance of the worship of viewing the mountains and rivers from a distance, not to mention the Buddhist Way that many people cultivate; those of high rank trace to the very source of spirits beyond the realm of arising, those of middle rank receive a physical body in the subtle realm of arising (i.e., the realms of heavenly beings and human beings), and those of low rank can be exempted from the three lowest realms of existence. 
“What the worldly teaching propagates is to attain peace and order in the whole course of one’s life. 
Those who deeply master are rare, while those who the world are numerous. 
How could they have ever participated in ? They just follow worldly trends and say that if one dies his spirit perishes. 
Consequently they do not strive for a lofty aspiration in the pure and distant , and utilizing every spare moment, many people comply with worldly trends. 
Therefore, the way of gentlemen is seldom practiced. 
If we examine with the Buddhist Dharma, our physical bodies are not ourselves; probably they are only like an inn in which to rest for awhile. 
The spirit is the part of ourselves . 
It exists boundlessly and eternally, and has no end . “The virtue of those who have the best virtue pervades over them limitlessly. Those who are good in the middle rank are slowly led to purity, are promoted, and attain the exhaustion . Those who are least virtuous in the low rank just have a chance to reform their evil acts, and they may make up for mistakes they have made to move to an upper rank. 
Therefore, from ancient times, regardless of sharp and dull faculties, there are innumerable people who keep themselves pure, hold a lofty aspiration, behave prudently in the present existence in order to shape karma in the next existence, and go on to supreme virtue. 
This is the efﬁcacy of the Buddhist Dharma. 
These are all what worldly customs and traditions block and what the Buddha opens up. 
As for the category, isn’t it the vast bright way to the wondrous existence? 
Why do you disregard it and not uphold it? 
“Wind, after passing through a ﬂame, is warm, and it is assuredly fresh when it blows through a forest. 
Water becomes muddy in a rapid stream, and when it becomes puriﬁed the rocks can certainly be clearly seen. 
Gains and losses in the function of the spirit also lie in to what the spirit entrusts itself. 
Not having faith in the Buddhist Dharma is not necessarily due to one’s temperament but is probably because of one’s frame of mind. 
If you try to keep your mind away from worldly affairs and move what is projected to the pure and subtle , the Buddhist doctrine will be clear and all matters can be believed. 
Since you can eternally save all the karma of your ancestors, both evident and hidden, up to a hundred past generations, it is the great ﬁlial piety. 
Since all sentient beings beneﬁt from benevolence, it is the highest mercy. 
Since the spirit concentrates and becomes subtle, it is the culmination of the Way. 
If what began even in the mind of an ordinary person is placed on the right track at the beginning, even if many kalpas pass, for sure it will directly gather at the profound culmination in the end. 
Equally, if the same person fails to get onto the track and goes astray, he will aimlessly go a long way and eternally sink into the nine realms [of the transmigration of birth and death]. 
How sad it is! 
If what I said above is not true, why in the world do virtuous sages suddenly appear, why are stupid and humble people born and brought up, and why are there all buddhas in the upper stratum and ﬂying and wriggling insects at the bottom? 
All of these are the natural features of the gains and losses of the spirit. 
15c “People have a physical body of seven chi and grow old and die in several tens of years, of which half is entirely occupied by nighttime. 
Since there are many days to go into mourning or to get sick, suffer for half [of their remaining time, not counting nights]. 
In addition, the prime of life passes , and when one has honor and fame he is certainly afraid of being disgraced. 
Pleasure really comes together with distress, and there is no perfect peace. 
however, strive with each other in entering the steep path of popular custom, and hate to advance on the spacious path of the Buddhist Dharma. 
What do you think of their intelligence? 
There are really many people in the world who are troubled about the Buddhist doctrine since they cannot understand the beginning of the conditions that give rise to phenomena. 
conditions that give rise to phenomena is vast and limitless, and it is not reached by our recollections. 
I would like to repeat and explain this. 
“‘The sage created the Book of Changes.’224 can practice divination by interpreting the sun, moon, and heavenly bodies that hang down from the sky, and know good or bad luck, peace or upheaval. 
Nevertheless, when we investigate why it results in such a situation, we are unable to know anything, since the sage did not clarify it. 
Now, if we give up what we can know because we do not know [why it results in such a situation], and take actions contrary to divination or against the signs of the sky, would anything be lost? 
To go against the Buddhist Dharma because the beginning of conditions that give rise to phenomena is not clear is similar to this. 
Moreover, people say that the spirit originally does not exist since they do not remember what they thought in their former existences. 
When he thinks of this he has a vague feeling and remembers nothing, not to mention one who has experienced the transmigration of birth and death and who has gone through different bodies. 
“When Zilu asked about death, the Master said, ‘While you do not know life, how can you know about death?’225 When he asked about serving spiritual beings, said, ‘While you do not know about serving men, how can you know about serving spirits?’226 “Wouldn’t it be that although You was completely fond of bravery and sincerely served his master, he should have originally asked questions about matters within his lifetime? 
Even though had questions about birth and death and the origin of spiritual beings, they are not from real affections of the mind based on reason. 
Therefore, ‘ man’s nature and the Way of Heaven cannot be heard.’227 In Buddhist statements there is the phrase ‘The fourteen questions regarding the issue of of sentient beings or the issue on whether or not has boundaries are entirely left intact and not answered by all the intelligentsia.’228 If answering indeed has no beneﬁt, to fall into viciousness. 
Then the Way to respect sages and to believe in the Buddha should decline what it renounces and should take what it is granted, just as when a thirsty man goes to drink water from a river and scoops up water from the stream to satisfy himself. 
Would it be necessary for him to trace the very source on Mount Kunlun? 
Generally, in the Buddhist Dharma, unreasonable things like disobeying Heaven and hindering the principles can be doubted. 
Now, [in Buddhism,] there is no unreasonable hindrance and there is truth to follow the mandate of Heaven and purify the spirit. 
Wouldn’t this really be so? 
Trouble and misfortune happen in events every now and then. 
Natural disasters rise in force imperceptibly. 
Even reﬁned and noble people or those who have a million followers spontaneously have a physical body and a spirit at the beginning, and wait for impermanence , just sitting there. 
Even though ‘the members of the household are with stern severity’ or ‘the wife and children are to be smirking and chattering,’229 they suddenly become downcast and absentminded. 
How much less can we rely adequately on people’s minds? 
They wastefully slander the profound teaching and indulge themselves in wanting to harm it uselessly, but the spirit is immortal. 
Even if they desire its morality, they cannot have it, and they must receive a body because of a sin they have committed. 
Sentient beings who have no redeeming features and various kinds of insects of the present time are all examples of this. 
Those who try to seek should consign themselves only to sincerity, believe in the Buddha, rely on the mind, and observe the precepts in order to reinforce their vigorous spirits. 
“If you receive the aid of numinous beings in your lifetime, you will be pure and peaceful after death. 
If you are pure and peaceful endlessly, then you will directly attain buddhahood. 
The Buddha is originally said to be this state, but people disparage it. 
On what basis do you judge that people are better than the Buddha? They are not better . 
They cannot stop falling into the evil realms where they eternally receive intense suffering. 
It is beyond our control in the secular world that there are people who are born into the six extreme evils. 
Those who are diligent in what they hear and see, when they are about to die they mostly have a stable mind on their deathbeds. 
Even if those in urgent and desperate situations chant the name of Avalokiteśvara with wholehearted devotion, there is almost no one who will not be favored with salvation. 
How can they increase their spirits and manage myriad cycles ? 
If you rely on the Duke of Zhou and Confucius to educate the masses, and taste the Buddhist Dharma to nourish the spirit, you will be an intelligent ruler in your lifetime and a bright spirit after death, and you will always manage . 
How could the Tathāgata deceive me? 
does not lead to wasting money and harming people by worshiping a pagoda, making luxurious images, and supporting incapable monks with tolerance. 
“Those who do not see the profound reality of things and yet look at immediate disadvantages will unrestrainedly insult the Dharma. 
“Formerly Master Huiyuan puriﬁed his karma on Mount Lu. 
I went there and stayed for ﬁfty days. 
His teacher, Master Daoan, had spiritual virtue that was spontaneously wonderful. 
He was a bhikṣu such as is rarely encountered. 
Both were originally of wide knowledge in the Way, and later lived in isolation on a mountain. 
often talked with me under the trees on a cliff or in a valley. 
were philosophical, but there was spontaneously something to admonish people in their expression. 
What is well conﬁrmed refers to that created a written language on the basis of bird’s footprints, that he who traced the very source of the spirit could hear people’s songs, 231 or that [Emperor Wen of the Han dynasty] who recovered the power took Tiying’s word and consequently corporal punishment was permanently abolished.232 Certainly phenomena suddenly come out of the affections of the delicate mind and ﬁnally shoot up into the sky. 
If I suddenly die, how could I not know that I am transcending to ?” End of Fascicle Two of The Collection for the Propagation and Clariﬁcation The Discourse to Explain the Way by Sun Chuo There was a person who was doubtful of the highest Way . 
I explained to him thus. 
Hence, those of limited knowledge expect what emerges within what they each view. 
Those who feel satisﬁed even while in a snare are suspicious about the capability of those who swim around in an ocean. 
Those who can ﬂy only to a height of several ren doubt the ability of those who can soar high into the sky. 
People bound by the worldly teaching and who indulge in looking at the traces of the Duke of Zhou and Confucius say that the highest virtue reached its culmination with Yao and Shun, and that sublime words were completed in the Laozi and the Book of Changes. 
The zhangfu is abandoned by people who customarily wear almost nothing, and [Emperor Shun’s musical composition] Dashao and Daxia are ignored in rural areas. 
If these people are extremely deluded and cannot be improved, they will not be moved by words and explanations. 
I will try to clarify the tenor [of Buddhism, hoping that] there may be someone who will come to be awakened in due course. 
The Buddha is the one who has realized the Way. 
The Way is what leads sentient beings. 
“It does nothing, but there is nothing it does not 91 16c accomplish.”233 Since it does nothing, it is free from preoccupation, peaceful, and spontaneous. 
Since there is nothing it does not accomplish, it spiritually educates all beings. 
In what all beings seek, there is the variety of low and high. 
Therefore, of the methods to transmit the teaching, some are precise and some are less exact. 
The foundation of the teaching is given to those of superior faculty. 
Misfortune is visited upon those who do not follow [the teaching]. 
Those who indulge in wine are imposed with a penalty. 
Those who steal are meted out appropriate punishment . There are the criminal laws established by the three dynasties, and the ﬁve penalties.234 People who violate the law are not pardoned. 
This is the rulers’ common institution, of which prime ministers and governors take charge. 
If a sage king rules over the world and ofﬁcials are intelligent and broad-minded, the criminals mentioned previously will certainly be thoroughly inspected, and there will be no hope of avoiding punishment. 
If vicious people are not allowed [to indulge] their self-interest, there will be no violators in the state, and wise and virtuous people will certainly be cited and evaluated for reward. 
Moreover, when the ruler is bright, his vassals are honest, the world is pure, and the law prevails; we can especially distinguish good and bad from each other and not be confused about right and wrong. 
Needless to say, in the place where deities are present, regardless of distance and obscurity, they are intelligent, upright, and honest in punishing the evil and helping the good. 
Hence, reward and retribution will visit even an extremely small merit and a very small demerit without the slightest aberration. 
When we go over the testimonies of weal and woe of all ages, they all have derivations and are recorded in evidence. 
How could they be concealed? 
The reason is because in a family that has plotted a crime, its descendants will not ﬂourish.235 Daoists clearly proscribe that a family can inherit the position of general beyond three generations.236 Isn’t this because weapons are evil, and warfare is a perversion that leads to killing many people? 
Wei Ke followed initial will and attained [the reward of] the grass trap.237 Zidu was faithful and received the conferment a very fast horse.238 After Prince Xiang of Qi state pinned the blame on , the disaster of falling from a vehicle befell him.239 Prince Hui of Jin state ignored courtesy. 
Consequently, he was at a disadvantage and had difﬁculties Hanyuan.240 This is all corroborative evidence that the dead retaliate against or reward the living. 
With regard to that Xuan Meng had pity for a starving man, at Yisang241 and an old lady who beat cotton in water sympathized with the weariness of Huaiyin,242 these all show that with a meal one who had suffered from starving was saved. 
Moreover, Zhao received help from who betrayed his master , and the old lady received the reward of a thousand pieces of gold. 
Therefore, when you achieve virtue secretly, blessing is revealed in all things. 
It is compared to sowing grain seeds in the soil, and then reaping a harvest one hundred times greater . 
The earth and the grain have no feeling toward human beings, yet a natural advantage comes to them . 
A person criticized this, saying, “If the issue of reward and retribution indeed entirely has signs, why does the teaching of the Duke of Zhou and Confucius not proscribe killing? 
Do you think that the sages had the intention of killing ?” The person answered, “No.” I continued, “You are really aware that they had no intention to kill. 
However, they killed because it was simply the intention of the masses.” “As the times go and the world changes, insincerity and simplicity arise in human beings. 
In the time of Tang and Yu, decorum occurred for the ﬁrst time. 
Accordingly, in the three dynasties, the net of criminal law became more evident. 
Even though executions were strictly carried out, this still did not prevent as heinous as a ruler and his 17a vassals exterminating each other, or fathers and sons killing each other. 
Sages were aware that the people’s feelings were indifferent to killing and it was impossible to swiftly put an end to it. 
Therefore, they gradually restrained the people and had them seek the appropriate manner. 
“This is compared to the case where a viper bites a man’s leg and he must have the leg cut off in order to save himself from death, or a man who has a malignant tumor in the body must gouge it out in order to save his life. 
To lose one in order to keep ten is to weigh the signiﬁcant over the less signiﬁcant. 
Hence, the reason criminals are executed in fall and winter is because they take life according to the seasons . 
In the politeness of providing a way of escape,245 if a bird or beast comes toward , he sheathes his bow . 
If you have heard the cries or seen them alive, when their meat is served to you, you will not eat it. 
‘If you go ﬁshing, you will not use a net. 
“As for discussions of lawsuits, you will reprieve the death sentence, and in a time of natural disasters you will grant amnesty. 
If you must pass a sentence of death, you will do so with tears in your eyes, feeling sympathy and never joyful. 
This shows that one’s gratitude for having been given birth and raised is deep. 
This is what is called ‘It does all and yet does not rely on them; it excels and yet it does not preside over all.’247 This virtue covers and yet one does not think its merit lies in oneself. 
How can we punish brutal men, restrain wicked people, and exercise control over the masses?” I answered, “This is not so. 
The Duke of Zhou and Confucius are nothing other than the Buddha; the Buddha is nothing other than the Duke of Zhou and Confucius. 
Thus, one who holds the reigns of the August is the August, and one who is on the throne of a king is a king. 
“‘Buddha’ is a Sanskrit term; the Chinese translation is Jue. 
It is compared to Mencius, who considered sages those who are ﬁrst awakened .249 The purport is the same . 
In responding to [the demands of] the world and serving as a model for people, they probably comply with the time. 
the Duke of Zhou and Confucius relieves the extremely corrupted world, while the Buddha’s teaching simply clariﬁes the fundamental law . 
Both are consistent; they do not differ as to the goal. 
Namely, it is just as the sages of non-Buddhism differ in the depth of their deeds. 
Therefore, those who consider retrogressively see one as two always, while those who understand properly have nothing to go to other than one.” A critic said, “In the teaching of the Duke of Zhou and Confucius, ﬁlial piety is considered to be the root. 
Filial piety is the culmination of virtue and the foundation of all actions. 
‘When this foundation is established, the way arises’250 and ‘ reaches to spiritual intelligence.’251 Consequently, in cases where children serve their parents, they attend to their parents with devotion while are alive, and they offer worship to their parents after passed away. 
Among three thousand offenses, there is nothing heavier than having no offspring.252 Our bodies are from our parents, and we must not presume to injure or wound them.253 Thus, Yuezheng was injured in the leg and was overwhelmed with shame for the rest of his life.254 17b “However, the way of the śramaṇa is to leave his native place recklessly, to abandon his parents, to stay with strangers, to shave his beard and hair, to damage his natural appearance, to have no sign of supporting while they are alive, to discontinue the rite of ancestor worship after death, and to consider his parents by blood to be the same as mere passersby. 
In going against good conscience and hurting human feelings, nothing is worse than this. 
How is this different from mowing down the roots , trimming the branches and trunks, and then saying that will be distinguished and grow tall and thick? 
If skin did not exist, how could hair attach to it? 
This greatly contradicts the worldly teaching. 
How are you going to reassure us about this matter?” I answered, “This is really a serious delusion of the extremely vulgar and a great error caused by your wrong view. 
“Parents and child are one body, and they cast their lots together. 
Therefore, if a mother hurts her ﬁnger, her child feels a ﬂutter in his heart [even if he is away from her]. It is because their common vapor causes him to feel and respond to it. 
Their unity leaves no space between them. 
If a father is prosperous, his son will rise to a high position. 
If a son attains high rank, his father will be respected. 
Therefore, ﬁlial piety is valuable. 
It is valuable because we can rise in the world, practice the way , and glorify our parents for a long time.255 Even if we were to prostrate ourselves before our parents, cherish them, and offer them a feast of the three different kinds of meat every day, we would still not be able to cause all people to respect us. 
These are the ways to nourish our parents. 
I have already elucidated the foundation [of ﬁlial piety]. 
I will talk to you further about the next issue. 
Shu of Yin opposed the ruler, [Lord Zhuang of Zheng state, and organized a meeting for Lord Zhuang and Lord Zhuang’s mother, who had had a conﬂict with her son,] yet was praised as faithful and ﬁlial in a history book.258 Shi Que killed his son [because he had kept company with Zhouxu, who had ascended the throne by killing the heir of Wei state], and displayed integrity as a loyal military man.259 The Zuoshizhuan states that when a son can enter government service, his father teaches loyalty to him; once name is recorded on the orders of appointment and he is commissioned, it is considered an offense to serve two masters.260 In this case, those who tie the chin straps for holding the cap at court have to give up the way of ﬁliality. 
Because if he sees is in danger, he will sacriﬁce his life but will pay no attention to his parents. “All these people’s names are recorded in history books and their services are gloriﬁed as the highest of the teaching . 
How could the recorders of history consider their impiety to be a sin? 
Therefore, as the proverb says, ‘When you look for a loyal subject, you must go to the clan that produces ﬁlial sons.’261 This indicates that even though there is a minor fault on one hand, there is a great favorable aspect on the other hand. 
“Moreover, Gun was exiled to a border region, but Yu did not ask for permission to leave ofﬁce.262 If had abandoned Yao’s decree in order to look for his father, he would have placed the highest government affairs his personal sorrow. 
“Taibo of the Zhou dynasty left his relatives in the distance, sought escape in a strange land, cut his hair, and tattooed his body, [complying with the customs there,] and never returned to his homeland in his lifetime or even after his death.263 Nevertheless, he is praised for having the highest virtue in Confucius’s Analects,264 and recorded as a man of great morality in the history books. 
This is actually because he was indifferent to the honorable throne and maintained the nobility of effacing himself; the merit he made by trying to give the throne three times is lofty, and the fault he committed by damaging his body 17c is minor. 
Consequently, he was able to make great changes to the barbarian customs and leave his teaching to history. 
Gao Xing of Liang state damaged her looks and kept her chastity. 
Princess Bo of Song state followed righteousness and neglected her life. 
Both their names are ranked among those women who died to defend their chastity, and their virtue is considered a model for all women. 
If you keep in mind the morality of these two ladies, you will simply escape the charge of being stupid and immoral. 
When we speak in accordance with these points, we can see that is in order of the importance of the by which we abide. 
“Formerly, the Buddha was a crown prince, but he abandoned his country and studied the way . He wanted to keep the original feature completely and enter the Way. 
he was afraid that he would not be able to escape from being detained . 
So he cut his beard and hair and changed his court dress of a crown prince . 
He showed to not return outwardly and tried to govern himself in simplicity internally. 
Thus, he gave up the palace and stayed in a vast forest. 
He took off the clothes of imperial emblem in order to put on a robe of deerskin. 
Then, he took as his dwelling a place where tree branches hung down and a mat of grass as his cushion. 
He saved himself the trouble of combing his hair. 
He avoided the nuisance of taking a bath. 
He tightened the reins of running after [empty fame, power, and wealth], and closed the gate of carnal desires. 
His eyes were restrained from black and yellow. His ears were closed to lewd sounds. 
His mouth forgot sweet and bitter. His thought was released from joy and sorrow. 
His mind left behind nuisances. 
“He stuck to the One and controlled his wandering spirit. 
He let his mind play in the three groups of the four stages of meditation, and he went in and out of the twelve gates of meditation. 
While he meditated, he folded his hands over the navel, was silent, remained still like a mountain, and was as serene as deep water. His spirit was just like cold ashes and his body was like a withered tree. 
He sat upright for six years. Then, enlightenment was achieved and he was called the Buddha. 
“He is equipped with the three transcendental knowledges and the six supernatural powers. 
His graceful body, which is zhang and six tall, has a golden glow. 
Its light suppresses that of the sun and moon. His voice is in harmony with the winds that blow from the eight directions. 
His body has the thirty-two and eighty minor marks of physical excellence. 
His spirit is completely free. 
Thus, he saunters beyond the three realms of existence, transforms freely in boundless realms, and makes the sky revolve, the earth dance, the mountains ﬂy, and streams meander. 
He appears and disappears suddenly. His supernatural transformation is unceasing. 
Wherever his mind is directed, nothing can hinder him. 
By the great doctrine, he reformed a great number of evil beings to correct their courses. 
None among the numerous demons and those who had followed minor teachings did not adhere to [the teaching of the Buddha]. 
“At this point in time, Heaven became pure and Earth was made prosperous. 
‘The various things obtain their full development.’266 Living creatures, even wriggling , were immersed and nurtured in mysterious liquid. 
Withered and dry were refreshed and bloomed. 
returned to his native country in glorious radiance, where he extensively expounded the teaching. 
His father, the king, was moved, became awakened, and ascended to the place of Buddhist practice, too. 
In this way, brought honor to his father. 
What ﬁlial piety can be compared to this? 
“Thereupon later generations receive and propagate the teaching. 
They resolve to revere the lofty path. 
They all follow their parents; they hold nothing other than what esteem. 
If they have brothers, their parents’ support is not abolished. 
Since they are able to cultivate the great work immensely, their gratitude to their parents is not neglected. 
Moreover, enable the dead to attain happiness in order to be reborn in Heaven. 
Isn’t this the way to the Great Pervader that concurrently holds wholesomeness?267 “ that the neighbor of the east side butchers an ox , while the neighbor of the west side offers sacriﬁces to a god.268 In the Yin dynasty, a variety of millet was considered to be good , but in the Zhou dynasty, the highest virtue was more esteemed [than offerings]. 
On this point the period of the rise and fall is apparent. 
“There are twelve kinds of scriptures in Buddhism. 
Four among them exclusively hold that exhorting people to be ﬁlial is important. 
The attentive intention can be said to be perfect. 
Nevertheless, ordinary people do not know the details of their origin. 
They have not gotten involved in the place concerned with , but then make wild talk and reckless speech; they wholeheartedly attack and criticize . 
With a view as small as the light of a ﬁreﬂy or candle, they doubt that is as abundant as the light of the sun, moon, and stars. 
With [knowledge as shallow as] a drop of dew on the tip of a blade of grass, they doubt the quantity of water in a deep ocean. 
They consider false accusations to be eloquence and having determination to be an honor. 
They can be said to be those who are disrespectful to great men and disgrace the ordinances of Heaven.”269 Response to He Chengtian’s Letter by Layman Zong Bing: 
The Criticism on the Discourse on Buddhist Laymen and Clergy He’s Letter to Zong Recently I received a letter from you, virtuous Gentleman for Palace Attendant, which says that you are diligent in Buddhist rituals for [rebirth in] the Western Paradise. 
The determination of a person of virtue and talent is great. 
How could I regard ten thousand kalpas to be extravagant? 
Since those who become monks ought not to clarify this issue, why do we, lay Buddhists, keep silent? 
I am very ignorant, but I hope you will have good ideas to enlighten me. 
Sincerely yours, He Chengtian Zong’s Response to He’s Letter Monk lin’s Discourse on Buddhist Laymen and Clergy, which you sent to me, is clear in writing and excellent in its points of argument. 
I am, however, in the dark about the explicit principles and I have not yet understood thoroughly the intention of . 
“The principles of the unseen world are not based on human affairs alone. 
The Duke of Zhou and Confucius were doubtful of them, but they did not provide an explanation. 
If they are vast and simply empty, why do all sages, including Zhuangzi and Laozi, say that there are spirits? 
If there is the spiritual intelligence, on what basis did judge is really not like what the Buddha says? 
Now we are altogether within the conﬁnes of ordinary people. 
Even when we infer familiar matters, we still make many errors and mistakes, through which we fall into disaster. 
Sometimes we think that it is alive but it turns out to be dead; or that it is dead but in fact it is alive. 
In all of our familiar matters, we have never seen those who always gain and 101 never lose. 
On what basis does determine outside of Heaven and Earth, beyond hundreds of million of kalpas, and of the imperceptible , and say with certainty that what debate is not true? 
If we infer according to facts and are not allowed to obtain the reality, then we may have doubt. 
The physical body of a human being is very coarse while the spirit is quite subtle. 
If the physical body follows the spirit, how could both equally die? 
responds to the affections of the mind is : the city wall collapsed [when the wife of Qi Liang cried], frost fell , a white rainbow pierced the sun [when Jing Ke attempted to assassinate the First Emperor of the Qin dynasty], and Venus went into the Pleiades [when Bai Qi sent provisions to King Zhao]. 
when a doctor [practicing the medical science] of admonishing the vapor makes water or ﬁre in the mind, always responds to it by becoming cold or warm. 
Needless to say, if we are exclusively sincere and ingeniously cultivate with the most brilliant wisdom and the highest energetic will, is moved and responds, and we will receive a body; moreover, we will be reborn in the land of the seven treasures. 
How could this be not true? 
Furthermore, states: 
“Even if we try to reduce the existence of a tree by analyzing it into smaller pieces, nothing harms the luxuriant hangs down its leaves to make shade. 
Even if we try to separate materials from a room and empty it, nothing damages the majestic beauty of the room. 
Precious brocade produces splendor by various colors. 
What is called fundamental nonexistence stated in the Buddhist scriptures does not mean that everything, various conditions come together in unity, is empty. 
Therefore, this is called the truth of existence 271 [in Buddhism]. 
Since nature is fundamentally nonexistence, it is called the truth of nonexistence .272 Although I do not know the Buddhist doctrines completely, I think that this advocacy is explicit and very stable. 
Ever-changing existence from ancient times suddenly ends up in emptiness. 
Just at the time of its peak of efﬂorescence, wouldn’t it be in permanent existence? 
This can be also compared to Huizi’s expression, “All creatures may be born and may die at the same time. 
The sun in the meridian may decline at the same time.”273 The fact of death and decline is constantly clear prior to the time before its birth and the meridian. 
Ignorant people do not see the reason; they merely see its existence. 
Hence, the Marquis of Qi state who usurped the place of the Shuangjiu family wept falsely and longed for their happiness.274 Wise people have the mind that is one with truth. 
Thus, Yanzi often was nearly empty; he appeared to have no although he had it, and seemed lacking although he had real . 
Additionally, if we look at those in the level further below, even if they are not capable of purifying themselves with the most virtuous words in order to exhaust the delusion of attachment and competition, how could there be nothing similar to a little bit [of this appreciation of emptiness]? 
“To clarify impermanence increases the feeling to crave for the shelter . 
Furthermore, states: 
Consequently they were not adopted for the foundation of the teaching. 
I think that we can analyze the reason for this as easily as pointing to the palm of our hand.” “The boat that was hidden in a ravine and was secretly carried away” means that the present time does not stay, as it is stated in the Buddhist 103 scriptures. 
If this can actually be clariﬁed, things and self are permanently unreal. 
How could it not be the main theme of the truth? 
Probably there were not many who understood it. 
Therefore, it was simply not considered to be the fundamental teaching. 
The eminent Zhi was not yet the same as the Buddha, as it is said. 
Why does slight these most virtuous words just because they have frequently been spoken in the Middle Kingdom? 
“If mysterious light is examined, there is no light as small as one cun in diameter. 
If mysterious transformation is analyzed, there is not even a very small amount of reality. 
If you repeat the word ‘the immeasurable life’ in vain, who has seen a hundred-year-old man? 
All these kinds of things are entirely said to be inconsistent with actual facts.” Supernatural light, mysterious transformation, and immeasurable life all derive from sincere faith, which is profound and wonderful. 
Hence, people are simply going to be reborn in the buddha land, and to be closely illuminated by light, and their life will be immeasurable. 
Those who sink in evil views and who are absurdly disrespectful to mysterious transformation are indeed widely separated in the principles from [those who have sincere faith]. 
How could they see auspicious omens in the actual phenomena ? 
The mind without greed is the foundation of the ten wholesome acts. 
Thus, we can cut off Hell facing down and be reborn in Heaven looking up. 
This is also what means by saying, “If you obey righteousness and follow the Way, the principles correct your mind.” Since we hold sincere reverence in mind, we worship and repent our sins. 
Since we are aware of impermanence, we have no stinginess in the mind, abandon wives and children, and make donations. 
Moreover, how could it be said without going through the intention to be respectful “to not take advantage of the feeling to not be stingy”? 
Nirvana is considered as having no happiness to be happy. 
The dharmakāya is considered as having no body to be the body. 
If you neither long for nor determine them, it can be “to increase the thought to indulge in idleness and give rise to the mind of curiosity.” If you sincerely praise and revere , indulgence in idleness will gradually be removed, and you will obtain the beneﬁt in no beneﬁt. 
Would this be concerned with “the custom of competing for a beneﬁt” ? 
Again, says: 
In the great purpose of Buddhists, the eight kinds of sufferings derive entirely from craving. 
They clearly express the twelve causations, and simply have lofty people clarify the spirit in nonarising. 
Those who hope for this path can be said to have desire for non-desire. 
With regard to instructing and leading ordinary people, Heaven and Hell have the reality [of reward and retribution, just as] shadow and sound . 
Similarly, because of Yu Gong’s benevolent work, were invited to ofﬁcialdom and given a ﬁef.277 Yan was fond of killing people and consequently he was executed.278 Those who are afraid of being executed and who want to be given a ﬁef will certainly reject killing and cultivate benevolence. 
Even though those who practice with wonderful determination in order to hope for Heaven and who attentively the ﬁve precepts in order to keep away from Hell have desire for necessary desire, they practice the pure path to reduce themselves day by day [until they attain wuwei]. 
This is also like heading west in order to seek Ying (i.e., the capital of Chu state), . 
Why would you worry that they will not arrive there? 
Furthermore, shows dislike “The red and blue colors dazzle the eyes that appreciate colors. 
build up private power and organize sectarian inﬂuence. 
They demand the fame of pursuing cultivation with determination and dedication and indulge in the desire of excelling and competing.” This is assuredly the ugliness of a black locust; or it can be merely said that even if the law was set at a low , by the misapplication [of the law] a higher tax is demanded. 
How could the 105 19a Buddha then be treated rudely and said to have created the law for greed? 
Wang Mang stole the Six Classics in order to seize the emperor’s throne. 
The First Emperor of the Qin dynasty built Afang Palace under the pretext of having an audience. 
Would we put the blame [for these actions instead] on the ethical education given by their predecessor kings? 
Again, states: 
“We should reject the tracks of the exoteric and esoteric , but keep their important purposes. 
Certainly he wishes for people to pursue their advantages and reform their minds in order to reach their natures. 
The sage has no invariable mind of his own; he simply accommodates himself to others’ minds, which he takes to be his own mind. 
If it is the true nature of living creatures that the body dies and the spirit perishes, in conformity with the nature of mortality would have surely just transmitted the teaching in cooperation with the Duke of Zhou and Confucius. 
Why is it necessary to deceive by [speaking of] the immortality and imposing the Buddhist doctrine upon them, shaving their hair and burning their skin, and to cut off the marriage relationship? 
The number of descendants extinguished by them is incalculable. 
If they harm themselves like this and injure the virtue of fulﬁlling their natures, why wouldn’t Śākyamuni prevent them from doing such things? 
Fellows who lack faith are not willing to cultivate their advantages and reform their minds. 
Those who have faith are indeed the peers of Jīvaka, Jiantuole, Gītamitra, Zhu Fasheng, Bo Fazu, Dharmarakṣa, Yu Falan, Zhu Faxing, Yu Daosui, Que Gongze, Fotudeng, Śrīmitra, Guo Wenju, Shi Daoan, Zhi Daolin, and Master yuan. 
Why should they have recklessly damaged human principles and taken the tonsure for the ediﬁcation of the insincere man ? 
These are all simply because the reality of spiritual wonder attracts minds from a distance and achieves the enterprise of supernatural power and pure truth. 
You sent this discourse from afar on the pretext of your lack of faith . 
Moreover, people of the world who doubt all think to be wonderful, too. 
Therefore, I have tried to answer by myself in order to offer some help for people [to understand Buddhism]. 
The issue that people of the world judge whether or not Buddhism is good is entirely a great the destinies of human beings. 
Therefore, I have exhausted my ignorant thoughts and composed the Discourse to Clarify Buddhism in order to present what I have in my mind. 
Sincerely, Zong Bing The Elucidation of the Criticism on [the Discourse on] the Equality of Good (i.e., the Discourse on Buddhist Laymen and Clergy) by He Chengtian I formerly sent you the Discourse on the Equality of Good together with an inquiry about your opinion. 
I received your thoughtful response. 
Although I cannot submit to all , I do not hold fast very much to biased views, either. 
I am, however, seeking a jade that glows in the night in a vast sea and I have simply not yet obtained it. 
I think that the Buddhist scriptures are from a school that is a good branch of the nine schools, including Daoism and Mohism. 
In benevolence and giving alms, is no different from the Middle Kingdom. 
Great people and gentlemen consider benevolence to be their duty. 
They have nothing to bear in mind. 
They just harmonize ordinary people’s ears and eyes by images and adornments. 
If it is still a slight that 19b wastes and harms , the beneﬁt it propagates will probably be apparent. 
Thus, exists together with . 
People of fantastic taste having appeared, is then considered to be better than Confucianism, to surpass Laozi, and to alone be noble. 
This that people have not been able to seek the foundation of the worthy words left and yet they are misled by a nonessential theory. 
To know the words, you must wait for one who understands beyond words. 
If you have faith only because of the reward and retribution of Heaven and Hell and the testimony that causes and conditions are not destroyed, control your feelings, take coarse food, are completely diligent in worship, and hope that you will probably be sheltered under the jeweled canopy or that you will ascend to the seat of Merupradīparāja , this is just nothing but Chunyu Sheng’s big joke.279 Your discussion says, “ all the sages, including Zhuangzi and Laozi, say that there are spirits? 
[If there is the spiritual intelligence,] on what basis did judge [that the principles of the unseen world are vast and simply empty] is really not like what the Buddha says?” I would like to respond to this. 
There are rites and music in the world in which we live, while there are spiritual beings in the netherworld. 
What sage kings consider to be the teaching is not obscure about its existence from the beginning. 
If there are reward and retribution in the next life, could it be the case that the Duke of Zhou and Confucius just keep silent and do not have even a few words about it? 
If an infant is approaching a hole in the ground, ordinary people are frightened by this. 
Wouldn’t sages still be merciful? 
If the physical body follows the spirit, how could both equally die?” I answer: 
The body and the spirit mutually support each other. People of ancient times compared them to a torch. When ﬁrewood burns down, the ﬂame becomes weak. 
When the ﬁrewood completely burns, the ﬂame dies out. 
Even though is subtle, how could it alone be transmitted? 
Again, you said, “ responds to the affections of the mind is the city wall collapsed , frost fell [when Zou Yan cried out toward Heaven], a white rainbow pierced the sun , and Venus went into the Pleiades . when a doctor of admonishing the vapor [makes water or ﬁre in the mind, the patient’s body] always responds to this by becoming cold or warm. If we are exclusively sincere and ingeniously cultivate, is moved and responds, and we will receive the body; moreover, we will be reborn in the land of the seven treasures. How could this be not true?”280 I will respond to this. 
the city wall collapsing, frost falling, piercing the sun, and going into the Pleiades are not examples that elucidate the next life. 
They should not be referred to in the present discussion. 
Furthermore, to see admonishing with water or ﬁre and to wish to be able to be reborn in the country of the seven treasures can be compared to the case of having observed a blacksmith decorate with gold, then wishes to be able to mold and cast itself .281 You will know at last that this is impossible. 
Ever-changing existence from ancient times suddenly ends up in emptiness. 
Just at the time of its peak of efﬂorescence, wouldn’t it be in permanent existence? 
If, as you say in the discussion, just at the time of its peak of efﬂorescence it already inevitably has the reality of emptiness, in that case, things are permanently empty, and emptiness and things are the same. 
If emptiness and existing objects are no different from each other, why are the wise and the ignorant so called in different ways? 
The Way, so called, in former times has no form in shape and no affairs in function. 
It nourishes wisdom and inspires peace and harmony in one’s mind. 
Would it alone be afraid of conditions from former lives, before removing clinging and attachment? 
You say, “ merely see its existence,” but are they superior to in this point? 
To laugh and sneer at the Marquis of Qi state [who was satirized by Chunyu Sheng] is just like the case where those who retreated ﬁfty steps laugh at those who retreated a hundred steps.282 Furthermore, you say, “‘The boat that was hidden in a ravine is secretly carried away’ means that the present time does not stay, as is stated in the Buddhist scriptures. 
If this can actually be clariﬁed, [we will know that both] things and self are permanently unreal.” I will respond to this. 
Regarding the issue that leaving secretly means not staying , wouldn’t it mean to enter death from life, or to enter nonexistence from existence? 
There is a passage : “ will be frightened in his body , but there will be nothing to harm his mind. 
He takes as a temporary dwelling, so he has no resentment of death.”283 Jia Sheng also said, “We simply transform to the dead. 
While they are alive, they are anxious about the afterlife. 
They attach their minds to immeasurable life and have ambition to be reborn in Heaven. 
Moreover, you say, “Supernatural light, mysterious transformation, and immeasurable life all derive from sincere faith, which is profound and wonderful. 
I do not follow , either, because those who are disrespectful to the wonderful ediﬁcation are seeking the light of , but you simply seek it in sincere faith. 
When we ponder the teaching of Śākyamuni, it delivers people by means of expedients. 
If there is the corresponding manifestation like this, why does he not show its mysterious transformation in order to cause people of evil views to understand? 
Why doesn’t he value several tens of millions of talks and yet is sparing of momentary supernatural light? 
He speaks eloquently with the voice of the phenomenal world in vain, and he has come to an end without clarifying the true wisdom. 
[Sentient beings] are exhausted throughout life and do not know in what to take refuge. 
Isn’t this sad? 
Again, you say, “Since we hold sincere reverence in mind, we worship and repent our sins. 
Since we are aware of impermanence, we have no stinginess , abandon wives and children, and make donations. 
How could there be [the case stated in the Discourse on Buddhist Laymen and Clergy,] ‘to ask for one hundred times ’?” I will answer this. 
To be complicated and skillful in order to begin a matter is not as good as to remove greed and cease competitiveness. 
To observe the precepts in order to cleanse penitence is not as good as annihilating a glorious hope in order to accomplish simplicity, to say nothing of inviting what one prefers and praying for a beneﬁt or forgeting one’s blood relations and desiring fame. 
If you say there is no of asking for , I do not believe it. 
Furthermore, you say, “Nirvana is considered as having no happiness to be happy. 
The dharmakāya is considered as having no body to be the body. 
If you sincerely praise and revere , indulgence in idleness will gradually be removed, and you will obtain the beneﬁt in no beneﬁt.” I am responding to this. 
Nirvana is considered as leaving behind suffering to be happy. 
The dharmakāya is considered as taking the suffering to be the body. 
That is just the reason people who praise and revere are unable to cut off . 
If it results in no benefit, what do those who diligently cultivate it attain, and why do you say they attain it in no benefit? 
This is the testimony that both the body and the spirit are exhausted. 
I am afraid that this is not what you should articulate in your discussion. 
Moreover, you say, “Those who hope for this path can be said to have desire for non-desire. 
Similarly, because of Yu Gong’s benevolent work, were invited to ofﬁcialdom and given a ﬁef. 
Yan was fond of killing people and consequently he was executed. 
Even though those who practice with wonderful determination 111 in order to hope for Heaven and who attentively the ﬁve precepts in order to keep away from Hell have desire for necessary desire, they practice the pure path to reduce themselves day by day [until they attain wuwei]. 
This is also like heading west in order to seek Ying, [which is in the south]. 
Why would you worry that they will not arrive there?” I would like to answer this. 
What was caused by shadow and sound, however, must be matched to the original form and voice. 
How can a form of usual produce a shadow of eighty thousand yojanas? 
To be stagnant, just like to have desire for non-desire, is still usually to stagnate in the object of desire. 
The ears and eyes preside over different . Engineering and art craft are different kinds of work. 
Thus, even if the metal and stone are able to harmonize,285 Mount Tai would not be able to reveal its height. 
Even if wild geese and swans get together, the deep autumn is not able to transmit its intention. 
Even though you say to head west , you have traveled this far from Ying. 
What can you do about it? 
Furthermore, you say, “If it is the true nature of living creatures that the body dies and the spirit perishes, [in conformity with the nature of mortality the sage] would have surely just transmitted the teaching in cooperation with the Duke of Zhou and Confucius. 
Why is it necessary to deceive by the immortality and imposing the Buddhist doctrine upon them, shaving their hair and burning their skin, and to cut off the marriage relationship? 
.” I am responding to this. 
What are ? 
Chinese people receive the vapor that is pure and peaceful, and they have benevolence and righteousness in their minds. 
Therefore, the Duke of Zhou and Confucius elucidate the nature and the teaching in which they learn . 
People of foreign countries receive a nature that is tough and strong, and they are greedy, angry, and perverse. 
Therefore, Śākyamuni was strict with the rules of the ﬁve precepts. 
In the discussion you sent to me, this is called “the sage has no invariable mind of his own; he simply accommodates himself to other people’s natures.”286 In the admonition to chastise cruelty, there is nothing more painful than Hell. 
In the exhortation to lead to good, there is nothing better than Heaven. 
The Duke of Zhou and Confucius do not do so. 
They follow its natural temperament and leave behind its very . 
Misconduct in sexual behavior and stealing are set forth in the ﬁve penalties. 
The crime related to wine is clariﬁed in the section called the Announcement about Drunkenness , in the history of the Zhou dynasty .287 “ in the spring hunting, will not surround a marshy thicket” .288 When we see living creatures, we cannot bear their death. 
the laws for the ﬁve offenses in hunting and chasing game from only three directions .289 We ﬁsh without a net. 
Hence, benevolence is extensively diffused, and beneﬁts reach even to pigs and ﬁsh. 
For a gathering on a happy occasion, there is always on a cutting board. 
Even old people are able to have meat . We till land in spring and gather the harvest in fall. Sericulture and weaving are done in a timely manner. 
The three numinous beings have come,290 and a hundred deities are all worshiped. 
Furthermore, we make clear the praise of offering a libation in worship, while we are strict in the punishment about dubious laws. 
To give an account of the questions asked by the chief magistrate of Pu is the foundation to exhort the teaching.291 To expound answer, “the fume rising as the vapor,”292 clariﬁes the testimony of our next life. 
In addition, you state in your discussion, “people like Jīvaka, tuo, and Śrīmitra . 
On what basis do you now conclude the superiority or inferiority of people who lived a hundred years ago or who live several thousand li away? 
One such as Bhikṣu lin is a monk in appearance, but has disinterestedness like Heaven. 
He seems to discern truth or falsehood profoundly. 
Particularly, he is not willing to fear the scriptures, to protect his master, and to garnish illusory remarks. 
For this reason, I respect him. 
It is said in Sun Xinggong’s Discourse that Dharmarakṣa is erudite and intelligent and Yu Falan is sincere and knowledgeable. 
With whom of the Middle Kingdom do you want to compare these two people? 
Moreover, Ying, the king of Chu, built a Buddhist temple. 
Ze Rong offered relief to starving travelers. 
How could they have pure character and behavior? 
Formerly when I was in the eastern capital city , Śramaṇa Daohan visited me from Wuzhong and exhorted me. 
He was very earnest and sincere. 
Because of this, he stayed for three nights. 
He talked for my sake about the conditions of reﬁning the body and purifying the spirit, and the testimony of the arising and extinguishing of sin and merit. 
I folded my hands before my breast and listened to his outspoken remarks without sleeping from night till morning. 
The reason a person rises in the world, becomes famous, has faith, and practices the Way really relies on the teaching of the Duke of Zhou and Confucius. 
Zilu says, “When I hear [well-intentioned advice], if I cannot carry it out in practice, I am concerned only that there is I have yet to hear.”293 I have to do many things. 
Why should I suddenly abandon this and attend to that ? 
In addition, I sought the written form , which is well matched to human feelings, had been established, and I came to know that the next life is above my means. 
Having investigated thoroughly the endless grief throughout our lifetime, I have realized that it is difﬁcult to receive this body again. 
Sages are my teachers. 
How could the Duke of Zhou and Confucius deceive me? 
Hoping that the aged and respected person of great intelligence instructs others without being wearied, I have simply not yet kept silent here. 
You said formerly you had already sent the Discourse to Clarify Buddhism. 
Sincerely, He Chengtian Response to He of Hengyang, the Criticism on the Elucidation of the Discourse on Buddhist Laymen and Clergy by Zong Bing I have respectfully read the discussion you sent to me. 
You repress the ediﬁcation of Buddhism and set forth your aspiration in the teaching of Confucianism. 
signiﬁcant matters are collected and expressed, and your talent in literature and argument examines and clariﬁes . 
Having observed your intention, I see that you do not mean that the one who established Buddhism is not a sage, but the teaching is an expedient , without truth. 
I, have not completely appreciated on what basis you base your belief that has no truth. 
Now, when we determine and see a long-range plan of things together, the gains and losses are about on par. 
Couldn’t it be that we have had holy people who talk to each other pointing at their palms? 
Sages “make an exhaustive discrimination of what is right, and effect the complete development of every nature, till they arrive at what is appointed for it .”294 If there are those who do not attain points, as if they have cast those people into a moat. 
Now delude people the immortality of the spirit, and deceive them the attainment of buddhahood. 
They indulge in shaving the head, wearing red robes, and burning their bodies and ﬁngers. 
115 In addition, they do not employ their natural gifts in order to support their parents and the way of husband and wife or father and son. 
From the time Buddhism was introduced to the thirty-six states west of the Sha River (near Turfan) prior to the time of its introduction to China, those who cut off relations number in the hundred millions or hundred billions. 
If we think of those [who were born in barbarian tribes] and who came to , such as You Yu and Jin Ridi, there were more people who were about to be born and yet who could not . 
If Buddhism has no truth, wouldn’t the cruelty of casting people into a moat, be unspeakable? 
Do you say you want it in order to exceed the proper limits in righting a wrong, or in order to govern foreign people whose natures are “tough and strong” and who are “angry and perverse”? 
The sort of people who are angry and perverse will still not believe and will not be frightened if you bind them with the three-article law , or punish soon after rewarding. 
Would it be possible to rule over them by means of the tenets “ nothing other than form,” fundamental nonexistence, nirvana, the dharmakāya, the twelve causations , and kalpas as numerous as the minutest particles of dust? 
Those who receive this instruction are what you call people who “receive the vapor that is pure and peaceful, and who have benevolence and righteousness in their minds.” Since we avail ourselves of pure and peaceful in order to explicate the sublime words, and encourage the righteous nature in order to learn the subtle practice, we are consequently able to purify our illumination and contemplate the Dharma. 
When the Dharma and illumination are all empty, we reach the Way . 
These are entirely stated in the Buddhist scriptures, and are what you believe. 
As to people in modern times who are superhuman and have excellent virtue, such as the eight wise men for whom Sun Xinggong made eulogies and the ﬁve thinkers praised by Zhi Daolin, they are all considered to be lofty by their contemporaries. 
Therefore, the two could make a composition about them. 
How can this be called wild talk? 
I have no idea with whom I should compare these bhikṣus. 
Falan’s disciple, Daosui, however, has not yet caught up to his master. 
I do not know of Bhikṣu Huilin at all. 
If you say that is as good as Wenbing, he may not naturally fall behind Daosui, but he must still be below Dharmarakṣa and lan. 
The comment I made previously is not an impropriety of speech. 
If has the appearance of a Buddhist monk who is sincere and capable, disinterestedness like Heaven, and profound knowledge truth and falsehood, why is it not certain that Śakra-devendra will transform and willfully urge him to attain buddhahood? 
In the discussion I received, you express a doubt: 
“If there really are reward and retribution in the next life, why did the Duke of Zhou and Confucius keep silent, without even a few words about it?” This is indeed a common question, based on prejudice. 
This is truly something we should clarify together. 
The sacred spirit originates profoundly. As it is moved, then it responds. 
It is not something that leads people prior to a necessity. 
The reason the masses moved the sages to action is disorder. 
Consequently, the responses found in the Six Classics are only about governing . 
Therefore, there is no word of the Buddha. 
Liu Xiang says that the nine provinces mentioned in the Yugong (i.e., the earliest known book of the geography of China) probably follow what is recorded in the Book of Mountains and Seas, which states: 
Even though this is a barbarian region , countless domains spread out like stars in the sky. 
Somewhat to our surprise, we do not know which domain glory. 
The exquisite people of this region used to cherish the Way at all times, and Buddhist services existed, too. 
Even though they might have received the Dharma-nature near the Yi and Luo Rivers, or they might have experienced the ultimate reality near the Zhu and Si Rivers, Shi Yi, carelessly did not record because they had nothing to do with the way of governance, and Bu Shang did not compile them because they go against the Confucian way. 
Even if there were some in the non-Buddhist canon hidden in the double wall , they would have also been burned by the king of Qin (i.e., the First Emperor of the Qin dynasty). 
It is not yet necessarily known whether or not the Duke of Zhou and Confucius kept silent about [reward and retribution in the next life]. 
There is no case where the way of the profound absolute vacancy and issues of the mysterious immortals have not been mentioned in worldly books. 
The words of Confucius regarding the Way are found in chapters of Zhuangzi’s book, of the remote age. 
In that case, through the Five Classics that are concerned with state administration, we cannot yet ﬁll in the wonderful ediﬁcation beyond this world . 
You also say in your criticism, “Things are permanently empty, and emptiness and things are the same. 
If emptiness and existing objects are no different from each other, why are the wise and the ignorant so called in different ways?” What Buddhist scriptures state is that form is empty; there is nothing other than emptiness. 
It is not said that there is no existence. 
There is existence but it is simply empty. 
the wise and the ignorant. 
It is empty, so all differences are altogether empty. 
Form is naturally not form. 
Even though form is empty, conditions join together and become an existence. 
All are just like those things that are produced by illusion, or revealed in a dream. 
They exist, but they do not. 
The future has not yet come, the past has already gone, and the present does not stay. 
There is no ﬁxed existence, either. 
Generally these several principles are the laws all profound sages attained ultimately. 
It is really difﬁcult to make them clear by indicating them with language. 
When I observe things from this point of view, I truly realize it is evident. 
Therefore, I feel free from worries and petty thoughts, and so I increase purity by washing away . 
Furthermore, you say, “The body and the spirit mutually support each other. People of ancient times compared them to a torch. 
When ﬁrewood burns down, the ﬂame becomes weak. When the ﬁrewood is completely burned, the ﬂame dies out. 
Even though is subtle, how could it alone be transmitted?” Well, ﬁre is produced from ﬁrewood, the spirit is not made from the body. 
When the spirit reaches its acme, it transcends the body and becomes independent of it. 
There is no body, but the spirit exists. This is called the eternality of the dharmakāya. 
Hence, we begin as an ordinary person, and will become a tathāgata at last. 
Even though our life is coarse until now, if we have a view that turns upward for countless kalpas without exhaustion, we will certainly learn in order to ascend to the pure world. 
[It is said in the Book of Odes that] “A mulberry insect has a child, which a wasp carries on its back .”297 If we compare to those in the spiritual world, where we “will be sheltered under the jeweled canopy [offered by Ratnaśikhi], or we will ascend to the seat of Merupradīparāja ,” why would we have no hope? 
In addition, you have doubt and say, “ Śākyamuni delivers people by means of expedients,” “Why doesn’t he value the several tens of millions of talks and yet is sparing of momentary supernatural light?” and “ does he not show its mysterious transformation in order to cause people of evil views to understand?” 119 Although it is called “expedient” as a term, of people’s receptivity and the Buddha’s response, either dim or apparent, complies with evil acts and meritorious deeds variously. 
In former times the Buddha expounded and emitted light for sentient beings, they all usually accumulated wonderful sincerity. 
Therefore, even negligent people could hear them. 
The light is emitted and it illuminates us through contemplation. People of wrong views do not have the conditions to look at even if it envelops them. 
Now if we see Buddhist scriptures and yet do not repent of our negligence, even if we are enveloped [by the light] in advance, how beneﬁcial would it be? 
People such as wise men of sincere faith are able to clearly perceive supernatural illumination by themselves. 
“The regular stars are not visible, yet it is a bright night.”298 When I examine what year and month , I see it corresponds to the night when the Buddha was born and emitted a light. 
Guan Youan set sail on the sea on a windy night. 
All his companions sank , but Youan saw a light in the darkness. 
Heading toward the light, he reached an island, and only he and his entire family were saved.299 The Buddha has no discrimination. 
He responds only to good. 
There are too many cases to mention in which the Buddha’s responses were given to people like Wang Xiang or Guo Ju.300 These are also auspicious omens of seeing the light. 
Couldn’t there be the Buddha even if you have not seen ? 
In addition, you explain the prosperity of the Duke of Zhou and Confucius, which you compare to and consider to be greater than [the teaching of] the Buddha. 
The regime of this country is, however, merely the prosperity of sovereigns. 
In the disaster of the three superintendents, the uncle and nephew distrusted each other, and the brothers killed each other.301 Even though among the seventy-two of disciples some “ascended to the hall and some passed into the inner apartments” ,302 those who lived until the age of ﬁfty were few. 
Yan died young, Ran was afﬂicted with disease, You was cut apart , Yu was executed together with his relatives, and Si lost his beard. 
Was not the suffering [of Confucius] in the Kuang and Chen regions unspeakable?303 He spread the teaching abroad while suffering hunger, and wandered from state to state. 
When we observe this alongside the Buddhist teaching, we see only his lament there. 
Isn’t this the result of the congregation of causation from the previous existences of people of the world? 
Moreover, the truth spread by has not yet been deep and great at this point. 
If we outwardly act in accordance with rites and music, and cultivate inwardly with nonarising , purify the spirit in the state of nirvana, and consider thousands of millions of kalpas to be bygone years , wouldn’t it be really great? 
Events are not transmitted to later generations and we have not been able to know the principles . 
I hope you will not say that based on crude evidence the Duke of Zhou and Confucius were not so. 
All people say that the Buddha makes wild talk, but the Book of Mountains and Seas says that those who died and who were reborn are very numerous.304 In the immortal realm such as Mount Kunlun, the ﬁeld of Guangdu , and the mound of Xuanyuan, the weather is neither cold nor hot, phoenix’s eggs are eaten, sweet dew is drunk, the inhabitants are sheltered by jade trees, they sip the water of the Zhu fountain, and they do not die even though they reach a thousand years of age. 
I can see that one who hears the Buddhist Dharma and straightens himself is indeed a daring soldier of Pucheng (in present-day Shanxi 121 province).309 Is it because what you have heard is not yet lofty? 
If what you heard is lofty, it is still possible to change your mind, just as a leopard changes . 
Human beings are creatures of exquisite spirit. 
If we, however, take refuge in the culmination of numinous beings (i.e., the Buddhist Way) and roughly receive the teaching and precepts, it is enough to move even an insigniﬁcant amount of . 
If we move it, we will rise higher. 
In former days, the fact that the spirit is immortal was just as the Buddha says, but the spirit casts away, the mind is wounded, and we go against the government of the unseen world by ourselves. 
How could we know that suffering and difﬁculties in this existence would not be due to previous existences? 
If we imprudently despise the teaching of the respectful spirit with our own view, I am afraid that we may pass on this difﬁculty to [our next existence]. 
“Once when Śākyamuni was a bhikṣu of the Hinayana, he slandered the Mahayana. 
Because of this, even he fully underwent hardships, passing through hells for a very long time.” [Even Śākyamuni fell into Hell,] to say nothing of those who have no faith at all. 
Moreover, on what basis can we determine that this Buddhist scripture must be false? 
The words used in your previous letter rebuking me are merely in accordance with Bhikṣu lin’s chapters and sentences. 
My intention has already been roughly told. 
I could not reply to each , but everything has already been thoroughly covered in my composition, the Discourse to Clarify Buddhism. 
Now I will attach it and send it to you. 
I ask you to please do your best, make a thorough investigation properly, and tell me completely whether I am right or not. 
I am old and about to die. I would like only to continue this until my last day. 
The tactical deployment you took up is just like what Xiang Ji (i.e., Yu) did . 
The testimonies and examples are solid and clear. The language and expressions are erudite and rich. 
You really wish to spread your beneﬁt and kindness and your instruction is extended to even ordinary people. 
I deeply acknowledge that this is due to a gentleman’s consideration. 
Therefore, I had better keep silent and help fulﬁll your cherished hopes. 
I, however, always think that foreign matters may not be what the Chinese are engaged in. 
Thus, I simply made the previous statement. 
If China and foreign countries should now surely be the same, I am simpleminded. 
I venture to apologize for my slowness. 
In spite of it, I still have a thought. 
Those who are versed in the nature of Heaven and Earth are not misled by unrealistic, peculiar matters. 
Those who discern the way to prosperity or decline do not employ their minds for unreasonable, illogical matters. 
Otherwise, if your discussion is not on the basis of an expedient, and the general instruction is entirely expressed from your feeling, wouldn’t this be the ignorance of a well-read, experienced person? 
I have not yet had a chance to meet and talk with you. 
Yours truly, He Cheng End of Fascicle Three of The Collection for the Propagation and Clariﬁcation The Discourse on the Full Understanding of Life by He Chengtian The two polarities were already positioned, and a sovereign joined them. 
In the universe, there is nothing nobler than [these three]. 
Heaven has two divisions: 
People are born only when there is Heaven and Earth, while Heaven and Earth become supernatural only when there are people. 
The three powers are a single and interdependent unit. 
Consequently, the one who can receive the vapor that is pure and peaceful, whose spiritual intelligence is particularly prominent, whose feeling is in overall charge of all ages, whose wisdom encompasses all things, whose ingenious thought traces to the very source of the deep and dark world, whose production is equal to that of Nature, and who results in benevolence and capability, is a sovereign. 
When he nurtures the common people and helps Heaven in propagating virtue, the sun and moon are clear and bright; the four kinds of supernatural animals appear; the auspicious wind has the same tune; the four seasons are harmonious; various types of foods, including the nine kinds of grains, animals that feed on grass or grain , products of the soil, aquatic products, and foods of various ﬂavors such as sour or salty are served at the table; and a house, a boat, a vehicle, things decorated with gold, pottery, and dark yellow fabrics made of silk or linen are supplied for equipment, implements, or clothes. 
The culture follows rules of decorum and entertainment follows the eight kinds of musical sounds [produced from the calabash and musical instruments made of earthenware, stretched hides, wood, stone, metal, silk strings, and bamboo]. 
All things are protected, and living creatures reproduce. 
22a If people are careful in spending, it is easy to be sufﬁcient. 
If it is easy to be sufﬁcient, there will be a surplus of power. 
If there is a surplus of power, the people’s will and feeling will become extravagant. 
Then, the mind delighted with governance will arise. 
If things are concise, nothing will be disturbed. 
If nothing is disturbed, the spiritual intelligence will be sharp. 
If the spiritual intelligence is sharp, one will make plans carefully. 
Then, the business to save and govern is accomplished. 
Therefore, Heaven and Earth instruct the people with thrift and simplicity. 
[The two diagrams] qian and kun, teach the people with ease and concision. 
This is why instructions are attentive and generous like this. 
How can be sentient beings on the same level with birds, ﬁsh, snakes, and insects? 
Sentient beings have appropriate seasons in which to be caught and of employment. 
To start a ﬁre , we wait for a gale to blow. 
For hunting and ﬁshing, we inquire into [the activities of] the wolf and otter.310 This is because we follow the seasons of nature. 
A real man neither hunts a fawn nor takes eggs. 
The song “Rushes” was composed.311 We bestow good inﬂuence even upon the ﬁsh. 
This is because we love what we human beings use. 
We are cautious not to commit the ﬁve offenses in hunting.312 Emperor of the Yin dynasty took a new prayer.313 When Confucius ﬁshed, he did not use a net. 
All living things must die. 
The physical body is destroyed and the spirit scatters, just as become luxuriant in spring and decay in autumn, and the four seasons change, one after another. 
How could there be further to receive another body? 
The Book of Odes states that “Happy and easygoing gentlemen seek a blessing by no crooked ways.”314 This means that the propagation of the Way lies in oneself. 
“The three sovereigns reside in Heaven.”315 This denotes that the exquisite spirits ascended far to . 
Nevertheless, one harbors sensual desires in the mind while outwardly fearful of the expedient teaching , or one deeply considers his present life while giving donations in hopes of a reward in the next life. 
Our predecessor Confucian masters in former times said nothing about these issues. 
I am originally deﬁcient in intelligence and vigor, and I do not know how to make it my business to practice . 
The Expatiation of the Discourse on the Full Understanding of Life of He of Hengyang by Yan Yanzhi I formerly obtained your discourse, in which with deep views and extensive thought you take the human way to be lofty and degrade other living creatures. 
The content is clear and subtle, and the subject does not lose signiﬁcance. 
This is really helpful for the teaching, and good enough to wipe out the heretical school. 
How could they forget what they rely upon? I am merely concerned that if Chinese zithers is monotonous, it will lose the clear harmony. 
Thereupon, I will brieﬂy and broadly write several articles, and take all your responses, receive later. 
You say that he who is in one unit together with the two polarities and who becomes the three powers with them must be a name of the virtuous one, but this is not a category of people in general. 
Generally, however, various species are equally called sentient beings; this is the name for those who bear consciousness. 
How could it be the title for sages and wise people? 
In that case, to comment on the three powers has nothing to do with the masses. 
How does calling them sentient beings abuse sages and wise people? 
Even though I have the feeling to depend upon [the importance of] order, I am not worried that causes disorder. 
If both registers can be taught and all can be lifted up, understand the principles thoroughly, make a restriction to leave language behind, adopt this, and share reality, then it is possible , just as when the notes of beilü 
?317 Moreover, “the great virtue [of Heaven and Earth] is called life.”318 there is a common feature of all things, which is the same as what differentiates all things. 
How could it be distinguished to attain life? 
The life that is not different for each living 22b creature should be sentient beings. 
In the ranks of sentient beings, however, there are a great many differences between the ignorant and the wise. 
People employ other living creatures in order to nourish themselves, and other living creatures are put to work in order to support people. 
Even though at the beginning may follow , they come to kill at last. 
Sensual desires are not repressed. 
Life is harmed in increasing and miserable ways. The law of Heaven will be pent up and destroyed. 
Emperors and sages lament this situation, but they cannot suddenly take away remain entrenched . 
Therefore, they set up the teaching to plan seasonal hunting and the scriptures to prudently follow the seasons. 
It is simply to nourish those who bear consciousness by opening up benevolence and to gradually return to the cessation of extremities. 
Furthermore, you understand that in the great law of Nature the life and death are equal in rising and falling. 
In the truth of spirits, however, the issue of remaining in existence or not might differ from the issue of the withering of grass or the fading away of . 
If is the same as trees and plants, then it will disappear like smoke. 
Moreover, you say that the three sovereigns ascended far and their exquisite spirits reside in Heaven. 
If the exquisite spirits indeed exist, and they are surely different from trees and plants, then there is nothing to support your opinion regarding the doctrine of receiving a body. 
Is it that because the three sovereigns were purely good, they were rewarded and reborn in Heaven? 
You intended to denounce [the doctrine of] future life, but on the contrary you established ascending far . 
If there is merely the exquisite spirit, which does not have any form and appearance, I have no idea what it relies upon to establish itself in Heaven. 
Therefore, I strive for and depend on your opinion. 
So, back and forth, but I have not yet attained contentment. 
Generally, within fate there is nothing that does not move without response. 
Even if it is said that they inevitably tally with each other, why do you suspect we have hope ? 
Consequently, those who forget kindness have no demand and those who keep merit have hope . 
Cherishing merit while hoping is not yet wholesomeness. 
There are wise people and those who are not so wise among human beings, and then there are public and private in our thoughts. 
In this physical world it cannot be said that since some people expect rewards, those who establish their virtues all wish for . 
Would they never fail to have sensual desires when they take actions? 
You have never been able to promote , and you always put it down. 
Even though you deeply reproach, correct, and upbraid , please cease your arrogant speech and do not attack them. 
You usually ﬁrmly entrench yourself in a castle, and it is difﬁcult to send a letter . 
Furthermore, I have been cooped up with worries and distresses in my house, and I had no chance to entrust my feelings and reasoning to you. 
I wanted to express my intention and judge your former explanation. 
I worry that it may not be worthy. 
Sincerely yours, Yan Yanzhi Response to Yan of Yongjia I respectfully read your esteemed letter and examined repeatedly your deep intention. 
You draw a line between each of the three powers. 
You declare your aspiration for the Way and praise and admire Buddhists. 
You act in sincerity and reach out to things. 
When you practice it in yourself, it is excellent. 
You have not yet understood completely. 
Therefore, I will relate my original intention once again. 
You said, “ he [who is in one unit together with the two polarities and] who becomes the three powers with them must be a name of the virtuous one. 
Why are sages and wise people also so?” [I am afraid that you misunderstand my words.] The way of human beings was established incorporating various benevolences and righteousness. 
Natural compassion is a manifestation of the virtuous. 
To feel ashamed for evils is the beginning of a chivalrous mind. 
the trees of Mount Niu were cut with scythes and axes [and lost their beautiful] nature.319 A peaceful and quiet state of mind is put into disorder by the thought of interests. 
Then, can there be no mistake [if it is said that a wholesome heart] exists but it is not counted? 
In addition, you say, “To comment on the three powers has nothing to do with the masses. 
Why does calling them sentient beings abuse sages and wise people?” I have already heard your instruction, but I have still not understood on what basis the two roads are judged . 
If we people hope for tirelessly, in order to dispel what we have not yet understood, we certainly raise both registers . 
there is a common feature of all things, which is the same as what differentiates all things. 
How could it be distinguished to attain life?” I do not say that this is not so. 
Even though people are born and equally placed under the great virtue , they cannot be called sentient beings. 
It compares to the case that although sages equally receive the ﬁve primary elements, they cannot be called the people. 
What merit is there in considering that the life that is not different from each other must be sentient beings? 
In the letter received, you say, “People employ other living creatures in order to nourish themselves, and other living creatures are put to work in order to support people.” If you broadly judge like this, then you have the same thought as my humble view. 
As to passion and sensual desires, if we do not restrain them, we will destroy life and be brutal to other living creatures. 
We will be the so-called one of excessive or the arrogant one. 
Sages assuredly remove this. 
Furthermore, you say, “Those who take the Way to be the mind will probably stop before they come to like this.” I would like to ask you a question. 
Are those who stop [evils before they come to the worst like this] not going to kill with their own hands? 
Or do they make all equally receive the teaching ? 
If you want to recommend it to families entered in the household registers , I see that your discussion does not hold water. 
Moreover, you say, “If is the same as trees and plants, then it will disappear like smoke. 
What does the exquisite spirit rely upon to establish itself in Heaven?” Well, the disembodied spirits are dim and faint. 
Zhongyou (i.e., Zilu) received when he wanted to know about death.320 Si was also unsuccessful in getting an answer [regarding the nature of human beings and the Way of Heaven].321 As for the matter that we will never again receive a body, I clearly stated this in my previous discussion. 
Regarding “Actions and the way of reward and retribution inevitably tally ,” I should say that the Yu family made a gate higher and waited for the merit of the accumulation of their 23a virtuous deeds,322 and Lord Boyang, [who rescued Emperor Xuan when the emperor was still an infant,] did not attack yet he was blessed with the rank of marquis.323 How are these concerned with the next life? 
In addition, you say, “According to the common talk of those who reign over the world, people who giving donations have no recollection , and when government ofﬁcials conduct righteousness, they still show kindness to others without thinking [that what they are doing is wholesome].” This statement is true. 
To require kindness in order to plan for a reward is what a preacher exhorts. 
To be kind in order to be delighted with a reward is a common affair of the world. 
If one doubts scriptures, he will suffer hardships for successive kalpas. 
If he diligently makes donations, he will obtain rewards accumulated many times over. 
I know that you want to draw it to the upper stream. 
This is also something for which I do not begrudge supporting immensely. 
Therefore, I do not [draw Buddhism to the upper stream]. 
If donations are not made as aid in an emergency and if kindness is given merit and fame, when these are all evaluated by a wise person , we feel ashamed. 
Thus, I have acted in accordance with my perseverance for a long time, but I have never improved myself. 
I feel inwardly ashamed at Boyu [of Wei state, who continually tried to practice good conduct].324 I have not spared the time to censure others. 
Sincerely, He Chengtian The Second Expatiation to He of Hengyang I have been occupied in farming for a while. 
In spare moments from my farming, aged rustics are my companions. 
The topic of our conversation is limited to crops. My work is entirely to plow land and pasture animals. 
I received a subtle argument from you, by which I am brightly consoled. 
The content of your letter is very detailed, and I feel more ashamed of my obstinacy. 
I now again forget and write to you of what I cherish in my mind, in order to convey to you what I have not yet expressed. 
The discussion on the three powers must be originally based on all three lines . 
When the three lines are displayed, the middle line refers to the virtue of a sovereign.325 Therefore, it is so supernatural that it can reach the uppermost, and so lofty that it can unite with the head of the state. 
Consequently, I said formerly that if one is not suitable to Heaven and Earth, he has nothing with which to originally respond to the knowledge of these things. 
You still take without discarding in . 
You carry them extensively without leaving anyone out. 
Your resolution to be generous to people is really ample. 
I am, afraid that your arrangement of positions is disordered and consequently there will be numerous ambiguous issues. 
If wherever natural compassion arises you exhaust the capacity of universal love, and if wherever the feeling to be ashamed of evils arises you accomplish the righteousness of help for honest people, you are the most benevolent and the most righteous. 
Those people who possess their lot in advance and have not reached its apex simply cannot be a match for the two polarities (i.e., Heaven and Earth) . 
Why isn’t the wholesome mind invoked? 
Nevertheless, you falsely accuse that “[a wholesome heart exists but] it is not counted.” I have not yet evaluated your intention. 
Even if the three powers are equally arranged in a line, we cannot bring people of superﬁcial talent into the line. 
Therefore, in this land, those of humble birth are not counted in ; and in that land, sages and wise people are clearly distinguished. 
The purpose of recommending all of both registers lies in this. 
Regarding people like Qiao and zha, their virtue is not able to be one with emperors and kings. 
The judgment of the two paths is easier than giving instructions to one’s servants by merely gesturing with one’s chin. 
Moreover, I am aware that you say, “Even though people are born and equally placed under the great virtue, they cannot be called sentient beings. 
It is comparable to the case that although sages equally receive the ﬁve primary elements, they cannot be called people.” The reason cannot be called people is that are more vigorous than people in spiritual intelligence. 
Certainly, we must differentiate them on the basis of their extraordinary spirits, but we should not distinguish them based on the life they received. 
You avoid in vain the name of the people, but the reality of the people is not damaged. 
cannot help but resemble the case that if one is afraid of a single-plank bridge and tries to avoid it, in the end he will not be able to avoid . 
As for my statement, “People employ other living creatures in order to nourish themselves, and other living creatures are put to work in order to support people,” I intend to mean that the ignorant and the wise restrict each other, and the confused and the intelligent control each other. 
This matter, [the difference between human beings and animals,] derives from human intellect; it does not derive from the laws of Heaven. 
Therefore, at the beginning we are compassionate to its emergence, and lament its stagnation and disappearance in the end. 
Would your various types of food including livestock serve the same purpose as this? 
Generally, moving and ﬂowing well are the nature of those of the lower stratum, while making judgments in transformation and shaping is the work of sages of the upper stratum.326 If one carefully builds a fence , he is still worried that a thief may come over the fence, not to speak of he completely sets up everything in order to satisfy extravagant desires. 
How could we discuss abandoning excessive ? 
Therefore, I know that in your discussion of “to destroy life and be brutal to other living creatures” I cannot share anxieties with heartless people . 
The intention to be fond of killing is found in some people, but the feeling to love life is abundant. 
Why would kindness be limited to just fawns and eggs? 
Moreover, this does not mean that outside of the market and the kitchen there is nothing to be offered to nourish us. 
The writing of Shen Nong is explained by Zhongsan [in the Discourse on Health Care ]. 
Gongli (i.e., Zhong Changtong of the Later Han dynasty) praised this matter , and Zhongyang (i.e., Jiao Shen of the Later Han dynasty) worked hard at the practice [of guiding the breath ].327 This shows exactly that formerly there was a biography of that person and we now hear of him. 
If we can set forth a far-reaching prospect and seek for a long period of time, we will be able to fulﬁll it in a short period of time and to expect merit in a long period of time. 
If the exquisite spirit is exactly distinguished from grass and trees, your answer, “Wandering spirits [become evil spirits. 
If that even though there are and they have no form, then could there be beings without form in the world? 
you have already accounted for their existence. 
How could you align yourself with him in not giving an answer ? 
Even though you are fond of studying, I am afraid that you have not gotten to what you rely upon. 
Otherwise, this is because the paths of understanding and of obscurity are very much separate from each other, and the mysterious issue and the evident are far removed from each other; these facts consequently cause the bright moon to stop shining on the world, and knowledge restricts your mind from understanding . 
Or, a worldly person who has an unpolished gem and displays it in a market is censured. 
reward and retribution and actions is primarily called fate. I think that there are no absurd things. 
Among those who are moved , the minds of human beings are the greatest. 
The movement of one’s thought cannot be perceived by servants practicing divination. When it is extended to its accumulated point, we are not competent enough to determine its origin and we must give up . 
Zhuangzhou says that if the land is tilled in a careless and haphazard manner, the reward is poor, too.328 Lord Sun (i.e., Xunzi) says that the force of reward or retribution falls on a person according to each category.329 These statements are set forth to admonish us for our future lives. 
It brings about widespread blessings for everyone, and is the highest of a hundred deities in nobility. 
Why should it be merely that blessings are extended to one’s descendants and happiness is limited to being ranked as a high ofﬁcial or minister? 
If we continuously save with good , a good will also follow. 
It appears that this is because you verify the parsimonious feeling familiar to you, and you doubt the virtuous teaching with which you are unfamiliar. 
Consequently, you just punish those who boast about achievements, but are recklessly censured for forgetting about wise people. 
You, who thinks that “those who place themselves in reality, take the splendor to be vile,” tend to simply stay in kindness and leave behind coldheartedness. 
If there are people like those who make donations not in order to give aid in an emergency, or who are kind only expecting fame , then you will be ashamed of them and I will also be ashamed of them.331 137 The Second Response to Yan of Yongjia I have believed in my narrow view from the time I was young. 
The older I grow, the deeper becomes. 
Hence, I was hoping to ﬂoat relying on a stream or to soar entrusting myself to a female kylin, when you expressed your thoughts with good intention and again kindly gave explanations. 
If sometimes good jade has a ﬂaw, even a humble person may point out the ﬂaw. 
How could I, such a person, be fond of arguing? 
Again, I will take a step further and ask you questions to get , with which I will examine completely what brings me to a standstill. 
In your letter you say, “The discussion on the three powers must be originally based on all three lines . 
When the three lines are displayed, the middle line refers to the virtue of a sovereign. 
Therefore, it is so supernatural that it can reach the uppermost, and so lofty that it can unite with the head of the state.” If, just as your point of argument, we consider the three lines [of the Book of Changes] to be the three powers, the ﬁrst line is intended to be the line of Earth and the third line is said to be the rank of Heaven. 
As a matter of fact, as long as the two polarities, have no consigning basis, how can we take to designate the establishment of people? 
Moreover, you say, “ wherever natural compassion you exhaust the capacity of universal love, and wherever the feeling to be ashamed of evils you accomplish the righteousness of help for honest people, you are the most benevolent and the most righteous.” This indicates that you admit that those who practice benevolence and righteousness become the three powers. 
Again, you say that Zichang and zha cannot belong to the upper stratum, and Yi and Yan ought to belong to the lower stratum. 
People who are qualiﬁed to put on yellow lower garments (i.e., ranking ofﬁcials such as Zichang and Jizha) still fall below . 
Although you said [the judgment of the two paths of sages and ordinary people is easier than] giving instructions to one’s servants by merely gesturing with one’s chin, since there is no warrant for high and low (i.e., sages and ordinary people), a deluded one has not yet comprehended this. 
Yin and yang nourish the vigor , while toughness and gentleness give them their natures. 
They each have a round head and rectangular feet; they do not differ in their appearance. 
They have much natural compassion and the feeling to be ashamed of evil. So does everyone. 
For those who take part in and accept the two polarities [in order to be in the three powers], however, it is necessary to hold benevolence and righteousness as the ﬁrst step. 
Furthermore, you say, “ are equally placed under [the great virtue] in the same way as people. 
Certainly, we must differentiate them on the basis of their extraordinary spirits, but we should not distinguish them based on the life they received.” Such extraordinary spirits are already different from other living creatures. 
Why would they all suddenly be the same under the law of receiving life? 
Life is based on the law and the law differentiates [between sages and other living creatures]. 
Then, on what basis is the same name, “life,” given to other living creatures? 
If you stick to this name “life” and 139 cause the people to certainly follow it, then is something undeﬁned and complete 334 also included in this instance? 
Again, you say, “If one carefully builds a fence , he is still worried that a thief may come over the fence, not to speak of [his worry when] he completely sets up everything in order to satisfy extravagant desires. 
How could we discuss abandoning excessive ?” You said at the beginning that emperors and sages set up the teaching to plan seasonal hunting and the scriptures to prudently follow the seasons; in this way to gradually return to the cessation of extremities. 
Now, you criticize with the statement, “This is precisely the beginning of extremities.” I have not known in detail whether this rebukes my view or ridicules sages. 
Furthermore, you say, “Outside of the market and the kitchen, why can there be nothing to be offered to nourish us? 
The writing of Shen Nong is explained by Zhongsan. 
An old man of seventy years is not satisﬁed until he eats meat. 
Why can you merely display herbs and medicines and reserve them as the best remedy? 
The reason I am worried that does not stand up is not that it is difﬁcult for me to support your great discussion, but I take a step back and doubt this matter; simply, cannot be suddenly removed from the world. 
This, indeed, is the question. 
Just on the point in which you say that spiritual beings should have some substance, isn’t it possible you are confused, since Indian books state that spiritual beings become other living creatures? 
People of former days considered spiritual beings to be the teaching. 
Moreover, they wrote it down in books and scriptures, and it is widely found in written materials. 
Qiao of Zheng state and zha of Wu state considered this so, too. 
Therefore, when music is played six times [with the Chinese zithers made out of wood from] Mount Yunhe, the spirits of Heaven really descend , and when it is played nine times [with the Chinese zithers made out of wood from] Mount Longmen, the manes of people all come and gather.335 You often adhere to the Rites of Zhou , but recently you disregard this meaning. 
Since merciful people deeply saw this fate, they made the correct statement of its foundation.” You have not made it clear about so-called merciful people. 
If you depend on the doctrine of reward and retribution [in accordance with] actions that is stated in books other than , it is entirely the teaching of expedients to which I refer. 
In investigating the utmost doctrine, you have not analyzed with the sages’ words and yet you have adopted many crafty and strange in order to support . 
Can it be to give the impression of rescuing by means of water from disasters caused by water? 
Furthermore, you say, “I think that there are no absurd things. 
Each one is moved with good virtue,” and “If we continuously save with good , a good will also follow. 
Without any exercise of thought, it will occur naturally.” If these words are certainly so, those who are moved with good virtue must be equal in degree of seriousness, just as the force of a sundial must have a certain extent in length. 
Even though hunting is done according to the seasons, the extremely cruel nature [of human beings] has not been uprooted. 
For what is a person rewarded to ascend to Heaven, which is splendid and joyful? 
For what is one punished to fall into hell, which is dark and full of suffering? 
Why was it sealed in the ages of xi and Tang ? 
In the beginning, nets were made and this has given rise to a number of sins. 
offering animal sacriﬁces was established and opened the punishment of the long night (Skt. 
The heavenly kitchen is abandoned, and those animals fed with grass and grain are considered delicious. 
There has been no benevolence to save people from drowning [in extreme misery]. 
The cruelty of putting people into a dry moat was carried out without restraint. 
If you think that the intelligence of the exquisite spirit [of sages] is not yet complete in some points, even though you are thoughtful and love strange ideas, you have not come to disgrace the sages. 
When you talk about benevolence and righteousness, you say, “those who care about are few and those who use them for their own beneﬁt are many.” However, when you speak of doing kindness, you approve that men of virtue and talents who are left neglected forget a reward. 
If you can encourage people who are willing to give , expect companions who want to be benevolent, expound the meaning of forgetting reward and retribution, and lead the people toward a mind of righteousness, then righteousness is truly here and you are not far in seeking benevolence. 
It brings about widespread blessings for everyone, and is the highest of a hundred deities in nobility,” the intention of this is nonsense, and it is not what I am concerned with in this discussion. 
Isn’t this like the case when the Qin army was about to escape and their messenger talked nonsense?338 How could I continue to press you? 
Sages are placed above, and they do not have to strive for supremacy against a hundred deities. 
If there is a beginning, there is an end. 
Therefore, they cut off the intimacy and fame of being praised. 
Nothing hurts the capacity of universal love. 
By hunting and ﬁshing, both the wise and ordinary people are nourished. 
Game for its threefold use is served to guests as a practical matter.339 Gold and precious stones illuminate splendidly. 
Getting drunk and being satisﬁed with kindness, one is beneﬁted in this way for ten thousand years. 
Recluses broaden new works every day, while ofﬁcials expound the teachings of ancient sage sovereigns. 
Sincerity is apparent in bright rulers. 
The dragon seal manifests views. Musical stones create harmonious rhythms. 
These are for the paradise of Yao and Confucius. 
He kills chickens, makes a variety of millet, and entrusts somewhat his ambition; or, [ just like Yi Yin,] he carries a heavy three-legged caldron on his back to cook, becomes famous and immortalizes his fame; or a man butchers sheep, uses a knife , and lets his lofty aspiration ride the drifting clouds. 
Why is it 143 necessary to consider the future blessings of the family that has accumulated enough good deeds to be vile, to hope for the blessings of the next existence of which there is no proof, to turn one’s back on the real pleasures of one’s own lifetime, and to be tired of working in vain, without a place to return to? 
trying to harness wind or catch a shadow is not the grace of the golden mean of the Confucian school. 
To admire a barbarian and to be confused by absurd things go against the goal of a masterly mind. 
squatting or kneeling upright in worship and bowing complaisantly are inconsistent with each other after all. 
I personally wish that you would give up practicing both and abide by alone. 
Metaphors such as a single-plank bridge, the two men shu and shu, a person in the world [who keeps an unpolished gem and displays it in a market], and an ofﬁcer in charge of translation, have nothing to do with the original meanings. 
The Third Expatiation to He of Hengyang Sacred thought is difﬁcult to investigate, and a mysterious response is unforeseen. 
I vainly think that the cloth that could be washed in ﬁre , was [engraved in stone, but it was] cut down in a later generation,341 and Teng Xiu felt ashamed of himself throughout his life about the barbels of a shrimp.342 Therefore, I simply fear to judge with my own speculation anything outside my consideration. 
The scriptures of doctrines are everlasting,343 and their unique insights are strong, durable, and skillful. 
It is difﬁcult to have doubts about them. 
I will write a little more about what I think and explain it, itemizing in accordance with your responses. 
Since fortune and misfortune are mingled in the matter, and foreign and Chinese are mixed in the meaning, although I tried to make a brief and concise statement, it ended up becoming a petty composition. 
You respond and say, “If, just as your point of argument, we consider the three lines to be the three powers, the ﬁrst line is intended to be the line of Earth and the third line is said to be the rank of Heaven. 
“As a matter of fact, as long as the two polarities, have no consigning basis, how can we take to designate the establishment of people? 
According to former scholarship I have heard, the simple symbol of the diagrams begins with three lines and the sixty-four hexagrams end with six lines .344 With the three lines the foundation of the position of the three powers is set up. 
before the six lines change what a group of dragons pass through.345 Hence, after the sixty-four hexagrams, the signiﬁcance of one’s course of action is clariﬁed. 
Therefore, [it is stated in the “Explanation of the Words and Sentences” in the Book of Changes that] “The one can live in seclusion ,” “ are active ,” “ lying hidden,” and “ advance together with the movement of time].”346 These are the meanings for sages to adapt to the circumstances of their times and the way to unite . 
If we consider that the two polarities have no consigning basis, and we do not take the second line to be designated for the establishment of people since the ﬁrst line is not intended for Earth and the third line is not positioned for Heaven, then I do not understand on what basis your previous assertion that “the three powers are one unit” arises. 
If you still accept the theory found in the “Commentary of Appended Judgments” and you do not surpass 25a the instruction received from your teachers, why do you take only the meaning of the hexagrams correctly and decline the meaning of the simple symbol of the diagrams? 
In addition, I know you say, “Since the line is located between justice and harmony, it is simply suitable to correspond to sovereign virtue.” If there are merely the lines for justice and harmony and rather unexpectedly there is no person of justice and harmony, to what are the lines going to be applied? 
If justice and harmony lie in virtue and all ordinary people cannot have justice and harmony, my discussion that one is suitable to [Heaven and Earth] cannot be seen as extravagant. 
You respond, “ ‘ wherever natural compassion you exhaust the capacity of universal love, and wherever the feeling to be ashamed of evils you accomplish the righteousness of help for honest people, you are the most benevolent and the most righteous.’ This indicates that you admit that those who practice benevolence and righteousness become the three powers.” Again, you say that “Zichang and zha cannot belong to the upper stratum, and Yi and Yan ought to belong to the lower stratum. 
People who are qualiﬁed to put on yellow lower garments (i.e., ranking ofﬁcials such as Zichang and Jizha) still fall below . 
Although [you said the judgment of the two paths of sages and ordinary people is easier than] giving instructions to one’s servants by merely gesturing with one’s chin, since there is no warrant for high and low (i.e., sages and ordinary people), a deluded one has not yet comprehended this.” My explanation is this: 
The so-called most benevolent and most righteous are designations only for those who have completely reached the acme of benevolence and righteousness and who can receive standing on an equal footing with Heaven and Earth. 
I do not mean that anyone who has even a little bit of the feeling of shame for evils and of universal love is in the three powers. 
As I have already explained this in my previous discussion, I am surprised that you still have a question about this. 
In the four of the universe,348 only the sovereign is an entity . We know that those who make the two polarities the three are none other than sages. 
According to the grading of the Eastern Lu, [where the Duke of Zhou and Confucius are from,] Qiao and zha do not fully equip righteousness. 
Why are they placed higher to occupy the highest rank? 
In the light of the basis of the western land , since Yi and Yan have not attained the dharmakāya, they must be placed lower, in the rank of living beings. 
In the discussion you gave me, you comment on Śākyamuni’s with the view of the Duke of Zhou. 
Therefore, my intention was taken contradictorily. 
I have become rather verbose. 
Sages become sovereigns or teachers, while wise people become subjects or assistants of the teachers. 
When they approach supernatural achievement smoothly, and are inﬂuenced by the great work, they can share the course of action, and keeping silent and speaking are also achieved at the same time. 
If one masters a part to this point, how could he turn his back to become a ranking ofﬁcial of the yellow lower garment? 
You vainly see that there are those who cannot be ranked equally with sovereigns, unreasonably and resentfully blame it on them, and do not know to raise up to the highest point. 
Furthermore, it is not the feeling of sticking to principles. 
If you pointed out and concluded like this, why do you say there is no warrant (i.e., sages and ordinary people)? 
You respond, “Yin and yang nourish the vapor , while toughness and gentleness give them their natures. 
They each have a round head and rectangular feet; they do not differ in their appearance. 
They have much natural compassion and the feeling to be ashamed of evil. So does everyone. 
For those who take part in and accept the two polarities [in order to be in the three powers], however, it is necessary to hold benevolence and righteousness as the ﬁrst step.” 25b My explanation is this: 
If it is assumed that those who have a round head and rectangular feet, and who most certainly have the sincerity of feeling shame for evils and natural compassion in the same way, and who do not differ in their appearance, can all take part in and accept the two polarities , then is a group of people like Jiao (a younger brother of King Zhuang of Chu state) and Zhi [who are known as robbers] reckoned among those in the three powers? 
If this is actually impossible, we cannot place them on the same level with great people, if the only reason for this is that they are equally human. 
It is difﬁcult for ordinary people to become equal to in dignity and capacity. 
It has already been stated that “The benevolent rest in benevolence and the wise seek benevolence,”349 “To practice energetically is close to benevolence,”350 and “The one who is afraid of vice strives to be benevolent.”351 If we regard those [who try to be benevolent for beneﬁt] in the same light as the one of the principal seat, truth and falsehood become mutually indistinguishable. 
Zhuangzi says, “In the world, the good people are few and those who are not good are many.”352 If are divided like this, how can you say, “So does everyone”? 
Although they want to avail themselves of , what can be done about those who are suspicious or deceitful? 
The symbolism of the hexagrams shows numinous beings. 
.’ Such extraordinary spirits are already different from other living creatures. 
Why would they all suddenly be the same under the law of receiving life? 
Life is based on the law and the law differentiates [between sages and other living creatures]. 
Then, on what basis is the same name ‘life’ given to other living creatures? 
If you stick to this name ‘life,’ and cause the people to certainly follow it, then is something undeﬁned and complete also included in this instance?” My explanation is this: 
I said previously, “[In life, there is a common feature of all things,] which is the same as what differentiates all things. 
How could it be distinguished to attain life?” You responded to this, “I do not say that this is not so.” Furthermore, you asked, “What merit is there in considering that the life that is not different from each other must be sentient beings?” This indicates that you contradict my that are sentient beings, yet you accept is not different. 
Could there be anything that is not different and not sentient beings? 
Therefore, I again simply said: 
Is it originally yin and yang? 
I do not see the difference , but you said that you have suddenly not been the same. 
If there are differences in the law, isn’t it that escape in vapor? 
Then, beyond yin and yang there is moreover a realm where one receives life. 
How should the three periods, be ﬁrmly founded? 
If vainly in the name of life you do not see the truth of life, it does not match your previous statement. 
If you say that life is not life, this means that people 25c are not people. 
Venerable Sir Li’s theory about this, [namely that something undeﬁned and complete that came into existence before Heaven and Earth,] probably has such meaning. 
You respond, “ ‘If one carefully builds a fence [around a house], and so on.’ You said at the beginning that emperors and sages set up the teaching to plan seasonal hunting and the scriptures to prudently follow the seasons; in this way to gradually return to the cessation of extremities. 
Now, you criticize with the statement, ‘This is precisely the beginning of extremities.’ I have not known in detail whether this rebukes my view or ridicules sages.” My explanation is this: 
Formerly I read your original discussion, [the Discourse on the Full Understanding of Life]. 
Regarding the section from “the nine kinds of grains” up to “When Confucius ﬁshed, he did not use a net,” I came to understand for the ﬁrst time that you meant in your discussion that whatever is governed and produced originates entirely from the sages, who are personally good teachers, in order to lead common people. 
In my solitary, humble, and clumsy opinion, I would say that whatever do, there must be reasons for their actions. 
Sages manage and control [their actions], and do not let them go to excess. 
You, however, have not been aware in what way leave behind excessiveness. 
Sages assuredly remove this.” I do not understand your intention here. 
Therefore, recently I asked you about the issue of excessiveness. 
You replied and said, “I have not known in detail who is to be rebuked.” Probably you forgot what you said previously. 
You responded, “ ‘Outside of a market and a kitchen, and so on.’ Well, in offering to Heaven and Earth, calf’s horns [are used]; in the state offering the three domestic animals, are sacriﬁced; and the thick soup of beef or pork is served in a wooden vessel on a painted wooden stand to offer to guests of honor. 
An old man of seventy years is not satisﬁed until he eats meat. 
Why can you merely display herbs and medicines and reserve them as the best remedy? 
The reason I am worried that does not stand up is not that it is difﬁcult for me to support your great discussion, but I take a step back and suspect this matter; simply, cannot be suddenly removed from the world.” My explanation is this: 
Shen Nong laid down how to live and the people of the Zhou dynasty provided the instruction . 
They already advocated a diet of grains. 
In addition, the best remedy was mentioned and sacriﬁce was already offered. 
I previously adduced that outside of the market and the kitchen, there are other things that support and nourish us. 
Even with the merit of eating the meat of domestic animals, however, it is rare to live a hundred years. 
As a good aspect of taking divine herbs, I often hear about a life span of a thousand years. 
For this reason I say, why is it necessary for an old man of seventy years to appreciate the great favor of eating meat? 
If, however, one who sequesters himself completely in a closed-in area gives up this [meat diet], he simply has no other means . 
I think that [your statement “ cannot be suddenly removed from the world” is similar to “They cannot suddenly take away remain entrenched ,” which I expressed in my previous expatiation. 
Since you understand that [these dietary habits] cannot be suddenly removed from the world, probably you do not think that the Way is complete in this . 
Just on the point in which you say that spiritual beings should have some substance, 26a isn’t it possible you are confused, since Indian books state that spiritual beings become other living creatures? 
People of former days considered spiritual beings to be the teaching. 
Moreover, they wrote it down in books and scriptures, and it is widely found in written materials. 
[Lord Sun] Qiao of Zheng state and zha of Wu state considered this so, too. 
Therefore, when music is played six times [with the Chinese zithers made out of wood from] Mount Yunhe, the spirits of Heaven really descend from Heaven, and when it is played nine times [with the Chinese zithers made out of wood from] Mount Longmen, the manes of people all come and gather. 
You often adhere to the Rites of Zhou, but recently you disregard this meaning. 
It is not only that I do not reject that there are spiritual beings but also I think that if there are , they must have a form. 
Please forget about the Indian theory, and strictly comply with the Chinese classics. 
Moreover, put aside the issue that become other living creatures. 
The appearance and the issue of existence or nonexistence should be assuredly reported and settled. 
Spiritual beings are very often mentioned in stories and writings. 
It is not that I do not understand their names and titles. 
Recently I received three discussions . Every time I received [a new discussion], the number of increased. 
A myriad of spirits have all gathered together, but you have not answered even a part of the question . 
You vainly said that it is an incoherent argument, and considered it a common opinion. 
You have not made it clear about so-called merciful people. 
If you depend on the doctrine of reward and retribution actions that is stated in books other than , it is entirely the teaching of expedients to which I refer. 
In investigating the utmost doctrine, you have not analyzed with the sages’ words and yet you have adopted many crafty and strange in order to support . 
Can it be to give the impression of rescuing by means of water from disasters caused by water?” My explanation is this: 
Thinking about merciful people, I hear for a long time that there are such people. 
I know that you think the doctrine of reward and retribution is entirely the teaching of expedients. 
The way of expedients is mysterious and deep; only sages can accomplish it. 
Even though you are proﬁcient in knowledge and understanding, you have not seen its culmination. 
If what the doctrine of expedients states is all deceptive and delusive, there would be no reward and retribution in the Nature. 
Again, this is dreadful! 
The spirit is lofty, but the one who hears it is low. 
How can you bring a false accusation? 
I think that the “sages’ words” you mentioned must be the words of the Duke of Zhou and Confucius. 
What we talk about now is entirely the issue of “believing and following” . 
Nevertheless, you say that I have not analyzed . 
My answers do not go beyond your questions. 
I do not feel that I have “adopted many .” You Yu and Ridi were not born in the Chinese region. 
How can we specify that there is no one who has mastered the principles outside of the nine regions away from the royal domain? 
If you believe your own criteria, have only your ears and eyes to teach you, and consider that everything except what you have already learned and known is crafty and strange, then I will stop my argument! 
26b You responded, “Furthermore, you say, ‘I think that there are no absurd things. 
Even though hunting is done according to the seasons, the extremely cruel nature has not been uprooted. 
For what is a person rewarded to ascend to Heaven, which is splendid and joyful? 
For what is one punished to fall into Hell, which is dark and full of suffering? 
I spoke of a sundial in order to give evidence . 
The intention of your letter is to raise a doubt that it is not necessarily that [actions and the way of reward and retribution] correspond to each other and to suspect that there is no rule between them, and then you again try to remove a fortunate response. 
A fortunate response is nothing other than what is produced by fate. 
If a fortunate response is extinguished, there is no fate. 
I think that one who keeps it in mind to believe in the Way must not come to this point. 
If you think that decorations in building or construction are not initiated by a benevolent mind and it is worse than taking another’s life in accordance with seasons, wouldn’t it be seriously ungrateful to the mind of that man ? 
The emperor’s vehicle and seal are not necessarily the sentiments of Yao and Shun. 
Would respectful buildings and magniﬁcent offerings be Śākyamuni’s intention? 
To demand the reward [of rebirth] in Heaven and to ask for punishment in Hell are very similar to the stories that the ancient questioned Yafu (a general and minister of the Han dynasty who died of starvation, as had been foretold by an elderly woman physiognomist) about, and that Ying asked a question [to a guest who had foretold his future misfortune].354 How tasteful these words are! 
I will leave it out. 
A good cook who wields a knife feels afraid whenever he comes to a complicated joint. 
The Sage is as bright as the sun and moon, and his ediﬁcation can open the three powers. 
If reward and retribution inevitably tally, how is it hindered by the teaching? 
Why was it sealed in the ages of xi and Tang ? 
In the beginning, nets [to catch animals and ﬁsh] were made and this gave rise to a number of sins. 
offering animal sacriﬁces was established and opened the punishment of the long night . 
The heavenly kitchen (i.e., food naturally collected) is abandoned, and those animals fed grass and grain are considered delicious. 
There has been no benevolence to save people from drowning . 
The cruelty of putting people into a dry moat was carried out without restraint. 
If you think that the intelligence of the exquisite spirit is not yet complete in some points, even though you are thoughtful and love strange ideas, you have not come to disgrace sages.” My explanation is this: 
I know that you think the meaning of reward and retribution was sealed in the times of xi and the Zhou dynasty. 
The time of xi and Tang was long ago, which no one knows fully. 
The record in the Book of History comprises no more than a few sections. 
When the merits of virtue and punishment were just mentioned, they had no scope to record the origin of weal and woe. 
Now, in the writings on emperors and kings, the issue of a person’s life is still not written, but taking the lack of a written record as evidence, you consider that indeed it did not exist in ancient times. 
This is again a fault caused by considering your mind as your teacher. 
Moreover, it is all displayed in the works of the Duke of Zhou and Confucius to believe and follow blessings and misfortune . 
Since there are familiar and unfamiliar 26c in language and shallow and deep in teaching, is it to have the wise give this and snatch away that? 
While we live, we indeed have desires. 
When we have desires, we certainly ask for something. 
If we ﬁght, we harm each other. 
If we are peaceful, we stabilize each other. 
The reason a net was made is to remove harmful things in order to have peace. 
Furthermore, hunting and ﬁshing are no different from the sacriﬁce of livestock. 
In the previous reply you were already aware that sacriﬁces of livestock could not suddenly be removed from the world. 
you say, “Wasn’t it possible to abandon at least hunting and ﬁshing in ancient times?” This has not yet been a coherent discussion. 
Therefore, to try to dispense with death is of following one’s feeling and to take away other lives is of going against one’s nature. 
Why would he offend and go against the natural course? 
From this, we know that since we cannot suddenly remove longstanding customs, simply set up a system to control them. 
Even though the spirits of sages are vigorous, they have nothing to make ignorant minds wise and clever. 
The heavenly kitchen was involuntarily abandoned since matters are far away and difﬁcult for us to reach. 
Since substantial things are familiar and easy for us to indulge in, domestic animals is always delicious. 
saving a man from drowning and taking a man out of a dry moat are common to many wise people, but to teach people differs . 
It is not that the Way itself differs. 
Your reprimand that [I think the intelligence of the exquisite spirit of the sages] is not yet complete in some points also seems inappropriate. 
You respond, “When you talk about benevolence and righteousness, you say ‘Those who care about are few and those who use them for their own beneﬁt are many.’ However, when you speak of doing kindness, you approve that men of virtue and talents who are left neglected forget a reward. 
Since those who use for their own beneﬁt are many, how can you say to forget a reward? 
If you can encourage people who are willing to give , expect companions who want to be benevolent, expound the meaning of forgetting reward and retribution, and lead the people toward a mind of righteousness, then righteousness is truly here and you are not far in seeking benevolence.” My explanation is this: 
“Those who care about benevolence and righteousness are few and those who use them for their own beneﬁt are many.” I learned this from Zhuangzi’s book.356 It is not my own statement. 
You hastily impeached me before you made a complete examination. 
Well, “Since those who care about are few and those who use them for their own beneﬁts are many, no one is able to be a man of virtue and talents. 
It is not something on which you should depend in order to show that your great discussion is correct. 
If being willing to give and forgetting a reward are to master benevolence, and if forgetting a reward and giving tally with righteousness, we may leave behind the word “want” [in the phrase “in order to hope for companions who want to be benevolent and also remove the word “toward” [from the phrase “lead the people toward a mind of righteousness. 
If here and you are not far , who would not long for these? 
Isn’t this like the case when the Qin army was about to escape and their messenger talked nonsense?” 27a My explanation is this: 
Based on the views of this land, you say that blessings rest with high-ranking ofﬁcials. 
These are controversial points in our discussion. 
The foundation of the criticism of this discussion takes by turns to be the essence. 
If every time it gets beyond your control you say that it is vast and preposterous, then the road to look for principles is nearly blocked up. 
Sages are placed above, and they do not have to strive for supremacy against a hundred deities. 
And so on.” My explanation is this: 
[The one who becomes a leader] not only refrains from ﬁghting but also certainly assumes a humble attitude. 
When you see the phrase “The highest in nobility among a hundred deities,” you may not think to contend with a hundred deities for supremacy. 
Instead, you take it as Lord Teng and Lord Xue, [who fought each other for supremacy]357 and forget to master benevolence. 
I am aware that you think there is a beginning and an end in things, and that there is no land of eternal life. 
If we look for it within our realm , it is true, just as the purpose of your letter, and it is just as I said in my previous expatiation, “Various existing things are really suitable for this (i.e., in the great law of Nature life and death are the same in arising and falling).” As to illustrations in the Book of Mountains and Seas and records in the Biographies of Arrayed Transcendents, these issues are concerned with this world, but they can no longer be traced back, not to mention the case where the Way separates from common practices and the principles separate from an ordinary pattern. 
My explanation is this: 
When I came to examine the section on this subject, you enthusiastically relate successive generations. 
Your writing is extensive, the content is complete, and you are very good at methods your teacher. 
Your voice to sing for the world of sages is vigorous, but you simply have not made a key remark in studying to ﬁnd the signiﬁcance of the Way. 
I have been vaguely informed of the outline of the ways of emperors and kings and the traces of the virtuous and the intelligent. 
I personally wish that you would give up practicing both and abide by alone,” and so on. 
My explanation is this: 
blessings that has accumulated are not considered to be vile was already explicated in the section of “believing and following.” The issue about hoping thoroughly for the next existence was also completely, when I spoke of perceiving reward or retribution. 
Why wouldn’t it be possible that squatting or kneeling upright in worship and bowing complaisantly are practiced together in the same world? 
In principle, it is possible to practice them concurrently. 
These several passages in my latest letter arose somewhat from a joke. 
When an arbitrary opinion has come to this point there is no help, but it is just very strange. 
Since you have never responded to this, it is really promising . 
You are powerful, as if allied nations follow you just like clouds, and your great discourse has become popular. 
I, , live apart from society, and every time I present my solitary opinion, it is commented on in whispers. 
I truly rely on a versatile scholar. 
I abruptly forgot about the troublesomeness and have greedily written all to my heart’s content. 
End of Fascicle Four of The Collection for the Propagation and Clariﬁcation The Discourse on Regeneration by Luo Junzhang It is good that the scholar Xiang said, “What is Heaven? 
It is the general name of all things. 
What is Man? 
It is one of the things in Heaven.” From this, we may say that each thing has its own term of existence, while Heaven and Earth are everlasting. 
If all things did not regenerate, Heaven and Earth would have an end. 
Heaven and Earth are not supposed to have an end. 
I seek in various ancient discussions. 
In that case, human beings and things have their ﬁxed terms. 
It is impossible that existence extinguishes and becomes nonexistence. 
It is impossible that you can transform to become me. 
—the wise, the ignorant, one who lives long, or one who dies young—circles round and returns to one’s being. 
spontaneously goes on consistently, and there is not an iota of difference. 
Its way is profound. 
Even though Heaven and Earth are vast, they are harmonious, without disorder. 
Although all things are numerous, they are sorted according to their classes. 
Each of them has its foundation. There is the sequence in successive 27c ancestors. 
In the direct line and the collateral branches for a hundred generations its longstanding is never lost. 
Furthermore, the spirit and the physical substance are a natural couple. 
The natural couple’s separation and reunion are the change in birth and death. 
There are gathering and scattering in the physical substance. 
Therefore, when each of them returns , there is a principle. 
Even though things are confused and indistinguishable when they scatter, they are not out of order when they gather. 
The farther they go, the closer they return. 
In addition, the spirit and the physical substance profoundly meet each other, and spontaneously unite together exactly, just as two pieces of a tally ﬁt together. 
People of the world all lament that uniting leads to separation without fail, yet no one consoles himself with that separation leads to uniting without fail, as well. 
All people know that gathering leads to scattering without fail, but no one recognizes that scattering leads to gathering without fail, as well. 
They do not give much thought to this . 
How could there be distance ? 
Generally, since the present existence arises in conformity with the former existence, affairs are in alignment with past affairs. 
In the essence there is nothing disordered. In the intention, we are not aware that [the one of the former life] profoundly unites with . 
Now, a talker merely knows that the one of the former life is not the present life, but he simply does not know that the one of the present life is the one of the former life. 
Those who have extensive views, therefore, see that life is equal to death, and say that life and death are just like wakefulness and sleep. 
How true this statement is! 
Sun Changsha’s Letter by Anguo I have examined the Discourse on Regeneration, in which you sum up the issue of changes, and thoroughly analyze gathering and scattering. 
This is a good discussion. 
Nevertheless, I still have a different opinion. 
However, it takes many years until what is hidden reveals itself. 
When things exhaust the condition , they must go far off to an unseen place where our ears and eyes cannot perceive them. 
They are disorderly, confused, and mixed, and they transform into other substances. 
They are not what they used to be. 
This is the reason why all creatures that have feelings grieve. 
If this is so, you cannot console only yourself. 
Response to Sun I received your letter. 
Your composition is brief yet your purpose is expressed, and the logic upholds actual facts. 
Even though I am glad for your simple and easily understandable reply, I have not yet appreciated it. 
In the original I did not say that things do not change at all. 
Those that decay do not lose their former essence. 
Who takes charge of molding them, namely, mixing and making ? 
If they are like this, would regeneration occur only once? 
arise endlessly and regenerate for a long time. 
When they come to an end, they return to the beginning. 
While you are not able to know the present, how can you know about regeneration? 
How could it be said that I console only myself? 
The Discourse on the Immortality of the Spirit by Zheng Daozi 28a Many think that body and spirit perish together and the function of the spirit and consciousness are extinguished along with them. 
All people of the world already consider the Duke of Zhou and Confucius to be the culmination. 
Benevolence, righteousness, and ethical education were ﬁrst formed in their minds. 
The foundation of the spiritual intelligence is never mentioned in even a single word. 
The Buddha speaks words of the utmost importance, but ordinary people do not believe in him. 
I fell into delusions when I was young, but I thought to get out of the delusions. 
I sought the profound purport and examined the essence of the spirit. 
I realized that the principle is more exquisite than a physical body and the spirit is more subtle than the principle. 
Entrusting what has appeared, I will transmit my mind and brieﬂy adduce the testimony. 
Even though they exist together while one lives, with regard to the point that there is a difference between coarseness and subtlety in their origins, there is a distinction between corporeality and incorporeality. 
Why do I say this? 
A body consists of the ﬁve viscera , the six entrails (i.e., gall, stomach, bladder, the three parts of the abdominal cavity, small intestine, and lower intestine), the limbs and the seven apertures in the head (i.e., eyes, ears, nostrils, and mouth). 
Therefore, one is alive. At just the moment when people are born, each one receives the ﬁve primary elements in a different way . 
Hence, some people suffer from being crippled in a limb or some part of the body, or lack either ears or eyes, but this does not prove fatal. 
Even with the body it is like this, not to mention with the spirit whose essence mysteriously shines. 
Body and breath move together, while the spirit and the wonderful realization ﬂow in the same way. 
Although motion and inactivity support each other, exquisiteness and coarseness separate from each other in their origins. 
Wouldn’t it be because each has its origin and they depend on each other to function? 
When you take a familiar example of this, the reason is clear. 
In what a body supports, muscles and bones have sensations of pain and itching, while nails and hair do not. 
Why is this so? 
Wouldn’t it be because muscles and bones are the essence of life but nails and hair are not the foundation of life? 
When life is in the foundation, sensations exist. 
For the function of a body, it is still considered that the foundation and the periphery are concerned with rising and falling, not to mention the spirit that is the foundation of life, and whose origin is the most subtle. 
How could wither along with a seven chi-tall and be exhausted together with doors and windows? 
If you infer from this truth, you can clearly understand that the spirit is immortal. 
A guest criticizes, “Your argument on the body and spirit is complete. 
Nevertheless, even though the body and spirit have different origins— is of coarse origin and is of subtle origin—both consider existence to be their status. 
The reason for being is that life is the foundation. 
Why, then, is it possible that the foundation of existence has become exhausted and that which has depended on the foundation alone exists? 
Since it is completely obscure, it is not only that there is nothing to establish with words but also that there is nothing to extablish with consciousness. 
If it is not established by the consciousness, where does the spirit deposit itself? 
It has not yet been based on the mind. 
Is this why a criticism such as this comes up? 
Now all changes are entirely existence. 
Prospering, declining, rising, falling, dying or being born, take the place of each other. 
With regard to water and ﬁre, they prevail over all sentient beings thoroughly and are abundant, without deﬁciency. 
Wouldn’t it be because the essence of ﬁre follows things, the law of water annihilates and follows others, [both 165 ﬁre and water] are not self-generated when they are generated, they are what all sentient beings depend on, they are useful in the light of , and therefore things cannot use them up? 
Even exist in the same sphere of life are clever in this way, not to mention the principle of the spirit that is singularly transcendent and unparalleled. 
It is not on the same level with ordinary things, but is it ﬁxed that, since it is outside of life and is completely obscure, the spirit has nothing into which to deposit itself? 
If we carry out a discussion on this basis, the Grand Terminus is the mother of the two elementary forms , and the two elementary forms are the foundation of all things.360 The Grand Terminus, is simply the vapor of Heaven and Earth. 
It can still unite the roots of all these changes, and it does not change that it is the root. 
How much more can the spiritual intelligence—the apex of the numinous being that exhausts both existence and nonexistence—do? 
You can comprehend that is immortal.” The critic says, “You infer that the function of the spirit is beyond the body and you indicate that the Grand Terminus comes before things. 
This is really signiﬁcant. 
It is, however, valuable that reason satisﬁes the minds [of people]. 
Then a discussion can be carried out. 
The spirit and the body have not been separate from each other even for a moment. 
If they were separate from each other, there would be no spirit. 
There is no spirit in trees and plants because they do not have consciousness. 
If it is able to be immortal, it rides on the numinous being without availing itself of a body. 
Since it does not avail itself of a body, why does it exist with a body? 
If [the spirit and the body] cannot be separated from each other, it can certainly be understood that the foundation of life is the same.” I respond, “There is a criticism of this. 
The body and the spirit have their own origins. 
As to ﬁre, there is ﬁre on the basis of ﬁrewood. 
If there is no ﬁrewood, there is no ﬁre. 
Even though ﬁrewood is a device to make ﬁre, it is not the foundation of ﬁre. 
The foundation of ﬁre spontaneously exists, and simply comes to function complying with ﬁrewood. 
If ﬁrewood came before ﬁre, would it be reasonable to say that there was no ﬁre before Suiren (a legendary ruler who ﬁrst discovered ﬁre)? 
The foundation of ﬁre is the utmost degree of yang, and yang is the culmination of ﬁre. 
Therefore, ﬁrewood is what ﬁre deposits itself into, but it is not the foundation . 
That the spirit and the body avail of each other is also like this. 
Availing of and complying with each other are merely the cause of the path of birth [and death]. 
Why could it be that if there is a body, the spirit exists; and if there is no body, the spirit is exhausted? 
Its foundation is entranced, unconscious, and indescribable. 
“Let me extensively give an example in order to clarify this for you. 
When ﬁrewood is in water, ﬁre is dead. 
When ﬁrewood is out of water, it makes ﬁre.361 The ﬁrewood remains the same, but ﬁre is designated beforehand . 
That the spirit does not rely on a body is also like this. 
If does not need a body, as you said, what avails itself of a body and what shines alone are usually the same in the principles. 
Even though avail themselves of each other, this is not interdependence in the foundation. 
According to what the Buddhist doctrine clariﬁes, we must educate and mold this spirit in order to save that body. 
This is what ordinary people are deluded by, because they have not reached the foundation. 
Although the spirit does not need a body, that body is surely produced. 
In the body that is surely produced, this spirit certainly dwells. 
If certainly dwells in that is surely produced, the function and the perception become one, and they are spontaneously beneﬁcial to each other. 
If it is fruitful, the Way is practiced. 
This can be compared to the four seasons and all things. 
It is what the principles follow and what is naturally reached.” The critic says, “I have respectfully heard that although the body and the spirit are different from each other, they are mutually beneﬁcial. 
You 167 have already compared the spirit in the body to ﬁre in ﬁrewood. 
Firewood has no intention to make ﬁre and ﬁre has no frame of mind to deposit itself into ﬁrewood. 
Therefore, they can collaborate endlessly. 
It is not that the ﬁre of this ﬁrewood moves to that ﬁrewood and becomes ﬁre. 
Nevertheless, in Buddhist doctrine, on the basis that after the body is exhausted further dwells in that body, the coming into and going out of the spirit and the body originate in evil acts and meritorious deeds. 
Let me ask you: 
If this body performs evil acts, are evil acts done by the physical body or by the spirit? 
If the body , is merely one of all things created by the Great Founder.362 If the spirit , since the spirit does not act independently and is tied to something else, namely the body, your assertion that the body and spirit do not avail themselves of each other fails in this point.” I respond, “It is good to have this question so that I can explain the reason thoroughly. 
I said that body and spirit do not avail themselves of each other, by which I simply meant that they have different foundations. 
Once they come into life, in the endless transmigration of birth and death each of them pervades its function. 
If this life is used in order to commit evil acts and perform meritorious deeds, could it be possible that the spirit performs its function subtly by itself and does not do anything for the function of the body? 
If this is so, it would be intentional to be wise or ignorant. It is not that neglects the function and mysteriously meets with [a body]. 
It is logical that meets mysteriously with , and it is logical that the body is exhausted. 
The spirit that was educated dwells in a body. 
This is exactly so! 
Since realization derives from the spirit, delusion lies in the spirit as well. 
The spirit follows the body. 
Therefore, there are the wise and the ignorant. 
Being wise or ignorant is not the spirit but the spirit does something in the functioning of the body. 
revolves in the three periods for a very long time, beyond calculation. 
Being wise or ignorant has no beginning, and the potency [of being wise or ignorant] becomes evident midway [through the course of the transmigration of birth and death]. 
The law of non-beginning is profound, while the potency midway is immature. 
In the principles there is neither beginning nor end. 
Once we have already been born or transformed, continuously committing evil acts or performing meritorious deeds simply takes place naturally. 
So-called sagacity truly derives from the ears and eyes, but the foundation of the ears and eyes is not sagacity. 
What is called being wise or ignorant really ought to have a beginning. 
If there is already being wise or ignorant, nothing about the beginning can be known. 
There is something, but it cannot control things. 
There is only nothing that is later able to become to what things return. 
If there is a beginning, it is impossible to have no end.364 Only when there is nonbeginning do beginning and end become inexhaustible. 
It is impossible . 
Based on the assumption that things have a beginning, you cannot demand that the spirit is the same as things. 
The Way of the Spirit is abstruse and subtle. The ultimate principle is unspeakable. 
As the principle is indicated indistinctly, we come to understand it together. 
If we seek for the foundation from the end, we are apt to fail to catch its entirety. 
If you [were to continue to] indulge in arguing and competing in compositions, I know that you should cease. 
“The Hongfan chapter speaks of the foundation of living. 
On this point it is the same as Buddhism. 
As to the matter that in what the Buddha expounds there are many the Milky Way ,365 this is simply because you indulge in daily matters. 
Shangchen extremely transgressed against , but his descendants made the state prosperous. 
Yan and Ran were virtuous, but they were not well known because they died young. 
The teaching of the 169 Duke of Zhou and Confucius is for matters of this world . 
If this reason is inferred, it can be understood. 
“Let me extend the testimony in order to examine it in more detail. 
Yao begat Danzhu, who was stupid and evil, who had no sense of order, and who did not know benevolence and righteousness. 
Gusou begat Shun. 
When we trace the origin of birth, was not a man who could raise . 
You, however, said that the Buddhist doctrine is unrealistic. 
Shouldn’t you realize ?” The New Discourse on Body and Spirit by Huan Junshan I, Cheng , think that Junshan had never heard Śākyamuni’s teaching, but he already excerpted the simile of ﬁrewood and ﬁre when he discussed body and spirit. In the later disputant’s statement, there is a point that obscurely matches with . Accordingly, I carry on here. 
I saw that he was reading Laozi’s book. 
He said, “Laozi preserved his health by a tranquil life without worldly desires and enjoyed his life for as long as several hundred years. 
Today if we practice the way he did, would we be able to prolong life and stay young?” I responded, “Even though are the same in form and name, each has a different degree in their temperament, nature, and ability. 
By loving, cultivating, and appropriately using [our natures and abilities], we can simply alleviate our aging. 
It is just like if we take good care of clothes, footwear, and utensils, they remain in good condition and last long.” Nearby I saw the embers of a ﬂaxen torch that hung down one chi. 
On the basis of this, I then made the analogy, “ of the spirit dwelling in a body is similar to that of a ﬁre burning a torch. 
If we are good at holding it and shifting its position in accordance with the ﬂame, it is possible that the ﬁre will not go out until the torch fuel is entirely consumed. 
Without the torch, no ﬁre can be produced by itself in emptiness. 
Moreover, it is impossible for the embers to burn after . 
When teeth fall out, hair turns grey, and muscles lose their vigor, the spirit cannot invigorate . 
When completely cover the inside and outside [of the body], the vapor is exhausted and we die. 
It is just as the ﬂame and the torch come to an end together. 
a man encounters an evil thing and is injured or falls ill. 
If he does not receive treatment or meet a good doctor, he will probably die an unnatural death. 
If he dies , his muscles and bones are usually just like ﬂames that are fanned by a strong wind, which are not protected from , and which die out. 
“Once while sitting and drinking in my inner chamber at night, I lit a ﬂaxen torch. 
In the midst of burning, the torch was crushed and about to go out. 
I closely inspected it by myself and found that the bark covered like a scab. 
So I supported and shifted its position. 
“Furthermore, no one can know the beginning of the time of his birth, and even when he gets old, he ought not to know when he will die, either. 
In ancient times, when it was a peaceful world, people were born under goodness and prosperity. 
All were strong and enjoyed longevity. 
They lived for about a hundred years and died. 
When they died, they looked like they were sleeping and suddenly left . 
It is just like fruits and grains that fully ripen and naturally fall . 
People of later ages are victimized by the vicious vapors of declining and waning. 
Moreover, they lose a timely marriage and work excessively and diligently despite hardships. 
Hence, even if they give birth, both [parents and children] are impaired, and their bones, muscles, blood, and breath are not strong enough. 
Therefore, many people die of misfortune that shortens their 171 life, or while still young in midlife. 
When they fall ill, they may suffer from pain, sadness, and worry, and later they pass away. 
Therefore, we sigh, we hate death, and we consider it to be a great . 
If they have a long life only coveting proﬁt and still seek to prolong their life, they are deluded and do not understand .” Someone criticized this, “When the body and spirit are compared to a torch and ﬁre, it appears that there is a parallel point, but I am afraid that there is not. 
The reason human skin and ﬂesh are healed spontaneously when they are ﬂayed or injured is that the blood and breath circulate. 
When the ﬂaxen torch is damaged, although it burns, it cannot completely recover [its original force]. 
Hence, grow with the spiritual breath. 
If the torch is unable to recover by itself, this is probably what is considered different . 
Why do you assert that are the same?” I responded, “A ﬁre begins from the edge , but the spiritual vapor of a human being is within the body. 
Even if it moves from the exterior toward the interior, assuredly it is not necessary to go in from an edge. 
This is similar to a red-hot charcoal ﬁre: 
This is the same as the case where the human blood and breath stimulate the growth of skin and ﬂesh. 
When we look at that some parts become ashes, and other parts become embers. 
Why is it impossible to compare this to ?” On another night I was talking with Boshi, sitting face to face, burning the oil of a lamp. 
Since the oil in the lamp was exhausted and the wick was bare, the light was going out. 
Then, showing this to Boshi, I said, “Human aging is also like the bare the lamp.” Furthermore, I spoke of the matter of the ﬂaxen torch that I previously . 
Boshi said, “When the lamp and the torch burn out, we must add oil or switch to a torch. 
When a man becomes old, he should quickly pour [blood and breath in his body in order to sustain his life].” I responded, “A man has already received a body and formed himself. 
This is just like holding that lamp or torch. When [the lamp and torch] are exhausted, how can they change themselves, since they have been exhausted? 
That which quickly pours [blood and breath in a human body in order to sustain its life] is Heaven. 
If Heaven is able to do well for human beings and ﬁll up their bodies with blood and breath and strengthen their muscles and bones, then their bodies and spirits become vigorous, even to the extremities, and they live for a long time. 
It is just as a ﬂame lasts a short or long time according to the quality of the oil or the length of the torch. 
Just by collecting nearby oil in order to soak the tip of , or shifting the position of the main part of a torch in order to make the ﬂame stable, their brightness can be recovered. 
“Now, regarding the preservation of our health, we may be able to replace a lost tooth, dye gray hair black, or regain lustrous skin and face, just as in the case of collecting oil or shifting a torch. 
Since intelligent people are aware that it is difﬁcult to seek , they do not trouble themselves about that. 
Ignorant people are deluded and hope to gain the power to add oil or replace a torch. 
Therefore, they are anxious and restless. 
Moreover, trees, plants, and the ﬁve kinds of grains spring up on the earth by the vapor of yin and yang, and produce fruits and seeds when they mature. 
The fruits and seeds go back into the earth and are later reborn. 
This is compared to human beings, birds, beasts, and insects: all are born through the union of male and female. 
When they are born, they grow up; when they grow up, they become old; and when they are 173 old, they die. 
It is similar to the changes of the four seasons. 
To attempt to change its nature and seek to practice a peculiar way are done only by those who are deluded and who do not understand .” The Discourse on Why Śramaṇas Do Not Bow to the Sovereign by Dharma Teacher yuan 30a During the reign of Emperor Cheng and of Emperor Kang of the Jin dynasty, Chariot and Horse General Yu Bing had doubts about why śramaṇas treat the emperor as equal to themselves, without regard to formalities. 
clariﬁed the reason, and Cavalry General He responded to this.367 Later, in the Yuanxing era , Defender-inChief Lord Huan agreed with , but he thought that Yu’s argument was not complete. 
“Even though the Buddha’s ediﬁcation is endlessly vast and infers the world beyond the visual and aural senses, respect is considered to be its foundation. 
I assume that what they aspire for differ, but this does not mean that respect should be abolished. 
“In the Laozi , princes are considered equal to the three great elements, .368 When why they are considered so important, entirely lies in that they support to grow and to move smoothly. 
how could they be referred to be equal to the two polarities, only for the reason that sages are on the throne? 
[As the Book of Changes says,] ‘The great virtue of Heaven and Earth is called life.’369 to make life all over the country and arrange all things lies in sovereigns. 
Therefore, we respect the throne and we are gloriously courteous to it. 
The reason śramaṇas are born in succession and live with supports is also that they are every day under the government ordinance . 
How could it be that enjoy the virtue and abandon courtesy , or beneﬁt from kindness but reject paying respect to them?” At that time, many people of distinction both in and out of the government responded . 
Although their statements did not awaken of that time, they all made good points. 
generally consisted only of what these people expressed from their hearts, and truth was hidden by feelings. 
Consequently, this caused the supreme monk’s robes to be damaged by earthly affairs. 
The mind that brightly aspires gave way to human customs. 
It is sad! 
This is precisely a cause for the case that “[The world and the Way] were lost to each other”370 or the bad luck that happens every thousand years. 
I am deeply afraid that the Great Dharma is going to ruin, and I am impressed with that “Not to forget that previous lessons are .”371 Hence, I wrote a discourse of ﬁve sections, in which I actually expressed my humble intention. 
How could it be said that , which is as deep as a gully, needs [my humble statement that is as powerless as] the morning dew? 
Generally there are four different classes for those who have renounced the world: 
In propagating the teaching and educating the people, their achievement is equivalent to that of sovereigns, and their ediﬁcation concurrently takes the way of statecraft. 
Regarding the time to awaken people, there is no time not to do so (i.e., people may be awakened anytime), but according to the period [in which Buddhism] is encountered, go out or retreat . 
Therefore, following the rise and fall [of the world, the teaching] simply becomes evident or not evident. 
Let me brieﬂy mention here what among the issues can be discussed. 
Those who remain householders and respectfully perform the Dharma are the people who obey the ediﬁcation, whose feelings are no different from those of people in general, and whose lifestyle is the same as that of non-Buddhists. 
Accordingly, they have attachment to their families and relatives and offer courtesy to their rulers. 
Courtesy and respect lie in the foundation . Consequently, on the basis of [the foundation,] the teaching is established. 
When we the origin of we ﬁnd that the accomplishment is derived from the world of antiquity. 
Therefore “By teaching love on the basis of the feeling of intimacy” we cause the people to become aware that there is spontaneous kindness. 
One must inquire into their origins. 
Therefore, retribution for a sin is considered punishment, and makes people fear and exercise caution for their later . 
Heaven is considered to be a noble reward, and makes the people happy and has them perform acts for their later . 
These all clarify the teaching with the law of reward and retribution, just as the shadow [responds to the form] and the sound . 
This is because if one treats oneself generously to maintain his life, he sticks to the confrontation [between himself and others] and has confusion, a nuisance roots deeply, and he assuredly never misses maintaining his life. 
He is addicted to worldly pleasures, from which he is unable to escape by his own effort. 
Accordingly, for the teaching to restrict [sensual desires, the law of reward and retribution is expounded] and taken as the limit [of the teaching for lay Buddhists], and nothing more than this is clariﬁed. 
Since nothing more than this is clariﬁed , generally are very much the same in obeying the law . 
Therefore, it is impossible for them to receive the virtue [from their parents and the sovereign] and yet fail to show courtesy toward them, or to beneﬁt from the favor and yet reject paying respect to them. 
Consequently, who are delighted with the teaching style of Śākyamuni always ﬁrst admire their parents and respect their sovereign. 
When one abandons secular and takes the tonsure, he must await the orders and take action following [their orders]. 
If the sovereign and the parents have doubts about [his determination to abandon secular life], he should retreat, ask their intentions, and wait for the time when they have the same state of mind as his. 
This is precisely the reason why Buddhism values supporting daily lives and helps the sovereign educate in the way of administration. 
The purpose of statements made by the advocates appears to be the same . 
Therefore, I have posited the distinction between Buddhist clergy and laypeople in order to clarify the purpose regarding the three most revered people. 
I have brieﬂy narrated the tenor of Buddhist scriptures and pronounced my thoughts. 
The teaching for them is to master that afﬂiction is caused by having a body and that afﬂiction is ended through not preserving the body, to know that life after life is derived from receiving the principle of the mutation [of birth and death in the phenomenal world], and to seek the ultimate law of Nature through not following the principle of the mutation . 
Since they seek the ultimate law of Nature through not following the principle of the mutation , they do not value the support of [a sovereign who] manages the movement of . 
Since they bring an end to afﬂiction through not preserving the body, they do not esteem the advantage of welfare . 
This kind of person makes a vow for himself by taking the tonsure at the beginning, and shows in changing his ordinary clothes . 
Accordingly, in general all members of the clergy renounce the world in order to pursue their aspiration, and they become different from 177 secular people in order to realize their way. 
Since they become different from secular people, their clothing code must not be the same as the secular rule. 
Therefore, they are able to save secular people who are drowning in the deep stream , uproot their deep roots for numerous kalpas, profoundly lead to the ferry of the three vehicles, and open widely the passes to the realms of heavenly beings and human beings. 
If a person completes the virtue , the Buddhist Way diffuses over his family members of the six relations, and the beneﬁt spreads to all people. 
Even though are not placed in the rank of princes, is already compatible with the fundamental way the emperor rules over the world, and they can let the people be as they are. 
Consequently, while privately they oppose their family’s valuable [attachment to him and become a monk], they do not go against ﬁlial piety. 
While they may lack the courtesy of paying respect to the ruler in public, they are not impolite . 
Judging from this point of view, you know that if you go outside beyond the principle of the mutation in order to seek the ultimate law of Nature, the principles is profound and the signiﬁcance is great. 
It is clear that [the Confucian] benevolence spoken of , heaving a sigh, is insigniﬁcant in merit and of little beneﬁt. 
If that is the case, are still ashamed to hear the teaching of “those who are about to face toward Mount Ming”373 (i.e., those who aspire to the way of Laozi and Zhuangzi beyond the Confucian ethics) and turn back. 
How could be compared with those who follow the education and the wise men who receive a stipend without rendering any service, and be the same as them in regard to showing ﬁlial piety and respect [for their parents and the sovereign]? 
“When we look to Laozi’s thought, we ﬁnd he means that Heaven and Earth are considered to be great because of their attainment of the One ; princes and kings are considered to be noble since they master to follow ;374 since attain the One, they are the foundation of myriad changes; and since master to follow , they have the function of leading the movement of Heaven and Earth. 
If this is so, to clarify the ultimate law of Nature must lie in mastering the root . 
To master the root must be due to following the principle of the mutation [of birth and death in the phenomenal world]. 
Therefore, wise people of former times thought that is good. 
It is impossible that many other theories differ from this. 
If a theory that differs from these many theories is established, it is unworthy of serious consideration. 
Even though a large number of individuals are multifarious and there is a difference between the exquisite and the coarse, generally speaking, in the long run they are simply divided into those who have a mental function and those who do not. 
Those who have give rise to a feeling for change, and those who have no feeling for change. 
Since they do not have a feeling for change, when the change ends, their life is completed. 
those who give rise to a feeling for change respond to things and are moved. 
Since this movement must be caused by the feeling, their life does not cease. 
Since their life does not cease, the change becomes broader, the form goes through [the transmigration of birth and death] more and more, the feeling is more pent-up, and the afﬂiction gets deeper. 
“Therefore, a sutra states, ‘Nirvana is the state of no change. 
The three realms of existence are the state of ﬂowing motion. Thereby, they are places full of sin and suffering.’ When the change comes to an end, causes and conditions cease eternally. 
When is in ﬂowing motion, we receive suffering forever. 
How can this be clariﬁed? 
When give rise to a feeling for change, 179 the spirit is tied to its foundation, and the intelligence becomes dull. 
When is ﬁrmly blocked , one tries to preserve only himself and gets involved only in the state of motion. 
Then the reins of mental function lose control, the path to birth and death is daily opened, and one just follows greed and clinging in the long ﬂow . 
“Consequently, those who turn back to the origin and seek the ultimate law of Nature do not toil their spirits with life. 
Those who transcend the mundane world do not trouble their life with feelings. 
If we do not trouble our life with feelings, it is possible to sever birth and death. 
If we do not trouble our spirits with life, it is possible that the spirit profoundly unites with . 
Since the spirit profoundly unites with the transcendental world, it is called nirvana. 
Even though Heaven and Earth are great for producing and raising all things, they cannot make living creatures immortal. 
Although princes and kings consider causing all beings to survive to be their achievement, they cannot cause them all to be free of afﬂiction. 
Therefore, in the previous discussion I said, ‘[The teaching for Buddhist monks is] to master that afﬂiction is caused by having a body and that afﬂiction is ended through not preserving the body, to know that [the operation of] life after life is derived from receiving the principle of the mutation , and to seek the ultimate law of Nature through not following the principle of the mutation [of birth and death].’ The meaning lies in this. 
Since the meaning lies herein, this is why śramaṇas treat sovereigns as equal, without regard to formalities; they exalt their tasks, they are not graced with a title of nobility from princes and kings, and yet they beneﬁt from the kindness of .” Section Four: 
“Looking at all previous histories, from the time of the earlier emperors on, those who occupy the throne and are united with the fundamental ways do not necessarily differ from each other in the original base. 
Since the original base cannot be dual, through all the generations ceremonial forms are the same and the system is consistent. 
It is ‘Only Heaven is great and Yao solely modeled after it.’375 If it is like this, it is not the case that the wisdom has nothing to illuminate, and there is nothing else that can be illuminated. 
Inferring from this, beyond what we see and hear is empty; there is nothing to ascertain about it. 
Since there is nothing to ascertain in reason , it can be clear what are the ultimate law of Nature and the ultimate Way . 
Today, all śramaṇas do not understand the meaning beyond writings, and they are puzzled about purpose that is beyond the teaching. 
“The mysterious ultimate law of Nature is vast and remote. The Way of the Spirit is profound. 
It can be sought with principles, but it is difﬁcult to cross-examine with phenomenal facts. 
Once [the Way of the Spirit] is established as a teaching, the teaching aims at following the fashion of the day. 
The capacity according to varies between superiority and inferiority, but regarding [the fact that the teaching] completes all things, it lies in using the function of human receptivity of mysterious responsive activity, conforming to people’s minds, and leading their endowments. 
When their endowments reach the utmost limits, ‘the knowledge stops at what it does not know’376 and does not participate in more than that. 
“If this is so, it is not that those who have mastered the ultimate Way do not comprehend both ; they comprehend both, but they simply cannot manage both simultaneously. 
“As for the statement , ‘Outside the six conjunctions (i.e., the limits of the world of humans, literally, the four cardinal directions plus zenith and nadir), keeps it in mind, but does not discuss ,’378 this does not mean that it is impossible to discuss it but that if [the sage] dares to discuss it, he may be at variance . 
The statement ‘The spring and autumn manages the affairs of the former kings’ designs. debates these but does not criticize them’ does not mean that cannot criticize them, but that if he criticizes he may to be confused. 
These three manners (i.e., not discussing, not debating, and not criticizing) are all based on the fact that our visual-auditory senses are limited and place restrictions on our behaviors, and do not get involved in the world beyond our visual-auditory senses. 
If we seek the sage’s purport on this basis, the ways inside and outside [the limits of the world of humans] can be united and clariﬁed. 
“I always think that the Buddhist and Confucian teachings, and that the Tathāgata and Yao and Confucius secretly have a close relationship with each other even though they differ from each other in establishing their teaching. 
Debating it in detail, we will be able to see a main theme [that the two ways are the same]. 
In reason, there may be those that are united at the beginning and separate later, and those that are separate at the beginning and become united later. 
Those that are ﬁrst united and later separate are none other than all buddhas and tathāgatas, while those who are ﬁrst separate and later united are successive sovereigns who have not mastered the ultimate Way; they are in the group. 
“Why is this made clear? 
A sutra says, ‘The Buddha mastered the spontaneous, marvelous Dharma. 
Following the revealed world extensively, he becomes an immortal, the wheel-turning noble king, a high-ranking ofﬁcial, a minister, the most reverend priest, or a monk. 
As these, he transforms and manifests himself everywhere. 
No one among all the kings and virtuous men knows who he is.’379 This case is that of the so-called one that is ﬁrst united and later separate. 
“On the other hand, there are who began a great enterprise but have not yet achieved the meritorious education. 
Since the form varies, what receive is uneven. 
Some expect achievement after death, or some have the testimony that responds to revealed in their lifetimes. 
Among sage kings, those who have accomplished the teaching based on are countless. 
Even though is that of the stick and carrot and has no set rules, their goals must converge. 
This case is that of the so-called ones that are ﬁrst separate and later united. 
“If are now separate and later united, those who intend to walk on a road leading everywhere will assuredly not limit themselves to only one passage. 
If are united now and later separate, it can be certainly known that the conclusive point of Śākyamuni and that of Yao and Confucius are no different from each other. 
Hence, if we seek uniﬁcation from separation, we will know that must arrive at the same truth. 
Those who only look at phenomena, however, do not understand that both are one. 
Therefore, they are merely confused by the many ways and surprised by their differences. 
“Observing on this basis, the merit of the way of Heaven and Earth is nothing more than operating and producing and nourishing [all things]. 
The virtue of emperors and kings is nothing more than following the way and helping it in nourishing and leading . 
If we compare them (i.e., the merit of the way of Heaven and Earth and the virtue of emperors and kings) with , the singularly transcendent teaching and the immutable religion, it is already clear that it is doubtlessly impossible to talk about its superiority and inferiority in the same breath.” Section Five: 
Hence, those who want 183 to reach the utmost supremacy must go against the mutation [of birth and death] and seek the ultimate law of Nature. 
Since in order to seek the ultimate law of Nature one does not go through following the mutation [of birth and death], you refer to successive sovereigns and equate with Buddhism, and take the one who has mastered the utmost supremacy to be a sovereign who rules with expedients. 
This is what your discussion entails. 
You must believe that it is the Great Pervader.380 When I inquire whether or not this conforms to reality, it is not so in reason. 
A person receiving the vapor , which lasts only for his lifetime. 
When his life comes to an end, he will vanish and return to nothing. 
Even though ‘the spirit is the most mysterious of a myriad of things,’381 this is originally just what yin and yang transform into. 
‘By a transformation a person is born. 
By another transformation a person dies.’382 Since is collected, there is a beginning; when it is dispersed, there is an end. 
“Inferring from this basis, it is assuredly known that spirit and body altogether transform, they are originally not in different lines from each other, the exquisite and the coarse are the same, and are one unit from beginning to end. 
When the body is complete, the vapor is collected and the spirit comes to exist. 
When the body is destroyed, the vapor is dispersed and the function [of the spirit] extinguishes. 
When the function [of the spirit] is extinguished, it returns and becomes nothing. 
What else could do this? 
If are fundamentally different from each other, these two different kinds of vapor are united in the law . 
In addition, the spirit that dwells in the body is compared to a ﬁre that burns wood. 
When is destroyed, must be extinguished. 
When the body is broken up, the spirit is dispersed, as it no longer has to rely on. 
When the the wood is lost, the ﬁre goes out, as it no longer has to rely on. 
It stands to reason. 
“Even if it is difﬁcult to distinguish and clarify whether or not [spirit and body] are homogeneous, it can be said that existence and nonexistence are certainly due to the collection and dispersion . 
The phrase ‘collection and dispersion’ is the general term for the change of the vapor , and for birth and death of myriad transformations. 
Accordingly, the Zhuangzi says: 
‘Human life is due to the collection of the vapor. 
When is collected, there is life. 
When it is dispersed, there is death. 
If death and life are in the same category, what is there to worry about?’383 The ancients who were good at speaking of the Way must have the idea [that life and death are due to the collection and dispersion of the vapor]. 
If that is so, the highest truth terminates in one’s lifetime. 
“Whatever can the spirit be? 
Since it is the highest exquisiteness, it cannot be illustrated with the symbols . 
For that reason, sages call it ‘the most subtle .’ Even the most intelligent person cannot deﬁne its form and cannot trace the very source of its profound purpose. 
Nevertheless, you, the speaker, have doubts based on general knowledge, join many others , and make yourself confused. 
Your false accusation is already serious. 
You intend to talk about . 
This is to speak of an unspeakable matter. 
Here, within unspeakableness, I would like to draw an outline of it for you. 
“The spirit perfectly complies with , being free from anything, and it is extremely mysterious and indescribable. 
It is moved by objects, but since it is not a thing, when the thing changes is not extinguished [along with the thing]. 
Since we have feelings, we can be moved by objects. 
Since we have consciousness, we can seek with the law. 
Hence, the nature varies. 
In intelligence there are sharp and dull. 
Therefore, the function varies. 
“Carrying out the discussion inferring from this point of view (i.e., that feeling and consciousness form the phenomenal world), it is known that the 185 mutation is affected by feeling, and the spirit is transmitted by the mutation . 
Feeling is the mother of the mutation . 
Spirit is the root of feeling. 
For feeling there is the law of encountering objects, while for spirit there is the function of moving into the unseen world. 
The ancients who discussed the Way did not come to agreement . Let me cite and clarify the matter. 
“Zhuangzi, in the chapter on the ‘Great and Most Honored Master’ , pronounces profoundly that ‘the great mass [of Nature] gives us life so that we toil, and grants us death so that we can rest.’384 Moreover, he says, ‘Life is considered as being a human. 
Death is to return to the truth.’385 This is, as they say, to know that life is a great calamity and non-life is considered as returning to the origin. 
Wenzi quotes the words of the Yellow Emperor, ‘Although the body is dispersed, the spirit does not change itself. 
Based on the fact that it does not change itself, takes advantage of change . 
Therefore, its change is boundless.’386 “Zhuangzi furthermore says, ‘When we take only the body of a human being , we still have joy. 
This body undergoes myriad changes endlessly.’387 These words are, as they say, to know that human life is not exhausted only in one mutation , but follows [the changes of various] things and never returns . 
“You, the disputant, have not examined theory that ‘birth and death simultaneously exist side by side,’388 and you are deluded by the idea that is collected and dispersed just in one mutation . 
You do not think that in the Way of the Spirit there exist numinous beings that are more mysterious than anything else, and you say that the exquisite vapor and the coarse vapor are equally exhausted. 
How sad would this be? 
“The metaphor of ﬁre and wood is originally derived from a sacred scripture. 
Since its transmission was lost, the deep purport has not been investigated, and the subtle words thereupon sank into a secular teaching. 
It causes you to avail yourself of it, and yet to have doubt. 
“If until now there was no chance for a leader who was awakened to the ultimate law of Nature, we would not know that there was a pioneer who had insight into this law, and the function that transmigrates in the unseen world would never reach until the end of their lives. 
When feeling and consciousness move each other389 the mutation , which is endless. 
“That a ﬁre is passed on to ﬁrewood is similar to the spirit transmigrating to the body. 
The former body is different from the latter, so we realize the profound response between feeling and consciousness. 
Deluded people, see the body decay in one existence and then they think that the spirit, feeling, die together with . 
“Now, as you say in the discussion, if spirit and body altogether transform , then begins from the original place of Heaven, and one’s disposition of being dull or intelligent is the same as the natural endowments he receives . 
If he receives it in the body, [since the disposition of being dull or intelligent is an attribute of the spirit,] everyone who has a body would all change and become spirit. 
If he receives it in the spirit, [since the spirit is 187 not exhausted,] it would be passed on from spirit to spirit. 
[If this were the case,] then the Danzhu would have been as holy as [his father,] Emperor Yao, and Zhonghua would have had as a function of a spirit as Gusou. 
If it is impossible, we assuredly know that the unseen condition was apparently established in the long-distant past, and the distinction of being intelligent or dull is destined before the body . 
Although the marvelous lathe (i.e., the movement of Nature) revolves well, it still cannot change the character of Nature, not to mention that of are more humble than . 
If we examine logically, it is sublime language and has a veriﬁcation. 
We all gathered at the Dharma hall. 
One day, when I tried to study it again I found there is a certain point that I do not understand thoroughly. 
You think that the śramaṇas’ system of deportment is a special regulation that differs from the secular system, and which is an excellent tool for those who cultivate the Way; therefore, they certainly should omit making perfunctory respect to their sovereigns and parents. 
“My present question is this: 
The reward and retribution for the next existence is profound and has not appeared responding to [what one does in this existence]. 
Nevertheless, they cause princes to offer [various things to them] and nobles who believe to kneel down [to worship them]. 
Shouldn’t they be censured for receiving kindness from others for doing nothing and being too hasty? 
Should they not be chastised for beneﬁting from others’ favors in vain, just like a parasite?” I, the host, answered after awhile, “Let me take an example from familiar matters for you, all wise people. 
suppose here is someone who, in order to announce an order he had received from the of that time, is traveling to a remote place where the customs are different and where he needs nine different translators . 
The question is whether or not the king must provide him provisions and bestow upon him a carriage and clothes.” replied, “Yes, he must do so.” I said, “We can discover the case from this example. 
What kind of person is called a śramaṇa? 
They are those who uncover the obscurity and confusion that cover common people, who open the profound path to the world beyond the mutation , who together with the people of the world follow the way of ‘forgetting both ,’391 who cause those who wish for loftiness to take the custom handed down , and who have those who rinse their mouths in a stream taste its surplus drops. 
If they are so, even though the great achievement has not yet been accomplished, when we see the trace of their superb footsteps, what we realize will indeed be magnanimous. 
Needless to say, do not match toil to practice the three kinds of acts . 
In addition, although these people need their bodies, they feel no inclination toward secular matters. 
They consider that to receive offerings of the four things (clothing, food, shelter, and medicine) is just as if a horseﬂy or a mosquito were to ﬂy in front of them. 
Then they were happy, their minds at peace, and they all left, exclaiming. 
This was the third year of the Yuanxing era of the Jin dynasty , the year of efeng.392 At that time, Emperor ﬂed from the capital and the people were all anxious . 
Consequently, based on , I set forth this discourse. 
The Discourse on the Śramaṇa’s Robe Worn with a Bared Shoulder by Dharma Teacher yuan Someone asked, “The śramaṇa’s robe that shows a bared right shoulder is derived from the Buddha’s teaching. 
Does it conform with decorum?” I answered, “Yes, it does.” He asked , “The three dynasties had different systems from each other and the decorum of each was not the same; simple and embellished. 
These changes are detailed in ancient books, but Buddhism is excluded from those . 
All the debaters have doubts about this. 
Since the three kings (i.e., King Yu of Xia, King Tang of Yin, and King Wu of Zhou) appeared in the world , changed in accordance with the times. 
Seen from this basis, what you, the debaters, maintain is simply the word regulated in the secular world . 
How do I know this is so? 
Since the people there have been without changes, their way has not been ruined. 
“The Buddha rose in the world and based on he established the teaching. 
He clariﬁed that since are not evil they should bare the right shoulder. 
Why is this? 
It is because the noble and the humble must be distinguished in their ranking; if virtuous ones are promoted by a high rank, the mind to uphold the virtuous ones will arise. 
Therefore, śramaṇas go beyond fame and rank in order to cast away the times. 
They withdraw and never desire to take the initiative . 
“Moreover, people are generally right-handed. 
If we do not follow in doing something, we will have difﬁculties in everything. 
If we commit a blunder, although we may try to recover, it is not easy even for the middle level of wise people , not to speak of those who are below this level. 
Let me try to explain this. 
“The body consists of right and left, and the function of principles consists of right and wrong. 
To make up these two issues (i.e., right and left in the body and right and wrong in principles), each one avails itself of the foundation. 
If the foundation is blocked and is not uprooted, responds more and more to the demands of the phenomenal world. 
Accordingly, if the body and principles help each other, the way will be subtle and clear. 
if the customs of the world do not change, to respond to the subtle is difﬁcult to manage. 
Once a robe with one shoulder bared is made known, we will follow the practice in the body, be moved with the principles, and comprehend it in the mind. 
Thus, we control the vapor of following [the nature] and show the form of sincerity. 
“Hence, by wearing a robe with one shoulder bared, the World-honored One consolidated sincerity and shut off evil; he made the name and reality well matched, and he caused reverence and laxity to not mix with each other. 
Later he opened the path to seek . 
He leads those who have been deluded for a long time to the true nature, he causes the wise who are stranded in the world to not despair by thinking that they have no hope , and he causes those who hope to advance to not turn back by being deluded in the path. 
“If we act in this way, our feeling is ediﬁed, we earnestly approach [the Buddhist Way], and we do not tire of practicing . 
Our acts must follow , and our appearance unconsciously becomes respectful. 
This is indeed the external cause that the Tathāgata invites [people to Buddhism] and his wonderful method to teach ordinary people and to lead . 
Nevertheless, many debaters have not been instructed , and some people want to eliminate . 
How serious this problem is!” A Criticism by He , Zhennan I received your response to my question regarding the monk’s robe with one shoulder bared. 
You connect the simplicity with primitive times, take the body and principles from familiar matters, distinguish respect from laxity, and completely explain both sincerity and clothing. 
Hence, there are inside and outside in the phenomenal world, and then can be established roughly or minutely according to them. 
Regarding Li , Śākyamuni, the Duke of Zhou, and Confucius, there are those who live in the secular world and those who leave the secular world behind. 
They are not the same in following their traditions, but it is clear that there is no difference between one who goes against and one who follows it. 
Therefore, Laozi clariﬁes to make much use of the right side in military honors and unfortunate rites,394 and in the Book of Rites it is instituted not to use the left in funeral rites.395 Moreover, the four immeasurable minds thoroughly refer to the most sincere mind to respect one’s parents, and the method of hunting called sanqu (i.e., driving game from three directions, leaving one side open for some to escape) shows the benevolence of the king’s acts.396 When we examine in later ages, the purpose [of those events] can be seen. 
Would we rather entrust the utmost way of following to inauspicious incidents, and show the auspicious sincerity in funeral rites? 
The reason that Zheng state stripped off the upper garment is similar to the reason that Xi of Xu loaded a cofﬁn on his carriage [to meet the king of Chu state].397 All these because they thought that if what they availed themselves of went against , they would assuredly receive an unexpected punishment. 
Testifying from this, where does following exist? 
Therefore, I act in accordance with what I have in my mind, hoping you will explain more thoroughly and cause the inside and the outside to be united into one. 
Dharma Teacher yuan’s Response I respectfully inquired into the purpose of your question. 
I always think that in the teaching of the Way and the teaching on social relationships , or in Śākyamuni, the Duke of Zhou, and Confucius, although the method of establishing their teachings differs they secretly have a close relationship with each other. 
The trace of the wonderful , however, is hidden in daily use. 
Consequently, words of utmost were blocked 193 by scriptures of worldly teaching, and this caused those who speak [of Buddhism and Confucianism] to regard them as separate from each other. 
The reason I know this is so is that sages teach based on the idea of “ﬁshing and shooting [at game excepting those in nests].”398 to remove the extremities , to lessen taking excessive catches by hunting in accordance with the four seasons, to not be stingy by letting some animals escape through the politeness of the method of hunting called sanqu, and to be sure to wait until have grown to maturity before [ﬁshing for them and hunting] them with nets. 
is thorough, to benevolence for the grass at the roadside in remote ages. 
Its tenor is a match for Śākyamuni’s compassion. 
If we think [everything that exists] in the world is equal to us and if we see ourselves as the same as others, ﬁlls the arms and the ﬁne hair of an animal are the same. 
Would there be a difference between superior and inferior, or would they not be all of a sort? 
Accordingly, [in the Chinese sages’ teaching] we progress in virtue along with , and make our duties clear for our superiors and parents. 
The teachings in Buddhism and Confucianism can be understood from this viewpoint. 
The Chinese sages’ intention can be known. 
Therefore, I would like to examine and express again my long-cherished thoughts. 
When we seek how one takes a body that goes through changes, [we ﬁnd that the body] is molded by yin and yang and we receive a body that consists of a right side and a left side. 
With the shift of day and night, [the change of] life and death is explained. 
In human feelings, everyone is delighted with living and afraid of dying, and everyone is fond of advancing but detests retreating. 
For this reason, former monarchs followed the people’s nature. 
Comforming to the nature they distinguished the system for auspicious from that for inauspicious , and set up different positions: the left and the right. 
Hence, on auspicious occasions the left is esteemed, one is promoted in the peerage, and he lives in comfort; while on inauspicious occasions the right is honored, and one expresses grief in order to dissolve the nature . 
These are all based on what we receive . 
We follow it in order to understand the teaching thoroughly, respond to the changes of the times, and recollect the virtue of our predecessors. 
What people of the world value is nothing more than survival. 
[The concept that “The system of decorum and clothing can be established] roughly or minutely according to lies here. 
Śramaṇas are not like this. 
They put their own persons last, withdraw , and yet do not detest being humble. 
If the time is not for them, they are resigned to the humble position. 
To govern oneself by being in the humble position is called modesty. 
To stay in the low place which many people dislike is called obedience. 
If we do not lose modesty and obedience as the base, it is easy to accumulate the merit of “reducing day by day ,”399 and it is possible to ﬁnd joy on the path to escape from and to attain . 
Hence, lives in seclusion, forgets glory, and conducts himself contrary to the secular world. 
Those who conduct themelves contrary to the secular world are different in reality from wise people who live in the world of ethical education, even though they may resemble each other in appearance. 
How can I clarify this? 
Generally speaking, those who have renounced the world understand thoroughly that suffering is caused by having a physical body and it can be stopped by not keeping the body. 
They know that [the endless succession of] life after life is derived from receiving the mutation , and they can seek the ultimate law of Nature by not following that mutation. 
Inferring from this point, we certainly know that those who aspire to the ultimate stage do not trouble their spirit by living, and those 195 who are far beyond worldly affairs do not trouble their life by feelings. 
If we do not trouble our life by feelings, life can be cut off. 
In that case, regarding the establishment of ceremonies for auspicious and inauspicious occasions, admiring parents, and serving a monarch, as mentioned above, these are probably just statements for a limited world. 
They are what “have not been out from the closed world from the beginning.”400 If we do not go out of the closed world, we will just play with our writings and will not thoroughly understand the change. 
If that is the case, just remain in Confucianism and lose themselves in their lives; they avail themselves of myriad changes and go against the ultimate law of Nature. 
Seen from the position of utmost obedience, couldn’t it be said that this is contrary to ? 
“In Buddhist scriptures, the destruction of life is considered to be a grave offense; will be punished in Hell; retribution meted out by the ofﬁcials of Hell according to the laws of Hell is just as a shadow or a sound [responds to its voice]. 
I have a doubt about this. 
The substances of the four great elements are merely earth, water, ﬁre, and wind. 
They gather together and result in a physical body, in which the spirit dwells, life lodges, and the mental function settles. 
Certainly [unlike the body] there is no situation in which gets injured. 
When is destroyed, there is no harm to the spirit at all. 
is simply as if the water and ﬁre between Heaven and Earth were destroyed.” Second question: 
“In the mind of all people, affection and desire are luxuriant, there is just the self, and emotion and anxieties are deep. 
If a person’s reward or retribution is brought about based on feelings, and if, based on affections of the mind, a response is produced, in what does the reason of following nature have its foundation?” Answer: 
“I think these two issues are a key point of your questions and the pivot of your argument. 
If the pivot is cleared, myriad doubts will be dispelled in the same way. 
It can be said that you clarify stagnant feelings in the realm beyond common knowledge and offer unexplored wonderful advocacy. 
Nevertheless, Buddhism is deep and profound. It is hard to talk about its subtle language. 
If we do not the fundamental purport wholly, how can we speak of its profound purpose? 
“If the fundamental reason why human beings receive a body is clariﬁed through inferring from the nature of the four great elements, ‘they borrow different substances, and pretend that the common form of the body is composed of them.’401 Life is just like a particle of dust that is easily brushed away. 
So, if we take advantage of the movement, the coming and going, of nature, even though gather together or scatter , this has nothing to do with the self. 
a large number of bodies temporarily dwelling in a great dream,402 they are actually in the realm of existence, but it is the same as if they were in the realm of nonexistence. 
“If one comprehends this reason in one’s mind and yet other people have not understood it, he feels sad about the fact that he alone has attained the truth without having achieved ; he is grateful to have become awakened before others and gives rise to the thought [of leading others to Buddhism]. 
If both others and 197 myself attain equally, there is no opposition in our minds. 
Then, when we freely wield a sword, we will unite ourselves [with the Buddhist Way] and observe with the tranquil mind; even when we engage in battle, all whom we encounter are friends [since we have no opposition in our minds]. 
“This is exactly when Mañjuśrī placed his hand on a sword403— the action is wrong, but the principle is right— and although he brandished his weapon all day long, there was no place to catch the sword. 
Why are sin and punishment brought into question? 
If we return to this point (i.e., that those who realize the Way go beyond reward or retribution), and look for the fundamental , then we will be able to clarify reward and retribution . 
If we analyze from the phenomenal world and seek the ultimate law of Nature, then we will be able to discuss sin and punishment . 
I will try to explain this more. 
Ignorance is an abyss of delusion. 
Greed and attachment is a mansion of numerous sufferings. 
When these two work together, supernatural effects occur in the unseen world. 
Since greed and attachment wash away nature, the four great elements unite and form a physical body. 
When feelings stick to , there is subjective between good and evil. 
When there is subjective between good and evil, we feel a persistent attachment to life, and birth never ceases. 
Thereafter, we sleep soundly in a great dream, we are confused in the midst of delusions, we suffer doubts in the long night of spiritual darkness, and we cling to whatever exists. 
Therefore, loss and gain come alternately, and weal and woe visit us one after another. 
For accumulated evils, disasters spontaneously come from Heaven; for committed sins, punishments in Hell. 
This is precisely an inevitable destiny, and it leaves no room for doubt. 
“Why is this so? 
There is the foundation to understand it; that is to say, in the law spontaneously cope with each other in the unseen world. 
Even though its sign is obscure, when its force reaches an extreme point it becomes evident. 
Consequently, good and evil in the mind are considered to be a form and a voice, and happiness and suffering as reward and retribution are considered to be the shadow and the sound . 
The foundation is moved by feelings, and then the response spontaneously arises. 
Would there be ofﬁcials of Hell? It is because mismanage and lose the way. 
What achievement would even a Creator of the Universe have ? 
In the purpose of your criticism, you completely agree that earth, water, ﬁre, and wind unite and form a physical body, which is taken as a dwelling of the spirit. 
This precisely means that there is a master in the house. 
If your answer is no, he does not, the uniting of the four great elements is not due to the master of the house having been moved. 
If lives without feelings, since is not derived from the result of the master having been moved, even if the spirit dwells in a physical body he has no feeling and no perception, such as 34a pain or an itch. 
If the spirit has no perception and the house has no pain or itchiness, either, when it makes contact with other things, is like mowing grass or cutting trees. 
“If has feelings, the uniting of the four great elements is due to the fact that the master was moved . 
If stays with feelings, since is due to the fact that he was moved, while the spirit dwells in the house it must have perception of pain or itchiness. 
The spirit has perception and the house feels pain and itchiness as well. 
When it makes contact with other things, it certainly cannot be the same as water and ﬁre in the realm of nature. 
“Speaking from this basis, spirit and body differ from each other, but they change together. 
They really differ from each other in the fact that [the spirit] is inside and is outside, but they are joined together. 
Except for those who reach the point of view , who could discern the relation between ? 
If one cannot discern this, simply the more time passes, the more deluded he will be. 
If the root of the blockage is not pulled out, the way to continue to exist will become ﬁrmer. 
If the origin of the persistent attachment is not removed, to maintain will become deeper as well. 
“In the case where a thing goes athwart , the mind becomes deranged; not to mention the case where the whole body is totally lost. 
Even if one has exhausted happiness, receives annoyance, and has no regret in the mind, since a form and a voice (i.e., one’s acts) are set forth, their shadow and sound spontaneously manifest. 
There is nothing ﬁxed beforehand in reason, but the laws come together and make it so. 
Even though we want to escape from it, how can we do so? 
This is exactly to invite reward and retribution in accordance with feelings, or to produce responses by availing oneself of being moved. 
fundamentally differ from each other in the purpose of our arguments. 
Therefore, we are simply not the same in understanding .” Question: 
“If, since people’s feelings cling to life and cannot cause death, then that feelings are brought into existence is simply derived from the delusion of egoistic attachment. 
Could it be possible, to conform to delusion and consider as the object of retribution?” Answer: 
“That phenomena arise is indeed derived from the mind. 
Retribution must be derived from the phenomena [that are derived from the mind]. 
Hence, if we observe phenomena through retribution, the phenomena can be changed. 
Inferring from this point of view, we know that the Sage clariﬁes the object of retribution based on delusion and obstruction; it is not to conform to delusion and consider as the object of retribution, . 
Why is this so? 
It is difﬁcult for people to be awakened and has indeed existed for a long time.407 For this reason, in Buddhism, on the basis of what it is derived from, the teaching is certainly given little by little. 
Since [the Buddha] knows that longtime habits cannot be given up immediately, he ﬁrst teaches that evil acts and meritorious deeds. 
evil acts and meritorious deeds cannot be totally forgotten. 
Therefore, he has weigh the value [of retribution and reward]. 
If they assess which is valuable, meritorious deeds or evil acts, they examine good and evil and place their mind . 
If [they know] good and evil are blocked by egoistic attachment, they [abandon the egoistic attachment], and advance the ego a step further in order to lead other people to . 
If these two issues (i.e., examining good and evil and advancing the ego a step further in order to lead others to salvation) are concurrently developed, nothing binds the feelings. 
Accordingly, we will be able to ‘honor the talented and virtuous, bear with all people,’408 be benevolent to ourselves, give peace , and ponder far ahead the reward and retribution that are like shadow and sound, in order to relieve ourselves from the delusive realm of transmigration of birth and death. 
Once delusive feelings 34b are dispelled, later words about the right path can be understood, and the deﬁlement to maintain life can be cut off. 
Since even wise people of the middle class cannot cut off the deﬁlement to maintain life, how would people of ordinary intelligence be able to accomplish this?” The Discourse on Three Periods of Reward and Retribution , Composed for Those Who Doubt That There is No Testimony Corresponding to Good or Bad Conduct, by Dharma Teacher yuan It is stated in a Buddhist scripture that there are three different periods in which actions mature and bring about , reward or retribution: 
the ﬁrst is reward or retribution of the present existence, the second is that of the next existence, and the last is that of an existence after the next. 
The reward or retribution of the present existence refers to that for a good or evil begun in one’s present life, is given to him in the present existence. 
The reward or retribution of the next existence refers to that [for a good or evil act begun in one’s present life, reward or retribution] is given in one’s next existence. 
The reward or retribution of an existence after the next refers to that [for a good or evil act begun in one’s present life, reward or retribution] is given after the second, the third, the hundredth, or the thousandth existence from the present existence. 
There is no subject that receives [reward or retribution other than the mind]; receiving must be due to the mind. 
The mind has no ﬁxed task; it is moved by phenomena and responds to them. 
Since in its response there is , fast and slow, reward or retribution comes early or later. 
Even though there is variation in the time of its occurrence, following what the mind encounters, all reward and retribution respond to it. 
Since there is variation in the strength of response [of reward or retribution], are not the same in relative gravity. 
This is exactly natural reward and punishment, and the outline of the three periods of reward or retribution. 
Unless people have the all-around talent, intelligence, and brightness to reach the essential point , it is rare to be able to enter the gate . 
Let me try to discuss it. 
Good and evil arise through being gradually fostered . 
When they are gradually reach an extreme, [they become evident]. There is theory on the nine grades of . 
Generally, what is included in the nine grades is not what reward or retribution of the present existence regulates. 
In that case, it can be known that reward or retribution of the present existence is beyond the ordinary classiﬁcation, and the classiﬁcations other than the nine grades are not what the three periods of reward or retribution regulate. 
Why is this so? 
If advantages and disadvantages intersect in front of one’s eyes and suddenly a dispute arises between them, the mechanics of the spirit spontaneously move and take action before thinking. 
If it takes action before thinking, reward or retribution responds to immediately. 
This is one example of reward or retribution of the present existence that is beyond the theory of the nine grades. 
Moreover, the three kinds of acts are different from each other in essence, but the same in regard to having ﬁxed . 
Since reward or retribution is ﬁxed, people must receive them when the time comes. 
This is not something we can remove by prayer or avoid through intellectual power. 
When we infer and investigate this thoroughly, the signiﬁcance is deep and the law is extensive. 
Through this, those who participate in Buddhism will be able to understand . 
There are people in the world who encounter misfortunes even though they accumulate good deeds, and there are people who do evil deeds and yet are happy. 
These are all cases in which the reward or retribution of the present existence has not yet come and the response to actions one took in a previous existence has begun to manifest. 
Therefore, it is said that a person of a good 34c omen encounters a disaster, while someone of an unlucky omen meets happiness. 
A suspicion regarding the ambiguous issue arises here. 
Why is this so? 
There are those who intend to lend a helping hand to the monarch, aid the conditions of the times, save other people, model themselves after the lofty traces , and make up their minds to render a achievement, and yet who collapse in the middle of a great enterprise and are suddenly visited by heavenly disasters; or there are those who live leisurely in a gate made out of only one beam, who have no attachment to the secular world, who consider a peaceful walk to be a carriage, who live in comfort, and yet who encounter an undesirable fate unexpectedly when the destined time comes, who come to associate with and fall into secular ways and secular customs, and who become accustomed to ; or there are those whose names are known to be among the top of the four subjects (i.e., virtuous principles and practice, ability of speech, administrative talents, and literary acquirements) , who have mastered the heart of the Way, who have perfect love, who have realized benevolence, and who develop virtue through cherishing the highest wholesomeness. 
These are all cases in which people encountered misfortune while they were achieving merit or virtue, and this causes to doubt . 
Since the fundamental reason is clear, we should examine the responses. 
Each response has its base , which moves by . 
The reason for this is that the situation in which stands close to is lurking behind , was settled a very long time ago, and the auspicious omen declared in the unseen world secretly keeps recurring. 
Therefore, the vapor of happiness and the vapor of misfortune alternately shift, while the six realms of existence. Reward and retribution for good or evil acts appear to be very disordered, but they work simultaneously. 
This causes both the ignorant and the wise to be equally confused when the response manifests as phenomena; to think that even though they accumulate good deeds there is no blessing, or if they accumulate evil deeds there is no misfortune; to be moved by the gods and yet grieve at misfortune; and to lament that a heavenly disaster befalls a good person. 
All think that Confucianism covers everything completely and there is no ultimate law of Nature above it, and consequently this causes the Great Way to become obscured by the minor way. 
If we consider the correct words to be good guidance and seek the true responding to the mind, we must arrive at that there is no such case in the law of Nature. 
When we trace back to what causes it, according to secular books is considered to be concerned with a single lifetime; anything beyond is not clariﬁed. 
Since beyond has not been clariﬁed, people who seek the law of Nature limit it to within [the sensual world] where they can see and hear. 
This is because monarchs of former times conformed to the people’s minds, understood their temperaments, and took ears and eyes to be within a boundary, . 
If we now combine the way for outside and the way for inside and seek the intention to propagate their teachings, we will know that must be the same in the ultimate law, and we will not be confused by many different paths and frightened at the differences between them. 
If we can look into the three periods of reward and retribution and view the distinction between those who are distressed and those who go smoothly, it will be entirely understandable why Confucius did not answer Zhong You’s [question about serving spirits] and Yan and Ran were like ignorant people when they faced their sage teacher .410 It is also because there is the law of dependent arising from causation and the law of existence arising from causation . 
Even though they were bright enough to be ready to enter the truth , they still did not forget benevolence bequeathed by [monarchs of former times], and they still considered the three periods of reward and retribution to be a beautiful garden; or they made rapid progress [to the lofty state of the mind] and yet did not leave behind the abyss (i.e., the realm of the three periods of reward and retribution). 
From the viewpoint of inferring in this way, it is known that if the guests beyond the secular world keep the wondrous Dharma in mind, cleanse their minds in the profound gate , and obtain by inspiration at once, they can transcend to the uppermost state . 
Speaking from this basis of why Buddhist scriptures surpasses Confucianism and is beyond of the nine philosophical schools , would it not be because to reach the essence through governing the spirit, to train the mind, to trace completely the very source of the change, and to mirror myriad phenomena upon no phenomena ? 
End of Fascicle Five of The Collection for the Propagation and Clariﬁcation The Discourse to Elucidate the Refutation by Shi Daoheng During the Yixi era of the Jin dynasty, according to what I have heard, the two wise men of the Jiangsu area, Yuan and He, got together to make a discourse on statecraft, and satirized the current administration. 
Even though I have not read this composition, its intention seems to be to ridicule the pitfalls of the world, modeling itself after the chapter on the “Five Kinds of Vermin” in the Han Feizi,411 and they issued the Discourse on the Five Kinds of Perversions. 
Śramaṇas, however, took no action and it vulgarly lowers their case. 
I am afraid that misleads people of the world and causes them to fall into vicious delusion eternally. 
I cannot stand the extremity of resentfulness and regret. 
Therefore, I would like to elucidate this through a discussion in the form of the guest and the host. 
There was a gentleman who was controlled by Confucianism in a metropolis in the east, who cross-questioned an impudent rustic in an out-of-theway place in the west. 
He said, “I have heard that the Buddhist teaching is too deep to discuss on the basis of Confucianism; the style of the teaching is too profound to determine by physical methods; it is too reﬁned, non-aggressive, simple, and distinctive to get involved in with common knowledge; it is too wondrous and beyond all existences; and it cannot be fathomed by ordinary thought. 
Consequently, is often respectfully followed by sovereigns of the times and admired by the nobles, and then the common people crowd together, plight their faith, chime in, and quickly head . 
When we submerge in the true essence , even yi and qi would have no chance to surpass us in keeping integrity. 
When we abandon glorious favor, even Chao[fu, a recluse during the time of Emperor Yao,] and Xu [You, a philosopher during the time of Emperor Yao,] would have no chance to go beyond us in determination. 
When we taste the profound tenet , even Yan and Ran would have no chance to join us in the practice. 
When we leave behind disorder and impurity, even song and qiao, could not compare with us in purity.’ If things are truly just as have been spoken, there is no ﬂaw in reason. 
“Now, however, when I observe all śramaṇas, they are all lacking in talent; they live gregariously and they are vulgar. 
They are confused and indistinguishable, just like a river in which the water of the Jing River and the water of the Wei River have merged. 
They are disordered, just as if perfume and you , are put in the same box. 
If the source of the water is clean, the stream must be clear. 
If the root is deep, its branches and leaves will certainly be luxuriant. 
Examining the speech and behavior , they are not logical all the time. 
The reason I am surprised at them is precisely derived from these points. 
Just as the Emperor forgot that he is intelligent, and Ju Liang forgot that he has physical strength, , they all became sages by being forged in a furnace and hammered or molded.412 If ‘the Way is not to be practiced in vain,’ 413 the talent [for propagating Buddhism] must correspond to the capacity . 
“Why is their behavior contemptible and ignoble while they have such lofty ? 
They never weary in seeking ; they are anxious, lacking even temporary peaceful relaxation. 
Some reclaim land and cultivate it in agriculture, living like farmers. 
Some peddle or engage in trade widely and compete with many others for proﬁt. 
Some conduct medical practice and hastily treat illness with cold or heat.415 Some devise tactics with heretics in order to beneﬁt their occupation. 
Some practice divination by directions and time and speak recklessly about the auspicious and the inauspicious. 
Some go against the Way, avail themselves of authority, and skillfully curry favor of the time. 
Some hoard and save to nourish themselves excessively. 
Some talk idly pointing at their palms and consume the common people’s labors without moving from their own place. 
Even if they may temporarily have a good point, how much could it help to elevate their reputation? 
They should abolish these by themselves and standardize their customs. 
This is what people who lead a virtuous life detest deeply, and what concerns greatly those who rule over the state. 
“Moreover, there are ﬁve kinds of perversions in the world and śramaṇas are included among them. 
The basis to clarify this is that śramaṇas skillfully devise expedients and instigate ignorant secular people; one way [they do this] is to give parables to induce the people, and the other is to coerce them. 
say, ‘If you do evil deeds, you will certainly have misfortune for successive kalpas. 
if you cultivate good deeds, you will have eternal blessing.’ They say that those who are sinful will be investigated in Hell, and those who have merit will be helped by deities. 
They earnestly encourage and lead the people, exhorting them to do what they ordinarily cannot do. 
They force people to improve themselves and urge them to do what they usually cannot do. 
in the worst case one will reduce support for one’s parents, and the least bad case is that one will decrease the share for one’s wife and children. 
Buddhist temples run the gamut of splendor. 
“ make off with people’s valuable items; they waste more money on useless things; they use up others’ personal annual savings; and they cause a deﬁciency of funds for the state and military. 
In vain they raise their voice for the future; they pursue the formless before it shows a sign of manifestation. 
When we listen to their statements, they sound great and ﬁll our ears. 
When we look at their appearance, they look aloof and ﬁll our eyes. 
if I seek evidence through examining actual facts, I have not seen any indication of it at all. 
‘Even though one tries to keep his shadow tied up, he catches the wind.’416 I have no clue to . 
If you have good information on , please let me humbly receive it. 
If I attain realization even for the time being, I will be able to leave behind this hindrance eternally.” The host was disappointed . 
How vile your account is! 
The reason it is impossible for a vulgar to talk about the Great Way is that he is hampered by the appearance of things, and the reason it is impossible to explain the ultimate way to obscure people is that they adhere to the letter. 
Here, I will brieﬂy illustrate one corner for you,417 so that you can think and return to the ultimate Way. 
“Now, when the Sage teaches, he gives the Dharma according to the capacity . 
Since there is a limit to people’s capacity to accept , ediﬁcation is given gradually. 
Conscience is recorded even if it is the tip of a hair. 
A mean and stingy frame is omitted even if it is a hill or a ravine. 
Even a very minor virtuous act becomes eternally one’s own property. 
When one begins turning over a bamboo basket of earth, we cannot blame him he aims to achieve the making of a mountain.418 When one is about to proceed to the ultimate state of mind , we cannot slander him the fact he ties up a sack.419 On the other hand, the reason a sea is said to be great is because there is no clamor for excessive cleanliness. 
The reason the Way is said to be obscure in trace is because there is no astonishing appearance. 
“Loving parents and being affectionate to a wife and children are attachments of the people who possess a mind, but śramaṇas abandon these, just as they take off their shoes. 
Fame, social status, wealth, and carnal pleasure are what people of the world value, but śramaṇas regard those things [as being as insubstantial as] rice bran. 
It can be said that they put up with what people cannot leave behind. 
This indicates the lofty and reﬁned taste and the excellent task to propagate the Way, yet you say that are dark . 
Isn’t this a statement of very good appreciation? 
Moreover, if your ambition and actions are not the same [as those of śramaṇas], your course to proceed differs from ; wheel tracks separate at the fork in the road. 
Since you have not seen any outstanding points [of śramaṇas], is simply a natural consequence. 
It is quite natural that the ancients often lamented that it is difﬁcult people of talent.420 “The Zhou dynasty is known for having many scholars; there were ten talented vassals who helped their monarch in administration. 
During the halcyon days of Emperor Yao and Emperor Shun, there were eight virtuous men and eight gentlemen . 
Confucius had three thousand . 
They were all of outstanding ability in the country, but those who were selected to become proﬁcient in the four subjects were less than ten people. 
The people admire their footsteps for a hundred generations, and revere their great conduct for a thousand years. 
“With regard to śramaṇas, they torture themselves as if their muscles were to drop off, and cruelly treat themselves like worthless things. 
Would this be the way widely practiced and a well-intentioned argument for gentlemen? 
It can truly be said that such a person stoops to vulgar thought and has a base frame of mind. 
“Formerly a prime minister asked a guest, ‘It is commonly said that an owl eats its mother. 
Could such a thing occur?’ The guest replied, ‘I have heard only that a benevolent crow repays raising it.’ The prime minister felt sorry and ashamed of his improper question. 
Isn’t your present state of mind similar to that of the prime minister who asked the question? 
Gentlemen refrain from evildoing but cite his good points. 
On the contrary, what have you said? 
“Furthermore, you said, ‘ sit easily stretching out their legs.’ Since the forest and countryside are deserted, they often have to worry about insurgents. 
a bustling city, they are often inﬂicted with the carping criticism of companionship . 
If they stay in an inappropriate place, they invite the nuisances of the secular world. 
Even though the universe is vast, they do not know where to stay. 
When they take just a necessary amount of food, they once again use it in accordance with the Dharma. 
“Even at the digniﬁed time of sages, there were people (i.e., Boyi and Shuqi) who starved to death at Mount Shouyang. 
When the world was peaceful and brilliant people were promoted, there was a man who went to the sea and died there.429 What do you think ? 
“Furthermore, since śramaṇas have no feathers on their bodies, they cannot live being naked without clothes, and since their bellies are not gourds, they cannot let them hang down , without eating. 
As long as [their desire for food and clothes] does not reach the extreme, they must have support. 
When the harvest is good, they can take enough from the common people. 
This is really not proper, but it cannot be helped. 
Consequently, if a viper bites one’s hand, is cut off in order to save the body. 
“Even though one may make a living for himself, if he does not seek anything, he has nothing to obtain; and if he seeks something, it is not necessarily that he uses only one method . 
consider that everything within the boundary of desires is troublesome and vile, and cause to not move recklessly. 
Why [is it said that] they exceedingly attach ? 
“Long ago, Bocheng reclaimed land and cultivated it by himself,430 Ju and Ni ploughed side by side and practiced agriculture,431 Tao Zhu engaged in trade and made a living,432 Yuling irrigated a vegetable garden in order to support himself,433 Cui Wen sold medicines and led a life of poverty,434 Junping used to practice divination to augment his insufﬁcent income,435 Zhang Heng won fame for the art of divination,436 and Ma Jun gave full display to his achievement (i.e., making a compass chariot, which shows the correct direction) of marvelous skills. 
These are simply people who went against the secular world and led the life of recluses. 
“Nevertheless, it often happens that among śramaṇas, those whose conduct surpasses that of many people and who feel shame at associating with fellows of a sort are numerous. 
36b You, however, have not mentioned anything . 
Why do you have a partial view? 
You should view based on inspecting the facts. 
You cannot make a discussion separating the present from the past, and you cannot make an expression dividing a small number from the larger number. 
The rare and the simple are noble, while the numerous and the lewd are humble. 
This is, I am afraid, not a discussion intended to seek the essence and examine a theorem. 
The sage (i.e., Confucius) did not deceive us [regarding the fact that there was one sincere person in a hamlet of] ten families.437 If you do something with two others, they must serve you as your teachers.438 When fragrant orchids are completely luxuriant, if you were to collect, pile up, and burn them, wouldn’t this too be atrocious? 
Among , there are spontaneously those whose virtue is profound and whose capacity is expected by the times. 
Some are outstandingly pure and live uprightly; some contemplate, enter into subtlety, and pacify their spirits in the absolute state ; some expound subtle words, clarify obscurity, and explain problematic points; and some diligently devote themselves to meritorious deeds, exhort for the ediﬁcation , and esteem wholesomeness. 
“Generally, the foundation of the Buddhist monastic life lies in the day of tonsure, when they all individually make an oath, in mind and in words, with genuine feelings and the highest sincerity. Even though life and death are completely associated and the profound path is long and far, must urge themselves . 
Then, they will certainly be on the way leading to ; the glory of the golden wheel-turning king [who rules the four continents of the world] will be disregarded as if it were dust and dirt; and the importance of Śakra-devendra, will be slighted as if it were rice bran. 
Everyone is earnest and sincere at the beginning and has reasons of his own. 
Naturally is, neither suddenly attained at a stroke nor perfectly mastered. 
How could there not be a minor fault in the course of time? 
We cannot execute the entire Ji clan [of the Zhou dynasty] because of the fault made by Guan and Cai,439 and we cannot exile all the men of the court because of the four villains who committed cruel conduct.440 This is no different from the case where a man who suffers from head lice wants to burn his own head along with the lice, or the case of a man who is troubled by irritation on his legs consequently wants to remove all the parts of his body below the hips. 
Isn’t this also excessive? 
“You said, ‘ is futile for the political affairs of the times, and harmful to the study of the Way.’ When those who propagate the Way beneﬁt the world, common people act daily according to it, yet have no knowledge of it. 
Hence, gan Mu slept peacefully and yet Wei state was well governed.442 Gengsang was good at instructing and [the people in the area of] Mount Weilei submitted themselves to his virtue.443 “Presently in their lifetimes śramaṇas really have no achievements for which the government could assess value, but they do in fact confer an invisible beneﬁt in the sphere beyond Confucianism. 
Taking a familiar , to instruct the people through the ﬁve precepts is not on the same level of the Six Classics . 
Taking profound , the hidden severity of the eight difﬁculties is not equal to the criminal code; to engage in evaluating sins according to the Buddhist canon is not the same as the laws and regulations ; to speak of delusions with transcendental wisdom is not the same sense as do Laozi and Zhuangzi. 
Regarding the cause and condition of purity and uprooting suffering in the elements to attain enlightenment , ‘we occupy our thoughts, but do not discuss anything.’444 “In the teaching of the Duke of Zhou and Confucius, the doctrine is put to the best use in appearance, while in the highest level of the ultimate Dharma the issue about the spirit is simultaneously managed in detail. 
Regarding quality and ranking, cannot be spoken of in the same breath in terms of which is superior and which is inferior. 
“In ancient times Bei helped with the ediﬁcation and assisted in governing the state by means of the Way.445 the 36c border regions of the state were peaceful, the people knew righteousness [that they had to follow], the harvest was rich and preserved, and there was no disaster. 
What do you mean by saying that does not beneﬁt ? 
“You said, ‘There are ﬁve kinds of perversions in the world and śramaṇas account for one of them.’ Generally, what perversion means is to have no will to work, to be unspeakably self-indulgent; to gamble, dissipating one’s fortune and ruining one’s family property; to register one’s name in the household register and yet wander around at all times of the year; to neglect the duties of ofﬁce while receiving pay and not be willing to apply one’s mind to anything; to hold the reins of government and be in power, and yet exploit the common people; to compete for promotion and incur both public and private losses; or to indulge in violence, vice, and cruelty and engage in conspiracy. 
All of these damage the teaching, disturb order, and greatly harm the customs of the world. 
As a result of this, Xun Yue wielded his pen and his discourse on the chivalrous came into existence. 
Han Fei took up a brush and the composition on the “Five Kinds of Vermin” was completed. 
It is, therefore, suitable to consider these to be perversions, but isn’t it a false accusation to apply this to śramaṇas? 
“Our nation is just now competing with the times of Emperor Yao and Emperor Shun for lofty virtue as the primary goal, and trying to equal the Yin and Zhou dynasties in elegant education as the secondary goal. 
“When I examine what you think, as regards managing and operating the government of the time, you want to follow mean and crafty methods, like those of the tiger and the wolf, which were employed by the ruined Qin dynasty; and you want to inherit the cruel and harmful pattern that Shangjun carried out. 
They burned the books on the Chinese classics and buried Confucian scholars alive; they did not have the discipline to rule the country. 
By establishing very heavy taxation, each household had no unbudgeted extra money, and by setting up prohibitions for miscellaneous minor matters, they treated the people as if they were bandits. 
the world became unhappy, and the people felt no interest in their lives. caused the Ying family (i.e., the royal family of the Qin dynasty) to come to an end in three generations. 
The disaster caused by the two men was ended during their lifetimes. 
On the very day they were being punished, they repented for the ﬁrst time that the law they had established was wrong. 
Originally they wanted to pacify the country and make the people harmonious. 
They did not expect that the bank they had built was too high and harsh, and did not hold living space for themselves, to the contrary of . 
What did they attain by their grief? 
In understanding, there are difﬁculty and ease. 
In practices, there are shallowness and depth. 
The causes to inspire beings to awaken differ. 
They melodiously try to cause them to follow wholesomeness. 
This is precisely a key phrase in the use of schemes and power, and a bridge for a marvelous salvation. 
It really does not mean to induce and coerce the people. 
“You said, ‘ those who are sinful will be investigated in Hell, and those who have merit will be helped by deities.’ All wholesomeness belongs to those who possess virtue and who are the most sincere. 
There will be good fortune, advantage in every respect.’446 Furthermore, it is said that if those who do what is not good in darkness and secrecy, spirits will inﬂict the punishment.447 Wouldn’t this mean ‘to be investigated in Hell and helped by deities’? 
Regarding reward or retribution for good or evil, there are indeed testimonies in Buddhist scriptures. 
I will not enumerate them here. 
Buddhist temples run the gamut of splendor.’ This is due to families who make good deeds ; they merely expend their wealth in order 37a to prepare for future help, and they use up simply because they are making long-range plans for themselves. 
It does not seem that deities are delighted with the splendor and that all monks wish for delicious food. 
This is compared to when a farmer sows seed: 
he is keen in selecting seeds in order to reap good-quality grain; or when a carpenter makes a building, he hopes to choose good timber when seeking the adornments of the building. 
Therefore, in agricultural operations it is necessary to plant in fertile soil, and in selecting a site for a residence it is important to choose high and dry ground. 
Hence, we know that the three revered ones are ﬁelds of merit for sentient beings,448 and it is said that making offerings to them simply results in merit in the course of cultivating oneself. 
“You said, ‘ make off with people’s valuable items; they waste more money on useless things.’ To extensively confer beneﬁts [to others] and love without distinction are great virtues of benevolent people. 
To respect and adorn the ancestral temple is the most sincere heart showing ﬁlial piety and respect . 
Since in the worldly teaching things are like this, in the Way things are like this as well. 
‘Things are increased by being diminished.’449 If we do something, we must obtain . 
Moreover, the wealth of this transitory is just like impure soil, but to give it graciously is a marvelous faculty. 
It is compared to the case that even a boat made of decayed wood is essential for ferrying people over . 
Why is this seen as a waste of money? 
To intend to sit upright viewing nature , or to hope for comfort in silence with one’s arms folded, is similar to wishing to cut wood without an ax or hoping to feel full without eating. 
“If one does not lead a virtuous life, that is his own problem. 
Why is it necessary to cover the common people’s ears and eyes and conceal the great virtue of the world? 
You have already drunk poison and now you want to poison others. 
Why are you so cruel? 
It can be said that you ruin yourself, entrap others, and cause everyone to suffer from disasters. 
Therefore, for the blind, the deaf, and the dumb there is the disaster of being in a place without sight or sound for the completion of one whole kalpa, and as retribution to Devadatta, there is the experience of suffering in Avīci Hell. 
Isn’t this also a gross fault? 
There is a saying that when a ranking ofﬁcial who is quite stingy and whose mouth is swollen faces the blue sea, [since he cannot drink the seawater because of his swollen mouth,] he just holds his stomach. 
This truly refers to you. 
“Even though one tries to keep his shadow tied up, he catches the wind.” I have no clue to [understanding them].’ To disorder truth by using sophistry is something that the great sages lament. 
since the people did not recognize it is a precious stone [and thought that he was trying to deceive them], Bian He wept bitterly.450 Nevertheless, the subtle purpose is delicate, and those who master it reach the Way. 
is lofty and simple, and those who comprehend it attain employs deep competence and functions as a bridge for ruined or drowned people to cross over to . 
The excellence of [the 37b teaching] is always on a level to that of the time [when the Buddha resided in this world], and the ediﬁcation has spread boundlessly. 
Hence, Śakra-devendra and the king of the Brahmā Heaven realized the deep purpose and reverted to sincerity. 
Emperors and kings hope for the profound belief and consign themselves . 
The eight kinds of gods and demigods take the spiritual ediﬁcation and reform themselves. 
The common people come in a hurry to observe the real deportment. 
“Since is lofty, it is not the same as Confucianism, the teaching for the secular world; and since it is so solemn, it is the profound path to transcend the secular world. 
Nevertheless, since the fence is steep and high, it is seldom that one can pass through the gate, and since the house is dark and deep, it is rare for people to enter its rooms. 
Therefore, the Way saves those who are completely sunk in , but the doctrine is at variance with this. 
The virtue envelops all endlessly, but the fact is at a distance from this. 
“Even though the sun and moon ride in the sky, a blind man is not able to see the brightness. 
Even if thunder shakes the earth, a deaf man is unable to hear the rumbling. 
Whose fault is this? 
“In ancient times, King Mucalinda recovered his eyesight as the ﬁrst disciple .451 Subhadra listened to as his last disciple.452 What sin causes you to be so unfortunate as to harbor only suspicion throughout your life? 
Compared to what many people feel sad about, your case is the biggest problem.” Hereupon, withdrew in a hesitant manner. 
He was in low spirits and disoriented. 
After a while he said, “I have just heard the doctrine of the Great Way, which completely follows in a continuous line from ancient times to the present, which greatly establishes the law of cause and condition, and which probes into the very point of principles and completely understands every nature. 
It can be said that one traces things to their beginning, understands them to their end, and returns to life. 
I have really been asleep, at a standstill, for the long night . 
Now, fortunately, I have heard your discussion. 
My deﬁlements have been dispersed and my doubts have been scattered. 
I have awakened all of a sudden, as if I had opened the layers of clouds and seen the bright sun, or as if I had taken off something that had covered me and realized true wisdom. 
I am truly not intelligent, but I will respectfully follow the excellent teaching.” The Discourse to Rectify the Two Teachings by Ming Zhengjun There is a Daoist monk who composed the Discourse on the Non-Chinese and the Chinese. 
Since I am afraid that the Sage will be falsely accused and I would like to clarify the goals [of Buddhism and Daoism], I will ﬁrst explain the phrases from two scriptures that [the Daoist monk] cited and correct . 
The Discourse states: 
As was napping, Laozi availed of the essence of the sun and entered into Māyā’s mouth. 
At midnight on the eighth day of the fourth month of the next year, he cut right armpit open and was born. 
He landed on the earth and took seven steps forward. Then, he raised his hand and pointed to the sky, saying, ‘Holy am I alone throughout Heaven and Earth. 
The three realms of 37c existence are full of suffering. 
How could we be happy?’ Thereupon, the Buddhist Way arose. This event is found in the Inner Section of the Mysterious and Sublime , which is an authentic scripture composed during the Han dynasty, not a far-fetched book.” I corrected this, saying, “The Daoist purpose of this is based on Laozi’s scripture of two . 
The explanation about the mysterious and sublime is provided in seven chapters of Zhuangzi, and to attain the One and master the void thoroughly. 
There is nothing to hear regarding the wonders of the transformation of a body. 
Peng (a legendary ofﬁcial who was said to have lived eight hundred years) is equal in life span to a child who dies prematurely.453 I have never seen that [this text] advocates immortality. 
“Therefore, those who are in harmony with Heaven do not engage in changing normal ways, and they are content with their time and place themselves in order. 
If availed of the essence of the sun, entered into mouth, cut right armpit open, there is discrepancy between the time and the event. 
Absurd [statements made] during the Qin and Han dynasties extend to Wei and Jin times. 
How can you say that it is an authentic scripture?” The Discourse states: 
“It is said in Buddhist scriptures that it has already been an immeasurably long time since the time the Buddha attained buddhahood, or that once the leader of the circle of Confucian scholars, the most reverend priest of the country, or a monk.454 These are all derived from actual Buddhist scriptures, not expedient talks.” I corrected this, saying, “The foundation of Buddhism takes root in clarifying the ultimate teaching, and regarding the issue of three periods (past, present, and future) there is nothing that can testify to it in secular ways. 
Nevertheless, at the point where the exquisite and the profound meet, there are internally signs of meditation and wisdom. 
When there is a reaction between condition and sensation, the law of causation has nothing wrong externally. 
Śākyamuni gave the very fundamental cry of truth, and clariﬁed the goal to which the Way of the Spirit leads. 
Consequently, to train one’s essential and to examine the function of one’s intelligence are not the merit of preserving one’s righteousness. 
Salvation in the Way lies in neglecting the physical body and what is valued is not to complete life. 
Since living life is not valued, what merit is there in keeping existing things? 
In the tranquil state of complete extinction , there is the regular course of the Way. 
comes out of non-beginning and enters into non-ending. 
This is the teaching that regards as .” The Discourse states: 
“The tenets of the two teachings (i.e., Buddhism and Daoism) are as if a tally are matched.” I corrected this, saying, “Since the Buddha explains the three periods, completely complies with all things boundlessly. 
Laozi only nourishes our physical body and his teaching dampens enthusiasm to the utmost. 
Therefore, in the teaching that is conﬁned to issues about the physical body, does not discuss life in the other world. 
The Duke of Zhou, Confucius, Laozi, and Zhuangzi are truly teachers of emperors and kings, but they cannot provide testimony for the opinion we formerly read. 
“Daoism is precisely Buddhism; Buddhism is none other than Daoism.” I corrected this, saying, “Since there is a difference between the teachings, just as there is between a square and a circle, how could we see them as the same? 
Those who follow Buddhism can ﬁrmly weigh Laozi, but how can those who learn Laozi take it to be the same as the Buddha? 
“Some clarify the Five Classics and some spread the three vehicles” and “They teach Chinese people in the Chinese language and edify non-Chinese in their native languages.” In addition, it states: 
“Buddhism and Daoism are equal in universally edifying, but there is a difference between the Chinese and the non-Chinese .” I corrected these, saying, “He who is quietly inspired and attains thorough understanding must do everything smoothly. 
By a single voice, the Buddha lets receive awakening, complying with each of their species. 
Would the teaching of the three vehicles be necessary to edify the non-Chinese? 
Why does the Chinese way require strict adherence to the teaching of the Five Classics? 
In emptying one’s mind and exerting oneself in accordance with affections of his mind, there is no difference between Chinese people and non-Chinese. 
How could differences in customs contradict the Sage ? 
There are differences in the way to follow a tradition. 
Therefore, the gentleman makes achievements beautifully, just as the leopard’s spots become more beautiful ,456 and the people’s culture is ﬁrst reformed. 
Zhuan Sun received an instruction , and lost his determination to learn about the Yin dynasty.457 Regarding the virtue of Emperor Shun and Emperor Wu , Yao abdicated the throne , and expelled from the throne by force of arms and made a different statute. 
Sages of later generations had achievements. Could there be a boundary between Chinese people and the non-Chinese? 
“Moreover, is it necessary to adhere to the national dress in thinking through the ultimate teaching? 
Therefore, when we link to unchangeable sorts of things, our delusion becomes deep and our actions are stymied. 
Since water and land differ from each other, there are methods of sending things to a distant place. 
The example of the boat and the carriage cannot be considered well done. 
Moreover, the one who carved a mark on the side of his boat [to indicate the place where he dropped his sword into water],458 and [Daoist monks, like] the one who waited by the stump [where he previously had caught a hare], in the hope that other hares would come by that spot,459 assuredly show two points to which we are led.” The Discourse says, “ abandon their wives and children in token of a minor degree and discontinue their ancestor worship in token of a major degree. 
go against virtue and offend the order, and yet they have been unaware of this.” Moreover, it states: 
“To maintain completely one’s body and to abide by ancestor worship are in the teaching to continue wholesomeness. 
To damage one’s physical form and change one’s family name are in the learning to cut off evil. 
What should be valued in the ultimate principle of the universe is the Way, and what should be despised in phenomena is secularity.” I corrected this, saying, “Now takes rejecting ancestor worship as offending order. 
they 225 retain desires and expand politeness. 
Secularity is not necessarily despised. 
To damage one’s physical form [and change one’s family name] to cut off evil are despicable from [the Confucian] viewpoint, but their way is not necessarily noble. 
He turns the noble and the humble upside down and falsely makes self-satisﬁed talk. 
He vainly wishes to be a vermin and drowns in ordinary views. 
How could he expect the fundamental principle in the words of the Sage ?” The Discourse states: 
In Buddhism it is called right and true , while in Daoism it is called right and One . 
The term ‘One’ means to return to non-death and the term ‘true’ means to meet nonarising.” I corrected this, “ ‘Princes and kings attain the One and become the head of the world.’460 He does not talk about the transformation of becoming a Transcendent. 
Since ‘The one who does not lose when he dies is of longevity,’461 he does not discuss the issue of non-death. 
The Great Way has already been obscured and small comprehensions [of the mind] have risen one after another.462 How true this saying is! 
All those who make false accusations and deceptions and who are too arrogant intend to look for sages’ words in order to illicitly make up for their faults. 
The Daoist teaching today merely takes long life to be a belief and immortality to be the main goal. 
Alchemy, golden elixir, eating clouds, taking jade as food, mysteriously ﬂying up, sprouting wings or exuviating to ascend to Heaven, deliverance through the corpse, and transformation are the methods with which they entrust themselves. 
when we try to verify these things, no such things can be seen after all. 
“Furthermore, claims that if one does not ascend to immortals he will become a ghost after he dies, or he will be summoned and appointed an ofﬁcer of Heaven, according to his original merit. 
Even though these are greatly against the worthy writings left by Laozi and Zhuangzi, in the fundamental principles they still have nothing wrong in the worldly teaching. 
If one loses desires, directs his course to wholesomeness, avails himself of ediﬁcation, goes at will, and forgets the purpose of multiplying endlessly, truth results in absurdity, but does not throw a normal into disorder. 
“Regarding like Zhang and Ge , all of them additionally concocted supernatural transformation to educate the common people; they concocted weird accounts and misled the people of the world. 
Moreover, they have gradually expanded . 
Then they quote Buddhism, which is far away , and try to testify that consists of forgeries. 
Their argument is confused, and there is no model of scholarship on which they base . 
When we examine against the meanings of texts, we cannot ﬁnd anything similar. 
They cause the true and the absurd to be mixed up, people who wish for awakening to be deluded eternally, and no one to be able to dispute it. 
“You are already fully aware that the Buddha and Laozi are right, but you have not yet encountered a ferry . 
Now I would like to brieﬂy explain a corner and cause you to have self-introspection. 
“The two teachings possess both the study of the truth and the examination of the mind. 
Therefore, can avail themselves of all states of things whenever they encounter them. 
“The teaching of Laozi consists of moral training, statecraft, cutting off and abandoning the honor of high rank, and things to rectify their nature. 
It takes the absolute vacancy as the foundation and softness and meekness as the function. 
This is why scholars truly admire even the branch stream and why the teaching exists. 
Why do they take up the issues that deiﬁcation has no set pattern, of beneﬁting the world, and of immortality? 
“As for collecting clouds, sprouting wings or exuviating [to ascend as a Transcendent], changing the spirit, and tracing to the very source of the numinous being, these are from a teaching of a different vapor which was created through mending and accumulating that were formerly completed. 
Therefore, although there are records of strange matters, what are called the principles do not follow them. 
When we investigate supernatural accomplishments we reach all things accordingly; the large are extraordinary auspicious cases, such as a female kylin or a male phoenix; and the small is the transformation of sparrows or pheasants. 
Once we have received a physical body, we wish for learning. 
“So Yan and Confucius are contiguous to each other in their ways, and they are close to the apex of natural endowments and learnedness. 
If we indeed admire the mysterious trace and yet stop it, or if we desire to follow and yet there is nothing to follow, to be contented with our fate is not reckless deﬁlement. 
Therefore, Confucius esteemed to know the decrees and he certainly had something he did not say. 
Boyang left behind strangeness and honor, and he ﬁrmly abided by wuwei. 
In accomplishing the Way and attaining things, there is the origin that we realize in each of them. 
“Actions manifest in one’s previous existence, but you seek merit through forcing yourself to learn. 
A deep-rooted practice is accomplished habitually, but you perversely long for absurd desires and change them to the highest priority. 
If Yan state yet desires Yue state , what could make his desire come true? 
Therefore, in learning we ﬁrst ﬁnd what learned and then learn it in order to accomplish it. 
To do what can be done is to do what can be achieved. 
In order to study and clarify about the people, the teaching was established in the middle of Heaven. 
This is the profundity in managing the affairs of the secular world, and the ultimate of Confucius and Laozi. 
“To do what has not happened, to complete the function of intelligence, to trace to the very source of causality, to share reason among living creatures who are different from each other, to have a thorough of falsehood and return to truth, and the authentic supernatural accomplishments all the greatness of Buddhism. 
Hereupon, the Buddha precisely clariﬁes the ultimate law of Nature. 
Those who stick to life are blocked and those who clarify the ultimate law of Nature reach it. 
Nevertheless, if one quietly rests in the right path, even if he is blocked, he is not deluded. 
If he actively follows the ultimate law of Nature, he will reach reason and illuminate the ultimate Way. 
“Therefore, people of virtue certainly esteem to complete the pure nature given by Heaven and seek the Way by themselves. 
They respect the foundation, help understand thoroughly, and return the merit to the four great elements. 
If one does not try to do things that are not so, abides by the teaching, and maintains the constant Way, he can learn the purity of the teachings of Confucius and Laozi. 
He searches the stream [of the teaching], looks into the origin, and considers life to be dust and poison. 
“When accumulated merits are revealed and the important comes, the essence of Buddhism is clear in our actions. 
Consequently, if in learning we ﬁnd what learned, it is possible to support all the people and the teaching is revered in the world. 
If actions become clear in the doing [of them], we will exterminate deﬁlements, return to the stream , and go far away from heavenly and human beings. 
Anything beyond this point has probably not been known. 
When one is inspired, he is successful in understanding thoroughly. When we come across traces [of the teachings, we may ﬁnd that] they become different from each other. 
This is comparable to the case where although the music was not handed down, we are not far from the mystery of the Five Thearchs; or the case where although the ceremony was not transmitted, the holiness of the Three Augusts is not suspended.465 The times of the Three Augusts and the Five Thearchs were different. 
Therefore their customs were not the same. 
They belonged to different ages. 
I see that Daoist monks ﬁght Buddhist monks Confucianists Mohists, and that Buddhist monks judge the rights or wrongs of Daoist monks, and vice versa. 
Once upon a time there was a wild goose that ﬂew in the Way of Heaven. 
Since it was far it was difﬁcult to see clearly. 
The people of Yue thought the goose was a wild duck, while the people of Chu thought it was a swallow. 
is simply due to people lived in either Yue or Chu. 
You may wholeheartedly follow in the footprints of the Buddha without disgracing the foundation of Daoism. 
A bird cries mournfully when it is going to die. 
A man speaks good words when he is approaching the end of his life.467 Recently my disease has worsened and my vitality has weakened. 
In this condition, I how many times I can breathe while my spirit stays . 
If I do not stitch , it drifts away. 
I would like to make my lingering intention of the afterlife the rules of conduct for my brothers and nieces. 
Now I am reporting this to you, gentlemen. 
Response to Zhang’s Letter Together with Questions to Zhang I, Zhou Shan, Shanci, wrote back to you, Shaozi, and stated: 
I, Zhou Yong, bow to you with my head to the ground. 
When I respectfully examine the same foundation, there is something to measure your lofty mind. 
Even though I know the primary to which the Way of the Spirit returns, in addition to Buddhism, the principle of Confucianism is magnanimous. 
This teaching has gradually spread . It is not that there is not anything perverse [in the teaching]. 
In its basic principle, simplicity, there is something respectable. 
I just have held these thoughts in mind and have not yet expressed them. 
In any system there is order and disorder, and we cannot make a mistake in distinguishing the similarities from the differences. 
We should make a conclusion in written form. 
Discerning the intention of your writing, you said that are fundamentally the same. 
It appears that is not I think. 
It has been my long-cherished desire to put in order some of my thoughts on this point. 
Fortunately, in the light of your opinion, I would like to try to articulate my view together with you. 
I look forward to hearing your profound instruction. 
In the Discourse on the Way to Reach the Origin you say, “Daoism and Buddhism are not dual in the ﬁnal consequence; [both teachings] aim toward tranquility and stability and they are the same in their foundation. 
When we come across traces [of the teachings, we may ﬁnd that] they become different from each other.” Zhou says, “You mention in your discussion that they are the same in their foundation. 
Please let me ask you: 
What is the meaning of the foundation to which you refer here? 
Wouldn’t it be that those who speak of Daoism consider the two-chapter text to be primary, and those who speak of Buddhism should take prajñā to be the ultimate law of Nature? 
The reason why the two-chapter text is esteemed is that the signiﬁcance reaches the absolute vacancy at the extreme point. 
With prajñā one observes that the extremity of the spiritual function is the Dharma-nature. 
Even though the absolute vacancy and the Dharma-nature are the same in respect to tranquility, they differ from each other in the purport of the way to position tranquility. 
As for your statement in the discussion, ‘ are not dual in the ﬁnal consequence,’ do you mean that settle in the absolute vacancy or that they are not dual in the Dharma-nature? 
If there is another foundation, please tell me about it in detail. 
If are not different from each other, I wish to hear your explanation of why they are not.” In the Discourse on the Way to Reach the Origin you say that “The times were different. 
Therefore their customs were not the same. 
Hence their righteousness varied.” “I see that Daoist monks ﬁght Buddhist monks Confucianists Mohists, and that Buddhist monks judge the rights or wrongs of Daoist monks and vice versa. 
Once upon a time there was a wild goose that ﬂew in the Way of Heaven. Since it was far it was difﬁcult to see clearly. 
The people of Yue thought the goose was a wild duck, while the people of Chu thought it was a swallow. 
is simply due to people lived in either Yue or Chu. 
Therefore their customs were not the same.’ This means that Buddhism is different from Daoism. 
Hence their righteousness varied,’ refers to the Daoist teaching being separate from the Buddhist . 
This means only that the foundation in which you believe is just one: 
a wild goose. 
If you run about busily Buddhism and Daoism, you will have neither of them. 
In your lofty examination, you have not been aware of what you are following in order to discern the foundation. 
Is there any purpose in doing so? 
“If you still take hold of the two teachings and position their foundations, I am afraid that ﬁghting and judging will just begin and you will not be able to pass good judgment on anything. 
If we survey equally the origin of teaching on the basis of the two teachings, the origin of each teaching always reveals itself along with the teaching itself. 
We should put on a deerskin cap and hold a staff with rings [just as a hermit does], and see in a leisurely manner. 
If the origin in which are well matched is correct and the traces that separated are wrong, the functions of the two traces should be all removed. 
Why do you go in the direction to soar in the essence , while diligently engaged only in Buddhism, concentrate your vapor, hold the One fast in your embrace, and yet have no respect for Daoism? 
Your words are deep and your purpose is profound. 
I hope to hear your later account.” 233 In the Discourse on the Way to Reach the Origin you say, “You may wholeheartedly follow in the footprints of the Buddha without disgracing the foundation of Daoism.” Zhou says, “You wholeheartedly follow in the footprints of the Buddha without disgracing the foundation of Daoism. 
Do you think that they are one in the foundation and differ in their later development, or are they different both in the foundation and in later development? 
Since I wish to thoroughly inquire about this or that and investigate exhaustively issues related to the principles, I cannot help but to ask you .” The Second Letter Given to Zhou with Answers to His Questions I, Zhang Rong, say, “Since I have still been unable to forget myself, I have attachment to my family. 
I do not want to cause my mind to be deserted day and night, like the former capitol, and what I have troubled with throughout my life to run wild. 
For that reason, I created this Family Law in order to regulate the family. 
If Buddhism and Daoism are not employed, by what means would my family be regulated? 
Therefore, I try to postpone my last day depending on my vital breath and to extend my life span relying on animation. 
I truly wanted you to give me a wonderful opinion. 
Sure enough, you wrote back in this way and gave me your thoughts, clever views, and correct analysis. 
Since you have given me your thoughts, I now speak for you.” Zhou says, “You mention in your discussion that they are the same in their foundation. 
Please let me ask you: 
What is the meaning of the foundation to which you refer here?” I respond to Zhou, “The nature of the mind is the capability to know. 
The way of morality is what can be known. 
If one has the capability to know and yet he does not know what can be known, this does not mean that he has the capability to know. 
If there is what can be known and yet it is not known by one who has the capability to know, it is not what can be known. 
Hence, we see that one who has the capability to know must go to the way and what can be known must know what it goes to. 
“Nevertheless, an ordinary person trembles with feeling, disturbs the function of intelligence, stirs up desires, agitates the spirit, drives his sharpness out, and clouds the function of recognition. 
Therefore, the mind goes in the wrong direction and ﬂows downward, and the function of intelligence separates from the way . 
As to Boyang , giving undivided attention to the breath and bringing it to the utmost degree of pliancy, staying in the void to let the animation act at will, putting the restless at ease, and holding all together in one embrace,469 one stays put as if frozen and understands tranquility thoroughly. 
If you want to have Boyang not be tranquil, how could this be possible? 
If you would have him be tranquil and not anchored in the Way, how could this be possible, either? 
Now that it is tranquil and has two spirits, the spirits are tranquil and there are two ways. 
I have never heard this. 
“Consequently, at the ﬁnal point it is one. [Nevertheless, an ordinary person whose] nature is restless and too hasty and whose appearance is wild is unable to widely practice further. 
I hope you may become free from all thoughts and hold the pearl .470 Hence, although there are ﬁve people who are categorized as a ‘Thearch,’ the spirit is always one. 
There are three people who have the title ‘August,’ but the Way is not more than one. 
This is why I straighten rope.” Zhou says, “Wouldn’t it be that those who speak of Daoism consider the two-chapter text to be primary, and those who speak of Buddhism should take prajñā to be the ultimate law of Nature? 
The reason why the two-chapter text is esteemed is that the signiﬁcance reaches the absolute vacancy at the extreme point. 
With prajñā one observes that the extremity of 235 the spiritual function is the Dharma-nature. 
Even though the absolute vacancy and the Dharma-nature are the same in respect to tranquility, they differ from each other in the purport of the way to position tranquility.” I respond to Zhou, “Even though the Dharma-nature seeks emptiness by means of is precisely form [in the phenomenal world], the absolute vacancy actually extends the meaning beyond the phenomenal world. 
When I ascend to this state , I do not see a Buddhist and a Daoist. 
Since what people sense varies, it is hard to come to an agreement in responding to things. 
When they adhere to each other, they are already profound. 
Hence the old man in Ku (i.e., Laozi) concealed precisely form’ for the time being; he followed what exists without agitating the feeling, and he respected what does not exist and imbued the mind with what it follows. 
Things having been hidden away, the people then wish for nonexistence. 
Since it is possible that the wind from the west rose in the daytime and reached the essence of the south , wouldn’t it be possible to dream of the spirit of China while asleep at night?471 “If you think that Laozi did not accomplish anything about nonexistence, I do not expect you to grasp the meaning. 
If you think that accomplished something about nonexistence and yet did not accomplish anything about existence, what you understand differs from what I expect. 
If you have doubt because Laozi accomplished something about existence and yet did not clarify it in his teaching, why do Buddhists who accomplished something make the traces high? 
At such a time, if you think that Buddhists had better make the traces high sometimes, this is comparable to the case where Laozi made the traces high occasionally. 
Therefore their customs were not the same.’ This means that Buddhism is different from Daoism. 
Hence their righteousness varied’ refers to the Daoist teaching being separate from the Buddhist . 
The trace is assuredly so. 
Why do you extend your effort to take the teaching [if you have attained the foundation]?” 237 40b Zhou says, “If we survey equally the origin of teaching on the basis of the two teachings, the origin of each teaching always reveals itself along with the teaching itself.” I respond to Zhou, “You are correct, indeed. 
why they formerly competed.” I respond to Zhou, “The two states of Yu and Rui had legal struggles over farmland, but this is something with which King Wen did not have to be concerned.473 Even if the natural jade is broken into pieces in order to put an end to a ﬁght over the jade, is this particularly respectful? 
Moreover, we are ﬁghting for a wild goose at night, but you recklessly have a wild duck and swallow ﬁght each other. 
This means to put a deerskin cap on the head in vain and to hold a staff with rings in the hand to fabricate oneself. 
Why do you go in the direction to soar in the essence , while diligently engaged only in Buddhism, concentrate your vapor, hold the One fast in your embrace, and yet have no respect for Daoism?” I respond to Zhou, “The movements of the mind responding to eternal objects are diverse and one’s feelings are various. 
Although I do not ﬂy with a ﬂap of the wings up to the four fruits , you have no doubt that I abide in Buddhism. 
Even though I do not ﬂy with a ﬂap of the wings up to the ﬁve supernatural powers , what regret would I have in abiding in Daoism? 
Moreover, the honorable sacredness should be the foundation; I do not worry about the traces. 
Would I now change to which I am ﬂying? 
Do you think that they are one in the foundation and differ in their later development, or are they different both in the foundation and in later development?” I respond to Zhou, “I originally blend a hundred sages together and throw them equally into the One, the ultimate. 
Recently I discussed this in the Discourse on the Way to Reach the Origin , but Confucianism was not included in the discussion. 
Now you carry Confucianism to an extreme, and you precisely want to arrange Confucianism in a line and encircle Daoism. 
Therefore, you act as if you ﬁrst prick up your ears, think of causing a war, and then plan to mount a surprise attack on the heavenly city at night, but I am afraid that it is difﬁcult to ascend there; it is too precipitous for you to ascend there. 
Even if I see the troops going out, I will not see them return. 
I have already said that a hundred sages are thrown into the same place. 
Why would I allow that differ both in the foundation and in later development? 
Moreover, you oppose me with all your force displaying your intelligence and bravery willfully. 
As for what can move the mind and to what we consign our mind, what other than truth can be our teacher? 
Ediﬁcations in China and foreign countries are what the practitioners dedicate, but if we distinguish between these (i.e., ediﬁcations in China and foreign countries) and make our choice clear, this causes me to become discontented and lost. 
You virtuously wish to say it, and I have not stopped speaking, either. 
That is to say, I will send [this letter] to examine furthermore. 
You say in the Discourse on the Way to Reach the Origin [of the Two Teachings], “Even though the Dharma-nature seeks emptiness by means of is precisely form , the absolute vacancy actually extends the meaning beyond the 40c phenomenal world” and “Hence the old man in Ku concealed precisely form’ for the time being; he followed what exists without agitating the feeling; and he respected what does not exist and imbued the mind with what it follows.” Zhou says, “It is true that in Ku concealed precisely form,’ but I am afraid that in this statement you have not reached precisely form.’ If you make a pretext of being able to conceal , those who can conceal it are many, and probably there is not only the man from Li village . 
“When existence is existence, people perceive existence. 
When nonexistence is nonexistence, people recognize nonexistence. 
Laozi dealt with existence and wrote on nonexistence, but he did not go beyond this boundary. 
This is what I stated in my shallow discussion, the Discourse on Three Sects : 
‘If we select and run about busily, no one has been able to go beyond that level.’ In Buddhism, the reason why worldly-mindedness is left behind in theory and why the rules governing the rhythm of words go against the norm is probably because precisely form’ means [that form in the phenomenal world] is not existence. 
In going against the Way or being drowned in secular , here is the trouble. 
Since the trouble is due to adhering to existence and the nature of existence has not been clariﬁed, the school that rectiﬁes existence follows and respects the art of nonexistence. 
If the nature of existence is not clear, even though this is a big problem, whom do we go against in esteeming tranquility? 
This is why the Daoist teaching is added to the propagation of the teaching and why I said in my previous letter that ‘the teaching of] the Yellow Emperor and Laozi is truly majestic.’ “All the former opinions by Wang and He indicate that Laozi is no match for the sage . 
If was just as he is presented in this view, could not inﬂuence Śākyamuni’s teaching. 
This is the established dogma found in Buddhist scripture.474 Sometimes he appears even in the guise of a prime minister or a wealthy man. 
Why wouldn’t Laozi’s life be only one track ? 
It is only because we have not known the depth of observation and the level of nobility. 
This is all because the great brightness has not been opened and for the time being we have received only one side . 
“When the sun or moon comes out, the torch should be put out.475 Since no remaining is expounded, many interim will spontaneously cease. 
You still want to resist in order to save the brightness even under the sun and moon, and to clarify that this and the sun and moon are of common origin. 
“You already worship the sun and moon in your mind and you have no intention of disgracing the foundation of the torch, but you have not been aware of what the foundation of this torch is. 
Is it a name, or reality? 
If you say you want it to be reality, the sun and moon are reality. 
This means that the issue comes to an end with a buddha, and you do not understand the Way. 
In the purport of the Discourse on the Way to Reach the Origin [of the Two Teachings], whom does the origin reach? 
the animation halts in the void. 
.’ 41a Zhou says, “You state that ‘Even though the Dharma-nature seeks emptiness by means of is precisely form , the absolute vacancy actually extends the meaning beyond the phenomenal world.’ I think personally that Laozi and Śākyamuni came about the same time and took charge of their own ﬁelds, and about their spheres there is nothing better than statement of this. 
If we ascend to the state of Laozi’s mind, Laozi differs from Śākyamuni; if we experience Śākyamuni’s intentions, [we will know that] Śākyamuni differs from Laozi. 
Since the spirits are in tranquility, they are two,476 and there are two ways. 
Even though you had not heard this before, I have previously heard it. 
If this is so, the animation that halts in the void is spontaneously void; it is in the void that you mentioned, and to direct oneself joyfully is not the way I mean, either. 
Regarding the statement, ‘[In regard to] brushing off the dust of the mind by oneself, . 
“You say in the Discourse on the Way to Reach the Origin [of the Two Teachings], ‘If you want to have Boyang not be tranquil, how could this be possible? 
If you would have him be tranquil and not anchored in the Way, how could this be possible, either?’” Zhou says, “Your statement is very apt, but I am still worried that have not yet reached the utmost mastery. 
In what you say here, you hit the mark in regard to the tranquility of the spirit, but you miss the point as to the void of things. 
If you think that tranquility is tranquility and you do not mean that it is the ultimate tranquility, and if you think that the animation is animation and you do not say it is the complete animation, I approve of this. 
“You say in the Discourse on the Way to Reach the Origin [of the Two Teachings], ‘If you think that Laozi did not accomplish anything about nonexistence, I do not expect you to grasp the meaning. 
If you think that accomplished something about nonexistence and yet did not accomplish anything about existence, what you understand differs from what I expect.’ Zhou says, “As for the accomplishments about existence and nonexistence, if we do not the apex, we are not ready [to know them]. 
In knowing nonexistence and knowing existence, I approve of the Daoist . 
Daoist words, however, simply do not reach the state of neither existence nor nonexistence. 
Neither existence nor nonexistence is what Three Sects has in store. 
If you reverence additional thought, you may just take a look at . 
“You say in the Discourse on the Way to Reach the Origin [of the Two Teachings], ‘If it is not a wild duck, it is a swallow. 
The trace is assuredly so. 
This is why I see the derivation of Daoism as the same as that of Buddhism.’” Zhou says, “Regarding your statement: 
‘When I see with my own eyes, the Way exists there’ and ‘In grasping the meaning, there is the foundation,’ I think that the true meaning of the Dharma-nature is precisely this state [of mind]. 
Buddhism has it, but what you obtained does not have the reason. 
The foundation of what you see with your own eyes exists in the traces of the teaching. 
“As for the true nature of all dharmas, Laozi’s does not have the purpose. 
Even if you try to see the lofty nature with your own eyes, there is no such thing in Laozi’s traces. 
41b “Your discussion says, ‘[You may wholeheartedly follow in the footprints of the Buddha] without disgracing the foundation of Daoism.’ On what point must we bring no disgrace? 
If when you search the traces of Daoists you think you ﬁnd that its derivation is the same as that of Buddhism, the real meaning of the ultimate truth can be found in writings. 
Do we ascertain in the Dao chapter or do we encounter it in the De chapter? 
If both chapters are not what you follow and you attain the profound in your mind, this is naturally your subjective point of view and it is simply the third , following Laozi and Śākyamuni. 
This is not what I dare to bring up here.” “You say in the Discourse on the Way to Reach the Origin [of the Two Teachings], ‘The two states of Yu and Rui had legal struggles over farmland, but this is something with which King Wen did not have to be concerned. 
This means to put a deerskin cap on the head in vain and to hold a staff with rings in the hand to fabricate oneself. 
You said that ‘The Dharma-nature seeks emptiness by means of [the doctrine that emptiness] is precisely form.’ If this is so, the Dharma-nature is perfect. 
Now here is a man who talks about the Dharma-nature holding a staff with rings. 
I will ﬁght against you.’ You serenely lean against a thorny tree (in ancient times, a place where lawsuits would be heard) and pass judgment after hearing the argument between them. 
You say that neither of them is good, and you comment that one of them wears a deerskin cap on his head in vain and the other holds a staff with rings in his hand in order to fabricate himself. 
“You say in the Discourse on the Way to Reach the Origin [of the Two Teachings], ‘Although I do not ﬂy with a ﬂap of the wings up to the four fruits , you have no doubt that I abide in Buddhism. 
Even though I do not ﬂy with a ﬂap of the wings up to the ﬁve supernatural powers, what regret would I have in abiding in Daoism?’” Zhou says, “You said, ‘I do not ﬂy with a ﬂap of the wings up to the four fruits’ but still you diligently abide in Buddhism. 
You said, ‘I do not ﬂy with a ﬂap of the wings up to the ﬁve supernatural powers.’ Why do you cast aside only the Daoist trace? 
“Since this is illogical, I have just made such a complaint. 
“You say in the Discourse on the Way to Reach the Origin [of the Two Teachings], ‘You precisely want to arrange Confucianism in a line and encircle Daoism. 
Since I have doubts about this lack, I inquired about it to you. 
Is it possible that he directs himself joyfully while cultivating in Confucianism? 
Even though this is not the main point of our discussion, if I speak freely, I must come to . 
Therefore I omitted their later writings. My purpose is to keep to the main point of the discussion. 
Letter to the Daoist Gu by Xie Zhenzhi I, Xie Zhenzhi, say, I respectfully read the Discourse on the Non-Chinese and the Chinese. 
You argue and discuss the origin in detail on the basis of the scriptures of these two teachings. 
I painstakingly explore what is profound, but I have nothing at all on which to rely. 
I, however, have tried to take a lesson and read it more than three times, but my humble doubts have not yet been resolved. 
At the beginning of the Discourse you state that the Buddha is precisely Laozi and Laozi is none other than the Buddha.477 Moreover, you compare the transformation of becoming a Transcendent with nirvana and see that longevity is equal to no death [in Buddhism]. 
Accordingly, you refer to the worldly instructions in order to tally them with the profound teaching . 
When I collect examples of these words, they probably appear equal to . 
In addition, you say that [the foreign language used by Buddhists] is similar to the noisy chirps of insects or birds, and that it is not something we should follow. 
Please let me try to speak about these issues. 
The Duke of Zhou and Confucius took Confucianism and Mozi’s teaching as a model to be followed. 
Laozi and Zhuangzi spoke about the teaching and clariﬁed a method to lead to . 
Moreover, insects and birds are different species . The ediﬁcation originally separates from the Way. 
When we want to say something about this, we must ﬁrst investigate the reasons. 
Originally, when a person participates in the two polarities (i.e., Heaven and Earth), this is called the three powers . 
How could the foreign country and China be divided in a place governed by the three powers? 
Then, we know that a person must be part of the human species and an animal must belong to groups of animals. Let us seek in familiar matters. 
The seven treasures are what people love. 
Consequently, Chinese and non-Chinese people equally value them. 
Since being respectful is what people honor, people of the world are sincerely concerned with this. 
Hence, perfect marital relations were practiced in the four states,478 not to mention the inﬂuences of the great ediﬁcation. 
Wouldn’t it then be diffused throughout the trichiliocosm? 
Speaking on the basis of Buddhist scriptures, you perhaps have heard that the Buddha appeared in the world. 
He united all traditional teachings into one; the world was placed in one orbit. 
At the time Śākyamuni was ﬁrst cultivating as a bodhisattva, he extensively ediﬁed people. 
Those who lived in that land when he attained buddhahood were granted special benevolences and favors; and they were all reborn in our domain. 
however, have been deluded for a long time in birth and death; they have followed and been imbued with secular customs; they temporarily lose the right path; and they simply have not been aware of the present enlightenment. 
I think that the Sage looks down upon all with the wisdom of the three transcendental knowledges, observes the faculties of each person, and understands that vary from person to person. 
Therefore, he expounded the three vehicles and spread it. 
First of all, the true Way is only one and the Dharma is nondual, too. 
Now, for the time being the three vehicles is expounded and there are different ways to guide , but the place to which all return is one. 
Hence, when traveled about, gathered people, and expounded the teaching, those who attained awakening were as numerous as grains of sand. 
In saving from drowning and delivering them from delusions, there is nothing to surpass this teaching. 
Therefore, the boundless world, including the present, the future, and the past, is collectively here. 
We know that the ninety-ﬁve schools are clearly not branches . 
At the beginning they said that their teaching is the same , but in the end they said that it is different . 
Consequently, we know that what is the same at the beginning is not the same, and what is different is, in the end, no different either. 
Isn’t this like absurdly beating an earthen pot and recklessly trying to harmonize with the basic sound huangzhong?479 Wouldn’t this be a deception? 
Now we see that a bird sings in the world of birds, and an animal roars in the world of beasts. 
If we truly hold one of many sounds and feel that it is different from all other sounds, we respond to it in a different manner. 
In this case, if the foreign country differs from China in the way to edify , why do you mix everything up? 
if a boat it will be dried out, and if a carriage it will be submerged, can be compared to this case. 
Propriety of the secular customs is the attenuated form of loyalty and good faith;480 it is not the purity of the Way. 
Those who cultivate the purity of the Way strive to go against secular customs. 
When secular customs can be deﬁed, the Way can be pure. 
It is difﬁcult to defy secular customs. Hence, we ought to leave behind extremes. 
In order to leave behind extremes, you must ﬁrst take off the crown, shave your head, put on a Buddhist monk’s robe, and abstain from a diet. 
If we take off the crown, we need no expense for worldly ornamentation. 
When we shave the head, we need not trouble with hairpins and combs. 
When we put on a Buddhist monk’s robe, we do not bother tailors to make our clothes. 
When we abstain from a diet, we stop thinking about our favorite foods. 
Regarding writings and subtle books such as the Tripiṭaka and the four Āgama sutras, they are exactly [what Laozi said “Those who devote themselves to learning from day to day to increase .”482 How could this be what Chinese customs could create? 
Moreover, you say, “Buddhist scriptures are complicated and illustrious, while Daoist scriptures are concise and profound.” Inferring from this, this means that if are profound, it is difﬁcult to hope to study them intensively and to rely on them; if they are illustrious, it is easy to hope to seek them carefully; if they are concise, they must be insufﬁcient in indicating the reasons; and if they are complicated, they are a collection of interesting points and there are many keys to the way . 
In the Buddhist teaching, anything that has a form is considered to be illusory. 
Therefore forget themselves in order to save sentient beings. 
In the Daoist teaching, one’s self is considered to be true. 
Hence take medicine and food in order to preserve their lives. 
This is certainly impossible. 
If we deeply realize that the three realms of existence are abodes for the long night of spiritual darkness, and life is a master of the great dream,483 we long for the Way to awakening. 
Even if our body could be reﬁned and we could live without death, this originally differs from Laozi’s fundamental way, and it is not the same as the Buddhist principle. 
Why do you make such a statement? 
The spirit dwells in a body, similar to at an inn. 
If we go to an inn, why should we feel a persistent attachment to the eaves? 
The perception of the sensory perception and the form of what can be formed are not the substance of sacredness. 
Even the life spans of Yao and Confucius were less than a hundred years. 
Hence, from an eternal kalpa ago, the spiritual intelligence has been puriﬁed and reﬁned. 
As the spiritual intelligence has been puriﬁed , its function severs existence and nonexistence; it brilliantly transcends with the wisdom of the four phrases (i.e., existence, emptiness, existence and emptiness, and neither existence nor emptiness). 
Furthermore, those who “carve a mark on the side of a boat” (i.e., Buddhist monks) pray to a golden , while those who “wait by the stump” 42b harbor the hope to ascend to Heaven as a Transcendent sprouting wings.484 Consequently practice the six pāramitās in the phenomenal world, while are hindered by delusion and eat numinous mushrooms . 
When we seek some traces of the origins of two teachings (i.e., Buddhism and Daoism), there are different views, the broad and the narrow, and there is an apparent difference between superior and inferior. 
They have entirely an intimate feeling of self; it is not the universal great knowledge. 
Then, it is known that they can discern differences in the secular customs by the teachings. 
brilliantly have arisen competing with each other. 
It can be said that pointing to the trails made by an insect and considering them to be the Chinese written language invented by Cang , or like drinking the milk of a poisonous insect and thinking that it is clariﬁed butter. 
This is very sad! 
The Buddhist Way is vast and extensive. The capacity of wisdom cannot be completely expressed. 
It is difﬁcult to survey the traces of responses by form. 
When we analyze nonexistence, even Mount Tai is exhausted in vain; it scatters along with an autumn down.485 We make use of the ten powers in order to destroy devils , and promote the four immeasurable minds in order to deliver secular people. 
When we raise the Dharma torch of prajñā, what dark place would we be unable to illuminate? 
If we concentrate with the Dharma might of samādhi, what distant place would we be unable to subdue? 
Why should we doubt that is not effective in both the foreign country and in China? 
The Second Letter Given to the Daoist Gu I, Xie Zhenzhi, address myself to you. 
Thank you very much for your response and explanation! I exhaustively examined the profound situation. 
You already have harmonized smoothly Daoism and Buddhism and yet Śākyamuni from Li just as separating the Jing River from the Wei River. 
“If we prolonged each by the addition of the proper lines, [then all events possible under the sky might have their representation.]”486 They will accordingly become games or gambles, .487 The more you explain about the Buddha, the more obscure the exquisite purpose becomes. 
When we decorate a shop counter in order to trade valuables, we do not sell them on a bright night. 
is like, as says, trying to erase your footprints by running around, or trying to stop casting a shadow by jumping.488 How could you avoid ? 
According to on what your discourse is grounded, you think that insects and birds are different species and that the non-Chinese and the Chinese differ from each other in manners and customs. 
I think that the three powers equally unite, the human reason is one, there are minor differences in secular teachings, and the teaching of the Dharma is almost the same [for non-Chinese and Chinese]. 
The Grand Terminus is divided into the two polarities (i.e., yin and yang),492 which are intertwined in vain. 
When the ﬁve skandhas get together, the body and consciousness unreasonably manifest. 
Consciousness is formed on the basis of deﬁlements, while the body arises from the condition of attachment and hindrance. 
Before the time of Fuxi, many people were basically 42c foolish. 
Since they were basically foolish, they lived in trees or dwelled in caves, and drinking their blood, and swallowing the hair and feathers.493 Sovereign and subject, father and son, saw each other just as people of the northern tribes and those of Yue state saw each other. 
They were still like beasts. 
It was not the world into which Daoism was introduced and where love and justice had inﬂuenced the people. 
When the people became bogged down in desires and lost themselves in waves, they thought to deliver themselves by clinging to a precipice. 
When we deliver ourselves, we pray for wholesomeness. 
When we pray for wholesomeness, sacredness responds to us. What is sacredness? 
It is what we communicate with through our receptivity to things. 
Communicating is not self-communication and receptivity is not self-receptivity, either. 
Receptivity is constantly on this side, while communication comes always from that side. 
Speaking from that side, [it is like] a mirror hung in a lofty hall. Speaking of this side, all images coming back to this side. 
Since the sacredness responded to that land , the voice spreads in this land . 
When we see the brightness of the sun and moon, why do we have to borrow the observation of Li Zhu, ? 
When we hear wrathful thunder, why do we have to have Ziye (i.e., music master Kuang, a blind musician of the Spring and Autumn period) hear it? 
Consequently, it does not matter that different things, such as the humble and the noble, go with each other in the same way, and in the difference between the two polarities of left and right there is no harm in natural relations. 
Since there is no harm in natural relations, clouds and practice the Dharma teaching. 
The Way is one, while form is dual. 
The Way is truth, and form is worldliness. 
Since truth is still one, worldliness is still dual. 
We make a thorough investigation of duality to attain unity; we ought to unify the law. 
If we eliminate worldliness and return to truth, we will certainly go against worldliness. 
For this reason, the Tathāgata established the model and made various teachings the same in the eternal past. 
If Confucius and Laozi were the Buddha, they would dim the light, secretly lead , rectify their prejudice to deliver them, establish benevolence, create righteousness, and conform to secular people’s feelings. 
Hence, maintain their bodies to be complete, continue worship, extend their kindness to their family members of the six relations, attend to their health, nourish their natures, themselves, and other things. 
However while these are considered to be very good, they are not considered to be perfect. 
Probably this is for a limited system; “whip up their lagging .”494 How is it possible to compare the Way with supreme enlightenment , and to compare the sages with Śākyamuni? 
When Buddhism is expounded clearly, it has essential points and it is competent and extensive. 
Since exquisite and those of coarse fathom it, strongness and weakness agree with each other. 
It is easy to draw a circle by using a pair of compasses, but difﬁcult to do this only by hand. 
Daoist scriptures are simple and crude. Many are composed in a farfetched manner. 
Regarding scriptures such as the Wonderful Scripture of the Truth of the Numinous Jewel , adopted the Lotus Sutra for it. 
to chew rocks and eat clouds. 
It is not simply that their law cannot be followed, it is also difﬁcult to consider that their way is the same [as that of Buddhists]. 
Yet to completely employ wuwei has not been able to remove existence. 
The nine philosophical schools are even closer to what [the teaching of] the three vehicles of the Buddhist school leads to. 
Since the nine philosophical schools are even closer to [what the Buddhist teaching of the three vehicles leads to], we attain motion and rest here. 
The noumenal principle of meditative power is merely part of [the teaching of] the three ; it is not the culmination. 
Meditation sutras are subtle. The characteristics of the objective world are exquisite and profound. 
Even if we try to become united in truth with these, it is still impossible to accomplish it. 
Now you say, “The Way lies in wuwei and is simply to attain the One.” “It lies in wuwei and is simply to attain the One” means to commune with what is profound for a thousand years. 
If one were to reject studying and reﬁning his thought, would this not be negligence? 
How could it be a tentative method to lead to Daoism? 
Examining respectfully what you said, not only do you not understand Buddhism, you do not understand Daoism either. 
The profound Sage concealed himself . 
The long night drifts slowly. 
Many stars shine brightly. 
When the sun luminously rises and shines, the lunar mansions rapidly disappear. 
Round and square should be uniform for use as construction materials, Even though they are different from each other as raw materials. 
If one is solely deluded, he is not awakened. 
The big-headed fellows are surprised that departs far away. 
Even if a good grasscutter slights prajñā, How could we censure transcendental wisdom? 
End of Fascicle Six of The Collection for the Propagation and Clariﬁcation Critique of the Daoist Gu’s Discourse on the Non-Chinese and the Chinese by Zhu Zhaozhi, Attendant-in-Ordinary I read your lofty talk on the non-Chinese and the Chinese. 
You discuss the two teachings and present the purposes of each of the scriptures. 
deeply accords with what is profound, and your wonderful words are virtuous and pleasant. 
The distinct paths for all ages are united into one path in the present dynasty. 
Questions and disputes for successive generations are happily today. 
There are many people who are cleansed and comforted. 
There is no discussion more beneﬁcial to the world than this. 
This is because it is not understood that although there are two different tastes, sweet and bitter, they must be the same in nature in order to make a body. 
Therefore, [Buddhists and Daoists] attack each other and then strange doctrines arise. 
are repeated and become complicated. This causes quite a lot of harm. 
is at the beginning, just as rises in the sky and the light covers the outside of this world; and yet in the end, just as sets in an abyss, the light is obscured and the brightness is lost. 
If a spiritual guide loses himself, many others are also lost. 
Therefore, I forget that I am shallow and ignorant, and then lead and deliver . 
Now, I will ﬁrst express my thoughts and later I will speak of what I ﬁnd regrettable. 
I think that since “it is right to follow the good as on the course of a stream,”497 it is not regrettable merely to go against traditional . 
So, I send this to you for the time being in order to temporarily substitute it for a meeting. 
43b Since the sacred Way is void and tranquil, it perfectly responds to anything with no set pattern; because of its response with no set pattern, it responds to everything. 
Therefore, if we inspect the mind from the point of sacredness, originally there is no name in a myriad of understandings. 
When things are spontaneously understood and named, with the names they are considered to be evident. 
Hence, those who have complete intelligence are called ones of right, perfect enlightenment ; those who smoothly and thoroughly understand are called sages; and what opens up [the knowledge of the issues of] things and accomplishes the undertakings is called the Way.498 In this case, a sage is merely the one of right, perfect enlightenment and the one of right, perfect enlightenment is nothing other than the Way. 
You should understand this. 
Why is it necessary to seek it in a distant place? 
Nevertheless, rules of propriety and the pure precepts have three hundred rules, they are equal in number, and there are equally three thousand deportment or formal manners . 
What may differ between lies only in the names “Buddhism” and “Daoism” and in their appearances. 
A mastermind still considers the physical body to be like an inn . 
How would it be worthwhile for him to discuss the Chinese formal dress called gunmian?499 What may be questioned lies only in the beginning of establishing teachings, in which China and the non-Chinese country differ from each other in their function. 
It is proper to argue the point that present manners and customs are managed concurrently and will change according to the current of the times. 
Now I will speak about this point. 
In a sage’s instruction, action is certainly based on the right order. 
In the eastern country , where splendor is valued, there is the Chinese formal dress called gunmian; the formal manners of ceremonies and music; rules for deportment; and decorations such as full court dress, a formal gown, a crown, and hairpins, in order to propagate the way; it is probably to lead to become close to . 
Since simplicity is valued in non-Chinese manners and customs, the people are instructed with extreme plainness; a shaved head is a beautiful appearance; clothing is made without cutting to shape; emotions are calmed; the intellectual function is opened; and the spirit is expected to be free [from anxiety and agitation] for kalpas, in order to develop the minds; it is to recommend to keep away from . 
The Daoist teaching is to take transcendent elixirs called zhiying, to eat clouds, to take elixir, to breathe in the Grand One , to exhale the old, and to inhale the new. 
The great is that the spirit ﬂies , sprouting wings . 
The minor is that the body becomes light and strong and has no illness; that is to say, maintaining the body, one can expect the efﬁcacies. 
All three teachings have one function of being moved by something and responding to it, but this is not what I think is the culmination . 
This is tentatively called nonexistence. 
How is it different from this? 
Therefore, from the time of the Han dynasty on, simple customs have degenerated, benevolence and righteousness have gradually declined, the rules of the Great Way have not been transmitted, studies of the Five Classics have declined even more, great justice has already become perversely bad, and sublime and profound words have vanished as well. 
No one roams at “the gate of many wonders” ;500 43c deportment based on the golden mean is not observed, the art of courtesy is already ruined, Chinese ceremonial music falls as well, manners and customs come to an end, there is no division between sovereign and subject, the authentic teaching has deteriorated, and human ethics have become disordered. 
Thereupon, the sacred way completely governs [all things] and reaches distant lands as time goes by. 
The profound ediﬁcation was transmitted to the eastern land and granted benevolence to this world and kindness to sentient beings. 
The essential signiﬁcance has been revived. 
Consequently, houses of sublime and profound words were built here and there, and there are guests who chant the profound words all around. 
This can be observed in reality; it is not merely empty talk, a series of vain words. 
When begins to eat, she feeds the baby tasty meat; when becomes bored of the tasty meat, she changes to tallow and honey; and when is tired of tallow and honey, she lets the whole body rest peacefully. 
It is extremely beneﬁcial to the baby to be peaceful and comfortable both on the inside and on the outside, isn’t it? 
Reason is just like this. 
Nevertheless, if one unrestrainedly slanders and recklessly separates it from [Confucianism and Daoism], he has not realized the center of the ring (i.e., the absolute state beyond the judgment of right or wrong).502 I cannot discuss . 
Correspondence exchanged between you two wise men pushes and swings me; it is as powerful as breaking timber. 
If we analyze it with reason, would it be necessary to push and swing [people with such powerful correspondence]? 
You began with the clear that Confucius and Laozi are the Buddha, but at the conclusion of the writing, your discussion is desultory. 
Why Chinese government ofﬁcials’ ceremonial robes and the manner of raising and kneeling on the ground are all types of Chinese deportment, and slanderingly say that the worship of putting one’s head on the Buddha’s feet is just like when a fox squats down? 
Why Chinese ceremonial dress and bowing by completely bending the body are respectful manners in the region near the imperial capital, and increase humiliation by saying that the practice of kneeling with one’s right knee on the ground is just like a crouching dog? 
Let me ask you a question. 
If Confucius is one of right, perfect enlightenment and Śākyamuni is one of wrong views, I cannot tolerate to hear this talk. 
If you approve of as one of rightness and truth, for what reason do you despise and reproach him? 
You have already lost the intention to stand in awe of the admonitions of sages. 
Moreover, you have forgotten the courtesy of not having one’s own way. 
This is the ﬁrst thing I ﬁnd regrettable. 
Futhermore, you say, “To maintain completely one’s body and to abide by ancestor worship are in the teaching to continue wholesomeness. 
To damage one’s physical form and change one’s family name are in the learning to cut off evil.” This means that son of Shangchen (King Mu of Chu state, who killed his father and usurped the throne)503 would have had the achievement of carrying on wholesomeness , and that Rāhula, who became a Buddhist monk, would have had the determination to cut off evils. 
Again, you say, “ abandon their wives and children in token of a minor degree, and discontinue their ancestor worship in token of a major degree.” The law of spiritall beings is obscure and vast; it is difﬁcult to clarify. 
Therefore, when Zilu asked a question , Confucius did not explain.504 It must be because life and death belong to different paths, and the condition of spirits are hard to understand. 
Would it be because the sage was unable to explain it? 
In fact, was afraid that the wise would not be able to understand this. 
You already accept that the spiritual ediﬁcation was transmitted 44a to the east, and yet you also say that took the tide with funeral services. 
This is the third point I ﬁnd regrettable. 
Moreover, you say, “The direct teaching can promote modesty and suppleness , while the indirect teaching (i.e., Buddhism) can restrain arrogance and toughness.” I read this statement three times, and it is egregiously disordered. 
Since modesty and suppleness are easily contravened, we should promote them harmoniously with the indirect . 
Since arrogance and toughness are difﬁcult to edify, we need to restrain them diligently with the direct . 
When we examine the mind and inspect these matters, isn’t this indeed the case? 
If rice bran gets in your eye, you cannot tell east from west. 
If you are attached to your biased view, you are confused about the meaning of an expression. 
Your statement misses the mark. This is the fourth point I ﬁnd regrettable. 
In addition, you say, “Since humble themselves, only the intelligent advance; and since [the words of the Buddhist teaching] promote , the ignorant vie with each other in moving forward.” Your statement about the words of the Daoist teaching is true. 
It covers and carries all things. It raises and educates all things that have a form. 
Once the Buddha’s voice sounds, those who practice the four immeasurable minds are equally in line, the three vehicles equally follow him obediently, and heavenly beings and dragons altogether submit themselves to him. 
Your statement “The ignorant vie with each other in moving forward” appears to be a false accusation as well. 
Furthermore, you say, “Buddhism is the way to destroy evils, while Daoism is the way to give rise to wholesomeness.” Regarding the way to destroy evils, I can ﬁnd no fault. 
Stopping evils and performing good deeds are the reasons why teachings arise. 
I have not understood about the way to give rise to wholesomeness. 
Who has the way ? 
If wholesomeness is already wholesomeness, why is it necessary to give rise to it? 
If wholesomeness is not wholesomeness, it does not mean to give rise to wholesomeness. Then the outward reason for giving rise to wholesomeness has no entrustment. 
The Way is wholesomeness. 
If it cannot shake off evils, it is distorted as a teaching. 
The Great Way is equally broad for all, but you want to limit it . 
This is the sixth point I ﬁnd regrettable. 
Moreover you say, “For those who are brutal and stubborn, it is the best to be taught by the Buddha. 
For those who are kind and gentle and who keep their minds free from preoccupation and open to receive , it is the utmost to follow the way.”505 To beat and bring a man who is brave and ﬁerce to submission and to have a man who is brutal and tyrannical become peaceful are really Śākyamuni’s great achievements. 
I am not against your bright purpose . 
Nevertheless, the power of the Way is strong and brilliant and the merit of its ediﬁcation reaches far-distant places. 
“makes the nature complete and preserves what exists continually.”506 There is nothing that is not placed under its favor. 
You unconsciously fall into a persistent biased view. 
Don’t you realize that being narrow-minded and inferior impedes the Way? 
When I open and examine the heading [of your Discourse, I see that] you ﬁrst admonish one’s personal assumption, but while making a statement and presenting a discussion you unconsciously change your mind, and you have difﬁculty in maintaining both your claim and nominal deﬁnition. 
This is the seventh point I ﬁnd regrettable. 
You say, furthermore, “The eight represent all foreign scriptures of the western region and describe both extensive things and small things.” The Diamond Sutra consists of less than a thousand sentences. 
There are minute teachings and detailed precepts , and ritual codes go into particulars as well. 
This statement goes against reality. This is the eighth point I ﬁnd regrettable. 
Moreover, you say, “Observing each country, the nonChinese country is of a cruel nature, while China is of a mild nature.” Let me ask you a question. 
You unfoundedly think that is mild while is harsh. This is the ninth point I ﬁnd regrettable. 
Moreover, you say, “One who plays the go game is wiser than one who travels around. 
One who expounds and chants is better than one who makes quips and jokes.” Thinking this over, the reasons why the reﬁned taste could be transmitted and why the scriptures and writings were not abandoned are really due to to make people understand by expounding and chanting and to attain enlightenment through inquiring and seeking. 
Therefore, said, “Not thoroughly discussing what is learned is the thing that occasions me solicitude.”511 You, however, compare [expounding and chanting Buddhist scriptures] with making quips and jokes. 
Let me ask you a question. 
First of all, you want to forget the words before you apprehend the ideas. This is the tenth point I ﬁnd regrettable. 
has these ten points that I ﬁnd regrettable. I cannot resolve them myself. 
I hope that you, a gentleman, will explain them further for me. 
Xie had a criticism and a different view as well. 
I have had a look at the correspondence between you and Xie , Attendant-in-Ordinary, regarding the Discourse on the Non-Chinese and the Chinese, in which you clarify the meaning that are united into one. 
It can be said that they are concise, detailed, and reﬁne discussions. 
With regard to deeply honoring the decorations of Chinese ceremonial robes and crowns, rejecting the simplicity of taking the tonsure, stating that the manner of raising and kneeling on the ground is respectful, and disgracing the manner of sitting like a squatting fox, they conﬁne the Chinese people and cut off their adoption of foreign methods. 
Even though the metaphor of a boat and a carriage is skillful, the feeling of impartiality and benevolence is not enough. 
You already leveled the origin reach and meet, but the way with which the tool entrusts itself is blocked. 
In this case, we only get a distant view of the awakening of the three vehicles in this land, and the ferry of the six pāramitas is a long way off from us at the present point. 
Those who open Buddhist scriptures and play with the doctrines are greatly disappointed and discontented. 
Xie looks down on the Way of Transcendents and praises Buddhism; he considers the art of sprouting wings [and ascending to Heaven as a Transcendent] to be a groundless doctrine and takes the assertion of becoming a Buddhist monk as following the authentic text. 
It is as if one knows his ﬁngers are ﬁngers and does not know there is no difference from other people’s ﬁngers. 
Is this the reason to reach all aspects to grasp the meaning, or the thought that are virtuously the same? 
265 I was gradually educated in the Dharma early in my life and later enjoyed the taste of Daoism. 
I always think that respecting the emptiness and valuing the nothingness are the same in the ultimate purport. 
Both a snare and a net are laid; in principle there is no prejudice. 
Each person should follow whichever teaching he can best understand and enter that way. 
Why is it necessary to be able to inherit the emperor’s upper robe with the dragon ﬁgures and yet be unable to ride on precious stones? 
I have to work a lot because of my poverty. I am behind in my studies. 
It has been more than ten years since I covered the boxes of my books and writings. 
What I learned in my childhood and what I heard previously are now all forgotten. 
I have spent years in idleness, having a willful mind. 
Every day I lament by myself through the long night. 
Hence, I am writing down my humble opinion, exhausting my poor ability. 
I hope you will again give instruction for me and give guidance on the points about which I am doubtful. 
I, Guangzhi, bow with my head to the ground. 
The Discourse says, “Raising [a ceremonial tablet], kneeling on the ground, and bowing by completely bending the body are respectful manners in the region near the imperial capital, while squatting like a fox and crouching like a dog are reverential manners in uncivilized places.” My question is this: 
Regarding the point that each person attains what he is content with, there is originally nothing with which to argue . 
The Discourse says, “Even if it is said that since the united point of the teachings is equal, and that the teachings are interchangeable, is it possible to wade across the river by carriage or travel on land by boat? 
It is certainly impossible.” My question is this: 
Teaching is intended to follow human feelings, but human feelings are not a teaching. 
Teaching has no ﬁxed pattern because human feelings are not uniﬁed. 
What human feelings, which are not uniﬁed, proceed to varies. 
In a prairie to a remote land, why would we take that ? 
Why is it impossible to use both forms of transportation, both boat and carriage? 
The Discourse says, “ is neither completely the same nor completely different. 
abandon their wives and children in token of a minor degree and discontinue their ancestor worship in token of a major degree.” My question is this: 
It is not a fault of being the same. 
Would an ox used to plough a ﬁeld rather be forever released from sacriﬁcial use since it is useless for an ancestral temple? 
If go against virtue and offend the order, they should make no action. 
Therefore, having a simple meal and practicing the Way are not unfortunate signs, and being in full dress and eating the bread of idleness are not the ways to cultivate the right . 
The Discourse says, “What should be valued in the ultimate principle of the universe is the Way, and what should be despised in phenomena is 267 secularity. 
If it is because of the Way, the Way is originally one. 
If it is because of secular , the secular [customs of Chinese and non-Chinese] are completely different .” My question is this: 
Since the ultimate Way is void and comprehended, it is honorable even without having a rank of nobility. 
Since secular have nothing that is not stagnant, they are humble even if they are not rejected. 
The humble is unable to have no trouble. 
The honored is naturally content with itself. 
The sphere of secular troubles is also equal. 
If the Way is one and troubles is equal, what is good and what is bad? 
(I.e., there is no distinction between good and bad.) Therefore, they are all ediﬁcation by sages. 
When delusion is exhausted and intelligence arises, oneself and others is spontaneously forgotten. 
The Discourse says, “The teaching of nonarising is indirect, while the teaching of immortality is direct. 
The direct teaching can promote modesty and suppleness , while the indirect teaching can restrain arrogance and toughness.” My question is this: 
Nonarising is precisely immortality, and immortality is nothing other than nonarising. The names differ but the contents are the same. 
Is it possible to hold the distinction between the direct and the indirect? 
If we separate the superior from the inferior because of the difference of their later development, we should restrain toughness by the direct and promote suppleness by the indirect . 
Therefore, Confucius said, “Since Qiu withdraws, I urge him forward. 
You is busy with other people’s affairs. 
The Discourse says, “Buddhism is elegant and extensive, while Daoism is simple and exquisite. 
What is exquisite is not something in which clumsy people believe, and what is extensive is not something that exquisite people can handle.” My question is this: 
One who acquires extensive information and a retentive memory must go along with the mental function that is profound and broad. 
If he sincerely cultivates good conduct, he must follow the principles and reach the subtle . 
If his principles are exquisite, he has nothing that is not exhausted in intelligence. 
In that case, what is exquisite and what is extensive are equally meritorious and mutually make use of each other. 
The Discourse says, “The words of the Buddhist teaching are splendid and they promote , while the words of the Daoist teaching are sincere and cause to humble themselves. 
Since [the words of the Daoist teaching] cause to humble themselves, only the intelligent advance; and since [the words of the Buddhist teaching promote people to feel better,] the ignorant vie with each other in moving forward.” My question is this: are splendid, but they are not apart from the principles. 
are sincere, but they have not reached the void. 
There is order in the relation between being molded and crafted. 
If the teachings are aimed at those whose natural disposition is ignorant, then not only the intelligent advance. 
If certainly aimed at those who possess intelligence, the ignorant are unable to go forward. 
If both the intelligent and the ignorant can , why is it necessary to promote them [to feel better] or to humble themselves? 
This is something about which you ought to make a further argument. 
The Discourse says, “Buddhist scriptures are complicated and illustrious, while Daoist scriptures are concise and profound. 
Since are profound, it is hard to discern the gate to the subtle . 
Since [Buddhist scriptures] are apparent, it is easy to follow the road to true . 
If we follow true , we will not get lost on our way 269 home . 
If we discern the subtle , we will completely attain all thoughts.” My question is this: 
Since are concise, it is easy to follow them. 
If are complicated, it would be difﬁcult to follow them logically. How could you easily follow ? 
If we follow true , we will not get lost on our way home. 
We will be able to be led to the culmination of the Way. 
Even though are not profound and concise, we will spontaneously reach there deeply. 
The Discourse says, “For those who are brutal and stubborn, it is the best to be taught by the Buddha. 
For those who are kind and gentle and who keep their minds free from preoccupation and open to receive , it is the utmost to follow Daoism.” My question is this: 
Wrong views and the distortion of truth are what the Dharma does not allow. 
Making other people happy means to be able to accept anything. 
The meaning of to keep one’s mind free from preoccupation and open to receive mysteriously matches [the meaning of the Buddhist tenet to make other people happy and give up all attachments]. 
I do not know on what teaching brutal and stubborn people rely. 
If you say that receive varies, you are rather like the one who carved a mark on the side of his boat [to indicate the place where he dropped his sword into the water]. 
How could there be a case in which [Buddhism and Daoism] tally with each other? 
The Discourse says, “Buddhism is the way to destroy evils, while Daoism is the way to give rise to wholesomeness. 
Moreover, we should not imitate the teaching of the western tribes with the nature of the Chinese people.” My question is this: 
Your saying that is the way to give rise to wholesomeness is very good, but your statement “We should not imitate ” is disgraceful . 
I am unconvinced. 
Let me ask you a question about the nature of the Chinese people and the nature of the western tribesmen. 
You consider the nature of the Chinese people to be purely good, and that of the western tribesmen to be fundamentally evil. 
If [the nature of the western tribesmen] was fundamentally evil, how could it be broken by reason? 
If was purely good, what signiﬁcance would there be in giving rise to wholesomeness? 
Therefore, we know that if have evil, which can be broken, they have not left behind wholesomeness; and if have wholesomeness, which can arise, they have not escaped from evil. 
In that case, wholesomeness and evil go together and mutually align as deep or shallow. 
Accordingly, the fact that Rāhula was benevolent and gentle is not the inﬂuence of the light from the east . 
King Jie and [the robber] Zhi were ﬁerce and cruel; was this caused by a concentration of the vapors of the west? 
If the wholesomeness of this is different from the wholesomeness of that [land of the western tribes], and if the evil of that differs from the evil of this , in wholesomeness and evil [the Chinese people and the western tribesmen] would be essentially against each other. 
could there then be a case where they reach the same point? 
The Discourse says, “Regarding the manner of squatting and the incomprehensible foreign language that can be compared to the noisy chirping of insects and birds, why is it worthy to imitate them?” My question is this: 
Even though the respectful mind is developed through rites, rites are not the same as the respectful mind. 
Consequently, when a ruler sets at ease and the people obey him, the gems and silk are kept in a bamboo chest . 
When manners and customs are simple, sincere, and peaceful, bells and drums are no longer sounded. 
Moreover, the use of bells and drums is not on the same level of that of the two polarities , probably because [bells and drums] are used as tentative expedients from necessity in order to rescue 271 . 
If we return , we do not mind whether are the same as or different from . 
Now, as for squatting like a fox and crouching like a dog, who says are not respectful? 
With respect one straightens his mind. 
Who says are impolite? 
Among groups of those who bear consciousness, human beings show their nobility. 
The nobility does not consist in language. 
language lies in treasuring principles. 
Therefore, since the kylin and the male phoenix harbor benevolence in mind, they are valued in sages’ books. 
The chimpanzee can speak [but he does not know principles]. 
If one sticks to language and removes principles, this is not what the wise depend on. 
Accordingly even the unchanging the elder Li is beyond the desire for fame.515 Vimalakīrti’s silence is not superceded by skillful speeches.516 If we inspect the words , both his and mine have aspects to be driven away. 
When the aspects of both [Buddhism and Daoism] are driven away, trying to moisten something with tiny bubbles, should be rejected. 
If there is no boundary [between Laozi’s purpose and that of Śākyamuni], neither goes against nobility. 
Why do you view prajñā from a distance and say that it is not wisdom? 
Why do you humiliate and rigorously compare them to insects and birds? 
I carefully examined your discussion repeatedly, day after day. I have not yet been satisﬁed. 
Moreover, according to regional custom there are different languages. 
Taking only China as a familiar example, Qi state and Lu state are not the same . 
The use of the terms that mean “to begin,” quanyu and chuluo, has also changed from ancient times to the present. 
If that is wrong, this is not right either. 
If this is right, that alone cannot be wrong. 
Since both cannot be right, they are equally wrong. 
Imagine a case in which our Chinese spoken language ﬂows into that country. 
When we solely clarify this point, beams and pillars become equal .517 If [the biased views of] both sides are concurrently removed, wouldn’t they then understand each other? 
Principles are inmost, deep, and subtle; they are not what we ought to take part in. 
I sincerely wish to discern the right profound teaching, and for the time being I simply express in a straightforward manner. 
The Disputation on the Daoist Gu’s Discourse on the Non-Chinese and the Chinese by Huitong at Yecheng I was at leisure at the beginning of the summer, with nothing particular to do, and I forgot the time passing by, when I opened Mr. 
Gu’s discourse, which is so bright to inspire the ignorant. 
I saw that it discusses the origin of the differences and similarities and clariﬁes the purport of right and wrong. 
The expressions are rich, the principles are evident, the writing is splendid, and is truly profound. 
Every time I closely read it, I forget my fatigue. 
It is really the so-called reﬁned work by a distinguished literary person. Nevertheless, when I examine the ultimate purpose, there are many points that make me doubt and laugh. 
It is like the story of the blind man who went to collect pearls and returned home with red beans, thinking that he had obtained treasures, or the story of the deaf man who wanted to listen to music—he hears a donkey braying, is delighted by it, and thinks that he 273 understands music. 
When I saw that you refer to Daoist scriptures in your discussion, I became more confused. 
What Laozi composed in ancient times is only the Five Thousand Words. 
Everything else is miscellaneous and they are dissolutely fallacious doctrines, yet you distinguish and call them Daoist scriptures. 
On what basis does this happen? 
I hope you will examine this point thrice and remove the delusion soon. 
The Discourse says, “If Confucius and Laozi were not the Buddha, who else would this be applicable to? 
Daoism is precisely Buddhism; Buddhism is none other than Daoism.” Speaking about this statement, I am afraid that you are completely confused. 
scriptures state, “Mahākāśyapa is called Laozi and Kumāra Guangjing is called Confucius over there.”518 We know that Laozi is not the Buddha. 
In fact, your views about principles have not yet been great. 
They, moreover, propagated the virtue , and showed merit and demerit of beings. 
Later Buddhism was transmitted. 
Nevertheless, it is difﬁcult to observe the Great Way, while it is easy to follow small comprehensions . 
This is a lamentation from ancient times and not a lamentation with signs originated today. 
Laozi composed the Five Thousand Words, but many people offer dubious explanations. 
Some people set forth fallacies to confuse people’s minds, and some pass on licentious and cruel stories to arouse people’s nature. 
Hence those who perform good deeds are few, while those who are steeped in vice are many. 
I think that the decorative adornments of the ofﬁcial class, the respectful manner of bowing by completely bending the body, the funeral rite—these were probably when the Great Way declined. 
Knowledge and desires arose and dishonest practices increased day after day. 
Sages accordingly prohibited these by ethical education and controlled them through laws and institutions. 
Therefore, “propriety was established when faith and honesty became weak; it was the commencement of disorder.”519 We have already lost wuwei and esteem phenomena (youwei; Skt. 
Regarding the appearance of shaving one’s head, bowing down to squat like a fox, and the custom of burial, I think that these are insufﬁcient in splendor; they are parsimonious. 
it is already true that wealth cannot be maintained. 
Laozi said that the ﬁve colors consequently cause people to become blind,520 and that even if one amasses a lot of wealth he will certainly lose it later.521 Accordingly, it is the highest degree of modesty to take the tonsure, put on a black robe, abandon one’s wealth, and leave behind the secular world. 
India is the center of the world where Buddhism originated. 
This indicates the good order and solemnity of the Great Dharma and the gravity and reverence of the highest teaching. 
You, compare it to a fox’s squatting. 
Hence, evil spirits assist vice and violent devils destroy what is right. This refers to you. 
is similar to using a ladle to attempt to reduce a large river or the sea, or raising a hand to block the light of the sun and moon. 
[Although you may do these things,] you can neither reduce the water in a large river or the sea, nor shield the brightness of the sun and moon. 
In early antiquity the nature of the people was still pure. 
People could be bright without availing themselves of ethical education, and they were spontaneously well governed, without being inﬂicted with punishment. 
When a man died was laid in an open ﬁeld. 
No mound was raised over it, nor were trees planted around it, nor was there any ﬁxed period of mourning;523 whenever the people grieved, they cried. 
This is the pure practice of ancient times. 
Furthermore, you compare the two teachings of Daoism and Buddhism to a boat and carriage. 
If knowledgeable people hear this, there is no one who would not smile . 
I think that the Way of 275 Heaven keeps silent and sages have no attachment. 
Therefore, the Way is enlarged by people; it is not that the Way enlarges people.524 In that case, the Sage’s spiritual mirror is proﬁcient in everything. 
Nevertheless, referring exclusively to one , you say that it is impossible to practice both for salvation. 
It is just as when the wonderful sunshine appears in the morning it offers illumination according to each thing, and when timely wind blows unceasingly in the evening, things produce various sounds according to their shapes. 
Accordingly, just as there are differences in shapes, the sounds are not the same, and since things differ from each other, the way illuminates them also varies. 
The sun does not illuminate differently in accordance with each thing. 
The wind does not cause things of various shapes to produce sound differently in accordance with each shape. 
It is simply known that the sun is one and the wind is one, but the things that receive them vary. 
You take up the metaphor of a boat and carriage. 
The great teaching is impartial and the highest virtue is unbiased. 
There is a common purport in educating sentient beings and the same destination toward which to lead people. 
They have the same voice in the foreign land and in China. 
Could there be [a teaching and an ediﬁcation] only for the Chinese? In the past, when Gongming Yi played the musical piece Cao in the note qingjue for a cow, just lowered her head and ate as before. 
This does not mean that she did not listen to , but did not meet her ears. 
On the other hand, if there were the buzz of a mosquito or gadﬂy or the lowing of an orphaned calf, she would promptly prick up her ears, swish her tail, and stamp on the ground, listening to it. 
What you hear now is probably something like the buzz of a mosquito or a gadﬂy. 
Furthermore, you say, “ abandon their wives and children in token of a minor degree and discontinue their ancestor worship in token of a major degree. 
The inner is different from the outer , just as speech differs from silence. 
If one burns incense at the altar in the evening, intones a Buddhist scripture at the temple in the morning, worships, repents, and entreats unceasingly, will reach his relatives in successive kalpas as a token of the great degree, and all people of the world as a token of the minor degree. 
The immensity of ﬁlial piety and benevolence like this cannot be surmised by the ignorant. 
The nation avails of the people and takes them as the foundation, and the ruler establishes depending on the people. 
I infer that your discussion seems to be an empty scheme. 
In addition, you say that śramaṇas, carved [a mark on the side of] the boat [to indicate the place where he dropped his sword into the water], and Daoists, waited by the stump [hoping that other hares would come to the place where he had previously caught a hare], ﬁght each other in vain for supremacy; they impeach each other. 
I pondered the sentences and looked for the meanings. 
People of the heretical way have been wanton for a very long time. 
They have been submerged in darkness and do not move from there. 
They roam around small villages and insincerely go beyond the border villages. 
In public they follow the sacred practice but in private they conduct debauchery. 
If attainment of the Way is like this, how shameful it would be! 
277 In former times a man of Qi state was fond of hunting, but he did not have a dog or a deer at home. 
Even though he rushed around for many years, he could not catch even a single animal. 
Thereafter he withdrew and returned to tilling the land. 
Moreover, you say, “The Great Way has already been obscured and small comprehensions have risen one after another. 
Who can correct them?” The right path is difﬁcult to destroy, while wrong principles are easy to reject. 
For instance, it is just as when light feathers meet with wind high above, they are blown away; or when ﬁne stones enter the ﬂow of water from a mountain stream, they roll down ; yet Mount Tai remains unmoved in a whirlwind and massive rocks are not swept away even by a rapid current. 
Hence, it is true that when plum trees are nipped by the frost they become leafless, but pines and cypresses are hardly withered even in the coldest season of the year. 
When a wicked method contacts a right , it is defeated. 
If you have the Great Way, then who would have small comprehensions [of the mind]? 
I think I will talk about this more and later I will make a judgment. 
A fellow like Yan Hui observed Dongye Bi’s way of handling the horses and he predicted would break down.526 Zigong witnessed the manners of Zhu state and Lu state, and discerned that would certainly die.527 Why are you as ignorant as this? 
Therefore, I will indicate the difference between the ignorant and the intelligent, make clear that the wise differs from the mean, and show you by presenting one corner of the subject for the time being. 
I hope you will be able to reply to me about the other three .528 Moreover, you say, “Either nirvana or the transformation of becoming a Transcendent is a method . 
In Buddhism it is called right and true , while in Daoism it is called right and one . 
The term ‘one’ means to return to non-death and the term ‘true’ means to meet nonarising” and “The teaching of nonarising is indirect, while the teaching of immortality is direct.” These were probably made because you are astute, skillful in debate, and eloquent. 
In that case, the doctrine of nirvana, extinguishing and crossing over , is written in authentic Buddhist scriptures. 
As for the assertion of the transformation of becoming a Transcendent and entering the way, however, on what doctrine is it based? 
Laozi said that those who endeavor excessively to perpetuate life must nonetheless enter the jaws of death.529 He also said, “The reason why Heaven and Earth endure and continue thus long is because they do not live of, or for, themselves.”530 Those who forget life survive, while those who try to sustain life must die. 
Since you are approaching death, you think that [the teaching of non-death] is urgent.531 It is indeed urgent. 
As the saying goes, “Pointing to the south which is in fact the north, one says to himself that he is not confused. 
Pointing to the west which is in fact east, he says to himself that he is not stupid.” You take mortality as going to be born. 
Why do you have such contrary thoughts? 
Therefore, you live in seclusion and abstain from food in order to cultivate the art of the Transcendents. 
I have heard that Laozi has the admonition against the ﬁve ﬂavors (i.e., sweet, sour, bitter, pungent, and salty),532 but gives no instruction about abstaining from grain. 
For this reason, even though a cicada and a moth do not eat, who among gentlemen values them? 
Although a frog and a python live in burrows, why would sages attach importance to them? 
Moreover, since ancient times, there is no one among the sages and wise people who has not died in the end. 
Only you speak of “immortality.” Why are you so reckless? 
Do they sound absurd to you? 
Formerly a person who had not seen a kylin asked a person who had seen one, “What kind is a kylin?” The one answered, “A kylin is just like a kylin.” The man who had asked then said, “If I had seen a kylin, then I would not have asked you the question. 
Nevertheless, you said that a kylin is just like a kylin. 
How can I understand this?” “A kylin has a body like a roe deer, a 279 tail like a cow, hooves like a deer, and a back like a horse.” The man who had asked the question then clearly understood. 
Now, do you want to see a kylin? Are you telling me without ever having seen one? 
In addition, you say, “Daoist scriptures are concise and profound. 
Since are profound, it is hard to discern the gate to the subtle .” I think Laozi’s teaching is contained in the Five Thousand Words and anything other than this is not an authentic scripture. 
The more Daoist scriptures appear, the deeper my suspicions. 
Most falsely consign beautiful expressions and vainly marshal ﬂowery words. 
This is similar to the story that a man of Zhou held out a mouse in order to sell it as uncarved jade, but a man of Zheng saw it and just withdrew.539 This is what it means. 
Speaking from this viewpoint, how can be appropriate? 
Again, you say, “For those who are brutal and stubborn, it is the best to be taught by the Buddha. 
For those who are kind and gentle and who keep their minds free from preoccupation and open to receive , it is the utmost to follow the way.” Formerly, Laozi said, “Violent and strong men do not die a natural death. 
I will make this the basis of my teaching.”540 Therefore, the reason people widely circulate books of admonitions and make culture and education known is for the sake of the ignorant; they do not do such things for those of outstanding virtue and learning. 
When people go against there must be misfortune, and when they follow them there must be fortune. 
People who are violent, strong, and stubborn are a group of the low and the stupid. 
The great teaching shows benevolence and compassion and saves such people with expedients. 
Regarding “Those who are kind and gentle and who keep their minds free from preoccupation and open to receive [others’ inﬂuences],” I think that this should be considered empty talk. 
People who learn Daoism today are against . 
Some Daoists pray for longevity by ingesting drugs; some try to cure diseases by licentious means. 
Moreover, “The trace of Daoist teaching is esoteric and sublime. 
“ places himself behind everyone, and yet he is always in the foremost position; he treats his body as if it were foreign to him, and yet it is preserved.”543 You merely say, “[The proper implements for use of the Daoist teaching] lie in oneself.” I do not know on what basis you make this statement. 
They understand it, but it sounds similar to the noisy chirping of insects and birds. 
Why is it worthy of imitation?” I think that those who eat bitter food do not know that bitter is bitter, and they do not covet sweet and fragrant food; those who are delighted with malodorous things are not aware that stinky and they are not addicted to pepper and orchids. 
How could you have a thought about the Great Dharma? 
The sacred teaching is subtle and unobstructed, and the ultimate Way is profound and extensive. 
It can be said that they are neither existence nor nonexistence. 
there is neither the meaning of a confrontation between self and other, nor a view between dissimilarity and similarity. 
Speaking is similar to shooting. 
You say that “[the incomprehensible foreign language sounds similar to] the noisy chirping of insects and birds.” What do you mean? 
Recently Sun went mad and openly acted outrageously. 
His cruel and disordered rejects righteousness. 
Only when people of high moral standing are united in common determination will ignorant people stop falsehoods and reform themselves. 
Vicious fellows ﬁlled a room and evil people overran the gates. 
There were grievous sorrows in the towns and grudges about disastrous sufferings on the streets. 
The Way of Heaven brings disaster to those who are arrrogant, and spiritual beings bless those who are humble. 
Later brought ruin down upon himself. 
The Discourse on the Western Tribe and China , Breaking the Daoist Gu’s Discourse on the Non-Chinese and the Chinese, by Shi Sengmin at Guangling Formerly Vimalakīrti availed himself of the lofty path in this world and displayed his merits outside of the phenomenal world. 
Therefore his trace appeared in the western land where he joined others in the profound teaching. 
If we speak of his mysterious supernatural powers, he was able to make Heaven and Earth turn upside down or expand or contract things as he pleased. 
People like this person can be called a Buddhist layperson . 
I have not understood the intention behind your calling yourself a Buddhist layman. 
You have not destroyed the high mountain of the seven kinds of selfconceit, you have not ﬁlled in the gorge of the ﬁve desires, the sunlight of wisdom has not shone , you have not cleared up the clouds of ignorance, you have not stopped the winds of eternal darkness, and you have not returned from the delusion of nocturnal roaming. 
Yet you still put on airs and call yourself a Buddhist layman? 
I, one who has poor Way and who appreciates your ability from afar, have come to know that you are not yet qualiﬁed to take possession of . 
Even though this is the entry level in the Great Dharma, it cannot be easily assumed. 
I examined the intention of your Discourse on the Non-Chinese and the Chinese, which completely illuminated your mind. 
I tried to fulﬁll my learning at the altar to Heaven, hoping you would instruct on this issue. 
Regarding your discussion, however, there is no natural ability to enjoy the elegance of the writing, there is no knowledge to examine the efﬁcacy of profound issues, there is not even a very small light in intellectual function, and the amount of beneﬁt is less than the moisture in a dewdrop. 
It is deﬁcient in myriads of ways. What signiﬁcance would there be? 
A bitter plum tree is overburdened with fruit and its branches break. 
Luan Da talked wildly and was decapitated. 
These are entirely the established system of the prehistoric times and the beacon of the Yin dynasty for the wise of later generations. I will now tell you the differences between Daoism and Buddhism in both names and meanings. 
The Buddha is the other name for the numinous being of right, perfect enlightenment; the Way is a general term for a hundred paths. 
Laozi is a sage who expounded one aspect , while the Buddha depended on the foundation of myriad deities. 
In Daoism a Transcendent is considered to be noble, but in Buddhism the exhaustion of deﬁlement is taken as good. 
In the Way of Transcendents there is a thousand-year life span. 
In the exhaustion of deﬁlement, on the other hand, there is a numinous eternal being. 
Because has a thousand-year life span, he rides on a dragon and controls the clouds. 
To control the clouds and to ride on a dragon is the way of birth and death. 
The profound numinous being is permanently happy and eternally pure. 
Now that it is like this, the movement of Heaven completely responded and the trace descended to the imperial capital. 
He quietly disliked the palace, surrounded by watchtowers, 283 and completely abandoned the palace. 
Therefore, he let go of his worldly nations and made a vow to go beyond to the three kinds of emptiness. 
He ﬂew like a dragon to the splendid house and readied a vehicle the place where he attained enlightenment. 
Thereupon, he ﬁrst expounded at the Deer Park , then he had an assembly at the palace of the Heaven, then he propagated at Vulture Peak , and later gloriﬁed it near the Hiraṇyavatī River. 
Consequently, the great light [of Dharma] illuminated even distant areas; the sun rest from shining; the splendid carriages covered the four directions; a vehicle of the king of the Brahmā Heaven descended from heaven; beings of the nine heavens together sang ; many hermits had an opportunity for realization; among those who made bold to have a relationship , there was none who did not gather together like clouds and take refuge in it. 
Therefore, the Tathāgata caused Samantabhadra to practice authority at the western road and all of the three sages to lead the people in the eastern metropolis (i.e., China). 
Therefore, a Buddhist scripture states, “Great being kāśyapa is none other than Laozi.”544 Hence assisted and supported the world of the Zhou period by means of the sophisticated teaching of the Five Thousand Words, and then returned to India, since his relationship to the ediﬁcation had been used up. 
This is why there is left Guan for the faraway west. 
Based on , the Chinese composed the Scripture on Laozi who Ediﬁed the Barbarians , which makes those of little knowledge sigh in admiration for China. 
You have not yet known the details of the profound purport. Why then do you insist that Laozi and the Buddha are the same? 
When people hear that the Great Sage has manifested as the leader of the circle of Confucian scholars, they take Zhuangzi, Confucius, the Duke of Zhou, and Laozi to all be the Buddha. 
If this were the case, is it possible that you are none other than Laozi as well? 
among sentient beings who transmigrate in the ﬁve realms of existence there is no one who is not the Buddha. 
What do you mean by this? 
is really when Kuafu chased after the sun and surely died from thirst. 
You say in the Discourse on the NonChinese and the Chinese that there are abominable people of Koguryo and Paekche to the east, tribal people of Qiang and Rong to the west, unkempt people to the north, and people who cut their hair and have tattoos on their bodies to the south; on the other hand, since the Duke of Zhou and Confucius created rules of decorum in China, there is a distinction between the nonChinese and the Chinese. 
the Western Tribe and China advocates that the east ends at a place where no one lives, the west ends at a solitary village, the north goes beyond the sea, and the south comes to an end at the gate of a village with no inhabitants. 
Since the Tathāgata enhanced the ediﬁcation in China, there is a difference between the western tribespeople and [the people of] China. 
You condemn those who have the nature of the Chinese for learning the teaching of the western tribes. 
This is because you have come out of the deep pit of a well and have not yet seen a view of rivers and lakes. 
As a Buddhist scripture says, “The Buddha occupies the center of the world and leads the people of the ten directions to purity”;545 therefore, we know that the land of India is the central kingdom. 
The Duke of Zhou and Confucius have the graceful and upright system , while the Tathāgata has the law to transcend the secular world. 
Since the graceful and upright system , they are different from the tribal people of the four directions. 
Since [the Tathāgata has] the law to transcend the secular world, he is not the same as the Duke of Zhou and Confucius. 
Since the system diffuses to the tribal people of the four directions, the tribal people of every direction praise the virtue . 
Since the law was appended to the Duke of Zhou and Confucius, Laozi returned to the west . 
Since Laozi returned to the west, a large number of tribal people have arisen. 
Since the tribal people of the four directions praise the virtue [of the Duke of Zhou and Confucius], they excessively increase confusion. 
285 The upright decorum is unable to be changed, and the true Dharma does not change. 
Since the upright decorum cannot be changed, Taibo straightened his clothes even in Wu and Yue. 
Since the true Dharma does not change, Buddhism was transmitted to the east without alteration. 
Since straightened his clothes, he caused the people in the land where they barely clothed themselves to follow the custom of appreciating clothing. 
Since the Dharma does not change, it causes Chinese people of talent and virtue to take the tonsure. 
Since had the custom of appreciating clothing, it made their appearance closer to that of the people of the Zhou dynasty. 
Since take the tonsure, it makes them respectfully equal to the western tribal people in customs. 
Since [talented and virtuous Chinese people who took tonsure] are equal to the faraway western tribal people in customs, it makes all those who see them at close range believe . 
If you think that there is no ﬁxed rule in the Sage’s path and his response varies according to each locale, then Taibo should have walked naked in the lower reaches of the Yangzi River , and it is possible that even today you do not wear clothes, either. 
Hence, even though locality and race differ, the sacred Dharma does not. 
You might say that you rely on the right way. 
Laozi considers the Grand Void to be the essence, while the Buddha thinks that conforming to present affairs is profound. 
Laozi thinks that nature gives rise to , while the Buddha considers that the unity of condition gives rise to . 
Daoism takes talismans to be effective, while Buddhism takes leading through explaining to be exquisite. 
Since the Grand Void is considered to be the essence, there are things to produce all things . 
Since conforming to the present affairs is profound, all things are essential. 
Since Nature gives rise to , there is no heavenly hall to which to ascend. 
Since the unity of condition gives rise to , there are noble stages to which one can ascend. 
Since talismans are considered to be effective, there is no efﬁcacious god in Daoism. 
Since leading through explaining is considered to be exquisite, people study the mind of the Sage. 
Since there are things to produce all things , Daoism is not great. 
Since all things are essential , the path of the Sage is lofty and vast. 
Since there are noble stages to which one may ascend, intelligent people throw themselves into . 
There is no efﬁcacious god . Therefore, what are you fascinated by and what do you seek? 
Ever since people began to study the mind of the Sage , śramaṇas have arisen like clouds. 
Therefore, we know that the Daoist scriptures are minor and shallow, while the Buddhist scriptures are extensive and deep; the Daoist scriptures are few and vile, while the Buddhist scriptures are magnanimous and clean; the Daoist scriptures are disordered and lacking, while the Buddhist scriptures are simple and pure; and the Daoist scriptures are approachable and yet obscure, while the Buddhist scriptures are profound and yet clear. 
You should change your polluted robe to a simple one and faithfully take part in the lofty teaching [of Buddhism]. 
Those who wear a yellow turban on the head look depraved. 
Wearing a cap made of leather is really not a Chinese style. 
Selling talismans and registers is an evil custom that deceives people of the world. 
Patting the cheeks with both hands and grinding the teeth are the extremity of confusion. 
Binding one’s hands behind one’s back and rolling on the ground is a manner of hell. 
Talismans and the union of vapors (i.e., the “art of the inner chamber,” sexual practices) are the most cunning craft. 
In this way, light and darkness are already evident and truth and falsehood are already obvious. 
You should lead your friends in an orderly manner and walk across to the pure path (i.e., 48a Buddhism). 
I look after the graceful virtue in my mind, and at the same time I receive with respect the truth of the Sage. 
Would this be bad? 
People temporarily ﬁnd their enjoyment in the dreamland, infected and misled by worldly fame. 
If the perception of objects increases, like mist, how can they discern the brilliant right ? 
The weakening of simple and sincere customs causes all the devils to compete with each other in confusion. 
When one seeks glory by means of falsehood and deception, he will assuredly commit the ﬁve rebellious acts. 
When he leads ignorant people by force, he must apply the six atrocious methods. 
Then he is ﬁlled with the pestilent force like dust in a dust storm and brings various troubles upon himself. 
I remember that the eastern Wu region suffered from hardships caused by the Water Transcendents ; in the western tribal land gave the title “spiritual soldier” ; in the groves of the Minyue region the obscene ways of seed people remain;1 and in the time of the Han dynasty the people were moved by the mourning song for the son .2 Loyal, wise men sigh in disappointment. 
The government has been maltreated and is about to come to an end. 
Even if we were to pick up sand and grasses from the ground, how could we count the sins we have committed? 
People of insigniﬁcant and superﬁcial learning do not know the foundation of the teaching. 
The erroneous words of the worldly teaching defy and conceal the Three Treasures (i.e., Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha). 
The streets are full of resentment of our dear spiritual people (guimin; i.e., followers of the Way of the Five Pecks of Grain). 
All of this is none other than the ashes of Mount Yan and the dregs of the Yellow and Luo Rivers, and is together submerged in dangerous difﬁculty. 
I am very sorrowful about it. 
I will illuminate the profound native land for children who are confused [in foreign lands and who do not know the way to go home], expose the subtle purport beyond this world, secretly spread a happy breeze, and judge situations of self and other. 
Is this something that can be presented and copied in words? 
48b To Ban Scriptures and to Raise their Price— The First Rebellious Act The profound scriptures unfold like clouds and pierce through the beautiful world of emptiness and existence. 
are really the deep sea for those who learn and the sun and moon for sentient beings. 
Therefore, Sadāprarudita Bodhisattva illuminates equally with benevolence, makes a ﬂash of lightning in the nether world, puts an end to devils in a dangerous marsh, sets a divine boat aﬂoat with the winds of faith, and delivers this ﬂeeting world from the sea of suffering. 
I have heard that when Daoist scriptures are composed worldly ideas are blended into them. 
It is strange that the ediﬁcation of Daoism is futilely banned and yet we see today that those who study ignore the strict rules and give the scriptures in order to obtain gold and silk fabric. 
If a poor man comes to the Daoists they will not see him even if he dies. 
They are greedy for proﬁt and have no mercy. No one goes against more than this. 
Moreover, their art is obscene and evil; it is not clean. 
They consider the grinding of teeth to be a heavenly drum, swallowed spit to be [like water from] a sweet spring, horse excrement to be numinous ﬁrewood, and old mice to be the raw material for a transcendent elixir. 
Even if one avails himself of this to seek the Way, how could he attain it? 
Formerly, the First Emperor of the Qin dynasty and Emperor Wu of the Han dynasty could not lighten their bodies [to become a transcendent]. 
sent Xu Fu and sent Gongsun to a very distant place, beyond the clouds and waves, and ordered them to offer a prayer and a greeting to communicate with transcendents, but there was no result . 
When we tranquilize our minds and remove desire, facts and the Way are next to each other. 
Would it then be necessary to make efforts to run around, swallow spit, or grind one’s teeth? 
To Recklessly Claim the True Way—The Second Rebellious Act Those who try to reach the pale red-colored clouds [in order to become a transcendent] talk of the merits of alchemy and elixirs. 
Those who try to open and clarify the pure intelligence count on the energy of a marvelous herb called danghua.3 Although maintain these and consider them to be true, they have not been able to avoid the ﬁnal consequence . 
Furthermore Zhang Ling absurdly called himself the Heavenly Master, but since he insulted people as well as spirits, he received retribution while still alive; at the end of the Xingping era of the Han dynasty he was swallowed by a python. 
His son Heng ran about looking for his body but could not locate it. 
was afraid that pure talk would be besmirched by . 
in order to show the trace of mysterious transformation, he bound [the legs of] a live crane and placed the animal on a precipice. 
In the ﬁrst year of the Jian’an era he sent messengers to announce that the Heavenly Master would ascend to the Mysterious Capital [where divine transcendents dwell] on the seventh day of the ﬁrst month. 
The followers of the Way of the Five Pecks of Grain and those who make a living by hunting in the mountains gathered like ants outside the door . 
The parishioners of Mount Yuntai bowed their heads to the ground twice and said, “We have humbly heard that the sage will travel to the Mysterious Capital. 
Corpus spirits will surely enjoy themselves4 and will precisely be as dark as the Nine Murks (i.e., the bottom of the earth). 
He lied to the people, telling them that had said, “I will turn the carriage toward Chenhua. 
Each of you, return to your parish, purify your mind, sustain the practice, keep the Master in mind, and think of the Way.” Heng then surreptitiously untied and the crane ﬂew straight up into the air. 
The followers, including those who make a living by hunting , were ignorant and foolish, and all said that had ascended to immortals. 
the living take advantage of the dead for proﬁt and cheat Heaven and Earth. 
48c To Explain Sins by Means of the Union of the Yin and Yang Energies —The Third Rebellious Act When one clears his mind of all feelings and removes desire, his aspiration for the Way becomes bright and true. 
A group of nameless, ignoble people recklessly composed the Yellow Books.5 They bow down and lightly reproach those who deliver an evil, unprovoked magic formula. 
(The magic formula says, “The Way of Heaven comes to an end. After ﬁfteen days have passed, the sun and moon are bright. 
As they come out, it is tranquil and deep; as they go in, it is dark and profound. 
When energy comes in, the true energy is opened. When the spiritual energy spreads out, the energy of the Way is exercised. 
All vicious spirits vanish. 
He who sees me will become blind and he who hears me will become deaf. 
He who dares to impose upon me will receive disaster instead. 
I am fortunate and he is unfortunate.”) In the year of Jiazi there was an imperial decree, and in response a religious register was created. Men and women became intimate with each other (i.e., engaged in sexual behavior), and there was no distinction between high and low. 
Lu Xiujing of the Wu region frequently practiced this . 
Then they open the gate of destiny [where the foundation of life resides], hold a baby of the perfected, and adopt postures like the “winding dragon” and the “playing tiger.” Through taking postures like these, they prevent calamities and disperse misfortune. 
Yi Jun of the Han period practiced this as the Way; he greatly misled the people and plunged them into disaster, and was exiled to Dunhuang. 
Later, as for Sun En , his teaching was much more dissolute; men and women became disordered and wild, no different from those between male and female birds and beasts. 
are easily drawn by visual objects, form and color, and it is difﬁcult to eliminate deﬁlements, not to mention those who mix the [yin and yang] energies at the cinnabar ﬁeld , who attempt to prolong life at the transcendent cave, who give full swing to a weapon and pass through the prohibition of the jade gate , and who go to the extremity of adopting abnormal postures like the “winding dragon” and the “playing tiger.” When alive they have no principles of loyalty, and after death they suffer in the blue court (i.e., a euphemism for hell, located on the east side of Mount Tai). 
I sincerely wish that the bright Heaven will investigate and reveal these fellows; all things, including myself, will be upright and clean and will not go against the instructions of the unseen world. 
To Presume Upon the Way and to Rise in Revolt—The Fourth Rebellious Act It is difﬁcult to understand the ultimate truth and easy to be deluded by the glory of fame. 
Relations are more signiﬁcant than deep waters or high mountains, and virtue is less important than wind and dew. 
People just like the rebels of the Yellow Turbans hoped a hawk does the Han royal family, but on the contrary they despised bright Heaven. 
Subsequently, there was Zi Lu, who also set forth the Way of Spiritual Beings . 
Yet the gods did not help him and he was gored by an elk. 
After that, Sun En also claimed the Purple Way . 
He did not care about his lowly status and inferior position and intended to attain the nobility of the emperor, a cloud or a sound in a dark cave; he issued absurd ideas in empty profundity. 
The Water Transcendent confused others and killed sinless people regardless of their age. 
He ruined the country and destroyed the people. 
Isn’t this cruel and inhuman? 
Therefore Emperor Wu of the Song dynasty thought of this and sighed with deep feelings. 
Then he ﬂew a thousand li like a dragon and crossed over the three large rivers like a tiger. 
Sentient beings were pleased and the grasses and trees enjoyed the spring light. 
If one confers a posthumous title to the spirit of the dead or strives to follow the illustrious virtue, if there is no true essence in the Way, he just recklessly chases after unreality. 
Then say that has gone to the east, they get drunk and bring sins to an end. 
Isn't such a bigoted and obscure thing vile and unusual? 
Moreover, regarding the issue that the merit one makes can be transferred to his ancestors of seven generations [through the Yellow Register Fête (a memorial service)], the purport of this passage is shallow and superﬁcial. 
ask to escape from carrying sandstones and become spiritual of Daoism for a long time. 
The intelligence of sages thoroughly investigates the subtle ; if there is a thought, this is illuminated. 
Why is it necessary to bother the libationary , or to waste paper and ink unreasonably ? 
If one must submit a petition and later a judgment is given, we know for the ﬁrst time that the Lord of the Way has no ability to profoundly examine things, and the heavenly administrative staff does not possess the function of the heavenly eyes. 
the Three Ofﬁces (san’guan, the ofﬁces of Heaven, Earth, and Water) tire of attending to legal cases and spiritual ofﬁcers are exhausted by arresting . 
To hear a petition is originally intended for those who are suddenly taken ill, but if one submits a petition on the day of wuchen it never reaches . 
Since the petition does not reach him, the petitioner will be wronged and driven to death. 
Alas, it is sad! 
This is truly the ﬁfth rebellious act. 
49a To Be Afraid of Evil Spirits and Wear Talismans is the Atrocity of Lawlessness—The First For those who follow the correct Way sincerely, even recalcitrant evil spirits reform their force. 
For this reason, sages of the superlative degree and people of lofty wisdom are devoid of emotions through myriad changes. 
Therefore they can profoundly enjoy music played with instruments made of metal or stone and sleep in mists and rosy clouds . 
This is because their pure sincerity touches and is understood [by Heaven]. 
How can wearing make this? 
If one carries the talisman of the Grand Terminus on the left and the iron sword of Kunwu on the right, when he points to the sun, the sun stops shining, and when he imitates a spiritual being, he can cover an area even a thousand li away with blood. 
If one receives the Yellow Book and the Red Writing (Chizhang, a talisman register written in red ink), say that he is a numinous transcendent. 
Regarding the matter of using a talisman to protect one against evil spirits on the six jia days and bowing one’s head to ground in a toilet, (just as Guo Jingchun said that those of the Daoist school go into a toilet to exorcise evil spirits but in the end they are unsuccessful), they are senseless and confused. 
I have heard about wearing talismans. 
In former days, as a group symbol, there were the yellow signs used by Zhang Jiao’s , the dark red-colored signs worn by Zi Lu’s , the purple marks by Lu Song’s , and the tactics called guxu by Sun En’s . 
They all powerfully confused the emperor’s troops, but in the end their people and spiritual beings were all exterminated. 
To Institute Imposing a Tax or Donation on the People is the Atrocity of Skillful Deception—The Second The teaching of the Five Pecks of Grain was founded by the Heavenly Master . 
Later it became vicious and corrupt. In addition, his group established the followers. 
People of the world loathed and feared . 
Therefore, Zi Ming and Du gong were both worried about by an evil python . 
Moreover, as for the Mud and Ash Fête , the ritual was begun by Zhang Lu. 
Since it was difﬁcult to edify the Di and Yi tribespeople, he established this ritual in which the practitioners tumble about in mud like a donkey, put yellow alkaline mud on their faces, bump their heads against a pillar and hang down, beating their bodies, just as clay is fashioned. 
This rite is designated to the borderland; it should not be performed in China. 
At the beginning of the Yixi era , there was Wang Gongqi, who was greedy for treasures. 
Lu Xiujing of the Wu area was quite aware that the ritual was originally abnormal, but still he smeared mud on his forehead and hung down with his hands bound behind his back. 
I would be happy if you do not speak of this. 
To Open a Kitchen at the Gate of a Tomb is the Atrocity of Not Being Benevolent—The Third To open the city gate and give great alms to the people is understood to be virtuous.6 In the lingering vapor of the heterodox path (i.e., the Way of the Five Pecks of Grain) they open a kitchen at the gate of a tomb and give food to pitiful people, which becomes a disorderly situation. 
Formerly Zhang Zi Lu inaugurated a meritorious event in Guanzhong (present-day Shaanxi province) and gathered a large crowd of libationers and spiritual soldiers. 
Furthermore, the titles Heavenly Master , Succeeding Master , Heir Master , and Master of Three Daughters were eulogistic titles created by Zhang Lu for himself. 
Moreover, the Woman of the Way , the Man of the Way , the Capped Female Ofﬁcials , the Father of the Way , the Mother of the Way , the Spiritual Lord , and the Seed People are names given to followers after they perform the ritual sexual practices of the union of the yin and yang energies. 
In addition, the People of Grain , the Family of Grain , the Supervisor of Merit , and the Libationer are titles given in order to placate followers in hard times. 
Again, the Deﬁcient of the Way [Pindao; i.e., the humble self-reference of a Daoist priest] and the Dharma Master of the Three Grottoes are titles created by Senghui of Chang’an. 
Moveover, the Learned Elder , the People of the Way , and the King of the Transcendent Lord were created by Wang Lingqi, a man of Moling county. 
Furthermore, Daoist Priest , Bandit of Ants , Controller of Wine , and Bandit of Grain are named by what the people consider. 
Moreover, regarding the Dharma Master , the Dharma Preacher , and the Attendant of Scriptures , Lu Xiujing established these names relying on Buddhism and following the world. The Lord of Heaven , the Lord of Earth , and the Vassal or Concubine are also designated. 
The Way of Great Peace , the Way of the Five Pecks of Grain, the Great Way , the Purple Way , and the Teacher of Spiritual Beings [Guishen shijun] were false prestigious titles created during the rebellious times. 
In addition, Luan Da of the Jiaodong region was appointed to the post of General of Five Proﬁts . 
Even though he was installed as a feudal lord he had none of the principles of a high-ranking ofﬁcial. 
By the end of the reign of Emperor Wu of the Han dynasty, this title was no longer used.) drank excessively and consequently fell into a drunken frenzy. 
His disgrace spread far and wide, and eventually reached the far-distant Min region . 
Liu Zhang, admonished , “Even the numinous transcendent refrains from taking pine nuts and the mist of clouds in order to preserve his life, yet you lead a luxurious life and relish good food and drink. 
How can you respect the Way?” When Zi Lu heard this, he was deeply resentful but felt ashamed in his mind. 
He punished himself and cleared roads. 
Concurrently, he established the rules of kitchen in which [the consumption of] wine is limited to three sheng.7 From the end of the Han dynasty onward, he was called the Controller of Wine. 
At the time of Wang Lingqi the category of the sin was removed. 
The Learned Elders and the People of the Way were bestowed with . 
This is similar to although had the nobility of the Five Proﬁts, became the name of a monster. 
To Deliver Living Creatures from Distress and Suffering is the Atrocity of Wild Imagination—The Fourth The physical body is more fragile than the calyx of ripe fruit in fall and life is more transitory than ice in spring. 
The wind of karma blows widely and vigorously in the transitory realm. 
Therefore, Lord Jing left in conditioned fate,8 and Sunzi recorded that was a 11 walking corpse. 
Deluded people and those of shallow learning are not aware of the Great Law . 
When they have an illness, fall into decline, or experience disaster, they are much more deluded and deepen the cause under the inﬂuence of evil spirits; they consider that a spiritual myna bird is the cause of disaster and try to turn their disasters over to the distant Milky Way; to see a ﬁshing star at the place where water falls in drops. 
Then they frown and revile the spirits of the unseen world, saying, “The messengers of the Three Ofﬁces have already sent the dead.” One who is going to die will naturally die. 
This is really only the libationer’s scheme to proﬁt from clothes and food, and they exploit people just as a silk worm consumes mulberry leaves. 
It results in startling the highest sage by a burning house and manipulating people’s emotion with an elegy. 
To Commit a Sin in a Dream is the Atrocity of Ignorance—The Fifth Human beings originate with the function of consciousness as the foundation. 
The amount of grass and trees is not greater than the number of times they have abandoned their lives. 
In this case, even the great earth, hills, and mountains are all my former traces. 
A broad, blue river is all my tears and blood. 
Observing from this point of view, who would not be my close friend? 
if someone sees in a dream someone who has passed away, then people say that it is a ghost or an apparition. 
Their feelings of kindness and affection sometimes inﬂuence each other. 
All evil spirits are ill-mannered and do not understand the law of submission and opposition. 
summon and feed spiritual ofﬁcers and soldiers, and report to in written form in order to judge them . 
They can cut off disembodied spirits, but who can illuminate their minds? 
I hope that in future you will not uphold superstitious words. 
Then it causes to have no thought of stopping a meal before ﬁnishing in Heaven and to calm the voice of disastrous thoughts in the icy river . 
To Hastily Make Cold and Hot is the Atrocity of Ferocity and Hypocrisy—The Sixth To profoundly calm the mind and keep silence is the true virtue among myriad acts. 
Generally, sentient beings in this world have no mercy. 
Those who are ﬁerce, cruel, evil, and vicious vie with one another in making talismans. 
They hang on a gate or attach it to a door and deceive ignorant people. 
Lofty, wise people and intellectuals are still not content with this. 
make the Yellow God and the transgressed talismans ,9 and with them they kill spirits. 
Furthermore, they set up the Red Writing, which is used to kill people. 
Their interest is only to please human nature without taking disastrous sin into account. 
Regarding [the results of] making conspiracies and harboring jealousy, old patterns are found in scriptures. 
will go to the great hell of pincers after death and will be reborn as an owl or a shrike, or they will be dumb [upon their rebirth]. 
Their spirits and skeletons will decay in confusion and drown and perish eternally. 
Who is aware of this? 
For our dear spiritual people of Daoism, the characteristics of the Way are not so. 
Although severe admonition is bitter, wise people should submissively listen to it. 
If you cannot adequately reform yourself, please wait for a person of the highest virtue and prepare yourself to be illuminated by the melody of his song in order to understand the long night . 
Is this something that I can explain with my weak words today? 
The Discourse on Extinguishing Delusions by Liu Xie, Record Keeper at Dongguan County A person composed the Discourse on the Triple Destruction .10 Its purpose and testimonies are vulgar and its literary style is philistine. 
Even though people of profound knowledge ascertain the highest principles, people of shallow ideas are confused by groundless statements. 
The vulgar views 13 of townspeople are truly not worthy of argument, but on second thought I am afraid that if ordinary people hear they may think it is true. 
The Discourse on the Triple Destruction says, “The excellent point of the Daoist teaching lies in putting all one’s thought in the attainment of the One and becoming a sage without death. 
On the other hand, the wonderful point of the Buddhist teaching lies in samādhi, in which one attains supernatural powers and is able to wish for no rebirth. 
Death is named nirvana. 
I have never seen a person who learns about death and yet does not die.” The Discourse on Extinguishing Delusions says, “The true and the false of these two teachings are evident and easily argued. 
In the Buddhist teaching one trains the mind, while in the Daoist teaching one exercises the body. 
The body that must die is conﬁned within a time period and a place. 
The spirit is boundless and can go around the circumference of the world twice . 
Bright people avail themselves of boundlessness and teach others with distinctive wisdom. 
Dark people feel a persistent attachment to that must die, and deceive others with a ﬂying transcendent. 
The heart of the art of the transcendent is food and medicine. 
conduct based on wisdom begins with meditation. 
Since meditation trains the true consciousness, it is exquisite and delicate, and nirvana can be wished for. 
Medicine, on the other hand, detains the impermanent body , and consequently even if one puts all his thought , he will be thrown into disorder endlessly. 
If one abandons the wonderful treasury , loses his wisdom, and nourishes his body, when we prove it on the basis of principles we can know is false. 
If his body ﬂies into boundless space and his spirit, which remains in the dark, ﬂies up to Heaven like a hawk, how could he escape from being a bird? 
In the wonderful fruition of nirvana, the Way is simply eternal. 
How could the assertion of ‘learning about death’ be about analyzing principles?” The Discourse on the Triple Destruction says, “If it is said that a prince is the founder of the teaching, then he did not take the tonsure yet he causes others to shave their heads; he did not give up his wife, yet he causes others to cut off their posterity ; this is really laughable. 
We clearly know that Buddhism is precisely the art to exterminate evils. 
I have humbly learned that, regarding the virtue of gentlemen, our bodies, down to each hair and every bit of skin, are received from our parents and therefore we must not presume to damage them; this is the beginning of ﬁlial piety.”11 The Discourse on Extinguishing Delusions says, “The prince gave up his wife and took the tonsure. 
Isn’t it deceptive to call white black? 
What Buddhist ﬁlial piety covers is probably more extensive. 
Reason is due to the mind, and has nothing to do with one’s hair. 
If a person has a persistent attachment to his or her hair and disregards their mind, what can he or she take hold of for ﬁlial piety? 
Conduct is more clearly well-timed; the fruition of highest wisdom is more wonderful than abdication in reason. 
Since is more wonderful than abdication in reason, shave their heads and follow the Way. 
Since the conduct based on is more clearly well-timed, they abandon worldly conduct and seek the mind. 
Judging from the two wise men , have no deﬁciency in ﬁlial piety. 
When you examine it with a sacred state of mind, of what are you doubtful?” As for the ﬁrst kind of destruction, says, “ is something that entered our country and destroys it. 
talk nonsense with falsehoods, build regardless of the expense, exploit people, empty the National , and put people in distress. 
Since they do not help the country, the population decreases. 
If we see a case where people do not conduct sericulture and yet wear [silk clothes] or where they do not cultivate land but have food, the country will go to ruin and the people will become extinct. 
There is no beneﬁt at all; even the suffering from the ﬁve kinds of disasters is no worse than that caused by them.”14 The Discourse on Extinguishing Delusions says, “The teaching of Mahayana Buddhism is completely perfect; it probes into the very root of truth and is the most subtle. 
Therefore, clariﬁes the twofold truth [of absolute and relative reality] in order to drive existence away, and speaks of the three levels of apprehension of emptiness in order to put a mark on nonexistence. 
The four immeasurable minds promote people’s distinctive minds. 
The six pāramitās save people from karmic suffering. 
Even though you slander them by saying ‘ talk nonsense,’ how could you damage the sun and moon ? 
They build Buddhist temples in order to expound and propagate the wonderful teaching. 
While the construction work is momentary the teaching lasts a thousand years. 
“In former times, when Yu gathered all the lords, many states presented gems and silk to him. 
Later, in the epoch of the Warring States , only seven lords (i.e., those of the states of Qin, Chu, Yan, Qi, Han, Zhao, and Wei) survived. 
During the Taishi era , the government ﬂourished and every household was prosperous, too. 
the disturbance of the Red Eyebrows caused the land within a thousand li [from the capital city, Chang’an,] to have no human habitation.15 ‘The country will go to ruin and the people will become extinct.’ Why is this due to ? 
In the reign periods of Hai (i.e., Hu Hai, the second emperor of the Qin dynasty, 209– 207 B.C.E.) and Ying one dan of grain cost a hundred thousand qian. 
During the reign periods of Emperor Jing (157– 141 B.C.E.) and Emperor Wu the stored grain became red and rotted. 
There were few Buddhist monks at the end of the Qin dynasty, and at the beginning of the Han dynasty there was the Buddhist teaching. 
causes a father and his sons to differ from each other in their behavior, brothers to differ from each other in following rules, to desert their parents, and the Way of ﬁlial piety ceases, separate from each other on sad or pleasant occasions or do not sing or weep together, enmity arises between kinsmen, a relative in mourning is eternally abandoned, go against what they have been taught and violate the right order, and do not repay Heaven. 
Nothing among the ﬁve rebellious acts and impious conduct is worse than these.” The Discourse on Extinguishing Delusions says, “The principle of ﬁlial piety is supreme and runs through Buddhist clergy as well as laypeople equally. 
Although the Buddhist teaching differs from the non-Buddhist teaching (i.e., Confucianism) in conduct, the function of mind is the same in principle. 
If my fate falls in the secular realms, I will basically cultivate myself according to the decorum of Confucianism. 
When my fate receives the fruition of the Buddhist Way, I assuredly propagate ﬁlial piety in the pure conduct [of Buddhism]. 
“There are reasons they do so. 
They all realize the principles of the mind and examine and illuminate the human world. 
passing horses exceeds proverbs.18 A stream aggrieves the superb sage’s heart.19 Therefore, we know that even if we attend our parents with devotion throughout our life, which is as short as the blinking of an eye, there is no salvation for the disembodied spirit. 
If we learn the Way and take our parents out , then the suffering of the netherworld will vanish eternally. 
“Consequently the gravity of matters is weighed; that is rejected and this is adopted. 
17 “In former days when the Three Augusts governed well, they were adored by Yao and Shun. 
When one died, was covered with pieces of wood and laid in an open ﬁeld, without raising a mound over it or planting trees around it.20 There is no historical record about a mourner’s staff or a mourning dress . 
How could it be said that the Three Augusts instructed to reject ﬁlial piety? 
“At the time of the Five Thearchs the mourning system was brilliantly established, it has not been heard that Yao and Shun performed a rite and blamed the Three Augusts belatedly [for not having a mourning and funeral system]. 
The Three Augusts have never been blamed [for such, either]. Why is the Buddha alone doubted? 
The reason the Buddha has no rule for mourning system is because his aim is to get rid of suffering. 
sincere and simple customs is not doubted, yet getting rid of suffering is reproached. 
This is what is called one who is inconsistent and who mixes up joy and anger.21 it is clearly known that the teachings of the sages are perfectly understood, complying with what people feel. 
The Three Augusts did not have the system of mourning practices because they the sincere and simple customs ; the Five Thearchs formulated the mourning system according to people’s feelings. 
Since Śākyamuni get rid of suffering, he abandoned secular customs and returned to the truth. 
When the traces [of these sages] are inspected, there are different paths, but their profound ediﬁcations result in the same point.” As for the third kind of destruction, says, “ enters one’s body and destroys it. 
In the body born as a human being, there is ﬁrst of all the suffering of injury; second, the pain of punishment of shaving off the hair; third, the rebellious sin of being impious to one’s parents; fourth, the sin of extinguishing [one’s family line by not having] offspring; and ﬁfth, damaging the body, following the Buddhist precepts and learning only impiety. 
Why do I say this? 
The precepts cause to not bow to their parents. 
They vie with one another in following them. 
If a boy becomes a novice ﬁrst and later his mother becomes a nun, she must bow down to her own son. 
How could we follow it?” The Discourse on Extinguishing Delusions says, “The body in which one dwells and the mind he receives are determined, in reason, by conduct performed in a previous life. 
Whether someone enters the Way or stays in the secular life is, in truth, linked with the causality . 
For this reason, Śākyamuni appeared in the world and his ediﬁcation diffuses throughout Heaven and the human world. 
The trace of the Way is testiﬁed to both in governing a country and ruling a family. 
I have never heard that all the people of the world renounce the world at the same time, because varies in giving rise to faith. 
Therefore there are two noble teachings . 
This is why the ofﬁcial class is different from that of śramaṇas. 
A wife is a nuisance of affection, and having hair is merely an adornment of one’s appearance. 
The nuisance of affection damages the mind and the adornment of one’s appearance goes against the Way. 
Therefore, [Buddhist monks] purify their minds and exterminate affection, and attending to the Way they give up adornment. 
When principles go beyond the ordinary level, the teaching must reverse the secular way. 
If one does not bow to his parents, it is because the Way is esteemed. 
If the parents bow to , it is because they respect the Way. 
The li states that when a son who newly wears the cap sees his mother, the mother bows to him. 
When a man in armor meets the ruler, he does not bow. 
Since it is valued that he holds weapons in his hands, to honor does not apply to . 
“The cap made of black fabric is used for minor ceremonies; originally it had no signiﬁcance in the Way of the Spirit. 
A helmet and armor are instruments of evil omen and have no highest virtue. 
Nevertheless, in the case where respect is to be paid, a mother bows to her son. 
In the proper circumstances to suspend paying one’s respects, vassals do not kneel down and bow to the ruler. 
The provisions of decorum are the worldly teaching 50c established by the Duke of Zhou and Confucius. 
Speaking of its ﬂexibility, it is not only from one pattern, not to mention the dignity of the Buddhist Way that reveals beyond the three realms of existence, which is the subtle foundation of the marvelous teaching and the profound origin of a great number of principles. 
If this is given to a person, he really is more respectable than those who wear caps or armor. 
If those who wear caps or armor go against decorum, no one of any age will doubt them. 
Regarding the dignity that is given to the Buddhist Way, why are you surprised by it?” The Discourse on the Triple Destruction says, “Fo (the Chinese term for “buddha”) is indicated as futu in old Buddhist scriptures. 
Kumārajīva changed it to fotu since he knew the derivation of the term futu is evil. 
Later Senghui changed it to fotu . 
Originally, in old Buddhist scriptures are called sangmen . 
The term sangmen derives from the gate of annihilation. 
Since it is said that the Dharma is the teaching about nonarising , are called sangmen. 
Again, Kumārajīva changed it to sangmen . 
Buddhist monks are not worthy of being called .” The Discourse on Extinguishing Delusions says, “Buddhist scriptures were transmitted for the ﬁrst time during Emperor Ming’s reign of the Later Han dynasty. 
Therefore, the sounds and the Chinese characters used for the transliteration were not correct. 
The sound of fu is similar to that of fo and the sound of sang is like that of sha . 
“The Five Classics are traditional Chinese books. Studies of them are not based on translation, but in both Ma ’s and Zheng ’s annotations on them, the sounds and Chinese characters are interchanged. 
Zhuangzi understood to forget the words after apprehending the ideas .25 Mencius ridiculed the harm done to one’s ideas by written language.26 You have not traced back to the great principles and only pursue words. 
Could the people’s lack in versatility in Song state have been any worse than this?”27 The Discourse on the Triple Destruction says, “The teaching to destroy the three entities is not applicable in China. 
Originally it was intended to correct the western region. 
They do not differ much from beasts, and they do not believe in absolute vacancy . 
After Laozi entered [the western region] through Pass, he intentionally established the teaching [to worship] the images and ediﬁed them.” Furthermore says, “Tribespeople are ﬁerce and rude. 
intended to cut off their evil seeds. 
Consequently he ordered the men not to take a woman in marriage and the women not to get married to a man. 
There is no doubt that truth has been exquisite from the ancient time of nonbeginning, and the Way will cover the endless . 
Examining the event when Elder Li went over Pass, the time period falls in the last years of the Zhou dynasty. 
Since the world 51a was in isolation and wise people lived in reclusion, he departed and forgot to come back. 
Even when Jie Yu withdrew from worldly affairs28 he wiped out his trace, not to mention went to the foreign land. 
Thereafter, a cunning and wicked libationer composed the Scripture on the Conversion of the Barbarians . 
The doctrine is clumsy and its expressions are vulgar. 
has been transmitted by petty people. When I examine it, the western tribespeople are weak and cowardly, while the northern tribespeople are evil and vigorous. 
‘“ jackals and wolves, are on the road, and kill foxes and raccoon dogs. 
Dragging each other to total ruin, commit cruelties. 
Even the law made by Shang Yang is not as cruel as this. 
How could the way of Boyang be like this? 
Moreover, it is useless if images of the founder of the teaching are provided before people follow . 
If people faithfully follow the teaching, massacres can be prevented. 
If only those who already follow are given the death penalty, this means that a single word can cause morality to be lost and numerous falsehoods to be visible. 
What reason could be seen in the sayings of an uncultivated person of the east ?”29 The Discourse on the Triple Destruction says, “Now I wonder by what means people such as the Three Augusts, the Five Thearchs, and the Three Kings learned the Way. 
Is it because the Nine August Ones disregarded it,30 or because Buddhism had not yet been established? 
If it is because Buddhism had not yet been established, this is vicious and false. I will not say anything more about this.” The Discourse on Extinguishing Delusions says, “Regarding supernatural powers and transformations, the substance of teaching is not one. 
Receiving mysterious responses appears and disappears endlessly. 
If a condition exists in the subtle ediﬁcation, bodhisattvas propagate the teaching, and if the ediﬁcation exists in a coarse condition, sage rulers exercise their virtue. 
Sage rulers and bodhisattvas reveal their responses in accordance with what they receive. Different teachings are united. 
There is originally no that is not of the Buddha. 
It is certainly known that after the time of the Three Augusts what received was extinguished and what was distinguished was hidden, but in the teaching during Emperor Ming’s reign of the Later Han dynasty, the condition responded to and the image appeared. 
Such things as the Three Augusts’ inﬂuence by means of virtue and the Five Thearchs’ education with benevolence are called the Way, but this seems not to be the highest . 
We have not heard that when xi and Nong conducted their administrations there were written reports to them. 
Yao and Shun continued their administrations. 
The Five Classics do not mention the Heavenly Master, yet [the Discourse on the Triple Destruction] seeks instructions from these sage rulers. 
When I examine the people of the Central Plains (i.e., the downstream regions of the Yellow River), there is no one who does not believe in Daoism. 
Those now in China who believe in Buddhism must be from a tribal background. 
If they say they are not, why then do they believe in Buddhism?” The Discourse on Extinguishing Delusions says, “The ultimate of the highest Way results in the One in reason. 
The true state of the subtle Dharma is originally nondual. 
The highest of the Buddha is empty, profound, and formless, but he responds to all aspects of natural phenomena. 
entered the state of tranquility and extinction and he has no thought in his mind, yet his profound wisdom shines more and more. 
Our invisible fate secretly encounters , yet no one sees its culmination. 
We employ the deep merit daily, yet we are not aware that we are doing so. 
51b “When reveals his trace, he shows his sacredness with his golden form. 
When he responded to the secular world, he was born [as a prince] in a royal palace. 
In order to get rid of ignorance, the four-stage meditation is considered to be the beginning. 
In order to develop wisdom, the ten stages are considered to be the way leading to the goal. 
All dragons and spirits are equally guided, and even insects are equally loved. 
“The expedient teaching has no set rules. There is no contradiction between clergy and laypeople in response. 
When the One Vehicle is expounded, different scriptures are led to the same . 
Since Buddhist scriptures follow expedients, although the teaching of Confucius is different from that of Śākyamuni, tally with the Way. 
Because there are east and west on earth, a country ﬁxes its boundary between its interior and its exterior. 
In extensively administrating the marvelous ediﬁcation and educating and molding sentient beings, there is no distinction. 
Assuredly can save [all sentient beings] in the six realms of existence and completely regulate the trichiliocosm. 
The Way is simply the highest, and the Dharma is merely the most honored. 
Nevertheless, even though the highest Way is one, delusions arise at the crossroads. 
The ninety-six non-Buddhist teachings all claim to be the Way. 
When we hear their names, we cannot tell whether they are evil or virtuous, but when we verify their teachings, their truth or falsehood is spontaneously proven. 
“According to the Daoist system, there are three classes. 
Laozi is marked as the highest, the divine transcendent follows him, and Zhang Ling comes last. 
Considering the Archivist’s great escape , he is really a great, virtuous man; he wrote a book; he treated of the Way; he valued nonaction; he attributed reason to being still and uniform ;31 and his teaching is based on voidness and suppleness. 
Nevertheless, he did not record about the three periods , and the conduct based on wisdom was not transmitted by him. 
This means that is a good guidebook for secular people, but it is not a wonderful scripture beyond the mundane world. 
The petty way, like that of the Divine Transcendent, is called the Five Directions . 
Their highest happiness is to be reborn in Heaven; the best of one’s physical ability is to soar up ; one attains supernatural powers and yet cannot escape from having deﬁlements; one has a long life and yet cannot avoid death. 
Merits are not expected from food and medicine. Virtue follows practice and cultivation. 
Thereupon, ignorant and crafty Daoists give rise to false pretexts; Zhang Ling, a grain thief, was recorded to have ascended to Heaven; and Ge Xuan, a rustic, was made known as Lord Transcendent in his biography. 
Ignorant people are deluded in this way. 
Can intelligent people be deceived? 
“Today when we speak of based on the way of Venerable Sir Li , the shortcoming of the teaching is like this. When we clarify the divine transcendent following , its essence is of low quality like this. 
“Moreover, imitating Ling and Lu, perform religious services and make petitions and talismans. 
They established the teaching of the Five Pecks and intend to save [sentient beings] in the three realms of existence. 
It is as if a mosquito were to try to carry a mountain on its back. 
They hold up the name of the Great Way, but their teaching is below the level of secular . 
They put up the designation Most High [Lord Lao], but their law is extremely idiotic. 
How do I know this? 
“To wish greedily for a long life and to fear an early death are common feelings of sentient beings. 
Therefore, with the Yellow Book they 51c control women, and falsely call themselves the earthly transcendent. 
The body that is ﬁrst vigorous and later weak is loved by all sentient beings. 
Hence, they value tears and saliva treasures in order to pour them onto the numinous root . 
To avoid disaster, suffering, and disease is the constant concern of the people. 
Therefore, kill or bind evil spirits in order to make the people’s foolish minds feel happy. 
To rely on power and depend on military force is the traditional custom of the secular world. 
Therefore, with civil ofﬁcers, soldiers, and armed horsemen they stir up people’s shallow thoughts. 
Regarding the dissolute method to prevent calamities and the debauched way to control people by charms, the principles are vile and the words are disgraceful. 
“Accordingly, Zhang Jiao and Li Hong exerted a harmful inﬂuence on society at the end of the Han dynasty. 
Rebellions led by Lu Song and Sun En ﬁlled the last years of the Jin dynasty. 
They have truly numerous followers wherever the aftermath extends. 
They are not lords in the ranks of the nobility, yet they imprudently established a register system of their followers. 
They have neither the tiger-shaped nor the bamboo as a sign of their authority and rank, yet they recklessly collect taxes from . 
When the world is peaceful, they gnaw at people. They destroy the government and foment rebellions. 
How could they be regarded to be the same as the Buddha? 
“Moreover, how could the Mahāparinirvāṇa-sūtra and the Mahāprajñāpāramitā-sūtra be compared with the Inner Section of the Mysterious and Sublime and scriptures of the Shangqing (“Supreme Purity”) school? 
Why would the golden form with the excellent marks envy the room for spiritual beings and the house of emptiness (kongwu; i.e., a place for cultivation, far away from towns and villages)? 
He who subjugated the devil king of Paranirmitavaśavartin Heaven does not admire deceptive and vicious tricks. 
How could the pure cultivation and observance of the precepts be the same as the disgracefulness of tallies? 
Is producing a clean and pure sound from a large bell similar to beating a heavenly drum with one’s lips and teeth ? 
If we compare [Buddhism with Daoism] in their forms and traces, their exquisiteness and coarseness are already far apart from each other. 
When we examine them with the ultimate principle, how could the truth and falsehood be hidden? 
If laugh at exquisiteness through its coarseness and slander truth with falsehood, this is precisely the same as the case of the blind man who says to Li Zhu, [who has very good eyesight,] ‘I can see clearly.’” Response to the Discourse on the Triple Destruction, which Daoists Postulate is Zhang Rong’s Composition by Shi Sengshun The Discourse says, “Nirvana is precisely death. 
I have never seen a person who has learned about death and attained a long life.32 This is a teaching to extinguish the species.” My explanation is, “Excessive endeavours to perpetuate life result in no life .33 People like Zhang Yi and Shan Bao are good examples of this.34 Accordingly, Confucianists say, ‘Everyone accounts death a boon, and life an evil.’35 Laozi says, ‘If I did not have a body, what great calamity could come to me?’36 Zhuangzi became ill and suffered from pain in his body. 
These three men are in a group of sages and virtuous men. 
They consider life to be trouble. 
If we want to seek no life, nothing is equal to nirvana; it is the sublime appellation of wuwei . 
When the trace [of the Buddha] is spoken, there is a written record that a royal palace and twin trees. 
How could you hear of the essential points of nirvana? 
There were once three blind men who handled an elephant; the one who touched the elephant’s ear insisted that an elephant is just like a winnower; another who touched the elephant’s nose disputed this and said that an elephant 52a is like a pestle.37 Each one could know a part of the elephant, but they could not completely apprehend the actuality of the elephant after all. 
You say that nirvana is precisely death. 
You are truly like a blind man who touches only a part of an elephant.” The Discourse says, “The prince did not give up his wife and yet he causes others to cut off their posterity (i.e., remain unmarried and childless).” My explanation is, “The sacredness is truly tranquil, but he manifested the traces. 
The prince took a consort as an heir [of the royal family] probably because he wanted to show the people that after he had fulﬁlled the way of human ethics, he was then simply able to abandon this great treasure and forget his kindness and affection . 
all the gods sent blessings from Heaven in the evening 38 and he jumped over the castle astride a white horse ;39 the reason for the ten epithets exists in these . 
“Why should a wife and children be necessary? 
Moreover, children are the heaviest burden in the world. 
When one suffers from cold and hunger, he turns to thievery to make a living. 
The Sutra says, ‘All sentient beings have buddha-nature.’41 When we respectfully seek its purport, this refers exactly to those who have the seed of buddhahood. 
This is bliss and beneﬁt. 
You are confused by the tenor of the secular world and stagnate in serious delusion. 
You are dreaming. 
How can you understand it?” The Discourse says, “The prince did not take the tonsure and yet he causes others to shave their heads.” My explanation is, “Those who live with their family have their parents’ affection, while Buddhist monks have the valuable of their strict teacher. 
Speaking of love, one’s hair and skin are important. 
Speaking of the strict , shaving the head is a difﬁcult task. 
Therefore, for who are pleased to take the tonsure, who take long leave of their parents, and who wish to leave behind the deﬁlements of this world and approach the wuwei of that , it is still possible to give up their attachment to hair and skin. 
If they do not think little of hair and skin, how could they respect the Way? 
“This can be compared to the mourning system: 
requires this person to assume the heavy responsibility of the ancestral temple of his adoptive family and cut off his love and care to . 
That for his adoptive parents is extended to three years indicates the weight of his obligation indeed. 
The Book of Rites states: 
‘The reason why one who leaves his original family must shorten [the mourning period for his real parents] is because what he receives [from his adoptive family] is greater.’42 This is an example of it. 
Sutras say that all heavenly beings offer swords and ascend to Heaven holding hair.43 What do you mean by saying ‘ did not take the tonsure’? 
You are merely fearless in probing a matter to the bottom yet cowardly in seeking the purport. 
This is deplorable!” The Discourse says, “If a boy renounces the world ﬁrst and later his mother becomes a nun, she must bow down to her own son. 
This is extreme discourtesy.” My explanation is, “Those who have renounced the world revere their teacher, value the Dharma, give up secular life, and follow the Way. 
Moreover, when the prince engaged in the learning, his father, the king, paid his respects to him. 
Gaozu, the founder of the Han dynasty, accepted the advice of the Household Prefect of his father, and considered his father to be his own subject.44 Lord Gaogui Xiang , 52b the Wei kingdom, revered the King of Qi [who had been dethroned] in his private chamber.45 Empress Dowager Chu of the Jin dynasty treated her father as a vassal in the Court.46 If we judge from these incidents, it is not strange .” The Discourse says, “Those who take the tonsure are of futu .” My explanation is, “Sutras say that the term futu means ‘sacred auspiciousness’ or ‘numinous diagram.’ Since it ﬂoated upon the sea and reached , it is called futu. 
The stone buddha image of the Wuzhong area had ﬂoated in the sea and suddenly came to .47 This historical fact is an example of this. 
Consequently he had nothing of which to be ashamed in being defective in morality. 
Zhongyong, followed the customs by cutting off his hair and tattooing his body, and he educated [the natives].48 If they met you today, they would certainly fall under your disastrous barking at sounds. 
“Among things, there are things that look the same and yet are not alike, and things that do not look alike and yet are alike. 
Non-Buddhist scriptures take Zhongni to be a sage, but the Chinese character ni [in Zhongni] is used to refer to a nun in Buddhist scriptures. 
Going in and out arises from the origin. 
To extinguish deﬁlements and lead to spiritual relief are precisely what the term sangmen means. 
The Chinese character sang should be the Chinese character sheng ; this is simply the case of an incorrect character. 
The term shengmen refers to the gate of Mahayana Buddhism. 
After extinguishing deﬁlements, carry all the people they have encountered by this [over to the yonder shore]. 
Furthermore, all eighty-four thousand are called the Dharma gate. 
Why would there be only the two gates called sangmen?” The Discourse says, “Barbarians do not believe in absolute vacancy . 
After Laozi entered through Pass, he intentionally established the teaching the images and ediﬁed them.” My explanation is, “When we make inquiry into the origins of the establishment images, that is not the original intention of the teaching; it is simply because after passed away, attachment to and affection for him did not cease. 
It is also clear in the descriptions in the Buddhist scripture that they made an image from a fragrant tree, candana.51 Furthermore, after Confucius passed away, his three thousand disciples remembered him forever and gave rise to deep attachment to him. 
This is not a seat for you.’ Inferring from this, we know that think about and adore . 
“Dharma teacher Kumārajīva was born in a foreign land. 
He was sharp and intelligent. 
He was good at talking about the characteristics of all phenomenal things. 
He 52c carrying Buddhist scriptures on his back and circulated them in Guangzhong and the Sanfu area . 
He explained the twofold designation of absolute and relative reality, and veriﬁed that both objects and the intelligence to discern them are tranquil. 
He aroused the lofty education of wuwei and urged the profound stream [of the teaching] to those who had not been awakened. 
This, as they say, is to drive away until there is nothing to drive away.52 You said ‘Barbarians do not believe in absolute vacancy.’ This is really not a serious discussion. 
Gentlemen emphasize that there is superiority and inferiority in principles and they are not concerned with the existence of images, yet you talk about images. 
Isn’t this applying yourself to paganism?” The Discourse says, “ the tonsure is originally not to seek the Buddhist teaching but to subjugate evil barbarians. 
Those who do not hear the Buddhist Dharma are compared to animals; their circumstances are alike the eight difﬁculties in reality. 
The current sage conducts more lofty state affairs than did the Three Augusts and the Five Thearchs. 
He clariﬁes the Dharma of the One Vehicle. 
Heavenly and human beings rejoice equally. 
that crawl around, and that take breath through a beak all rely on him. 
It is said that even insects that pant and wriggle are rightly placed. 
If you say this and that without ﬁrm thought, you should immediately shut your mouth. 
Truly, the more is revered, the loftier it can become, and the more it is penetrated, the ﬁrmer it is.”53 The Discourse says, “ entered our country and destroys it.” My explanation is, “The Sage assuredly follows the affections in the minds of and responds to them everywhere. 
In the ediﬁcation of monarchs of latter generations, Yao and Confucius were exalted. 
As to places beneﬁted by the subtle Dharma, certainly helps the secular world and ediﬁes . 
the people spontaneously become sincere without being killed as a penalty, and they adopt the right Way without suffering from being whipped. 
The rulers of the Shi royal family (i.e., Shi Le and Shi Hu of the Later Zhao dynasty) had Fotudeng as their teacher and brought prosperity to their country. 
I hear only that Daoist monks of insigniﬁcant learning make the Red Writing in order to curse . 
They disclose others’ personal secrets, go around the altar with disheveled hair, call out to Heaven, touch their foreheads to the ground, and scheme to get rid of each other and kill each other regardless of their relative degree of intimacy. 
This is precisely the way to destroy a family.” The Discourse says, “ enters one’s body and destroys it.” My explanation is, “The body is a worse nuisance than shackles. 
Laozi considers the body to be dung and earth.55 Śākyamuni considers the three 53a realms of existence to be a house on ﬁre. 
Therefore, those who have renounced the world must leave behind luxury, give up fame and wealth, realize the difﬁculties of staying in an inn , and wish always for the bliss of complete extinction. 
Those who follow popular customs, on the contrary, seek the way to escape from death. 
‘What destroys life does not die, and what produces life is not produced.’56 “Recently a Daoist monk, who is fond of fame, said that he surpasses others in the Way of the Divine Transcendents. 
before he reached several zhang in height, he fell violently to the ground. 
When I went near him and examined him, [I found that he had used] none other than two wings of a large bird. 
He is truly the socalled one who cannot spread his wings and ﬂy away!57 “Analyzing the doomed fate of based on their present affairs, they will come to ruin ; they will be punished before they turn back. 
Zhang Ling of the Han dynasty falsely accused people and collected a high-rate tax from them. 
was called the Grain Thieves . 
They were also wiped out. 
Regarding ‘entering one’s body and destroying it,’ isn’t this something like the poem ‘The Bow Adorned with Horn ’ ?”58 The Discourse says, “[Buddhism causes family members] to not join together in singing or weeping.” My explanation is, “To weep when others weep is the ignorant behavior of common people. 
To be able to sing a song in the face of someone’s death indicates the calm and peaceful feelings of Buddhist monks. 
When Yuan Rang lost his parent he climbed a tree and sang a song. 
Confucius, who was passing by, did not blame him.59 This is also one aspect of the teaching on morality and ethics .” The Discourse says, “ do not go to the court .” My explanation is, “Confucius said, ‘The scholar sometimes will not take the high ofﬁce of a minister of the son of Heaven, nor the lower ofﬁce of serving the prince of a state.’60 Confucian scholars are a group of philistines, but they can still be like this. 
Needless to say, śramaṇas are people who are beyond this world. 
Formerly Bocheng and Zigao and Zizhou and Zhibo simply longed for profundity and adored the Way.61 Because of this they did not get involved in human affairs.” The Discourse says, “Those who take the tonsure commit the sin of damaging their body.” My explanation is, “My view regarding the hair and skin was completely explained in my previous answer. 
I will further brieﬂy speak of it. 
Generally speaking, regarding the issue, ‘not to dare to damage ,’ this is precisely in order to prevent people from doing evil, offending the judicial constitution, being punished with the ﬁve penalties, and having an incomplete body. 
“Today śramaṇas keep the teaching of the Sage in mind and stick to it. 
They seek the ten stages in the distance. 
They shave their beards and hair and put on the Dharma robe. 
They do not go against establishing themselves and becoming famous.62 When they attain the Way they liberate their relatives as well. 
“Those who stick to written language simply do not understand the purpose beyond what is written. 
Even the wheelwright Bian did not pass on his skill to his son .63 I have nothing more to say about this.” The Discourse says, “Among those who have renounced the world I have not seen a gentleman. 
Why are you having such difﬁculty in making things clear? 
The Zuozhuan says, ‘Words are an embellishment of the person.’64 Zhuangzi says, ‘If words are not extensive, it is insufﬁcient to clarify the Way.’65 Although I would prefer not speaking, how would it be possible? 
“All those who have renounced the world have the stable root of the spirit from their previous existences, a very deep capacity for virtue, and profound intelligence. 
Therefore, their spirits are concentrated and their minds are led . 
Since 53b they rise above the world, cherishing lofty thoughts, even the universe cannot examine what they have in their minds. 
“They are removed from the valuable favor of their kind parents, give up the joy and love of their families; they empty the room in order to produce bright light ,66 and they practice meditation, abiding by the profound . 
Some of them practice frugal living in a forest or wilderness, and give up their own bodies to hungry beasts. 
Some lead a calm and upright life and follow a vegetarian diet. They dedicate themselves without negligence. 
They delightedly seek the ten powers , leap over to the highest path, set the heavenly net free, melt away the earthen web, give rise to myriad merits before they fully manifest, and relieve ordinary people from ten thousand kalpas. 
“What do you mean by saying, ‘ escapees from corvée labor’? 
Confucius wished to have a beak three chi long.67 Although words come out of the mouth, if a long tongue does not offend other people, your beak should be three zhang long.68 How deeply the people are hurt by your annoying statements about things that have nothing to do with you!” The Discourse says, “If two grownup men out of three renounce the world, why does the one have no chance for the providence ?” My explanation is, “ no chance for the providence [of the Buddha] were born under no chance for the providence. 
Those who have a chance for the providence [of the Buddha] come into existence precisely under [the karmic condition of having] a chance for the providence. 
How do I know this is so? 
“In the world there is a case where the whole family entered the Way. 
Therefore it is said that they came into existence under [the karmic condition of having the] chance for the providence. 
[On the other hand,] there are those who have never heard about bhikṣus from the time they were born. 
Therefore, it is said that they were born under [the karmic condition of having] no chance for the providence. 
“Sixteen princes renounced the world on the same day and entered the Buddhist Way, following their father.69 This is exactly a case in which the whole family was drawn by the providence and reached [the Buddhist Way] all at once. 
Why do you think only two grownup men [out of three in a family] should renounce ? 
Those who have no chance for the providence accommodate themselves to the condition of having no chance for the providence and should simply seek to examine themselves. 
Don’t you want to put away your shield and spear? 
What I really hope for is that you can come back from delusion.” The Discourse says, “The Daoist teaching raises virtue and makes the country great.” My explanation is, “There are ninety-six kinds of teachings. 
The Buddhist is the most esteemed . 
Even if the deities of mountains and rivers can produce clouds and rain, they are objects to be worshiped by the country and by families. 
In the point of raising virtue and making the country great, have more or less efﬁcacy. 
Nevertheless, in saving extensively and boundlessly, pulling them out of great afﬂiction, our vajra sage (i.e., the Buddha) alone loftily wins the victory. 
“The Buddha already existed at the beginning of time, when the Grand Terminus was divided , but at that time sentient beings’ causes and conditions were not yet active. 
Hence the name was hidden for the time being. 
Why do I say this? 
Inferring about the past before the Three Augusts, how could there be neither the Book of Rites nor the Book of Changes? 
That is to say, the two hexagrams qian and kun and the two lines li and yu conveniently arose together with Heaven and Earth. 
Even though it is said that they arose together , the reasons why these names did not arise are merely because [sentient beings faculties and receptivity had not begun, so the employment of [these names] had not yet taken place. 
Although the principles have always existed, their traces were not evident. 
53c “As for the two sages, one in China and the other in a foreign country , their principles are the same. 
Therefore, it is said in [the Scripture on the Clean and Pure] Dharma Practice , ‘The three wise men were ﬁrst sent . They gradually led to the secular teaching. 
Later, with the Buddhist scriptures they the people to eliminate evil and follow the correct .’70 Li Lao’s school is a branch of Śākyamuni’s teaching. 
The Buddhist scriptures say, ‘ spoke here and there but his name varied,’71 and ‘Once he was the leader of the circle of Confucian scholars, the most reverent priest of the country, or a monk.’72 Or, he was tranquil and inactive and yet he performed a Buddhist service. 
What the golden mouth expounds corresponds to , just as [two pieces of] a tally ﬁt together precisely. 
Why do you leap around to the east and west, avoiding neither what is high nor what is low?73 Alas! 
When we attain the principles we are complete in the Way. 
For this reason, a śramaṇa is called a person of the Way . 
The people of the Yangping area are called Daoists . 
The Sage Śākyamuni attained the foundation of the Way. 
Penzu and Laozi occupy the end of the Way.74 For who attained the foundation of the Way, the Way is spontaneously revealed before he speaks of the Way. 
Those who occupy the end of the Way always talk of the Way, but the Way [of which they speak] is insufﬁcient. 
For instance, Confucius, who was deeply learned, did not make his name only for expertise in a special skill, but his disciples, such as you and xia, are regarded as all four subjects . 
When that is collected, there is life, and when it is dispersed, there is death.’75 If we follow your statement, and if the Way is material force, the Way would then be collected and dispersed, as life and death. 
I have heard that your Way also has the subject of uniting the yin and yang energies . 
I wish that you will not mention this really disgraceful issue. 
Moreover, Zhuangzi says, ‘The Way exists in excrement and urine.’76 It is possible that the Way that exists in excrement and urine is your Way of uniting the yin and yang energies, isn’t it?” End of Fascicle Eight of The Collection for the Propagation and Clariﬁcation The Record that the Emperor of the Great Liang Dynasty Sets Forth the Right Logic for Spiritual Intelligence and the Attainment of Buddhahood, together with the Preface and Annotation Composed by Shen Ji of Wuxing The Way of the Spirit is profound and obscure, and Xuanni (i.e., Confucius) certainly had nothing to say about it.77 Psychological operations are subtle, the Archivist did not talk about it, either. 
This is not because the wisdom of these sages was not complete but it is difﬁcult to understand with familiar feelings, and if it is explained in words it is abstruse. 
Therefore, great scholars of former generations left discussions about past karma, and eloquent speakers of later generations stammer when it comes to discussing one’s life to come. 
Without utmost discretion of the world, how can be made clear? 
Therefore, when deluded people hear that the spirit does not cease to exist , they all think that it is eternal; when they hear that thought (Skt. 
citta-carita) is not eternal, they all think that it becomes extinct. 
They are doubtful about the nature based on its function, and think that its nature can be extinguished; they are doubtful about its function based on its nature and think that the function is not inﬂuenced. 
None is able to seek it exquisitely. 
Each person has a strong inclination toward . 
They then cause their spontaneous nature of awakening to sink to the level of superﬁcial talk. 
The sage ruler received a profound auspicious omen and manages from the imperial throne. 
He is 41 54b aware that he should confer the law in advance of Heaven and provide teaching observing the people. 
He fears that incoherent sophistry makes its own logic and becomes rampant. 
Who can restore order through subtle descriptions of complicated traces? 
The literary forms of the teaching left behind by Śākyamuni are going to disappear. 
I, Ji, thinking from early in my life that my body is empty, set the Buddhist teaching in my mind and I often appreciate the sound of the Dharma (i.e., the Buddhist teaching), and because of this I forget to eat and sleep. 
Nevertheless, it is difﬁcult for me, having a stupid and dull temperament, to understand . 
Regarding the great meaning of buddha-nature, I lost my footing and was confused in the path of my mind . 
Since the words of the emperor have pervaded over even distant areas, all the people equally receive comfort. 
Myriad nights have ended and eternal dawn has come to the darkness. 
Questions about various issues are now clear and completely understood. 
Consequently, hovering like ﬂoating clouds, we still sense the harmony of beautiful sounds; joyful, like a swimming ﬁsh, we still appreciate the harmony of pure sounds produced with a stringed instrument. 
Moreover, the divine wonder is sent from the will of Heaven. 
This is why I dance, waving my hands and stepping about, and cannot stop myself. 
With superﬁcial perception I venture to respectfully make an annotation. 
Might this be an attempt to trace to the very source of the innermost of Heaven through the eye of a needle? 
Practicing is based on the establishment of faith. 
I, Ji, say, “Ignorant and dark people assuredly give rise to great intelligence. 
Practice is not mastered for its own sake; it must be cultivated based on faith. 
Faith is mind in reliance on a teacher and in conformity with reason without disobedience. 
Therefore, the ﬁve roots of wholesomeness take faith as the basis, and faith in the four objects takes being true to them as primary. 
To perform wholesome deeds and reach fruition is called practice.” The establishment of faith derives from right understanding. 
I, Ji, say, “If we do not know right from wrong, how can we attain faith? 
Consequently, the foundation of establishing faith is supported by right understanding.” When understanding is right, external wrong views (i.e., non-Buddhist teachings) do not disturb us. 
I, Ji, say, “If the mind is right, myriad wrong views are extinguished. 
From this it is known that when we hold right views in our minds, external wrong views do not disarrange us.” When faith is established, there are no doubts in the consciousness. I, Ji, say, “Consciousness is the mind. Therefore, the Discourse on the Achievement of Reality says, ‘The mind, thought, and consciousness are the same in essence though different in name.’78 Now that the mind has faith, of what are we doubtful?” Nevertheless, what faith and understanding depend on has its foundation. I, Ji, say, “To ‘depend on’ means to rely on. 
When there is the basis for having peace in the mind, minor issues and actions spontaneously follow . 
It is evident in the following sentences that there is the basis.” Why? Because when we examine the origin of the spiritual intelligence in which imperishability is considered to be exquisite, the exquisite spirit indeed returns to wonderful fruition. 
Therefore the sutra says, ‘When we see a dead , the body deforms and decays yet the spirit does not perish. 
According to the actions, good or bad, fortune and misfortune spontaneously follows him.’79 This is precisely the meaning of the imperishability and ceaselessness . 
If the decays just as do grass and trees, could it be said to be exquisite? 
Because is free from cessation, it returns to the culmination of subtlety after all. 
When the mind is based on this ground, all principles that you touch become clear. 
When you are clear in numerous principles, what practice could you not achieve? 
The foundation of faith and understanding means this.” The essence of the wonderful fruition goes to the end of eternity. 
The exquisite spirit cannot avoid impermanence. 
I, Ji, say, “Regarding the wonderful fruition, the principle has already been sufﬁciently clariﬁed. 
Hence, it must go through changes.” Impermanence is to perish ﬁrst, arise later, and not stay even for a moment . 
When arises and is then extinguished, how could there of staying? 
ālambana), the consciousness of the former must differ from that of the latter . 
In this case, goes together with the circumstance. 
Who then would be able to attain buddhahood? I, Ji, say, “The mind moves following the circumstance. 
This is its external operation. 
Even though the latter follows the former, this is not a discussion of reality after all. Consequently, it is known that the nature of the spiritual consciousness is quiet and calm and does not move. 
Since it is quiet and calm and does not move, it ﬁnally returns to the wonderful fruition.” The sutra says, “The mind is the right cause and achieves the fruition of buddhahood after all.”81 I, Ji, say, “Brieﬂy speaking of the cause of attaining buddhahood, there are two meanings: 
one is the condition that causes and the other is the right cause . 
The condition refers to all wholesome deeds, and the right means the spiritual consciousness. 
All wholesome deeds have the merit of helping to reveal . Therefore it is called the condition . The spiritual consciousness is the basis of the right cause. 
Therefore it is called ‘right cause.’ It has already been stated that achieves the fruition of buddhahood after all. 
This clearly veriﬁes that is ceaseless.” Furthermore, says, “If ignorance is transformed it turns into intelligence.”82 According to this, the purpose of the sutra should be able to be pursued in reason. 
The mind is the basis of function. 
The basis is one while its function varies. 
The mutual shift between brightness and darkness is called ‘change.’ In the case where something leaves ﬁrst and another thing comes later, this is not called ‘change.’” The basis, which is one, is nothing but ignorance and spiritual intelligence. 
I, Ji, say, “Spiritual intelligence is based on darkness. 
Therefore, ignorance is considered to be the cause.” Searching for what is called ignorance, it is not a category of the Grand Void. 
Soil and stone have no feelings. How, then, can it be said that they are ignorant? 
I, Ji, say, “In distinguishing between good and bad, we have no ideas without the mind; in knowing clearly right or wrong, we have no recognition without feelings. 
Soil and stone have no minds. 
Therefore it is known that understanding and delusion depend on the existence of the mind, and a fool and an intelligent depend on the existence of consciousness. When ignorance is mentioned, the meaning depends on the existence of the mind.” Consequently, it is known that while discerning thought should be intelligent, its essence is subject to delusion, and since deluded thought does not know, it is called ignorance. 54c I, Ji, say, “Intelligence is the real nature. Therefore, it must be intelligent. 
Hence, delusion unavoidably enters it. Being deluded and not understanding is called ignorance. 
Based on this, the name was given. 
How could its purport be untrue?” Accordingly, ignorance has arising and extinction in essence. 
Arising and extinction differ from each other in function. 
The meaning of the ignorant mind does not change. 
I, Ji, say, “Inasmuch as there is essence, there is function. 
When speaking of function, it is not essence. 
When speaking of essence, it is not function. 
In function there are arising and falling away, but in essence there is no arising or extinction.” I am afraid that if one sees that function varies, he will think that the mind is extinguished, following the circumstance. 
Apart from essence there is no function. 
When people see staying not too far away, they may become confused about [that essence and function sustain a relation of] staying not too close; when they are confused about staying not too close, they think that the mind is extinguished following the circumstance.” Therefore, the term zhudi is added after the name “ignorance.” This shows that ignorance is precisely spiritual intelligence and the nature of the spiritual intelligence does not change. 
I, Ji, say, “The reason to link the term zhudi to ignorance is probably to expel the deluded consciousness. 
Those who harbor afﬂictions have not perceived .” How do we know this? 
If the mind formerly committed a heavy evil act which causes one to fall into Avīci Hell, and later the consciousness gives rise to the excellent wholesomeness of non-thought, good and evil are very far apart from each other in reason, and there is a big difference between the former and the latter. 
I, Ji, say, “If there is no basis, function has nothing on which to rely. 
A deluded person sees that the similar categories are continuous and thus considers them to be the same. 
Therefore, the great wholesomeness is taken up in order to expel the confusion about this continuation.” From this, it is known that the former evil is spontaneously extinguished, yet the deluded consciousness does not change; and even though the latter wholesomeness arises, the mind of darkness does not change. 
I, Ji, say, “The arising and extinction of good and evil never damage the basis.” Therefore, the sutra says, “What is accompanied by the bondage of deﬁlement is called ‘ignorance,’ and what is accompanied by all wholesome things is called ‘intelligence.’”83 Isn’t it that the nature of consciousness is one and it varies following conditions? 
I, Ji, say, “If good and evil alternately arise, how can it then be said [that they are] ‘together’? 
Nevertheless, these words are constantly opposed to each other, and their purposes are always indistinct. 
Therefore, this important sentence is given in order to explain this to the many deluded people.” Hence, it is known that the change of arising and extinction requites a past cause, and the alternation of good and evil arises in the present state of the mind. 
I, Ji, say, “Arising and extinction are caused by actions one previously performed; it is not that they are caused by the present state of the mind. 
Good and evil arise in the current state of the mind; it is not that one’s actions done in the past cause them.” Moreover, the mind is the basis. 
I, Ji, say, “Even though the function differs, the essence does not.” Since the basis of the function is ceaseless, the law of the attainment of buddhahood is bright. 
Since it changes following the state of the mind, it is clear that birth and death can be brought to an end. 
I, Ji, say, “That the attainment of buddhahood is bright relies on the basis. 
That birth and death can be brought to an end is derived from the function. 
If there is function but no basis, one is extinguished and does not attain . 
If there is basis but no function, one attains and there is nothing to extinguish.” Criticism of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit Preface by Xiao Chen 55a Fan Zizhen , the elder brother of my wife, wrote the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit, in which he clariﬁed that there is no buddha. 
He says that he has defeated numerous people in argument and caused a thousand people to surrender in a single day. 
I would like to examine some doubtful points and inquire about what I have not yet understood. 
What the Discourse has maintained up to today is about the physical body and the spirit, and what it argues is the principle is exquisite. 
For instance, the fact that offerings are presented with ﬁlial piety at the ancestral temple in spring and autumn is considered to be for what the sages, in accordance with the Way of the Spirit, laid down instructions and rites and guarded against ignorance. 
Du Bo fully drew a bow [to shoot King Xuan].84 Boyou, [who had been killed by a man of Zheng state, walked around] in armor.85 It is said that monsters spontaneously appear between Heaven and Earth; it is not that people who died became ghosts. 
In this way, it is impossible to cross-examine with the Book of Odes and the Book of History or to compare with things that happened in the past. 
If body and spirit are one, and exist and are extinguished at the same time, then Fan Zi will exult and rouse himself in an impregnable fortress in the distance. 
If spirit and body separate from each other and arise and go to ruin at different , I will overcome my enemy and attain superiority, and my task will be completed. 
Moreover, even though I make clear that there are buddhas, my treatment of “buddha” is not the same as that of other secular people. 
I will explain my real intention at the same time and attach it after the Discourse. 
The Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit The questions and answers are those between a guest and a host in the original text of the Discourse; the criticism is my present inquiry. Question: “You say that the spirit is extinguished. 
How do you know it is extinguished?” Answer: 
“The spirit conforms to the body and the body conforms to the spirit. 
For this reason, when the body exists, the spirit does, too. 
When the body withers away, the spirit is extinguished.” Question: 
“The body is the name of what has no perception. 
The spirit is the name of what has perception. 
There are differences in conformity with phenomena between what has perception and what does not. 
In reason, it is not acceptable that spirit and body are one. 
That body and spirit conform to each other is not what I have learned.” Answer: 
“The body is the substance of the spirit and the spirit is the function of the body. 
This means precisely that the body is the substance and the spirit is the function. 
It should then give evidence for their inseparability. 
However, simply 55b says, ‘The spirit conforms to the body and the body conforms to the spirit. 
It is impossible that body and spirit differ from each other.’ This is debating without evidence. 
Here I will testify on the basis of dreams that it is impossible that body and spirit are one. 
While someone is asleep, his body is an object that has no perception, but it has occasion to see something. 
This is because the spirit goes out and makes contact with . 
The spirit does not stand by itself; it must inhabit the body. 
It is just like that people do not live in the open air but need a house in which to live. 
When the spirit returns to the body, the consciousness becomes slightly confused, and [in its confusion] what has seen becomes a dream. 
When people come back to their homes, their spirits are suddenly obstructed. 
Since [their spirits have suddenly become] obstructed, brightness turns to darkness. 
Sometimes in a dream people soar up into the deep sky or travel ten thousand li to a distant place. 
if the spirit does not travel does the body go? 
If the body does not go and the spirit does not separate from the body, how could a case like this be possible? 
It is said that is a manifestation of what one thinks. 
So when a person peacefully enjoys deep sleep, his body is like a piece of wood that lies ﬂat, and his breath is like cold ashes. 
If it is said that spirit and body are one, this means that both the outside and the inside are inactive. 
If a does not have contact with sounds from the external world, how then could he give rise internally to thoughts? 
From this, it can be certainly known that even if the body is motionless the spirit moves swiftly. 
Furthermore, I have questions about dreams in general. 
Zhao Jianzi dreamed of a naked boy singing a song that could as meaning that the state of Wu would invade the state of Zou.86 One of the eunuchs of the state of Jin dreamed that he had ascended to Heaven carrying the marquis on his back, but [in fact, at midday on the same day] he had to carry the marquis on his back out of the privy .87 These are examples of this. 
Qi dreamed that he had shot an arrow at the middle of the moon.88 The empress of Wu state dreamed that her intestines left [her body] and ﬂew around the Gate of Heaven .89 These are examples of this. 
Jiang dreamed that Heaven named his son Yu.90 A man of Cao state dreamed that many gentlemen were plotting to ruin the state of Cao.91 These are examples of this. 
he, “rice crop,” and shi, “to lose.92 Wang Jun had a dream about three swords and became a district magistrate of a province [since the Chinese character zhou, “province,” consists of three of the Chinese character dao, “sword..93 These are examples of this. Some have nothing that conforms to reality. A man of the northern tribe dreamed of a boat. 
A man of the Yue region [in southern China, where river boats are a major means of transportation] had a dream of riding a horse. These are examples of this. Some later come true, and some do not. The head of the Yin dynasty obtained Fu Yue, in a dream.94 Emperor Wen of the Han dynasty dreamed that he obtained Deng Tong.95 testify [to dreams that later came true]. 
All of these indicate that the mutation of the spirit is vague and uncertain, and the unseen world and this world is unpredictable. 
This is easy to understand in brief but difﬁcult to discuss thoroughly with logic. 
If it is not accepted that the spirit goes out , all must be sought within the body. 
I am afraid that a piece of the hidden spirit is cut off from seeing the external world. 
Although you lean on the six kinds of dreams96 or try to aid with conception and cause, it is impossible in reason.” Question: “The spirit is originally not the substance and the body is originally not the function, either. 
“Their names differ from each other, but their essences are one.” Question: 
“Their names already differ from each other. 
Why is it possible that their essences are one?” Answer: 
“ between spirit and substance is similar to that between sharpness and a sword. 
between body and function is similar to that between a sword and its sharpness. 
The word ‘sharpness’ is not the sword; the word ‘sword’ is not sharpness. 
There is, however, no sword apart from its sharpness, and there is no sharpness apart from the sword. 
I have not heard that when a sword disappears its sharpness remains. 
How could it be possible that the body is lost yet the spirit remains?” Criticism: 
“The sharpness that a sword possesses is due to the effect of the sharpened on a whetstone. 
Therefore, it can slice iguanodons and dragons in water and cut rhinoceroses and tigers on land.97 If its sharpness is used up thoroughly and its function comes to an end, the sword’s tip and edges will certainly break and the sword becomes blunt. 
Just like this, sharpness is lost, yet the sword remains. 
Namely, the spirit is lost yet the body remains. 
Why do you say there is no sword apart from sharpness and the words ‘sword’ and ‘sharpness’ differ from each other but their essences are one? 
Since a sword and sharpness are not extinguished together, body and spirit do not perish together, either. 
Even though you are capable of making an example from familiar things, it goes against reality in reason.” Question: 
“ a sword and sharpness is probably as you say, but the signiﬁcance of body and spirit is not the same as this. 
Why do I say so? 
The substance of a tree has no perception, while the substance of a human being has perception. 
A human being already has substance, as does a tree, yet has perception that a tree does not have. 
Isn’t it that a tree has one but a human being has two ?” Answer: 
“This sounds strange! 
If a human being has substance, like that of a tree, that is considered to be the body, and he has perception, which a tree does not have, that is regarded as the spirit, then it might be as you say. 
Now, regarding the substance of a human being, this substance has perception. 
As for the substance of a tree, its substance has no perception. 
The substance of a human being is not that of a tree; the substance of a tree is not that of a human being. 
“The reason the substance of a human being differs from that of a tree is because has perception. 
Would a human being who has no perception be any different from a tree?” Answer: 
“A human being does not have substance without perception. 
It is just as a tree does not have a body that has perception.” Question: 
“Isn’t the dead body a substance without perception?” Answer: 
“If that is the case, a human being surely has a substance like that of a tree, as well as the perception that distinguishes from a tree.” Answer: 
“A dead body has substance like that of a tree, yet it does not have the perception that distinguishes from a tree. 
A living person has this perception that distinguishes from a tree, yet he or she does not have a substance like that of a tree.” Question: 
“Isn’t the skeleton of a dead body the same as that of a living person?” Answer: 
“A living body is not a dead body; a dead body is not a living body. 
How could a person who has the skeleton of a living person have the skeleton of a dead body?” Question: 
“If the skeleton of a living person is not the same as that of a dead body, the skeleton must not derive from that of a living person. 
If does not derive from the skeleton of a living person, from where does this skeleton come?” 53 56a Answer: 
“It comes from the skeleton of a living person, which changes and becomes the skeleton.” Question: 
“Even if the skeleton of a living person changes and becomes the skeleton, wouldn’t there be death on the basis of life? 
So, it is known that a dead body is still a living body.” Answer: 
“If a leafy tree changes and becomes a withered tree [with no leaves], how could the substance of the withered tree be same essence as that of the leafy tree?” Question: 
“The essence of a leafy changes and becomes the essence of a withered . 
The essence of a withered is exactly the essence as that of a leafy . 
It is just like the essence of very ﬁne thread that changes and becomes the essence of twisted yarn; the essence of the twisted yarn is exactly the same essence as that of the very ﬁne thread. 
Is there anything faulty in this?” Answer: 
“If a withered is exactly a leafy and a leafy is nothing other than a withered should then appear withered when it is ﬂourishing and bear fruit when it is withered. 
Moreover, a leafy tree should not change and become a withered tree. 
Since a leafy is exactly a withered , no further change can happen to a withered . 
In addition, if a leafy and a withered are the same, why isn’t a tree ﬁrst withered and leaﬂess, only later does it have leaves? 
Why is it ﬁrst leafy and later withered ? 
“When life leaves his body, should be suddenly and completely exhausted. 
Why does his dead body remain for a long time?” Answer: 
“There must be a sequential order in the essence of arising and extinction. 
Therefore, what arises suddenly must be extinguished suddenly; what arises gradually must be extinguished gradually. 
What arises gradually are such things as animals or plants. 
There is sudden and gradual . 
“The Discourse says, ‘The substance of a human being has perception while the substance of a tree has no perception.’ Isn’t this because a human being recognizes when it is cold or hot, he knows pain and itchiness, he lives when he is nourished, and dies when he is injured? 
A tree is the same. 
It is leafy in spring and withered in fall. 
When it is planted it must grow, but when it is pulled out , it must die. 
Why do you think has no perception? 
Here now the substance of a human being is just like that of a tree. 
When the spirit stays , the body arises; when the spirit leaves [the body], the body is exhausted. 
arises is precisely like a leafy tree, and is exhausted is exactly like a withered tree. 
Why do you assert that this is not the perception of the spirit and say that substance has perception? 
Myriad things are all perceived by the spirit; they are not perceived by the substance. 
The nature of grass, trees, and insects is, however, to simply be aware of ﬂourishing, withering, arising, and extinction. 
The consciousness of a human being distinguishes safety from danger, or advantage from disadvantage. 
Why do you say it is not that has substance like that of a tree, which becomes the body, and has perception that distinguishes from a tree, which becomes the spirit? 
This would mean that body and spirit exist as two that can be distinguished from each other. 
Trees merely receive the partial energy of yin and yang, while human beings bear the exquisite intellectual function of the numinous being. 
In consciousness, both are probably the same, but they differ from each other in spirit. 
In the discussion on the skeleton [of a dead body] and that , and in the explanation for giving and receiving death and life, judgment has already been previously settled. 
The issues are absurd, as well. 
“In the case where the body conforms to the spirit, are [body parts,] such as hands, considered to be the spirit, too?” Answer: 
“All are parts of the spirit.” Question: 
“If all are parts of the spirit, then just as the spirit ought to be able to think, hands and other body parts should be able to think, too.” Answer: 
“Hands and other body parts have perception pain and itchiness, but they have no faculty of thinking to judge right or wrong.” Question: 
“Are perception and thought the same or different?” Answer: 
“Perception is precisely thought. 
What is shallow becomes perception and what is deep becomes thought.” 55 Question: 
“If this is so, there ought to be two kinds of thoughts. 
Since there are two kinds of thoughts, are there then also two kinds of spirits?” Answer: 
“The body of a human being is only one. 
How could it be possible to have two kinds of spirits?” Question: 
“If there cannot be two kinds of spirits, why does [a human being] have perception pain and itchiness as well as the faculty of thinking to judge right or wrong?” Answer: 
“Even though hands differ from feet, they all are of a person, and even though right and wrong, or pain and itchiness, differ from each other, they all are of the spirit.” Question: 
“If the faculty of thinking to judge right or wrong is not concerned with hands and feet, with what should it be concerned?” Answer: 
“The faculty of thinking to judge right or wrong is taken charge of by the heart organ.” Question: 
“The heart organ is the heart of the ﬁve internal organs (i.e., heart, liver, spleen, lungs, and kidneys), isn’t it?” Answer: 
“Correct!” Question: 
“What distinction is there among the ﬁve internal organs? 
Does only the heart have the faculty of thinking to judge right or wrong?” Answer: 
“What difference is there among the seven apertures in the human head ? 
Their functions are not equal. 
Why?” Question: 
“Thought has no set pattern. 
How is it known that this is taken charge of by the heart organ?” Answer: 
“When the mind becomes ill, the faculty of thinking falls into disorder. 
From this, it is known that the heart is the basis of thought. 
” Question: 
“How do you know that does not lodge in other body parts, such as the eyes?” Answer: 
“If the faculty of thinking can lodge in the eyes, why does the faculty of sight not lodge in the ears?” Question: 
“Since the essence of thought has no basis, it can lodge in the eyes. 
“Why do the eyes have the basis? Why does thought have no basis? 
Is this the case? 
No, it is not.” Criticism: 
such as hands are of the spirit.’ This indicates that the spirit takes the body as the essence. 
When the essence is complete, the spirit is complete, too; when the essence is injured, the spirit becomes deﬁcient.98 What is spirit? 
It is discernment and thought. 
Now, even if a person receives a cut on his hands and feet, or his skin and ﬂesh are damaged, his wisdom does not fall into disorder. 
“The spirit simply employs wisdom in order to do things and it lodges in the organs in order to facilitate the intellectual function. 
It is similar to dwellings, which have a gate on the east to invite wise people, a balcony on the south for views, a window on the north to take in fresh air, and carved windowsills on the west that project the moon; the host uprightly occupies the middle of the room and conducts all his business. 
“If the issue is just as your discourse says, each of the [sense organs of the] mouth, nose, ears, and eyes has its part of the spirit. 
Then, if an eye becomes ill, the spirit of the visual sense will be damaged and both eyes ought to go blind together; if an ear becomes ill, the spirit of the auditory sense will be harmed and both ears ought to go deaf together. 
From this, it is known that the spirit is considered to be the organ, but is not considered to be the essence. 
“Moreover, says, ‘The heart is the basis of thought. Thought cannot lodge in other parts.’ In regard to the mouth, eyes, ears, and nose, this view is correct. 
If, however, it is concerned with other people’s minds, this is not so. 
“Although the ears and nose work together with one body, they cannot be mixed together. 
It is because what each of them has control of differs from the other organs and the function of each organ differs from that of the others. 
57 Even though other people’s minds exist in each of their bodies, it is possible to communicate with one another. 
This is because the principles of the mind are equally ingenious, and discernment and thought are equal in achievement. 
Why do you say that Zhang Jia’s mind cannot lodge in Wang Yi’s body, or Li Bing’s nature cannot lodge in Zhao Ding’s body?” Question: 
“Sages’ bodies are similar to those of ordinary people, but there is a difference between ordinary people and sages. 
Hence, it is known that body differs from spirit.” Answer: 
“This is not so. 
Pure gold can shine while impure gold cannot. 
Could there be a case where pure gold, which can shine, has the essence of impurity, which cannot shine? 
Moreover, could there be a case where the spirit of a sage lodges in the body of an ordinary person? 
There is no case where the spirit of an ordinary person lodged in the body of a sage, either. 
Therefore, xun had eight variegated colors, and hua had eyes with double pupils. 
Xuan (i.e., the Yellow Emperor) had a forehead resembling that of a dragon, and Gao had a mouth like that of a horse.104 These are differences in physical appearance. 
In Bi Gan’s heart seven apertures stand side by side.105 Boyue’s gall was as large as a ﬁst. 
These are differences in the heart and internal organs. 
Therefore, it is known that the characteristics of sages always differ from those of ordinary people. 
It is not only that their way is more remarkable than that of sentient beings; the bodies of sages also go beyond those of all creatures in the world. 
“You said that sages’ bodies must differ from those of ordinary people. 
I venture to ask you: 
Yang Huo looked like Confucius and of Xiang Ji resembled those of Emperor Shun. 
Between Shun and Xiang or between Confucius and Yang there are differences in intelligence even though they were similar in appearance. 
What is the reason for this?” Answer: 
“The stone called min resembles jade, but it is not jade; the bird called ju looks like a male phoenix, but it is not a male phoenix. 
In things there really are such cases. 
The features of Xiang and Yang are similar [to those of Emperor Shun and Confucius, respectively], but the former are not in reality. 
It is because the heart organs [of Xiang Ji and Yang Huo] are not equal . their physical features alone is meaningless.” Question: 
“You may say that ordinary people and sages differ from each other; their bodies and internal organs are not the same. 
Sages are completely perfect, and they are peerless in reason. 
It is more evident here.” Answer: 
“Regarding the issue that sages are equally sages, they are equal in sacred ability, but this does not mean that their bodies must be the same. 
It is just like horses whose coats vary in color run equally fast, or jade stones that are diverse in color are still equally beautiful. 
Therefore [the jade produced in] Chuiji of Jin state and He of Chu state are as valuable as ﬁfteen cities.107 Hualiu and Daoli could both gallop a thousand li .”108 Question: 
“I have already heard that body and spirit are nondual. 
That the spirit is extinguished when the body withers should be indeed so in reason. 
I dare ask you: 
the Canon says, ‘They prepare the ancestral temple and make offerings to serve the spirits of the deceased.’109 What does this mean?” Answer: 
“The sage’s teaching is exactly so. 
, ‘God is the one who clariﬁes it.’110 This is the meaning.” Question: 
Pengsheng, [who had been executed for murdering Lord Huan of Lu state,] appeared as a boar.111 These incidents are recorded in ancient books. 
“Things about ghosts are vague; they may or may not exist. There are many who die an unnatural death, yet not all of them become ghosts. 
Why would only Pengsheng and Boyou do so? 
Now he is a man, now a boar. 
It is not necessarily the case that is the son of the lord of Qi state or Zheng state.” Question: 
“The Book of Changes says, ‘Thus it is known that the condition of spiritual beings is similar to the law of Heaven and Earth, and there is no difference between these two.’112 Furthermore, it says, ‘There is a carriage full of ghosts.’113 What do these mean?” Answer: 
“There are birds and animals. 
ﬂy and run. 
There are people and disembodied spirits. 
“The Discourse says, ‘Could there be a case where the spirit of a sage lodges in the body of an ordinary person? 
There is no case where the spirit of an ordinary person lodges in the body of a sage, either.’ Yang Huo looked like Confucius and Xiang Ji resembled Emperor Shun. 
These are precisely that the spirit of an ordinary person can lodge in the body of a sage. 
“The stone min and jade, or the bird ju and a male phoenix, cannot be used as parables . 
The stone min has its own name, min; jade is truly called jade; the full name of the bird ju is designated as yuanju; a male phoenix is called the divine phoenix. 
The names already differ from each other and their features differ from each other in reality as well. 
Shun had the eyes with double pupils and Xiang Ji also had eyes with double pupils. 
This is not the case of having two different names, min and jade. 
“Furthermore, there are other examples, such as that Nüwa had a body like a snake and Gao Yao had a mouth like a horse. 
not only that the spirit of a sage can enter into the body of an ordinary person, but also that the spirit can subsequently lodge in the body of an insect or animal. 
From this, it is more evident that body and spirit differ from each other, and brightness and darkness are not the same. 
“If body and spirit are uniform and the cause of the former existence is cut off in reason, only a sage ought to be born to a sage; a worthy person must give a birth to a worthy person; and a brave person, a coward, an ignorant person, and an intelligent person are all supposed to resemble their parents . 
“The Discourse further says, ‘Sages are equal in sacred ability. This does not mean that their abilities must be the same. 
It is just like horses whose coats vary in color run equally fast.’ Here, are the horses’ coats the abilities that run fast? 
Among horses whose coats are the same color, old, worn-out horses and ﬁne horses may differ . 
In this way, the color of the horse’s coat has nothing to do with the characteristic of running fast. 
This is because in body there is no sacred ability. 
In the body of a human being there is no difference between an ordinary person and a sage, but there is a difference between being strong and being weak. 
Therefore, a patient spirit stays in a profound body, while an impatient spirit dwells in an approachable body. 
Regarding the bodies of sages mentioned previously by , he directly refers to the bodies of Confucius and Shun but he does not say that their bodies have sacred intelligence. 
“If I know that my spirit is extinguished, what advantage is there ?” Answer: 
Śramaṇas ruin popular customs. Just as ﬁerce winds blow and fog arises, spreads out widely, without stopping. 
I lament its baneful inﬂuence and intend to save those who indulge in . 
People use up their wealth in order to go to Buddhist monks, and they go bankrupt in order to follow the Buddha, yet they neither sympathize with their relatives nor feel pity for poor and destitute people. 
It is really because they have the deep feeling to favor themselves and a shallow intention to save others. 
Isn’t this because they expect a great reward from the Buddhist monks but no repayment from their friend? 
“ delude people with obscure words, frighten people with torment in Avīci Hell, decoy people with preposterous talk, and make people joyful with happiness in Tuṣita Heaven. 
Therefore, take off the Confucian robe and put on a Buddhist monk’s robe. 
They abandon the sacriﬁcial stand and pot and arrange vases and bowls . 
In every family, people give up attachment to their family members. 
Every one cuts off his offspring. 
As a result, causes soldiers to lose courage in military affairs, ofﬁcials to absent themselves from government ofﬁces, grain to be used up because of people’s laziness, and commodities to be exhausted because of construction projects. 
voices praising the Buddha’s excellence are still powerful. 
This is all because of . 
This tendency continues without stopping, and the harm goes on limitlessly. 
the common people are satisﬁed with their ﬁelds and gentlemen remain calm, being free from avarice. 
If people till the land and obtain food, we will not run short of supplies of food. 
If they raise silkworms in order to obtain clothing, we will not run out of clothes. 
When people of the lower classes have a surplus they will offer it to those of the upper class. 
People of the upper class maintain wuwei and wait for the common people . 
Then people can fulﬁll the entire course of their lives, attend their parents with devotion, manage themselves, act for the sake of others, do things for the good of the country, and make their ruler powerful. 
“The existence of the Buddha depends on whether or not the principles of the mind exist. 
From now I will point out the gains and losses and speak of its advantages and disadvantages in order to correct your excessive discussion. 
Some monks do so, but this is not the Buddha’s fault. 
When the Buddha established the teaching, its basis was to be fond of life, to abhor killing, to practice good deeds, and to be engaged in almsgiving. 
To be fond of life is not only limited to the wish that birds and animals should multiply but also to consider that the numen of a human being is important. 
Could it be possible that to abhor killing means to suspend a sentence, forgive a criminal, or let a criminal abscond? 
This refers to investigating criminals and judging them with sympathy. 
To practice good deeds does not necessarily mean to revere one zhang and six chi tall. 
It is to consider faithfulness and honesty as superior. 
To be engaged in almsgiving does not at all mean to use up one’s wealth for construction projects. 
If everyone were to cut off his offspring the Dharma seed would certainly never be transmitted. 
Even ordinary people understand this. 
“At present, if Buddhist monks who ‘wait by the stump,’ [hoping other hares will come by that same spot because they once caught a hare at that place] and confused, petty people see someone with cold, they do not give even a poor article of clothing to him, or if they encounter a starving man they do not give even coarse food to him. 
Nevertheless, vie with one another in gathering Buddhist monks who lack insight, and compete with one another in making many buddha . 
They abandon their relatives and never think of them. 
They abolish offering sacriﬁces and never practice moral cultivation. 
They tear up good silk fabric Buddhist temples and 58a scatter cinnabar and gold under pagodas. 
They think such acts are all for a ﬁeld of merit and expect a reward. 
This is all because their comprehension of the Buddha is not deep and their understanding of the Dharma is not excellent. 
Even though they call the Buddha the Buddha, do they understand the purpose of taking refuge in the Buddha? 
They call a Buddhist monk a Buddhist monk, yet how could they reach the meaning of following Buddhist monks? 
In this condition, divine beings do not bless them. 
I can do nothing for them, either. 
“In the ways of the six schools of philosophy, each has had a long-accumulated evil effect. 
This is entirely because the founders lost the transmission and came to fall into the mire. 
You pick up the fault of being too severe and sophistic but you do not blame the founders Han and Deng . 
Yet you punish only our Tathāgata and disparage his right, perfect enlightenment. 
This is similar to becoming angry at wind and waves and destroying a ship . 
“Rebels and villains presently deceive the ruler and their parents who are in a superior social position, and they are cruel to people of the same class in an inferior social position. 
Some do not fear the brilliant law , but are suddenly afraid of the government ofﬁce of the netherworld. 
They shrink from King Yama’s ferocity and fear the brutality of the ox-headed wardens of hell. 
Consequently, they repent their evils and reform themselves. 
This is an advantage . 
Moreover, the law of evil acts and meritorious deeds cannot differ from that of the worldly teaching, and should not go against human feeling. 
If there is someone who serves the ruler with loyalty, earnestly attends his parents with ﬁlial piety, and is trusted by his friends, it never happens to such a person that if he commits a fault that squanders his virtue he is disdained and abandoned, or if he commits the sin of killing insects or ﬁsh he falls into hell. 
Lord Yi slaughtered an animal in order to nourish King Tang.115 Zengzi cooked a fowl in order to nourish Dian. 
Both of these men, however, went to the hell of intense heat , and to the hell of sharp-pointed swords together. 
they served their superiors yet they were against beneﬁting their inferiors. 
“Formerly, Mi Zi made a false statement and rode a carriage [of the lord of Wei state because he was rushing to his sick mother], but he was spared from execution because of his great generosity.116 Alas! 
I once thought that the numinous artisan is not as good as the lord of Wei state. 
Therefore, it is known that this is a precaution for merciless people and not an admonition for kindhearted people. 
If we thoroughly examine its deviation and arbitrariness, the fault does not lie in the Buddha. 
When we observe fortune and misfortune, we realize that the teaching was given in order to lead . 
For this reason, when the body exists, the spirit does, too. 
When the body withers away, the spirit is extinguished.” Criticism: 
“Body does not conform to spirit and spirit does not conform to body. 
These are united and then they perform functions. 
Accordingly, uniting is not conforming. 
While one is alive, are united and perform functions. 
At the time of death the body still remains but the spirit departs. 
On what basis do I say so? 
In former times Zhao Jianzi was ill for ﬁve days, during which he did not recognize people , 58b and Lord Mu of Qin state came to his senses seven days .117 Both of their spirits traveled to the place of the Celestial Thearch, where the Thearch had magniﬁcent music played for them in Juntian . 
Is this an example that the body remains while the spirit departs? 
If the spirit is extinguished when the body perishes, as the Discourse says, then body and spirit should certainly be together, just as a shadow or echo . 
If this is so, when the body is ill the spirit would also be ill. 
How, then, could only the spirits travel to the Celestial Thearch and be delighted by the magniﬁcent music of Juntian, while their bodies they did not recognize the people ? 
This means that the spirit communicates with others while one sleeps. 
Therefore, the spirit became a butterﬂy and ﬂew around.118 That is to say, his body and spirit separated from each other. 
Namely, his body and spirit were united. 
When they are united they become one entity; when they separate from each other, the body perishes and the spirit departs. 
Therefore, when [Jizi of] Yanling buried his son, he said, ‘The bones and ﬂesh return again to the earth but the spirit in its energy can go everywhere.’119 This exactly means that even though the body perishes, the spirit is not extinguished. 
If this is so, then the clear testimonies found in the scriptures and history books are of uncommon brilliance. 
How could it be that when the body perishes the spirit is extinguished?” The Discourse says, “The questioner says, ‘The Canon says, “They prepare the ancestral temple and make offerings to serve spirits of the deceased.’ The explanation says, ‘It is not that there are spirits of the deceased. 
This is because the sage’s teaching is exactly so. 
“What the Discourse says is completely a sentimental expression, not the sage’s purpose. 
Please let me quote a passage from the Canon [of Filial Piety] in order to testify to the sage’s teaching. 
The Canon of Filial Piety says, ‘Formerly, the Duke of Zhou sacriﬁced to Houji (Minister of Agriculture) at the border altar in order to enshrine him as the correlate of Heaven, and he honored King Wen in the Brilliant Hall in order to enshrine him as the correlate of the Supreme Thearch.’120 If body and spirit are extinguished together, who then was enshrined as the correlate of Heaven, and who was enshrined as the correlate of the Supreme Thearch? 
If ji did not really exist and yet he was vainly enshrined as the correlate of Heaven, this is precisely to deceive Heaven, and it also deceives the people. 
How could one who establishes a teaching on the basis of deception and falsity cause people to master the mind of a ﬁlial child and oppress thoughts of slighting ? 
“Seeking for the purpose of the Discourse, its prerequisite is that the spirit does not exist. 
I will try to question closely again. 
“Confucius offered a small amount of vegetable soup and melons in sacriﬁce at his ancestral temple.122 The Book of Rites says, ‘We welcome [the spirits of ancestors] with joy and send them off with sadness.’123 If there is no spirit, what are we supposed to welcome in reception? 
If there is no spirit, what are we supposed to send off at that time? 
If was happy when he welcomed , it would be false happiness that appeared on his face. 
If he was sad when departed, the tears he shed from his body would be false. 
If this [was the case, then] in the religious services Confucius performed deception ﬁlled his mind, and his ancestral temple was full of falsity. 
Could the sage’s teaching be like this? 
Nevertheless, you say, ‘The sage’s teaching is exactly so.’ Why?” I, Siwen, speak. 
I personally read Fan Zhen’s Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit, in which he made himself the guest as well as the host. 
Consequently, there are more than thirty articles. 
Without thinking of my ignorance, I, Siwen, slightly criticized only two articles of the important points of the Discourse. 
I earnestly desire to break the root with this. 
When I look up I disgrace a blessing from Heaven, and when I look down I tremble in fear as a consequence of . 
The two articles you criticized will be separately read in detail. 
“Body does not conform to spirit and spirit does not conform to body. 
These are united and then they perform functions. 
Accordingly, uniting is not conforming.” Answer: 
“If are united and perform functions, it is clear that they have no function unless they are united. 
It is just like the animal called qiong and the animal called ju depend on each other; if one of them becomes disabled, the other cannot . 
Will you, however, become reinforcement for me?” Criticism: 
“In former times Zhao Jianzi was ill for ﬁve days, during which he did not recognize people , and Lord Mu of Qin state came to his senses seven days . 
Both of their spirits traveled to the place of the Celestial Thearch, where the Thearch had magniﬁcent music played for them in Juntian. 
Is this an example that the body remains while the spirit departs?” Answer: 
“Regarding the issue that Zhao Jianzi became a distinguished guest and Lord Mu of Qin state traveled to the Celestial Thearch, since it is said that they enjoyed [the magniﬁcent music of] Juntian with their ears and made themselves easy tasting all sorts of food and drink with their mouths, it is possible that they paciﬁed their bodies in a grand mansion, their eyes were delighted with a good view of the universe, they wore beautifully embroidered robes, and they ‘bit and reined’ a dragon. 
Therefore, it is known that what the spirit expects does not differ from what people do. 
Each of the four limbs and the seven apertures in the head is equal to those of the body. 
Since it cannot go far with a single wing, it ﬂies with both wings. 
“If the spirit is extinguished when the body perishes, as the Discourse says, then body and spirit should certainly be together, just as a shadow or echo . 
If this is so, when the body is ill the spirit would also be ill. 
“If the issue is just as you think, then when the body is ill the spirit is not. 
in such a case the body would feel pain but the spirit would not. 
When one has an afﬂiction, he is anxious. in this case the body has anxiety yet the spirit does not. 
If anxiety and pain have already been experienced by the body in this way, how could the spirit be bothered for nothing?” “I, Cao , think that are united and perform functions while one is alive; they share pain and disablement. 
When one dies, the body remains and the spirit travels. 
Therefore that traveled to the Celestial Thearch is different from the body.” Criticism: 
“ the spirit communicates with others while one sleeps. 
Therefore, the spirit became a butterﬂy and ﬂew around. 
When he awoke his body began functioning, and he became the veritable Zhuangzi. 
Namely, his body and his spirit were united.” Answer: 
“This criticism can be said to be a thorough argument, but it cannot be said to be the one who has mastered the principle. 
You say, ‘The spirit became a butterﬂy and ﬂew around.’ Did truly become a ﬂying insect? 
If so, when in a dream someone becomes a cow, he would then bear the shafts of another person’s cart on his 69 back, or if he becomes a horse in a dream, he would then be ridden by other people. 
the next morning there would be a dead cow or a dead horse . 
However, there is no such thing. 
Moreover, her intestines ﬂew around the Gate of Heaven . She should have died instantly. 
How could she continue to live after losing her liver and lungs? 
Furthermore, the sun and moon have their places in the sky, and land stretches a thousand li between east and west as well as between south and north. 
It is unlikely that comes down and enters into the bosom of a common woman.124 Dreams and phantasms are unreal. 
It is too extraordinary if we were to take them to be real. 
If we unite ourselves with intelligence and ponder over the sky, we can travel all around the sky from our seats. 
If our spirits are confused within us, we untruly see peculiar things. 
How could it be that Zhuangzi [became a butterﬂy] and really disported himself in the south garden, and Zhao Jianzi truly ascended to the Gate of Heaven? 
My cousin Xiao Chen at Ying also keeps grumbling about this based on dreams. 
“ Yanling buried his son, he said, ‘The bones and ﬂesh return again to the earth, and the spirit in its energy can go everywhere.’ This exactly means that even though the body perishes, the spirit is not extinguished.” Answer: 
“When a human being is born, the energy is provided from Heaven and the body is received from Earth. 
“What the Discourse says is completely a sentimental expression, not the sage’s purpose. 
Please let me quote a passage from the Canon [of Filial Piety] in order to testify to the sage’s teaching. 
The Canon of Filial Piety says, ‘Formerly, the Duke of Zhou sacriﬁced to Houji at the border altar in order to enshrine him as the correlate of Heaven, and he honored King Wen in the Brilliant Hall in order to enshrine him as the correlate of the Supreme Thearch.’ If body and spirit are extinguished together, who then was enshrined as the correlate of Heaven, and who was enshrined as the correlate of the Supreme Thearch?” Answer: 
“If everyone is equally a sage or a very wise person, the teaching originally does not exist. 
The people’s feeling usually values life and despises death. 
[If they believe that] there is a numinous being after death, a feeling of awe increases, but there is nothing to know after death, they give rise to disrespectful thoughts. 
“Furthermore, faithful and honest people have the foundation of their minds, while rufﬁans are awestruck on this point. 
Therefore, the Canon , ‘They make the ancestral temple where they present offerings to disembodied spirits.’125 That is to say, by employing the way of disembodied spirits we perform this ﬁlial offering. 
[Furthermore, the Canon of Filial Piety says,] ‘In spring and autumn they offer sacriﬁces, thinking of as the seasons come round.’126 clariﬁed that he encourages people to honor their ancestors ; it is forbidden that one who dies in the morning is forgotten in the evening. 
Why did not allow to serve them? 
It is because if a person has cognition after death, slight life and immolate himself . 
Why did not clearly say that exists and why did he give such an evasive answer? 
Examining its meaning, it is already discerned that cognition does not exist after death. 
[If Houji did not really exist and yet he was vainly enshrined as the correlate of Heaven,] this is precisely to deceive Heaven, and it also deceives the people. 
This would indicate that this sage’s teaching guides the people with deception and falsity. 
How could one who establishes a teaching on the basis of deception and falsity cause people to master the mind of a ﬁlial child and oppress thoughts of slighting ?” Answer: 
“A sage is the one who manifests benevolence, who stores up his functions within, who thoroughly comprehends the spirit, and who completely knows the processes of transformation. 
Therefore, it is said that ‘The sage masters his principle, while the wise person keeps to his principle.’128 Could it be possible to seek only the means and limit the teaching by words? 
“Deception merely refers to impeding ediﬁcation, corrupting customs, and leading the people to injustice. 
“Please let me ask you a question. 
King Tang, banished King Jie, and King Wu, [founder of the Zhou dynasty,] attacked King Zhou, . 
These cases are of killing a sovereign, aren’t they? 
Nevertheless, Mencius said, ‘I have heard that put the fellow Zhou to death, but I have never heard that he killed a sovereign.’129 You do not blame the sages’ conduct of banishing or committing regicide. 
Nevertheless, you make strenuous efforts regarding the issue that offering a sacriﬁce to ji is absurd, don’t you? 
Why do things come to this?” Criticism: 
“ ‘We welcome with joy and send them off with sadness.’ And so on.” Answer: 
“The signiﬁcance of this issue is naturally understood without thorough explanation. 
I will not waste words on a useless issue. 
There are many statements about this in the Book of Rites. 
I recently try to write about this section, but regret a bit that I have not completed it.” I, Siwen, speak.130 I read for the ﬁrst time the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit, composed by Fan Zhen in response . 
He still holds fast to his previous delusion. 
I, Siwen, tried to speculate about his logic and principle and charged forward with the four demonstrations. 
I am, however, ignorant and shallow in feeling and intelligence, and I have nothing with which to refute his vigorous discussion. 
When I look up I cover the sacred mirror with dust, and when I look down I tremble in fear as a consequence of . 
Zhen already established the meaning by going against the scriptures, and he delivered a talk that opposes the truth. 
It is difﬁcult to upbraid with sacredness those who have lost sacredness, and it is difﬁcult to berate with the truth those who oppose the truth. 
If the situation is like this, on the whole it is all right to stop debating in language. 
73 The Second Criticism of Secretariat Fan’s Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit The Discourse says, “If are united and perform functions, it is clear that they have no function unless they are united. 
It is just like the animal called qiong and the animal called ju depend on each other; if one of them becomes disabled, the other cannot . 
Will you, however, become reinforcement for me?”The Discourse again says, “ between body and spirit is similar to that between a sword and its sharpness. 
.131 I have not heard that when a sword disappears its sharpness remains. 
How could it be possible that the body is lost yet the spirit remains?” furthermore says, “ Yanling said that the body vanishes underground and the spirit extinguishes into Heaven. 
Therefore, it is said can go everywhere.” also says, “That ji is enshrined as the correlate of Heaven does not deceive Heaven. 
It is just like when King Tang banished and King Wu attacked ; these are not cases of killing a sovereign. 
You do not blame the sages’ conduct of banishing and committing regicide. 
Nevertheless, you make strenuous efforts regarding the issue that offering a sacriﬁce to ji is absurd, don’t you?” Criticism: 
“The animals qiong and ju is evidence only for the case that functions are made of what are united; it is not evidence for the issue that when the body dies the spirit immediately perishes. 
If the qiong is now killed, the ju does not die, and if the ju is beheaded, the qiong does not perish. 
They do not conform to each other. 
At present, you refer to these as keen evidence and good reinforcement regarding the issue that body and spirit perish together. 
This is as if you were to give someone a spear that points toward yourself and you then seek a way to survive. 
How sad! 
This is nothing but the ﬁrst testimony for the issue that the body dies yet the spirit is not extinguished. 
“You say in the Discourse, ‘ between body and spirit is similar to that between a sword and its sharpness. 
I have not heard that when a sword disappears its sharpness remains. 
How could it be possible that the body is lost yet the spirit remains?’ “The ground of your discourse on the issue that body and spirit perish together is merely this single point. 
An ignorant person has a delusion. 
Spirit and body, the two things, are united and perform functions. 
A sword and its sharpness are simply two different names for the same thing. 
At present, you refer to a thing with two different names and try to prove that two different things are united and function. 
This looks like a hairbreadth’s difference, but in fact it is a difference of thousands of li. 
This is also the second testimony for the issue that the body dies yet the spirit is not extinguished. 
Furthermore, gives the statement of Yanling, ‘The body vanishes underground and the spirit extinguishes into Heaven.’ The Discourse says that body and spirit are one entity and they conform to each other. 
If the body dies here, then the spirit should also perish in the body. 
How could it be said that ‘the body vanishes underground and the spirit extinguishes into Heaven’? 
This is also the third testimony for the issue that the body dies yet the spirit is not extinguished. 
Moreover, says, ‘That ji is enshrined as the correlate of Heaven does not deceive Heaven. 
It is just like when King Tang banished and King Wu attacked ; these are not cases of killing a sovereign.’ Is this supposed to remove evils by expedients? 
The rulers Tang and Yu , however, had no trouble in banishing or attacking [their immediate predecessors]. 
It is understandable in this case, the era was not peaceful; it was the last period of the three ancient dynasties (i.e., Xia, Shang, and Zhou), and the teaching was established as an expedient in order to relieve the people temporarily; therefore ji was enshrined for the time 75 being as the correlate of Heaven and King Wen was enshrined temporarily as the correlate of the Supreme Thearch. 
Now Heaven has been deceived and the Supreme Thearch has been slandered. 
What has been quoted to support is like this. 
This is again the fourth testimony for the issue that the body dies yet the spirit is not extinguished. 
These four testimonies have already been established, and the root [of the Discourse] has spontaneously collapsed. 
The remaining various side issues will be dispersed before the wind blows away.” The Discourse says, “ ‘We welcome [the spirits of ancestors] with joy and send them off with sadness.’ The signiﬁcance of this issue is naturally understood without thorough explanation. 
I will not waste on a useless issue. 
There are many statements about this in the Book of Rites.” further says, “Deception merely refers to impeding ediﬁcation and corrupting customs. 
“I said in my previous criticism, ‘If was happy when he welcomed , it would be false happiness that appeared on his face. 
If he was sad when departed, the tears he shed from his body would be false.’ In fact, the scaling ladder of my vulgar criticism and the sharp point of my weak reason lie in these words. 
You, the respondent, however, have not understood them well, and say only, ‘ is naturally understood without thorough explanation.’ Please let me explain it again. 
“According to the purport of your discourse, you already admit that Confucius had false happiness and false tears. 
In addition, you admit that ji was enshrined as the correlate of Heaven indicates pointing to nonexistence and considering it as existence. 
, .’132 This is not something that can be divined with diagrams; it is something kept away from wise sayings. 
You, however, say, ‘ it is possible to stabilize the upper class of the society and govern the people, ’ Why? 
The Discourse says, ‘It is already understood ,’ but an ignorant person has not yet understood it. 
I will again send an inquiry in a humble way. 
If you would like to talk about the nonexistence of the Buddha, you should establish host and guest, make the points of argument clear, distinguish the strong points from the weak points, refute the Buddhist doctrine that your opponent asserts by means of the Buddhist doctrine that you understand. 
Then, the reason supporting the existence of the Buddha falters and the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit spontaneously prevails. 
Is it appropriate to recklessly put forth a heretical view without seeking out others’ thoughts, to utilize the veiled mind, to wag your tongue, to vainly draw suffering, and to aimlessly slander? 
Insects speciﬁc to a season are fearful and apprehensive of the changes ; a frog in a well regards vastness as nonsense.133 Why is this? 
How could know the eternity of Heaven and Earth and the vastness of the dark sea? 
Mencius said, “What people know is not so much as what they do not know.”134 This is true! 
Observing the teachings founded by the three sages , they all speak of the imperishability . 
Since their writings regarding this are extensive, it is difﬁcult to record them all. 
I will take up only a couple of examples and try to make a statement. 
The “Chapter on the Meaning of Sacriﬁces” says, “Only ﬁlial sons can perform a sacriﬁcial ceremony for their parents,”135 and the section on “Ceremonial Usages” says, “After three days’ puriﬁcation, one assuredly sees those to whom his sacriﬁce was to be offered.”136 79 If it is said that one offers a sacriﬁce to someone to whom he is not supposed to offer and sees those he is not supposed to see, this is to go against proper principles and rebel against his parents. 
The Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit is something I do not understand. 
Letter Given by Dharma Teacher Fayun at Zhuangyan Temple to Lords, Kings, and Noble Courtiers and their Responses Here I send you His Majesty’s Response to His Subject: The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
What is marvelous and tranquil can be known but cannot be explained. 
His Majesty becomes Heaven, shines upon the foundation, conforms to the Way, instructs people according with their faculties, and bestows his response to his subjects. 
His purpose and instruction are attentive to every detail. 
The rite of ﬁlial offering is already evident. 
The speech of the three periods of existence is also clear. 
Among all those who are not trees or plants, who would not sing praises of ? 
I hope you will accept the moral education and greatly praise him together. 
Submitted by Shi Fayun. 
60c The Answer of the King of Linchuan I received the Imperial Response the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit that you sent to me. 
I humbly read its profound gist. The argument is accurate, and the composition is perfect. 
The ways of the two teachings are agreeable for modern times. 
The teaching of the three periods of existence carries weight in the present age. 
The Answer of the King of Jian’an your gracious letter. 
The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
His Majesty’s insight shines over distances, and his thoughts are deeply expressed. 
I humbly read what is subtle, and truly realize I am ignorant. 
I deeply appreciate your generous consideration. 
The Answer of the King of Changsha You have kindly shown me the Imperial Response to His Subjects: The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
His Majesty’s discretion profoundly coheres, and his intelligence shines deeply over distances. 
This can be a tool for people of deluded views to attain enlightenment; it teaches and leads on those of ignorant minds. 
The Answer of Shen Yue , Director of the Imperial Secretariat The spirit is originally immortal. 
The assertion the Extinction of the Spirit really startled me. 
Recently, when Dharma Teacher yue came out of the palace, I also received a copy of the Imperial Response to His Subjects. 
This not only subdues the heterodoxy but it also can destroy demons eternally. 
Hereupon Confucius and Śākyamuni are equally promoted. 
I, your disciple, have also recently completed and presented my doubts and examinations about the Discourse [on the Extinction of the Spirit]. 
61a The Answer of Fan Xiu , Grand Master for Splendid Happiness and Current Commandant of the Right Guard of the Crown Prince I, Xiu, bow. 
His Majesty’s instruction is profound, and he discerns the very beginning of a movement. 
Referring to a non-Buddhist text, he promotes Buddhism, illuminates and enlightens ignorant people, and teaches and leads on those who have not yet awakened. 
I attentively learn this through recitation night and day, and write it on the end of the sash of my ceremonial gown, waking and sleeping. 
The Answer of Wang Ying, Governor of Danyang your gracious letter. I humbly read the signiﬁcance of the Imperial statement that the spirit is immortal. 
His Majesty’s perspicacious thought is resourceful and deep. His affections are observed just as clouds grow. 
shows reason and clariﬁes instances. have been dispersed, just as ice melts away. 
to indicate the issue and make a statement is as clear as if it were illuminated by the sun. 
This will enlighten the ignorant and carry those who lack ability . 
There is no one among all sentient beings who will not take this and keep this in mind. 
I will respectfully write this on the end of the sash of my ceremonial gown , and I will revere this throughout my life. 
I, your disciple Wang Ying, bow. 
The Answer of Wang Zhi , Secretariat Director your gracious letter. I humbly read the Imperial Response to His Subjects: the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
It shines upon me as if enlightening the ignorant. 
I, your disciple, have followed Buddhism from my early days. 
It has been a long time of practicing and following the teaching I learned a long time ago. 
I not only echo very lofty , but also praise and encourage his purport. 
Moreover, the two interpretations he showed graciously in his response are calming to my mind, and beautifully illuminate what I have learned. 
I do not know how he could expound and propagate his deep plan and gloriously display his sacred account any more than this does. 
There will be no chaotic obstruction either within or outside [the country]. 
I will deeply keep your favor in mind. 
The Answer of Yuan Ang , Right Chief Administrator your gracious letter. 
The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
I respectfully read repeatedly. I suddenly awoke from my binding in confusion. 
The spirit is imperceptible and tranquil. It is hard to get at the principle. 
Taking an example from familiar matters, I do not know all about the body that I still use every day, not to mention the principle of profound and obscure , which is often incorrectly understood. 
Respectfully inquiring about it in the sacred books, they clearly state that is not nonexistent. 
I must simply revere the teaching and take refuge in the position of the existence . 
Even if we follow the position that exists and speak of its existence, we are still unable to reach the nature. 
Consequently, we discuss nonexistence from the position of “not nonexistence.” This means we may be further away . 
Except for someone whose understanding towers above others and whose wisdom is peerless, how could we subtly infer the statement that is not extinguished, and how could we deeply comprehend the purpose that continues from one life to the next? 
Also, cites two illustrations. I see precisely that the existence of the spirit is obvious. 
Seeking this in the three periods of existence, the doctrine of the immortality [of the spirit] is more evident. 
It can be said that “When I try to penetrate it, it seems to become ﬁrmer; when I look up to it, it seems to become higher.”137 [His Majesty’s examination] will surely clear away all delusions and vice, and cause those who are misguided to return to the right path. 
I will humbly recite this tirelessly, dancing with great joy. 
I, your disciple Yuan Ang, bow. 
61b The Answer of Xiao Bing, Chamberlain of the Court for the Palace Garrison your gracious letter. 
The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
Even though the three periods of existence is evident, the teaching of the One Vehicle is profound. 
Some people have the obscuration of biased views and still adhere to strange doctrines. 
Our sage emperor explored what is hidden, searched out what is subtle, focused on the spirit in the metaphysical world, probed into the very root of the principle, reached the nature, and embraced Heaven and human beings. 
He discussed and analyzed both the Buddhist teaching and non-Buddhist teachings. 
Truly it may also cause even an icchantika to immediately awaken. 
The Answer of Xu Mian , Imperial Secretary of the Ministry of Personnel According to the Imperial decree, the Imperial Response to His Subjects: the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit was brieﬂy shown to me one day. 
I humbly studied and read it closely. 
It probes into the very root of the principle and reaches tranquility. 
Both the writing and its meaning are clear. It profoundly transcends the secular world. 
When I respectfully go into the details of the three periods of existence, its brightness is like enlightening the ignorant. 
I will not only recite and sustain this sincerely, but also always distribute it to those who have not yet been awakened. 
You kindly showed this to me. 
I, your disciple Xu Mian, bow. 
The Answer of Lu Gao , Palace Cadet of the Crown Prince I, Gao, bow. 
I humbly read the Imperial Response to His Subjects: The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
followed the doctrine that being free from any thought of attachment is the foundation.138 He kept silent [about entering the gate of nonduality] and cut off thinking.139 What is concealed in the collection of the Tathāgata is mysterious and absolute. 
Therefore, it caused Zhongchu (i.e., Yu Chan) to propose the assertion of the allegory of ﬁrewood and ﬁre [to explain the relationship between body and spirit], and Huiyuan to disseminate the criticism [of the assertion that the spirit is extinguished, just as ﬁre consumes ﬁrewood].140 Questionable assertions have been conveyed and discussed by many people. 
His Majesty’s brightness was endowed by Heaven. His sacred intelligence is innate. 
Understanding the faculties of the people, he bestowed medicine to us. He made use of expedients according to the object. 
Consequently, he straightened out propriety and corrected faults. 
He caused the people to cleanse themselves of confusion and bestowed the Way on them. 
Delusion is supported by compositions of non-Buddhist teachings. 
He freely made statements and prevailed by surprise. 
Based on what is in accordance with the principles, he ﬁxed the three periods of existence as ﬁrmly as a city that is defended by moats, and sustains sentient beings. 
How could the advantage of these few words presented by him be minor? 
I took part in receiving a share of his discussion with respect. 
I am happy to pay respects to him. 
You kindly showed this to me without forgetting me. 
61c The Answer of Xiao Chen , Cavalier Attendant-in-Ordinary I, your disciple Chen, bow. your gracious letter. 
I humbly looked at the Imperial Response to His Subjects: 
The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit, which wondrously surveys people’s faculties and the spirit, and which brings ethical education into full play. 
This is really good enough to cause the pure Dharma to increase its brightness and Confucianists to respect their studies. 
Here the basis of the principles of human relationships is more clariﬁed. 
One who goes against the scriptures and who introduces disorder into the public customs will spontaneously destroy himself. 
I recite this, clapping my hands in joy, and overwhelmingly pay respect. 
My brother , who is stupid and incompetent, invited faults and now faces his trial. 
He is tormented and fearful in public and private, and his feelings and thoughts increase his terror. 
I will remember with admiration your kindness and guidance. 
I, your disciple Xiao Chen, bow. 
The Answer of Wang Bin and Wang Jian, Attendants-in-Ordinary your gracious letter. 
The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
His Majesty’s thought profoundly coheres, and his logic is preeminent. 
When he argues about the three periods of existence, he clearly explains the doctrine. 
When he cites two instances, the Way of ﬁlial piety is easily understood. 
This is good enough to cause the devil’s low fences to fall down eternally and the rightful peak to be lofty for a long time. 
We, your disciples, respectfully receive the highest path and observe the law of Heaven. 
How could our joyful minds be commonplace? 
Wang Bin and Wang Jian bow. The Answer of Lu Xu, Secretariat Drafter of the Heir Apparent I received your very gracious letter. 
I humbly looked at His Majesty’s Response to His Subjects: The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
I bent and lifted my head, and kneeled and worshiped this. 
I have heard in private that sages simply have a single principle ,142 but Tang and Yu have previously made no such remarks. 
To know an omen just as a god does is only to receive with respect the edict of the Liang dynasty today. 
When virtues last long, the world praises the illuminative guidance. 
You, the Dharma teacher, have deep knowledge and determination. 
your gracious letter together with the Imperial Response to His Subjects: 
The Examination of] the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit that you sent to me. 
I humbly read the profound purport, which removed obstructions from my mind and washed away my troublesomeness. 
Only a superior sage can talk about the foundation. 
How could a man who does not have supreme intelligence lead to its apex? 
His Majesty probes into the very root of the spirit, masters the mysteries of tranquility, examines the Way, and abides in the subtle state. 
When he gives virtuous utterance, [the law of] the three periods of existence spontaneously becomes evident. 
When he expresses virtuous words, even a thousand li receive his inﬂuence. 
His sincerity accords with propriety; his righteousness moves both human beings and deities; his reasoning stimulates the profound ways ; and his virtue covers both the unseen world and this world. 
The long darkness of the vast great night suddenly dawn. 
Foolish and ignorant sentient beings become awakened by themselves overnight. 
They exert themselves for the secret merits in the Deer Park , and saturate their daily lives with the stream of the Dharma. 
Those who have sunk in doubt will spontaneously come to an end. 
Since I, your disciple, returned to early and believe in it deeply, I am much happier about . 
The Answer of Wang Jian , Palace Attendant It is very kind of you to take the trouble to send a letter to me. 
The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
His Majesty’s purport is profound and illuminating. 
The signiﬁcance exposes the delicate issue, and the principle propagates the tranquil and profound matter. 
The Canon [of Filial Piety] speaks of the signiﬁcance of the corpse, and Section One of the Great Appendix describes the issue of the wandering spirit.143 What I, an ignorant man, have recognized is that is not extinguished. 
Referring to writings, he testiﬁes with books. is evanescent like ice that is melting away. 
Those who have vulgar eyes will respectfully turn around, and those who have the deﬁlement of delusion will reform their insecure minds. 
I, Wang Jian, bow. 
The Answer of Liu Yun , Palace Attendant your gracious letter. 
the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
There is no dualism in a concourse where all points meet; the main purpose is originally one. 
To enter into the hall [of the ancestral temple], the faces , and their voices are the profound purpose of great teaching. 
[The purposes of] these two sages, one in China and the other in a foreign land, match each other just as shadow , or an echo . 
Even though the truth exists without a doubt, suspicions [about the immortality of the spirit] and the deep attachment to it were equally divided. 
I will humbly follow the profound purpose , which illuminates, as if enlightening me in my ignorance. 
There is a similarity between and Heaven and Earth in completely surveying the characteristics . 
The unresolved doubts of the past thousand years melt away along with the spring ice. 
A lifelong perverted mind is opened together with a drifting cloud. 
I will simply recite repeatedly, in order to be released from suffering eternally. 
I appreciate your concern for me. My sadness is truly paciﬁed. 
I, your disciple Liu Yun, stated above, bow with my head to the ground. 
The Answer of Liu Cheng , Attendant-in-Ordinary your gracious letter. 
The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
The profound purport is abstruse, and the reasoning traces to the very source of deep points. 
I personally think that in cultivating causes and going toward fruition, the spirit does not have two consciousnesses; in attaining emancipation through the Way the buddha-nature is only one. 
Yang and Mo , however, put these into confusion; they offered far-fetched explanations meaninglessly. 
Hindrances went on and Confucianism, in particular, was concealed. 
His Majesty’s mind profoundly discerns , and his testimonies are faultless. 
He praises and censures the three dynasties (i.e., Xia, Yin, and Zhou), and he leads all to the same conclusion. Both reality and unreality are clear, without hindrance. 
I will humbly read this with respect over and over again so that both my doubts and parsimonious thoughts will be exhausted. 
I, Liu Cheng, stated above, bow with my head to the ground. 
62b The Answer of Wang Mao, Supervisor of the Household of the Heir Apparent I, Mao, bow. 
I humbly looked at the Imperial Response the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit, to which I pay my respects. 
I am very happy and I cannot but dance about, clapping my hands. 
Even though it is not something of which we speak thoroughly, it is luminously revealed in the writings left behind by various sages. 
How could it be possible to recklessly speak unfounded statements and falsehoods, and bring a heavy false charge against the imperial mandate that was previously made? 
Once visited by suffering and emptiness he will repent , but it will be too late. 
His Majesty bears intelligence, embodies sacredness, and wondrously discerns the truth and the untruth. 
He expresses righteousness, illuminates expressions, and navigates for those who are drowned . 
Would only heavenly and human beings praise and respect him? 
Truly all buddhas also emit light for him. 
I, your disciple, have from early in my life basically relied on the Pure Land to ease my mind. 
Fortunately I have lived a long time and met with this prosperous world. 
I will surely accumulate causes for my next life and educate myself with this merciful guidance for a long time. 
The sincerity of my joy is not only for today. 
I always deeply appreciate your outstanding favor to me. 
I, Wang Mao, bow. 
The Answer of Yu Yong, Chamberlain for Ceremonials your gracious letter. 
You kindly showed me His Majesty’s Imperial Response to His Subjects: the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
Before I humbly ﬁnished reading this, smoke and mist were again removed. 
I personally think that wormlike animals have perception but trees and plants have no consciousness. 
Groundless discourse, such as on the Extinction of the Spirit, intends to equalize those that have perception with those that have no consciousness, and asserts that omniscience is extinguished together with the body . 
In reason, this is really sad. 
His Majesty feels pity for those who are born from the four modes of birth and evidently sink in the six realms of existence. 
He examined and compared the teaching of Confucius with that of Śākyamuni, and gave evidence drawn from both . 
He enabled those who live in the land [that is farthest from the sea] to know about the sea, and those in hell to see the sun. 
These words of utmost importance are as bright as the autumn sun. 
Numerous doubts disappear just as does the spring ice. 
Even though [I knew that His Majesty] issued the discussion to propagate the Way and I openmindedly appreciated his virtue, I was furthermore given his instruction and guidance. 
I bow down, delighted with acts I performed in my previous life. 
You, the Dharma teacher, keep the Dharma gate in mind and stick to it. You will deeply agree with my joy in this. 
I respectfully appreciate with praise. I will recite this throughout my life tirelessly. 
I, your disciple Yu Yong, bow. 
The Answer of Xiao Ang , Acting King of Yuzhang your gracious letter. 
The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
His Majesty’s purport and the analysis he gave are able to make deluded people bright. 
The immorality of the spirit is apparent in the circulated books. 
Since reason is abstruse, people are confused. 
His Majesty’s discernment is illuminating. He examines by knowing coming events, and goes beyond what is stored up in all past . 
He wields wonderful thought beyond the laws of nature, and criticizes the heretic’s wild assertion. 
Moreover, he refers to the scripture of rites , and examines truth and falsehood. 
The Way of ﬁlial piety is surely propagated here. 
The Answer of Yu Tanlong, Superior Grand Master of the Palace your gracious letter. 
The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit, which enlightens the ignorant brightly and illuminates them clearly. 
The superior sage is extremely intelligent. Therefore, he traced to the very source of wondrous reality. 
Ordinary people who live in the impermanent world do not recognize profound matters by themselves. 
I have heard that for making an assertion, the instructions given in scriptures are all traces of the teaching. 
Regarding the Buddha, foreign books state peculiar things. It is difﬁcult to expect reasoning for them. 
I rely on the work and the sacred thought of His Majesty. He analyzed and explained various situations for his subjects. 
Are we not glad with praise? 
I will imprint the clear purport in my mind and keep this throughout my life. 
I feel more greatly obliged to your instructions, my Dharma teacher. 
I, your disciple Yu Tanlong, bow. 
The Answer of Xiao Mi, Frontrider of the Heir Apparent You kindly showed me the Imperial Response to His Subjects: 
Before I had even ﬁnished reading it, my heart became as delighted as if clapping my hands in glee. 
Since the testimony of the meaning is fully provided from classical scriptures, the frame of mind of ﬁlial piety is manifested here. 
I will respectfully 93 keep this at my elbow, spread it out on a desk or near my pillow, and read it thoroughly, day and night. 
I will write this on the end of the sash of my ceremonial gown for eternal use and show it to everyone. 
I, your disciple Xiao Mi, bow. 
63a The Answer of Wang Sengru , Palace Aide to the Censor-in-Chief your gracious letter. you kindly sent and showed me His Majesty’s response to all the ofﬁcials who respectfully inquired about the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
I humbly read this over and over again, deeply received it, and studied it with respect. 
I became clear just as the clouds open. 
I personally think that it is difﬁcult for the culmination of things to take shape, and that no one but a sage can make this clear. 
Since the truth is tranquil and obscures its location, the ignorant become deluded. 
Except for one whose spirit goes beyond the implications of language, and whose thought transcends prior to an omen, how could anyone illuminate these sublime words? 
When we hear the sound of metal and stone (i.e., a piece of good writing) and see through the subtle state like this, there is no wild path. 
He causes the person who presented the discourse to not end up in the long muddy wheel tracks, and those who have exclusively fallacious views to not sink into the sea of delusion eternally. 
I will end my response here; I will not go on tediously. 
I, Wang Sengru, present this and bow. 
The Answer of Wang Yi, Gentleman Attendant at the Palace Gate your gracious letter. 
The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
He is sympathetic toward the frog that stays at the bottom of the well, and feels pity for the cicada that lives only a very short time. 
Thoughts come from the depths of his heart, his words are subtle, and his reasoning is clear. 
When he refers to classical scriptures, his composition is simple but his purpose is profound. 
When he concentrates on a tranquil and abstruse issue, he can go through it by a single reason. 
Ancient books are numerous, yet he embraces them in one sentence. 
He reveals the hidden purport of various sages. 
He has ﬁnally brought longstanding stagnant delusions to an end. 
Thanks to this, the issue of whether or not is extinguished is understood. 
This is truly good enough to warn and admonish those who are seriously confused, and to serve as a model for a hundred generations. 
As it is said, “A sage’s course of action is vast and great. 
Fine words are quite evident.”148 I, your disciple, am ashamed of discerning reason; I am weak in my ability to judge others’ intentions. 
I successfully participate in hearing the moral instruction. I was bestowed with the subtle writing. 
I am forever grateful for the sacred rule. 
I, your disciple Wang Yi, bow. 
The Answer of Wang Tai, Gentleman Attendant of the Ministry of Personnel One day, having been invited to a banquet, I took part in hearing Secretariat Fan ’s writing, the discourse on the spirit and the body that are extinguished together. 
He subtly refers to the Way of ﬁlial piety and enhances the profound principle . 
I will always recite this sincerely and rid myself of ignorance and delusion. 
I, your disciple Wang Tai, lower my head to the ground and bow. 
The Answer of Cai Zun , Palace Attendant your gracious letter. declared the Imperial instruction of responding to inquiries about the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
The mysterious law is profound and wondrous. 
It is really difﬁcult to completely discern it. 
Even though former sages spoke cordially, talented people in later generations are still deluded. 
His Majesty’s purpose is accordingly explained and the ignorant are brilliantly enlightened. 
Assuredly he rises above all past generations and exclusively possesses wondrousness. 
He awakens the future and immortalizes . 
I will sincerely copy it on the end of the sash of my ceremonial gown and rid myself of confusion and hindrance eternally. 
63b The Answer of Wang Zhongxin, Director of Jiankang I, Zhongxin, address you. 
your gracious letter. 
I humbly read this profound and beautiful , and I cannot stop clapping my hands and jumping with joy. 
His Majesty’s divine sagacity is innate and his sharp faculty is outstandingly profound. 
The ﬁve kinds of ceremonies shine on his outward appearance and the three transcendental knowledges sparkle within him. 
When the golden wheel slowly revolves, the Way saves the whole world. 
When jade libation cups are already arranged, ﬁlial piety ﬂourishes in the seven imperial shrines. 
The sun of wisdom reveals in the sky of China, and the Dharma cloud hangs down in the trichiliocosm. 
The meaning of as if exist [in front of our eyes] was made clear again this morning. 
That the eternality is evident is everlastingly testiﬁed through all coming kalpas. 
For this reason, virtue surpasses that of a hundred kings and his reputation will be supreme eternally. 
your disciple rests in the Dharma gate and worships the great teaching . 
The Answer of Shen Ji, Adjutant of Outer Troops of the King of Jian’an I, your disciple Ji, bow. 
You showed me the Imperial Response to His Subjects: [The Examination of] the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
I am humbled and dance in joy. 
I, your disciple, personally think that teaching is not spontaneously spread, but is truly spread by people. 
People need the consciousness and the consciousness desires the position. 
Doesn’t this mean what is said in the Book of Changes, “What is great treasure for the sage is to attain the position”?150 Nevertheless, there may be a case when there is a position and yet someone is not suitable for the position. 
In another case there may be a person yet the position is not suitable for him. 
Reasonably speaking, it is the most difﬁcult to ﬁnd all three elements (i.e., a person, consciousness, and a position) together. 
Therefore Confucius concluded the Spring and Autumn Annals with the record about the capture of a unicorn called lin,151 and Mencius turned back to the title Nobility of Heaven.152 It is really because they had no positions . 
Genuine ediﬁcation is about to go down and disappear! 
As for saving frightened people from a long night , except for whose virtue matches that of Heaven and Earth, who else would be able to do so? 
I, your disciple, bask in the marvelous teaching from the early days. So I have already heard about this . 
Nevertheless, a group swallows and sparrows, still confuse each other, and ﬂying dried mugwort, compete with each other. 
The expressions are lofty and the principle is delightful. 
He encourages the wholesomeness of human and heavenly beings and admonishes people for their gravest punishments . 
He gives the instruction in a brief writing that clariﬁes both Buddhists and non-Buddhists. 
If a child were to fall into a well, even ordinary people would be heartbroken, not to speak of His Majesty, who governs the people with mercy. 
refers to that a white horse is not white is still seen to be inferior position to [the teaching of His Majesty, who has mastered] the golden mean.153 Regarding mind, which he has received beyond the law of nature, and his determination to promote ediﬁcation, evil spirits and monsters will destroy their own cheeks and tongues . 
His marvelous writing is as noble as Heaven, and this cannot be originally inferred. 
I feel quite ashamed of myself for having little virtue. 
I, your disciple Shen Ji, bow. 
63c The Answer of Sima Yun, Gentleman Attendant of the Ministry of Sacrifices your gracious letter. 
I humbly read it completely, and sang and danced with joy. 
Consciousness and thought are deeply hidden; the numen is obscure and subtle. 
They cannot be caught up with by walking with short steps, and they cannot be surveyed by the minds of ordinary people. 
Sages of non-Buddhist teachings are aware of this, and so they repressed and did not talk about it. 
Therefore, even after Confucius, the issue is still unclear; after the Duke of Zhou this still remains obscure. 
Nevertheless, mediocre people forget reason, believe in what their eyes perceive, dig with an awl, and view through a pipe. 
When ignorance and delusion become to this point, we should feel deeply sorry for this. 
Our emperor’s way pierces this world as well as the unseen world, and is brighter than the sun and moon. 
He hates the manner in which a foul-smelling water plant called you overpowers fragrance and a purple color takes away the luster of vermilion . 
He is angry when the stone min that resembles jade hinders jade and a pheasant disturbs a phoenix. 
He illuminates the culmination of the mind as a familiar case, and clariﬁes the basis of the virtue of ﬁlial piety as a profound case. 
Truly he causes those who learn heathen ways to cut off their evil minds and those who lean toward honesty to make ﬁrm their admiration. 
I fortunately happened to receive with respect ediﬁcation. 
The Answer of Shen Gun, Adjutant of the Personnel Evaluation Section of the King of Yuzhang I, Gun, bow. 
I, your disciple, personally think that in the way to exchange what is sought, there must be equal give and take. 
Regarding the case of “not instructing so as to create annoyance to the ignorant,”155 this vainly results in restlessness. 
Therefore, I stopped receiving consultation for myself. I am sincerely ashamed of myself for not examining highly profound things. 
I have only vague knowledge about the mechanism of causality. 
I genuinely hope that if I walk on hoarfrost without falling backward, stronger ice will come.156 You, the Dharma teacher, have a mind as broad as hills and valleys and with which, fortunately, even evil people can be accepted. 
Though I do not have the rank to ascend to the court, you invited me to join the group the Buddhist teaching. 
Du Yi said, “If a person wants to call a thirsty horse to a water fountain, the horse comes even if does not use a horsewhip.” You showed me His Majesty’s Response 64a to His Subjects: 
I humbly read it morning and night tirelessly, without sparing myself. 
established this Dharma hall and leads the confused group of people. 
The relationship between father and son (i.e., the Way of ﬁlial piety) is already mentioned and the three periods of existence is explained. 
The conditions of the spirits can be pursued here. 
It is said that the sea is vast, but who can know how vast it is? 
It is said that the sky is high, but it is impossible to measure its height. 
His Majesty’s sacred discourse probes profound issues, and its purpose goes beyond the world of language. 
I, your disciple Shen Gun, bow. 
The Answer of Wang Qi, Officer of the Personnel Evaluation Section of the King of Jian’an You kindly showed me the Imperial Response to His Subjects: The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
I personally think that the spirit is obscure and quiet. Successive sages have not preached anything about this. 
When I seek in records, my grief and vagueness cross each other and deepen. 
His thought arose from the profound point, his sublime purpose was deeply settled, the truth is already spread, and the vital point of ﬁlial piety is concurrently investigated thoroughly. 
I had had in my mind disappeared, just as ice melts away. 
Truly I realized with what I had been carelessly deluded. 
Needless to say, I, an ignorant man, am especially deeply impressed with this. 
I, Wang Qi, bow. 
The Answer of Wei Rui , Right Guard General The truth is abstract and tranquil. 
When one says it exists, it seems it does not. 
When one says it does not exist, in fact it exists. 
The words [of the truth] are luminous in Daoist scriptures. 
His Majesty’s way embraces the universe and is as bright as the sun and moon. 
The mechanism of appearance and disappearance is assuredly illuminated, and a vital point of existence and nonexistence is already seen. 
His guidance is already deep, and his logical explanation of the meaning is surely harmonious. 
Who among all those who have a mind would not rejoice? 
I was shown His Majesty’s writing, which I attentively read. 
My deﬁlements have disappeared, just as clouds are dispersed. Concurrently I clapped my hands in joy. 
You, the Dharma teacher, have a good stroke of fortune; the karma you created in your previous life caused you to meet the Dharma in this life. 
You parted from the ﬁve desires, entered into the eight kinds of meditation for liberation, left behind the three realms of existence, and follow [the teaching of] the One Vehicle. 
I could again happily hear your virtuous voice and come to praise you more. 
I, Wei Rui, bow. 
The Answer of Xie Chuo, Chief Minister for Law Enforcement I, Chuo, bow. 
has already rejected shortsighted discussion and truly explains various doubtful points. 
I personally think that a human being is the most highly endowed, and his spiritual function is inexhaustible. 
People of the best class know coming events and store up all past , 64b and people of the next class nearly attain .158 From this viewpoint, there is in reason no possibility to be extinguished. 
Therefore, Confucianists explicate ceremonies of sacriﬁce [for the spirits], and Buddhists are engaged in great benevolence and illuminate the condition of birth . 
The Buddhist and non-Buddhist teachings become clear . 
It is already enough to relieve us from hindrance. 
Moreover, His Majesty’s instruction is patient and his references and information are more extensive. 
He promotes what supports and begins [all things] to the people, and offers a guideline about discernment and studying to those who are smart and openhearted. 
He assuredly taught the ignorant and drew them out of hindrances. From his seat he surveyed the extremely profound issue. 
Heretical beliefs have already been cut off and the right path has returned. 
I, your disciple, however, think that I have studied in the school of the Sage in vain. 
I am eternally delighted by your protection and guidance. I, Xie Chuo, bow. 
The Answer of Fan Xiaocai, Libationer of the Minister of Education I, your disciple Xiaocai, bow. 
I personally think that when Pengsheng became a boar [after he was killed by a man of Qi state] and stood up,159 disaster fell upon the Lord of Qi state, and the incident in which Yuanbo put on a ceremonial cap [and appeared in Fan Shi’s dream] is well known in the history of the Han dynasty.160 Moreover, when we take account of parables of murderous schemes, we know they mean that must exist. 
If we intend to destroy the spirit, the Buddhist and non-Buddhist teachings will both be lost. 
How could he distinguish west from east? 
His Majesty’s purpose is broad and deep. 
His sacred mind is compassionate by nature and absorbed in sacriﬁcial ceremony and worship. 
He not only makes the scriptures and teaching ﬂourish, but truly he also causes ignorant people to become awakened in the Way. 
I am obliged to you for handing down . 
I will imprint this instruction and guidance on my mind, which brims with . 
I, your disciple Fan Xiaocai, bow. 
The Answer of Wang Lin, Attendant-in-Ordinary your gracious letter. 
You kindly showed me the Most August’s Response to His Subjects: The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
I sincerely went to the limit of my mediocre ability and respectfully read His Majesty’s composition. 
His voice brims with the sound of metal and stone, his reasoning penetrates the deep spring, his righteousness penetrates the six lines of a hexagram, and his statement completes the three periods of existence. 
This is sufﬁcient to cause those of biased learning to know the ultimate law of nature and those who have gone astray to remember returning . 
Fortunately I, your disciple, was born in a happy and brilliant . 
The sincerity of my pleasure is as boundless as that of a wild duck [that obtains duckweed]. 
I, your disciple Wang Lin, reply to you. 
You graciously bestowed on me your letter, and showed me Response to His Subjects: The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
I have personally heard that one sacriﬁces to the spirits as if the spirits were present.161 Even though I seek previous monarchs, they did not fathom it. 
dwell in the eternal world; they do not change. 
The profound mystery I had studied intensively with respect disappears, just as ice melts away. 
Therefore I come to know that vast and profound traces of sages do not derive from a single way. 
Different actions and responses basically follow the times. 
The ignorant will become enlightened. 
Even Xuan and Tang could not compete with him. 
His clear and Great Way hereupon reaches its apex. 
I, He Jiong, bow. 64c The Answer of Wang Yun , Recorder of the King of Yuzhang I, Yun, bow. your gracious letter. 
You showed me His Majesty’s Response to His Subjects: The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
I have personally heard that “one will seem to see in the place ” is a maxim in the canon of rites.162 It is now the great tenor of Buddhism that is not extinguished. 
Nevertheless, the wondrous characteristics are evanescent and profound, and the working of the spirit is extremely tranquil. 
Except for those who have mastered the Way, how could anyone understand in his heart the ultimate Way of nature? 
Without one who knows what produces all things, we have no way on which to depend to meet responses from the unseen world. 
His Majesty has thorough knowledge of the myriad matters he manages, his mind roams in the seven factors of wisdom in order to cultivate superior wisdom, he feels compassion for sentient beings and warmly raises up the common people, cleanses deﬁlements, encourages with the wisdom of realization, relieves them from ignorance and delusion, and causes them to ascend to the state of the long-lived virtuous. 
My family respectfully follows the great Dharma from generation to generation, and transmits the teaching of the Way. 
I am able to understand with his single voice. 
I, your disciple Wang Yun, bow. 
The Answer of Sun Yi, Gentleman of the Granaries Section your gracious letter. 
You kindly showed me the Imperial Response to His Subjects: The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
I humbly received this with respect and am delighted with it. 
Without moving even a single hair , all evils will be dispersed, and by crossing over on the ship we will go beyond to the yonder shore. 
His Majesty keeps the two polarities in his body, his virtue combines those of the three dynasties (i.e., Xia, Shang , and Zhou), by means of the marvelous plan, he manages the ultimate Way of nature, and he takes charge of supreme wisdom in order to regulate the people. 
When he issues an order, the grass bends when the wind blows. 
When he sits upon the throne and governs the nation, he keeps silent but his ediﬁcation moves just like that of a god. 
He raises the Five Thearchs and follows their tracks. 
His method is eternal, beyond myriad kalpas. 
Moreover, by ringing a large bell he [instructs us as easily as if he were to] point to his own palm. 
He sends down wondrous ideas and enlightens the ignorant. 
His logic is admirable and deep, and his purpose penetrates the issue and goes further. 
He is equal to a precious jewel beyond price, and equivalent to an undeﬁled lotus ﬂower. 
Filial reverence covers the people, and his instruction and examples glorify previous sages. 
Even slowly moving creatures recognize this pleasure together with us, and living things that ﬂit, ﬂy, or crawl are all happy about this blessing. 
I greatly appreciate that your letter was distributed even to me, one who occupies the lowest seat. 
I received this with sincerity, and will write it on the end of the sash of my ceremonial gown. 
I, your disciple Sun Yi, bow. 
65a The Answer of Xiao Misu, Aide to Danyang your gracious letter. 
It is said that when human nature and the Way of Heaven are spoken of, reason is cut off. 
By great fortune I was graciously granted wondrous instruction. 
I received it in the manner like throwing myself at your feet. I will keep joy and respect in my mind. 
I personally think that the Way of the Spirit is quiet and silent, and it is difﬁcult to see the edge of the sea of the Dharma. 
Our consciousness understands objects sensed as visual color or form, but they are still ambiguous. 
Nevertheless, it has been a very long time since the cloud of wisdom was gradually transmitted to the east and the boat of treasures crossed over to the south. 
The sound of the Dharma has spread into remote areas. 
Hence, the twofold truth and the eight kinds of meditative powers that lead to liberation are entirely lacking in the emperor’s statement. 
The nine kinds of Buddhist scriptures and the Tripiṭaka are bent to and mixed up with the national learning (daxue, “great learning”). 
Although his assertion was refuted by Āryadeva, his inﬂuence has not yet ceased. 
Therefore, it causes people of different learning, who have numerous doubts, to establish various views. 
If we had not received the teaching of the one who apprehended this issue in the past, we would really have ended up in confusion even in the next life. 
His Majesty’s way beneﬁts the world, and his faculty penetrates everything without any set pattern. 
He inspects both the Tiger Library (Baifuguan; i.e., Confucianism) and the Dragon Palace , and he leads equally by the highest virtue and the ultimate reality . 
Therefore he is in accord with the secular teaching and ascertains the way of the truth; that is to say, he follows the teaching of ﬁlial piety and propagates the teaching of the nature of awakening. 
How lofty is ! He has already performed the ten wholesome acts, and is not far from the golden wheel king . 
You, the Dharma teacher, received the wisdom to discern emptiness by nature, and have received training and learned much in this world. 
When you turn the Dharma wheel, the eight kinds of gods and demigods who protect Buddhism gather like clouds. 
When you speak sublime words, heavenly beings accept them. 
Therefore, you can spread the incense of the precepts in the private quarters of the imperial palace, and embellish His Majesty’s abode with the ﬂowers of realization. 
You can cause all the people to listen to the voice of the Buddhist Way. 
I, your disciple, have no recollection of Śākyamuni’s scriptures, and I have not reached the gate of the Confucian school. 
Although I wish to hear in the morning, I end the day feeling ashamed of myself for frivolously squandering . 
I simply hope to follow the boundless Dharma and beneﬁt other people as well as myself. 
I am suffering from a disease, and my mind and thought are confused with fear. 
I do not know whether or not I have arranged this in order. 
I look forward to visiting you to ask questions and intimately receive the greatest teaching from you. 
I, your disciple Xiao Misu, lower my head to the ground and bow. 
65b The Answer of Fu Jing , Secretariat Gentleman I was graciously shown the Most August’s Response to His Subjects: 
I humbly received the profound purport, and was able to dispel many doubts. 
His Majesty’s mind shines alone, and he is apart from others in looking at the issue for his wondrous examination. 
Therefore, this is not something ignorant people would be able to penetrate and look up to. 
Nevertheless, ordinary scholars of narrow views, personally sought a distinguished opinion. 
Now we have again received these tenets . 
I looked for the doctrine extensively in the scriptures; the doctrine is exactly founded on the tenets . 
You, the Dharma teacher, publicized and exalted His Majesty’s astute and discreet principles, and greatly praised his sacred words. 
You precisely cause the two teachings to come to the same , and the absolute and the relative (i.e., the Buddhist Way and secular ways) to square with each other. 
I am inﬂuenced and molded by the highest ediﬁcation. 
Yet I truly dance at the same time. 
I am looking forward to meeting you to ask questions in the near future. I will exhaust my sincerity on that occasion. 
The Answer of He Yang, Erudite of the Five Classics your gracious letter. 
You kindly showed me the Imperial Response to His Subjects: The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
I studied this intensively with respect, recited it, and enjoyed it again and again. 
Therefore I know that wonderful encompasses the origin of what produces all things, his business is apart from what ordinary people can recognize, his spirit concentrates on the meaning beyond language, and his principles excel ordinary people’s minds. 
His Majesty’s astute and discreet discernment profoundly reaches human nature and the Way of Heaven. 
Therefore his faculty is outstanding and profound, and he realizes by himself, transcendently and deeply. 
He gives an account of the three sages in order to lead those who have not yet understood. 
He shows the two issues in order to remove biased delusions. 
Hence, the purpose of the perpetuity of ﬁlial duty is even more clariﬁed, and the ultimate law of causality is more easily understood. 
The perfect scriptures expounded on Vulture Peak manifest here again. 
Even if compared to the sun and moon, there is nothing that can go beyond this. 
I will research the wonderful tenor. 
I feel as if I am still dancing with joy. 
You, the Dharma teacher, publicized and exalted the highest Way and made the great plan clear and bright. 
I, your disciple He Yang, present this. 
The Answer of Liu Qia, Secretary of the Heir Apparent your gracious letter. With respect I looked at the Imperial Response to His Subjects: The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
I humbly opened the letter of white silk, and respectfully looked at the profound account. 
The composition is as harmonious as the music of Emperor Shun and Emperor Yu, and the meaning surveys the hexagrams and the Great Appendix . 
spreads the authentic teaching, which is handed down to us in written form. 
His words surpass the ultimate of heavenly and human beings. 
Except for those who have mastered the highest virtue like his and whose thoughts match the virtuous spirits, would it be possible to deeply clarify the essential points of the Way that the human intellect hopes to attain? 
I will prudently write this on the end of the sash of my ceremonial gown, and wear it eternally. 
I will visit you on purpose to study one of these days, and explain more about this. 
I, your disciple Liu Qia, bow with my head to the ground and present this. 
65c The Answer of Yan Zhizhi , Erudite of the Five Classics your gracious letter. 
The body is separated and engages in coarseness. 
Needless to say, the principle of discernment is minute. 
How could those of confused views understand this? 
If we keep the Middle Way in mind, we can come back to [the right path] when we are swayed by desire. 
If you pay attention only to the two ends of a matter, you will be unable to reach the yonder shore forever. 
In discussions on the extinction of the spirit, this obstruction is really heavy. 
I respectfully rely on His Majesty, the chief support of the highest teaching. 
The brilliant imperial instruction was accordingly issued. The issue has been clariﬁed, just as clouds disperse. 
not only profoundly tallies the books authored by sages and virtuous emperors of ancient times, it also deigns to promote the signiﬁcance of ﬁlial piety. 
has most likely wonderfully reached the origin of life and deeply mastered the basis of conduct. 
He consolidates even more the moral character to maintain the rules of propriety and he treads on hoarfrost and dew.163 With the knowledge of examining the spirit, he respects the joy of practicing meditation and enhances his mind. 
Everyone should learn the mind of determination in the path of wisdom and force back the tide of the sea of delusions. 
I, your disciple, try to establish my pure mind from early days, but I have not yet known how to cross over to the yonder shore. 
I humbly read [the Imperial Response] and my body and mind were ﬁlled with jubilation. 
You kindly think of me and encourage me. 
The Answer of Cao Siwen, Houseman of the Eastern Palace You graciously sent the Imperial message to me. 
I, your disciple, recently received the point of this argument with respect in person, too. 
His Majesty was deeply afraid that people would be deluded. 
Once this imperial instruction is practiced, even those of ignorant mind will understand that the spirit is immortal. 
I, your disciple, recently criticized somewhat [Fan’s Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit] following the Duke of Zhou and Confucius,164 which I now enclose in this letter. 
Please be so kind as to take a look and refute strange points against scriptures. 
I will not talk of many things here. 
I, your disciple Cao Siwen, bow. 
The Answer of Xie Ju, Vice Director of the Palace Library your gracious letter. 
The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
I humbly appreciate His Majesty’s instruction bestowed in written form. 
The instruction deeply molds and fashions . 
feels pity on have the six coverings ,165 and feels sorrow that they have the four kinds of evil attachments (a heretical doctrine of the ninety-six non-Buddhist schools). He dispels the insigniﬁcant assertions that cause confusion about the Way. 
He delivers those who are on a narrow path to the Great Way. 
The purpose is unrestrained and yet mysterious, and the meaning is gentle yet clear. 
Wide comprehension and great scope are all embraced here. 
With a single sound of his voice and his chanting of half a gāthā (four-line verse) he manifests his outstanding realization. 
Sunlike wisdom and a mind like water remove deﬁlement and confusion here. 
Can he bear only the Tripiṭaka and cover the seven books? 
I, your disciple, am fortunate to abide in the best of times and secretly receive correct guidance. 
I will follow with respect and write it on the end of the sash of my ceremonial gown. I, Xie Ju, bow. 
66a The Answer of Ma Yuanhe, Chamberlain for the National Treasury your gracious letter. 
You bestowed on me the Imperial Response to His Subjects: The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
I have personally heard that the purpose of the crucial point showed is not studied by ordinary people, and the pivot that tallies with a wonder is mastered only by the virtuous. 
Therefore, various teachings go around, but the principle comes to sincerity and wholesomeness. 
Numerous scriptures state full details, yet the main point comes down to deliverance. 
His principle transcends language and his consideration extends beyond the phenomenal world. 
He attacks and blocks heterodoxy, and expounds that are united into one. 
Human and heavenly beings look up at him and follow him. 
He is truly like a bridge formed of ships aﬂoat on the blue sea or the sun and moon in the dark sky. 
Discussions on the extinction of the spirit do not convince me. 
When past sages spread teachings, they forced them on or guided to them, in different ways. 
In short, the principle is in fact not dual. 
The Book of Changes says, “The family that accumulates wholesomeness is sure to have superabundant happiness, and the family that accumulates evil is sure to have superabundant misery.”166 The Canon of Filial Piety says, “Parents are content with while living, and when they are worshiped after death their disembodied spirits enjoy .”167 Although the three periods of existence is not evidently discussed, the tenor is apparent. 
When ﬁrewood is completely burned up the ﬂame dies out. 
The wondrous existence is transparent. 
This is the proﬁcient assertion of the ultimate. 
The succession of a state and a family from generation to generation is derived from this. 
The treasures of the three powers are marked by various changes and movements. 
Discussions on the extinction of the spirit are frequently harmful to political affairs. 
“Those who refute sages have no law in their minds, and those who object to ﬁlial piety disown the principle of affection toward parents.”168 If one fails in these two issues, it will be difﬁcult for him to conduct himself in the world of His Majesty. 
I, your disciple, am ignorant and inexperienced in the highest Way. 
You deigned to send a letter to me, an ordinary man of shallow learning. 
I, your disciple Ma Yuanhe, bow. 
The Answer of Wang Jing, Court Gentleman for Evaluations You showed me His Majesty’s Response to His Subjects: The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
He lives without wasting even a single day. His way is distinctive and he is simply sharp. 
Thereupon he made inquiries to his subjects, and extensively promoted the meaning of ﬁlial piety. 
His Majesty’s writing is profound; the ingenious principle is deep and boundless. 
Except for a sharp and smart ruler, or a sunlike monarch whom we follow, or clouds we gaze upon from afar, could there be someone who can analyze profound and tranquil issues and who can clarify them in an elegant discussion? 
I, your disciple, am a lonely man from the area between the Yangzi and Huai Rivers. I have no learning and no skill. 
Even though I have followed a teacher and have had an audience with the emperor, I am not versed in even a single scripture. 
The Five Classics are vast and profound, and the categories of items are broad and abundant. 
As for the purpose of spiritual intelligence, there is a great variety of meanings. 
Regarding the music from instruments made from metal, stone, string, and bamboo, and the story that the Duke of Zhou [swore an oath to the spirits] on behalf of King Wu, are they not meant to be for His Majesty’s purpose? 
Furthermore, when we speak of the “Chapter on the Meaning of Sacriﬁces” , there is particularly clear evidence. 
If it is said that the spirits do not exist, then it would be possible that sages do not exist either. 
If it is approved that sages exist, there should also be the spirits. 
The law of the spirit is luminous. 
How could it be allowed that is extinguished? 
My, your disciple’s, view is stupid and shallow. 
I, your disciple Wang Jing, bow. 
The Answer of Lu Ren, Gentleman Cavalier Attendant, and Lu Chui , Secretariat Drafter of the Heir Apparent your gracious letter. You kindly showed us His Majesty’s Response to His Subjects: The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
Formerly when people of different schools argued about the path, Mencius took upon himself the Duke of Zhou’s way.169 When Hinayana Buddhists put the Way into confusion, Nāgārjuna explained the teaching of Śākyamuni. 
Thus, in circles of Yangzi and Mozi, every time they moved their tongues their mouths stiffened. 
Regarding followers of the six leaders of non-Buddhist teachings, their chariots were in disorder and their banners dropped . 
It can be said that those who assert the extinction of the spirit are biased in learning and inﬂexible. 
those who travel south while seeking the Yan region , or those who head toward the Chu area while steering the shafts of the carriage toward the north. 
If one travels a thousand li on roads in this way, he will be farther away [from his destination]. 
His Majesty feels pity on those who go astray. 
Thereupon, he exerted himself to create this Imperial composition, in which he investigated what lies deep and attained what is distant. 
He completely comprehends the processes of transformation and knows what the spirit is. 
We, your disciples, are both mediocre, yet we beneﬁt from your kindliness. 
Wearing a cap, we at the imperial court that corresponds to Heaven. 
We have heard the discussion to examine and study ancient matters. 
We sincerely feel happy about this guidance; our joy increases more and more. 
We will respectfully write this down on the ends of the sashes of our ceremonial gowns. 
We, Lu Ren and Chui, present this. 
The Answer of Wang Sengshu, Vice Commandant your gracious letter. 
You kindly showed me the Imperial Response to His Subjects: The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
How can we see it through a tiny pipe? 
I am happy and contented with the fact that my ignorance has dispersed. 
I will recite this in due order. 
You, Dharma teacher, are outstanding in virtue today, and your reputation is remarkable throughout all generations. 
I think that you clarify and propagate His Majesty’s purpose. 
The cloud [of doubts] will disperse luminously. I, your disciple, feel ashamed of myself for studying under adversity and being unable to see the whole of a matter with my discernment. 
How could I revere with praise the great brightness and publicize and uplift the wondrous model? 
It is indeed impossible for him to speak of the right path. 
How could he know of the certain danger of becoming stuck in a hitch when he has gone too far. 
The principles of this world and of the other world are bright and errorless. 
Cause and effect arise mutually and have no independence in relationship. 
When the body perishes, it naturally belongs to a class of trees and plants, but the spiritual intelligence always exists following conditions. 
Therefore, there is a story in the Zuozhuan that Pengsheng appeared as a boar,171 and we ﬁnd this passage in the Book of History, “Ancestors have arrived.”172 The Rites of Zhou says, “If music changes nine times, human and spiritual beings can know this. 
You should observe ceremonies.”173 [In the Zuozhuan there is an episode of] by tying up grasses repaying a favor he has received.174 How could consequently be extinguished? 
How could it be possible that the spirit does not exist in what was dreamed by Yuan Gui?175 The immortality of the spiritual intelligence is written in the Buddha’s golden sayings. 
In the statements of Confucius there is more evidence of this. 
Even though the Five Thousand Words (Dao de jing) and there are three hundred cantos in the Book of Odes, if we attain their principle it may spontaneously be embraced in a single sentence. 
Therefore we do not have to trouble ourselves to extensively seek for testimonies of . 
The three sages established brilliant teachings, and the various schools of thinkers permanently established great doctrines, but those who are ambitious and too hasty still strikingly make compositions and study [strange doctrines] again and again. 
His Majesty has presently clariﬁed the essence and illuminated what is hidden and tranquil. His discernment penetrates both the Buddhist and non-Buddhist teachings. 
Since ancient sages are eternal and His Majesty ﬁnds that heresy recklessly arises, he greatly gives rise to herein and bestows a piece of writing with love. 
This causes even icchantikas to attain realization immediately and consequently attain the fruition of buddhahood, and it openly and clearly cleanses persistent delusions in Jambudvīpa. 
Moreover, the beneﬁcial cause for gentlemen of the ofﬁcial class is great. 
I, your disciple, have enjoyed the Way without any order, but you, Dharma teacher, have given me a bamboo basket full . 
I pay respect to this, dancing with joy. There is nothing with which my joy can be compared. 
I will keep in mind deeply and much more. 
I, your disciple Wang Sengshu, lower my head to the ground and bow. 
The Answer of Ming Shanbin , Erudite of the Five Classics your gracious letter. 
You kindly showed me the Imperial Response to His Subjects: The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
Its foundation is deep and its purport is profound. How could a deer or rabbit investigate them? 
Probably each person will be happy about what he sees. 
I cannot stop dancing with joy. 
You, Dharma teacher, are outstanding in learning in the present time, and accorded with the Way for a thousand years. 
I think that you propagate subtle purpose without missing anything. 
I, your disciple, have excused myself from focusing on Buddhist scriptures for cultivation, and I am not proﬁcient in knowledge. 
How can I respectfully give an account of the profound Way and glorify the teaching? 
The advocate limits to what he sees and hears. 
How could he reach what is vast and profound? He can see what happens in a hundred years, and he will be deluded throughout the three periods of existence. 
He says that since the physical body perishes, the spirit is extinguished together with the body. 
This is already against what is stated in Buddhist scriptures and it also goes against the teaching of Confucius. 
How can we argue about the highest Way and speak of the wondrous doctrine with him? 
In this world we have ceremonies and music, while in the other world there are spiritual beings. 
Therefore, when Confucius gave an instruction, he responded to question, you know about death?”176 King Wen of the Zhou dynasty established a teaching; that he, a man of versatile talent [who is able to serve the spirits], will die instead of .177 The Book of Odes says, “The Three Augusts reside in Heaven.”178 The Book of History says, “Ancestors have arrived.”179 Moreover, the famous man who roamed on a bridge spanning the Hao River wrote the Discourse on the Coexistence of Opposite Views .180 The Archivist of superior intelligence said, “The manes of the departed do not manifest their spiritual energy.”181 When one puts ﬁrewood forward [toward the ﬂames as the force of the ﬁre weakens], the ﬂames are transmitted .182 very close to each other and are reborn. 
All these stated and recorded in the classic books are evident and clear matters. 
Since conditions are transient, they are extinguished. 
Because karma is something to be made, it is impermanent. 
Therefore, even when the ﬁve skandhas unite and become things, they end up in nothingness, just as smoke vanishes in the air. 
Even when the four small elements are groundlessly formed together, they disappear, just as a ﬁre is extinguished. 
I personally think that the Way of Spiritual Intelligence is neither karma nor conditions. 
Since it is neither karma nor conditions, although it moves, it is not extinguished. 
Since it is the subject that can perceive the object and also karma, the subject of activities, there are differences in the reward and retribution of joy and sorrow. 
Even though there are different paths of teaching, the truth returns to one. 
At present has abandoned the original texts of the Duke of Zhou and Confucius, and goes against Śākyamuni’s genuine statement. 
I do not know what he is going to become when he is like this. 
Even when the True Dharma was practiced in the world, there were still assertions: 
Moreover, after entering into the period of the Semblance Dharma there could be no situation in which there is no heretical view. 
Regarding the issue that the spirit exists and is not extinguished, the three sages have the same tenor. 
This is clearly written in books but many years have passed , so wise Confucian scholars and the erudite have not completely encountered this meaning. 
His Majesty’s intelligence is complete in the doctrines of emptiness and existence, and his intellectual function investigates thoroughly the origin of the spirit. 
Accordingly, he gave rise to the sacred sincerity and personally wrote this composition. 
He promotes the highest teaching and enlightens those who are seriously confused. 
He relieves learned people from their doubts forever. 
You caused me to be able to have a chance to appreciate His Majesty’s teaching and to receive his favor. 
I pay my respects to you and I am truly delighted with . 
I, Ming Shanbin, bow. 
The spirits of our ancestors will hear it.”185 The Zong Boshi section the Zhouguan , says, “If music changes nine times, human and spiritual beings 119 can know this. 
You should observe ceremonies.”186 The “Chapter on the Meaning of Sacriﬁces” says, “When we go into the hall heave a sigh, and we certainly hear their sigh of lamentation.”187 The Book of History says, “If you, Three Kings, truly bear the responsibility for Heaven’s great son (i.e., King Wu), [please let me, Zhou Dan (i.e., the Duke of Zhou, who can serve spiritual beings), be a substitute for his person].”188 The Zuozhuan says that the spirit of Gun changed into a yellow bear, Boyou became a ghost, and Pengsheng appeared as a boar.189 Above are seven items . 
I, your disciple, was born within the past hundred years. 
I heard [the law of] the three periods of existence from my early years. 
I have examined numerous scriptures and sought various ancient facts about this. 
The evidence that spiritual beings exist is already shown in Chinese books. 
The fruition of the highest wisdom is also indicated in the studies of the western region . 
The sacred teachings tally with each other on the point that the spirit has no end. 
the Sage’s ediﬁcation is, however, based on thoroughly understanding the people’s receptivity. 
What the people do not understand is not spoken, and what is spoken must be accomplished. 
does not respond to when it is not the appropriate time, and when he responds to them he alone saves them. 
The reward and retribution of karma, however, varies. Consequently, the path of acceptance differs from the path of refusal. 
The conditions of going and coming gather together, and the mind that sinks and the mind to be awakened are in opposition to one another. 
Those who are intimate with a little knowledge remain in darkness about this great tenet, and those who stick to familiar information do not discern what is profound and subtle. 
Our emperor succeeds the Three and the Five , attends to all state affairs, and succeeds to the seven hundred in order to control the six elemental energies of the changing .191 His achievements are immeasurable and his way is pure at the same time. 
He has the virtue of great ability to govern the universe, and the brightness that is just like having the sun on his left and the moon on his right. 
This is something that former emperors and kings did not distinguish, that many sages do not possess, that all the people should thoroughly understand, and that we will certainly achieve in the future. 
There is no one who is obstructed to receive profound wave and does not attain his deep point. 
I humbly read the wondrous discussion, which completely covers absolute and relative reality. 
The three powers are clearly recorded. All the people of His Majesty’s territories are attracted to . 
Even slowly moving creatures and wormlike animals know of this and dance with joy, not to mention people. 
I, your disciple, am young and wanting in reading thoroughly the meaning of writings. 
Since matches my long-cherished intention, I secretly dance with deep joy. 
Regarding the extent of various schools of thinkers, their statements are quite numerous. 
When we look for the issue of spiritual beings, there are many clear testimonies. 
Because are rejected by evil people, I will not quote anything from them. 
Except for correct words, what else could correct ? 
I have brieﬂy mentioned the seven items, all quoted from scriptures. 
These are just like if very tiny things were to lean against the Five Peaks, or a snail were to cling to the emperor’s six military corps. 
I, your disciple Yu Qianlou, bow. 
121 The Answer of Yin Jun , Household Provisioner of the Heir Apparent Recently your gracious letter. 
Human nature and the Way of Heaven cannot really be heard. 
His Majesty simply observes the twofold truth and concurrently understands [the teachings of] the three sages thoroughly. 
He clariﬁes both of these in a few words and explains what is subtle in simple writing. 
He teaches that sentient beings live within the ﬁve kinds of ceremonies, and his purpose is inclusive of the universe outside the limits of the human world. 
This can be compared to how a river and the sea both lead to land, or how the sun and moon ride high in the sky. 
I humbly read and am very happy; I rejoice both in body and mind at this. 
I, your disciple, have been inﬂuenced by the profound ediﬁcation from early in my life, and now, when I have become old, I have never lost . 
I am always afraid that my discernment and study have not been extensive and I may yet turn back halfway in vain. 
When I sit straight and contemplate quietly, my mind wanders about and scatters, or when I give a statement or set up a discourse, I am sometimes daunted by eloquent and sharp people. 
The Great Way is very smooth, yet common people love the byways. 
At present I humbly received the wondrous purpose with respect. 
I always carry this with me and chant it. I will eternally take this as my treasure. 
I have been involved in public and private matters for the past several days, and was also laid up with illness, so I was unable to respond to you immediately. 
I cherish your favor more deeply. 
The Answer of Zhang Mian , Assistant in the Palace Library In my search, the three periods of existence is bright and the two effects luminously reveal themselves. 
How is it possible to be deluded by the six dusts , to not be awakened, to be confused in the ﬁve realms of existence, and to sink for a long time? 
I think that “when the body withers, the spirit is extinguished” or “when a skeleton perishes, the consciousness decays” are the wrong views of a heretic. 
How could control Gautama’s True Dharma? 
I am afraid that at the end of a long kalpa leads insects will certainly arrive. 
The body dies and decays, and again another body is received, but the exquisite spirit does not change. Human beings and animals comply with conditions. 
the brilliant composition of the Nirvana Sutra and the valuable sayings in the ruiying .192 His Majesty sacredly illuminates what is tranquil and profound, and clearly examines what is deep. 
Comparing to the two phrases regarding sacriﬁcial offerings , he understands that the spirit is not extinguished. 
He makes clear that the reckless conduct goes against one’s parents. 
His justice, woven into , follows the eightfold holy path to enlightenment . 
It is difﬁcult to be able to hear words, just as [Confucius’ discourse about] human nature and the Way cannot be heard.193 I, your disciple, visited the Ruo River when I was young. 
I received the precepts in the area of Fan and Deng , and studied under Dharma teacher Qi at the White Horse Temple . 
[Dharma teacher Qi] frequently talked to me about the profound tenor of birth and death, and spoke often of the subtle purpose of the exquisite spirit. 
I again see that this judgment has destroyed the devil’s path to a greater extent. 
I know only to take refuge in , and tacitly compare myself to Seeking Fame .194 123 You graciously beneﬁted me by showing to me. 
I deeply appreciate your favor. 
I, your disciple Zhang Mian, bow. 
The Answer of Lu Lian, Erudite of the Five Classics I, Lian, address you. 
You graciously showed me the Imperial Response to His Subjects: The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
I humbly read His Majesty’s purpose, which clearly illuminates my deﬁlement and ignorance. 
My, your disciple’s, entire clan believes in the Three Treasures. 
From the time of my youth I have followed the Buddhist teaching. 
I carefully thought of many sages, both Buddhist and non-Buddhist, and found that they expand and guide with distinguished writings. 
The Tathāgata explained the three vehicles in order to indicate one principle, and spoke of the twofold truth in order to awaken those who are stuck . 
Former kings explained the ﬁve ceremonies in order to cause the people to thoroughly understand love and respect, and propagated the music of the six generations in order to lead spiritual beings. 
They further showed the three periods of existence in order to prove cause and effect. 
How is it possible to promptly reject the origin of the spirit and eternally cut off consciousness as a condition? 
If this was the case, reward and retribution for good and evil deeds would be merely an empty statement, and the establishment of sacriﬁces and reverence would be false. 
When we seek this in common sense, is it possible to be content with this? 
Nevertheless, ignorant and deluded people still remain quite obstinate. 
Therefore His Majesty clearly viewed with a tranquil mind, and his spirit visited the subtle gate . 
He put forth reason in words that are as bright as morning sunlight, and gave testimony by issuing this writing, which is as clear as a glowworm . 
This is enough to quickly educate ignorant and confused people and cause ordinary people to contentedly have faith. 
I humbly follow the tenor of the imperial writing. I will examine the origin of the mind. 
I cannot express my happiness in words, but I clap my hands and dance with joy. 
I, your disciple Lu Lian, present this. 
The Answer of Zhang Fan, Mounted Escort of Yangzhou your gracious letter. 
The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit, in which the magniﬁcent purpose traces to the very root of a vital point; sublime words tally with the Way. 
His Majesty’s innate intelligence is above those of the six scholars, spontaneously inclusive of that of the one above the sages in the tenth stage . 
Regarding the law of effects brought about by causes, his reason shines upon the three periods of existence. 
As to the signiﬁcance of observing the proper rules for ﬁlial offerings , he follows the continuous line of all kings. 
His sublime understanding is explained as easily as the ice melts in the springtime. 
His supreme purpose is as bright as the autumn sky. 
He causes the orderly, simple, and sincere tradition to thrive. 
You, Dharma teacher, are an outstanding man of virtue, well versed in principles. 
You have received His Majesty’s ediﬁcation together with us, but you alone enjoy the spiritual intelligence, deeply examine the profundity of the Way, and have insight into the path of the ultimate law of nature. 
I, your disciple, formerly heard a certain master’s view and became awakened to the tenor of the grand scholar . 
Today I encounter an era of peace and justice, and follow the teaching that is not extinguished. 
truly shines upon me, clariﬁes my ignorant mind, and washes away my deﬁlement. 
I prance and dance with joy. How could language or symbols surpass ? 
I, Zhang Fan, bow. 
125 The Answer of Wang Zhenguo , Commandant of the Left of the Heir Apparent your gracious letter. 
I humbly looked at the Imperial Response to His Subjects: The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
Regarding the immortality of the spirit, scriptures present explicit sentences. 
When we talk about the issue in conformity with our minds, it lustrously stands to reason. 
The discourse that the spirit is extinguished is really frightful and lamentable. 
His Majesty illuminates deeply and rightly. His wonderful tenor encompasses all extensively. 
breaks the heresy and propagates this model of teaching. 
I humbly read . I am happy to sustain this personally and deeply forever. 
I, Wang Zhenguo, present this. 
The Answer of Cao Jingzong , General of the Palace Guard You deigned to give me the Imperial instruction responding of the mortality of the spirit. 
The reasoning encompasses eternity, and the purpose includes the issue of the three periods of existence. 
Those who have been confused in the six realms of existence for a long time will hereupon be awakened forever. 
Those who have constantly been suspicious about the ﬁve realms of existence will realize the truth, just as if being enlightened. 
I will respectfully carry with me and write it on the end of the sash of my ceremonial gown. 
I will be sure not to disregard it even while sleeping and eating. 
You, Dharma teacher, have knowledge that goes beyond the realm of existence. Your learning has reached nonarising . 
You praise and recommend , and this good deed of yours shines as brightly as that of Dongli .195 I opened and appreciate it repeatedly, and so I forgot about my illness. 
I, Cao Jingzong, reply to you. 
The Answer of Yan Shan, Chamberlain for Attendants You deigned to distribute to me the Imperial instruction to ascertain the immortality of the spirit in response to subjects, together with your explanatory letter. 
The grounds of the reasoning are evident, and it is wondrously inclusive of both sides. 
Consequently, propagates the intelligent insight on his own, praising both the boat and the bridge [by which people cross over to the other side]. 
What cannot be seen with the eyes may be blocked by a curtain or a wall, and what cannot be heard with the ears may be obscured by distance. 
We cannot say there are no sounds or objects simply on the basis of their not being heard or seen. 
If we intend to ask about the Buddhist teaching now, we should rely on books of non-Buddhist teaching. 
A book says, “The spirit in its energy can go everywhere.”196 A Buddhist scripture says, “Nevertheless, the spirit is not extinguished.”197 Since the Buddhist scripture tallies with that in the book of non-Buddhist teaching, there is little to question about the issue that the spirit exists. 
Those who doubt [the immortality of the spirit and assert] its mortality are like an ephemerid that does not know the morning and the end of the day , or a cicada that does not know [what takes place between] spring and autumn. 
How could they know the long life of the tree called Dachun or the eternity of the sun and moon?198 His Majesty’s intelligence exceeds that of the ancient . 
The tenor of the three periods of existence has testimony. 
The principle of ﬁlial offerings [to the ancestral spirits] is honored here. 
Ordinary people had dark and narrow views before, but they have now become intelligent again. 
People of later generations will fall into darkness and confusion, but they will be awakened. 
127 I, your disciple, planted in my previous life and thus encountered happiness , being able to participate in following and enjoying the Way. 
I present my mind to Maitreya Bodhisattva; I sincerely and deeply take refuge in him with respect. 
I, your disciple Yan Shan, present this. 
The Answer of Shen Hong, Erudite of the Five Classics I, your disciple Hong, lower my head to the ground and bow. 
your gracious letter. 
The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit. 
I think that it is difﬁcult to understand the vital point, and an obscure matter easily becomes confused. 
How could we exercise our own views in darkness? 
He bestows the Dharma clouds in order to deeply beneﬁt them. 
He discloses sunlike wisdom and increases its splendor. 
His profundity is comparable to that of the dark, vast ocean, and his familiarity with the people is likened to theirs with a well crib. 
Throughout the ages, who else could know this ? 
There are parables found in the Buddhist scriptures, “After a sparrow ﬂies away, the vase is still there” or “Even if light is extinguished, the writing remains.”199 The Rites says, “ do not accept offerings from those who are not their family members. 
When [their family members] offer sacriﬁces to them, they send down blessings.”200 Moreover, , after dreaming of an orchid, conceived the Duke of Mu of Zheng state.201 [The father of the concubine of Wei Ke’s father’s] tied grasses together and fought Du Hui [on behalf of Wei Ke].202 Generally speaking, there are many instances like these; it is impossible to record them all. 
Furthermore, we transmigrate in the ﬁve realms of existence, but we will return to the same place the six pāramitās. 
All this is the evident testimony of the spirit and the profound meaning of the immortality . 
Today was bestowed on heavenly beings above203 and reached even the icchantikas below. 
This is what is called the simile of dispersing the dense fog by hanging two well-matched objects (i.e., the sun and moon), or coming out of a dark night and seeing Zhulong .204 I attempt to draw water from a deep well with only a short rope205 and examine the condition of the sea only by gazing at great waves in the distance. 
I am really happy and pay respects to , which is just like an invaluable precious jewel. 
The Answer of Sima Jiong , Arbiter of Jiankang your gracious letter. 
You kindly showed me the Imperial criticism on the Discourse on the Extinction of Man’s Nature (Miexing lun; i.e., Shenmie lun). 
Therefore, the discernment of the seven kinds of meditation and the eight kinds of meditation leading to enlightenment , and the subtlety of the three gates of emancipation and the fourfold truths, are originally luminous in scriptures and they are bright in clear and logical instruction. 
Therefore an exposition of the Dharma by the Buddha says, “It is just like the case where even if a hundred people were to praise the wondrous awakening in a chorus, they would still be unable to express even one ten-thousandth of the praise.”206 When karma arises, reward or retribution springs up from it. 
Though the meaning is obscure, the event is apparent. 
Moreover, even though the principle is profound the testimony is evident. 
From what is familiar, we can understand what is profound. 
For instance, when the sun or moon rises in the sky, we do not have to borrow the eyes of Li Lou, or when the sound of a bell reaches our ears we do not have to bother Ziqi, to hear it. 
The advocate [of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit], however, makes himself dark, strays from the right path, and has trouble understanding . 
I humbly read His Majesty’s excellent purpose. 
He achieves the apex and investigates what is profound. 
He examines the most tranquil truth, and moreover he elucidates it. 
He opens the profound path and at the same time he clariﬁes it. 
Even if various sages were to ride stirrup to stirrup with each other, or a large number of scriptures laid out the mysterious principles in a row, [the Dharma expounded by the Buddha] with his golden mouth on Vulture Peak and with his beautiful tongue near the Nairañjanā River cannot be sought and understood thoroughly after all without this , and if we disregard this instruction we cannot attain the right path. 
Truly, this washes away dust and dregs, like the waves in the Yangzi River or the Han River, leads with virtue, sets ceremonies in order, and returns customs and ediﬁcation to . 
This is the reason why is versed in both the Buddhist teaching and the secular teaching. 
I, your disciple Sima Jiong, present this. 
The Answer of Qiu Zhongfu, Assistant Director of the Left I humbly read the Imperial Response to His Subjects: 
The Examination of the Discourse on the Extinction of the Spirit, in which His Majesty illuminates what is profound and includes the absolute and the relative reality. 
My humble joy deepens. 
Xiao Mozhi, the magistrate of Danyang, respectfully submits a report, in which he says, “Four dynasties have already passed since Buddhism was transmitted to China. 
Buddhist temples and images in the thousands are everywhere. 
When we advance, we can connect our minds to , and when we retreat, there are plenty of from whom we may ask advice. 
They do not consider diligence and sincere faith to be supreme. 
Moreover, they place value on competing for luxury. 
Instead, they construct their several new buildings and proudly boast of it to each other. 
Construction materials such as timber, bamboo, copper, and varicolored silk are wasted limitlessly. 
Those who disregard a standard degree and go beyond a limit should be given restraint. 
“I would like to request that from now on all those who wish to erect a bronze statue go to a government ofﬁce and notify in person. 
If someone arbitrarily erects a bronze statue or establishes a Buddhist temple or monastery the case should be discussed, and under the law of failure to accept and exert the imperial 131 69b decree the bronze metal and all building and construction materials and tiles will be entirely forfeited to the government.” His report was sanctioned. 
At that time, Śramaṇa Huilin, who falsely took up the position of a Buddhist monk and slandered the teaching, wrote the Discourse on Buddhist Laymen and Clergy . 
He Chengtian, the magistrate of Hengyang, was in collusion with lin, and they often praised one another. 
They both adhere to one side and slander Śākyamuni’s teaching. 
Yan Yanzhi , magistrate of Yongjia, and Zong Bing, Secretariat of the Heir Apparent, believe in the Dharma. 
They reviewed these two essays and respectively refuted them in writings of more than ten thousand words. 
lin and at ﬁrst corresponded with [Yan Yanzhi and Zong Bing], but they stopped before stumbling. 
Bing accordingly wrote the Discourse to Clarify Buddhism in order to propagate his purpose. 
His Majesty considered this to be virtuous and said to Palace Attendant He Shangzhi, “I did not read scriptures when I was young and I have no free time recently. 
I have not yet thoroughly discerned causality of the three periods of existence. 
Nevertheless, the reason I do not dare go against is simply because my precursors and you, contemporary men of outstanding ability who lead , all respect and trust in . 
Fan Tai and Xie Lingyun always say, ‘The compositions of the Six Classics were originally intended to save the common people and govern them. 
If we must seek the genuine heart of our spirits, how can we manage without taking Buddhist scriptures as guidebooks?’ Yan Yannian’s refutation of the the Full Understanding of Life and Zong Shaowen’s criticism of the Buddhist Laymen and Clergy deeply and extensively clarify the Buddhist teaching. 
In addition, they are sufﬁcient to open and encourage people’s minds. 
“Recently Xiao Mo requested me to draw up a constitution but I have not ordered to let pass. 
We must have a measure to correct and stop superﬁcial dissolute practices. 
If has no harm in greatly encouraging [the people], then you should write an order.” Shangzhi replied, “People who have vague ideas mostly do not believe in the Buddhist teaching. 
I am stupid and ignorant, yet I take charge of the matter with my foolish diligence. 
I am afraid that my incompetence will blemish the great teaching. 
Regarding a great number of wise people of previous generations, they did not disobey brilliant imperial decrees. 
The medieval period is already far in the past, and it is difﬁcult to know completely. 
After moving to the Jiangnan area, Wang Dao and Zhou Yi are the most outstanding among the successive prime ministers. 
Wang Meng and Xie Shang are models of the principles of human relationships. 
Chi Chao , Wang Tan , Wang Gong , and Wang Mi are known either as being unparalleled or unrivaled. 
People such as Guo Wen, Xie Fu, and Dai Kui all set their minds to the ultimate of heavenly and human beings and raise their bodies among the clouds. 
The late brothers of my great-grandfather (i.e., He Chong and He Zhun) were exemplars of the world with their virtuous opinions. 
Wang Yuan and the Lin brothers held premier positions in the court due to their intelligence. 
Other people, roughly scores of men such as Fan Wang, Sun Chuo, Zhang Xuan, and Yin Ji, were talented people of the time. 
Moreover, all śramaṇas mentioned in Bing’s Discourse , Bo, Tan , and sui, are the next generation after them. 
They are compared and contrasted with Yu Yuangui. 
All the gentlemen before sui, such as hu and lan, are next to those gentlemen . 
When Buddhist clergy and secular people of modern times are compared and explained, they are like this. 
If we take extensive examples both from foreign countries and China, and accordingly come to examples from the Han and Wei periods, how could we be competent enough to speak of geniuses and extraordinary virtuous people? 
“Your Majesty’s thought penetrates beyond the world of creation and discretion and consideration is abstruse and subtle beyond the phenomenal world. 
You investigate things deeply and attain what is profound. 
How could ‘A man can propagate the Way’ be a false statement?208 Dharma Master Huiyuan once said, ‘There is nothing negative in Śākyamuni’s ediﬁcation. 
Following the Way indeed stems from the origin of the teaching. 
Why can it be said that only King Cheng and King Kang and Emperor Wen and Emperor Jing [of the Han dynasty] were extraordinary? 
If this ediﬁcation were practiced in concurrence with at the beginning of the Zhou and Han dynasties, it would have been doubly fast that praise is made and punishment is terminated. 
“Personally, I am inclined to think that this statement accords with the essence of reason. 
If ten people from a village of a hundred households observe the ﬁve precepts , those ten people are all honest and sincere. 
If a hundred people in a town of a thousand households cultivate the ten wholesome acts, those hundred people are peaceful and generous. 
If the instruction of this teaching is transmitted and spreads throughout the world, then a million people among ten million households will be benevolent. 
This is merely an example given for those who observe both precepts and wholesome acts. 
If those who observe even one precepts or one wholesome acts were all counted, the number would be at least twenty or thirty percent of the population. 
If one can perform a wholesome act, he removes an evil act. 
Since an evil act has been removed, one punishment comes to an end. 
If one punishment comes to an end in a family, then in a state ten thousand punishments will come to an end. 
It is not worthy to think that abandoning four hundred prisons is difﬁcult. 
It would be doubly fast in reason that the ode of the kingdom ya and the hymn of praise song rise. 
This would be, namely, to achieve the great peace without doing anything, as Your Majesty has said. 
Theoretically speaking, things should be like this. 
“If we seek actual facts for this, I, your subject, will say more. 
A history book of antiquity states that the people of the Western region all serve the Buddha and respect the Dharma. 
Therefore, even if the population of a large country numbers in the tens of thousands and that of a smaller country is in the hundreds, in the long run they do not annex each other. 
[The people of the region] are, however, still very honest and gentle; they seldom ﬁght. 
Therefore, when Fotudeng entered Ye, cases of massacres carried out by Shi Hu were reduced by half. 
When the treasure pagoda of Minchi [in present-day Henan province] emitted light, Fu Jian’s use of a mallet and a saw [to harm people] stopped. 
Mengxun turned against the one to whom he was indebted; he was heartless, as cruel as a wolf or tiger. 
In his later years he was inspired and enlightened and ended up becoming a good man. 
the Buddhist teaching matched that of Buddhist monks. He possessed power as strong as that of ten thousand men combined. 
When someone threw the region along the Yellow and Wei Rivers into disorder, he was ready to risk his life and went to his teacher who was in difﬁculty. 
This is due to nothing other than a respectful faith . 
“There is originally a reason for the fact that the Way of the Spirit helps in ediﬁcation. 
It often happens that are struck by lightning on a rainy summer day. 
Regarding the incidence that the Zhan family shrine shook [from being struck by lightning], it was written that [the Zhan family] had hidden guilt.209 In the reign periods of Jie [of the Xia dynasty] and Zhou , those who were wrongly put to death were too numerous to record, but only King Xuan of the Zhou dynasty 135 and Lord Jing of the Jin dynasty incurred divine wrath for abusing [their power to inﬂict] punishment. 
When we examine examples from ancient and modern times, our suspicions merely increase. 
Scriptures and history books, however, record such cases as evidence of encouraging and warning , and say that one out of ten thousand images still bears its full fruit. 
“ in reason there is a purport that should be axiomatic and believable, and in examining the fact there is also no fault of being perverse or absurd. 
Furthermore, familiar efﬁcacies bestowed by Avalokiteśvara Mahāsattva all immediately manifest in experiences of one’s lifetime, and the people see them together with their own eyes. 
In a family that offers prayers, whatever comes true, one after another. 
This is the reason to encourage and warn . 
Therefore bears its full fruit. 
“Nevertheless, a cohort of ignorant people improperly proceed to slander , neglect what is important yet die for what is unimportant. 
They stick to trivial matters and miss out on what is important; they resent that Buddhist monks and nuns cut off their offspring and hate that red and purple paint is wasted on Buddhist images and pagodas. 
The case of Huilin and Chengtian is probably like this, too. 
“As for the system reported by Xiao Mo, I do not think this is entirely wrong, but the worst people, who hurt and harm the Buddhist clergy and laypeople, exist among Buddhist monks and nuns who do no religious practice, and it is difﬁcult to sort them out based only on internal and external behaviors. 
Even though more and more gold, copper, soil, and wood are wasted [to make Buddhist images and build Buddhist temples], this is assuredly what is brought about by meritorious deeds. 
It is also difﬁcult to promptly stop this. 
I was thinking to deal with this matter seriously these days, but I had difﬁculty in settling my course of action. 
Today I graciously received with respect virtuous voice, and I am truly at ease.” At that time, Yang Xuanbao, Gentleman of the Ministry of Personnel, was present. 
He stepped forward and said, “This discussion surpasses the ultimate of heavenly and human beings. 
I am personally afraid that when we discuss plans to build up military power the states of Qin and Chu did, or when we make an elaborate plot to annex other states Sun and did, we should take something from this .” His Majesty said, “This is not a preparation for the Warring States period, but the issue is truly just as you said.” Shangzhi then said, “While a recluse is treated with due honor, soldiers are treated coldly. 
When benevolence is valued, military esprit de corps declines. 
If Sun and Wu are considered ideal and we engage in gobbling up other states, then the Way of Yao and Shun is useless. 
Is only Śākyamuni’s teaching ?” His Majesty was delighted with and said, “That Śākyamuni’s school has you is comparable to that Confucius’ school had Jilu. 
It is simply a case of ‘Evil talk does not reach my ears.’”210 The Responses of Two Dharma Masters, gao and ming, to Li Miao of Jiaozhou, Who Criticized the Matter that the Buddha Does Not Manifest Himself, and Li ’s Letters The Way abides in purity and emptiness. 
The principle of the four that are great is permanent,211 but there is the Dharma gate that wondrously goes beyond a multitude of spheres. 
If it is said that beneﬁting the people with efﬁcacy and delivering immeasurable are what is taught [by the Buddha], why doesn’t he make a true appearance in this world, why does he give empty talk that lacks substance? 
I am now surely going to ask you about the origin of in the West. 
I am humbly solicitous of you, Great Precept Master, to have compassion on me, take ahold of my mind, and freely bestow upon me your marvelous words. 
I, your disciple Li Miao, bow. 
I received a question from you about whether or not the greatest sage manifests himself. 
The taste of your principle is profound and extensive, and the signiﬁcance of your words is luminous and clear. 
The more times I read this, the more highly your virtue resounds. 
The fences and the walls of your house are high and large, and this naturally makes it difﬁcult to ﬁnd the gate. 
Then, I will try to exhaust my humble opinions and emulate Wangxiang, a mystic jade .212 There are generally three instances in which the Tathāgata responds to the people. 
The ﬁrst is emitting light and causing the earth to quake, [which are equivalent to] manifesting himself. 
The second is that the True Dharma, which is equivalent to the Buddha, exists in this world. 
The model which closely resembles corresponds to feelings of today’s people. 
What else then do they want to see? 
Therefore, the Vimalakīrtinirdeśa-sūtra states that is able to clarify the characteristics of existing things and know the faculties of sentient beings.213 With regard to the three assemblies held under the dragonﬂower tree at Kukkuṭārāma [in the city of Pāṭali in Magadha state, when Maitreya descends to this world from Heaven], people perceive in their minds [Maitreya Buddha’s present existence]. 
What is then hidden? 
Hence, the Lotus Sutra states, “At that time I appear together with many monks at Vulture Peak.”214 It can be expected that the palace of [the wheel-turning king ] Saṅkha, [who appears when Maitreya descends to this world,] is lofty. 
how is it that the origin in the West cannot be seen? 
Furthermore, many people of the world who have such doubts say that the descriptions in Buddhist scriptures do not coincide with reality. 
Śākyamuni let the Dharma drum resound at the Deer Park, and Confucius raised his virtuous voice in the Zou region of Lu state. 
We cannot actually experience any of this with our own ears and eyes; we believe them all based on written records. 
If you do not believe in this , I am not troubled by the fact that you have doubts about that . 
Why then do you stick so ﬁrmly only to ? 
My statements are superﬁcial and my expressions are poor. 
Although I speak, I cannot articulate my thoughts. 
I simply hope that on the day we personally see each other I must speak of your criticism. 
Stated respectfully . 
Your expressions are arranged beautifully, and there are many points with which I happily agree. 
As you say, to reform the people varies according to the time, and the True or that an image differs from people to people. 
I respectfully take your purpose as a model, with which I can ﬁnd no ﬂaw. 
Nevertheless, the cause to attain awakening is assuredly based on examining by seeing . 
To rely on something obscure produces doubt. 
Doubt is not the foundation of awakening. 
If what exists in written records 70c is uniformly understood by various different generations, we do not have to wait for a sage to appear as our teacher after countless generations. 
If we resign ourselves to voice and trace equally, his words and image are interdependent. 
Once the great justice is disregarded, the antagonism just like that between Confucianism and Mohism will ﬂourish. 
Then not only right faith will not be clear, but also slander and misunderstanding will increase our sins. 
Is it impossible to obtain the testimony of manifestation and strengthen with the seal and signs ? 
With the wisdom of nonobstruction the Great Sage bestows benevolence without being asked to do so. 
Why does he have to spare bright light, make his two xun-tall body obscure, cut off sentient beings’ hope after he entered nirvana, and cause them to commit sins prior to the three assemblies ? 
If straw dogs are futilely displayed, are they able to awaken you? 
If ritual instruments and images are pointlessly set up, are they able to cause you to have faith? 
Regarding the Thearchs, the Augusts, the Duke of Zhou, and Confucius, their teachings are limited to this world. 
Matters of the next life were left intact and they did not discuss them. 
Therefore they did not discriminate about hiding or appearing, declining or rising, expedient or reality. 
The Tathāgata’s teaching completely threads through the three periods of existence and his compassion universally proﬁts . 
This cannot be limited to the present existence. 
The Buddha’s altruistic activities are fully arranged, successively and innumerably. 
I have a question. Where do “the Buddha’s altruistic activities” exist today? 
If the situation is just as you say, then you believe in this (i.e., Buddhism) and testify to that . 
The Sage, however, does not appear in the world. 
I cannot hold my tongue and refrain from . 
I have just expressed my thought in words. 
I would be happy if you could further investigate in detail. 
I, Shi Daogao, inform you. 
I have again respectfully received your deep instruction. 
I read it three times and thought of it several times and I ﬁnally came to admire your profound meaning. 
The wisdom of predecessors and the ultimate principle are not what a common person can fathom, and sublime words and abstruse expressions are not something in which a lowly and ineloquent man is concerned. 
I will now attentively act in accordance with an ordinary man’s indiscretion and roughly explain what I have in mind. 
Some people sit and meditate in a grove; some cultivate meritorious qualities in the vicinity of the city; some bow and snap their ﬁngers; some sing gāthās and chant poems . 
All these are comprehended through the ears and eyes. Actions are immeasurable. 
This precisely corresponds to the case that the ferry by which one attains awakening is caused by relying on something obscure. 
Why is it always the case that to attain awakening is based on examination by seeing ? 
Doubt is also the foundation of awakening. 
Please let me discuss this. 
When one has a doubt he seeks a resolution . 
When [the doubt] is resolved one is able to become awakened. 
When awakened, one enters the Way. 
If this is not the foundation, then what is? 
Even though Confucianism and Mohism vied with each other in rising and the nine schools discussed right and wrong, the torches have not been put out and it is not that the sun and moon no longer shine brightly. 
Why do you anxiously urge manifestation and hurriedly return to the same point? 
The present world is indeed in the last period of the , when there is no realization. 
It is also not incorrect to produce an effect in order to prove sincerity. “The Great Sage spares bright light.” Those in the world who have this doubt are arrogant and they do not see [the Buddha’s appearance]. 
Subsequently they end up being long confused in a great dream and perversely sink and drown in birth and death. 
Scholars of the past and ancient sages have made old statements on this for 141 the most part. 
There are not several traces of wheels on the path. 
In that case, I transmit but will not state . 
If we efface ourselves and sincerely devote ourselves to , we will assuredly sense . 
When we sense him, we equally see him. 
If we do not sense him, we do not see him. 
Those who have seen tell this to those who have not seen him, but those who have not seen him certainly do not believe it. 
How could it be that the Sage does not exist? 
How could it be that sentient beings do not see him? 
People hear the sound of the Dharma and praise it as good. 
does not mean “straw dogs are futilely displayed.” People see images and bow to them. 
Would this be the case when wonderful ritual instruments are futilely set up? 
The Duke of Zhou and Confucius tried to save decadent worlds. 
How did they have time to spare to instruct people about future existences? 
If Confucius and the Duke of Zhou had been born when knotting rope , they would have endlessly clariﬁed the three periods of existence. 
You asked me, “Where do the Buddha’s altruistic activities exist today?” We bow our heads and join our hands . 
There are, however, methods to bring people to be deeply awakened. Even though the paths may vary they all arrive at the same point. 
Regarding what I referred to in my previous letter, that “having a doubt in this and believing in that ,” this is precisely because since people of the world do not see and then say there is no Buddha, I simply used the example of the Duke of Zhou and Confucius, whom we have also not seen. 
How could this be called contradiction? 
Your innate intelligence is perfect and original disposition is spontaneous. 
You hold a rank in the place of the Imperial throne and plan with your great resources. 
You roam in the park of philosophic principles and wander in the garden of books. 
In spare moments from your busy duty, you enjoy carefree time for a long day. 
Once your virtuous voice is given, there is no one who does not listen to you attentively. 
I have rough and shallow learning. 
I am deeply ashamed of my poor skill in correspondence. 
I submit my absurd and coarse reply to you, . 
I fear that I will stain your glorious writing with particles of dust. 
My awe and shame increase afterward and I am in an incessant cold sweat. 
Your discussion clariﬁed that the ferry to reach awakening is accordingly attained through doubt; to rely on something obscure is sufﬁcient ; there is no need to examine by seeing ; and [actions such as] bowing and reciting praises are all enough to reach Way. 
Nevertheless, you say that the Dharma of a image departs from the True . your logic of seeking for awakening is vulgar. 
To take this from secular books serves the purpose sufﬁciently. 
Why must emit light and cause the earth to quake without any reason? 
If right faith is not conﬁned to merely bending and lifting one’s head, and the Buddha’s altruistic activities are completely performed through body and speech, then what the Great Awakened One depends on is his wonderful physical form, which is the foundation at the beginning when one ﬁrst becomes involved and seeks . 
Therefore, it is known that those who ﬁrst come to believe in certainly doubt based on Confucian or Mohist and even those who learn still feel sorry about a lack of testimony . 
There is no trouble with the Three and the Five even if they spare bright light, but it is a fault of the ten epithets to hide morality. 
Wouldn’t this be the case? 
In addition, you say that the Duke of Zhou and Confucius were engaged in relieving the decadent world and had no time the next life. 
if they had existed in the time 71b when knotting rope they would have spontaneously clariﬁed the three periods of existence. 
This is not the case, either. 
The future is included in the meanings spoken of in the Seven Classics. 
Issues expounded and recorded in Buddhist scriptures are conﬁned to reward and retribution based on causality. 
Therefore the Book of Changes says, “[The family that] accumulates wholesomeness is certainly to have superabundant happiness, and accumulates evil surely to have superabundant misery.”217 The sūtra says, “There are no self, no one who creates , and no one who receives , yet good and evil karma does not perish.”218 This precisely indicates that the teaching of causality usually indicates being gradual while the teaching that includes is very magnanimous. 
Could it be said that what is engaged in lies in this, and what it lacks lies in that? 
Your discussion is beautiful but it is, from the beginning, merely speech that goes around and around in circles. 
I hope that you will pick up new and expound something different in order to wash away the delusions of all ages, make the level and easy way wider and smoother, and greatly pierce through the accumulated hindrances. 
I deeply wish that you, Great Precept Master, will graciously accept my clear sincerity. 
Presented respectfully by your disciple Li Miao. 
A great discussion has been bestowed on me here. 
I spent time to respectfully read this. 
This is as fragrant as an orchid that blooms in a dark gorge, and as clean as a gentle breeze. 
My caliber is not as sharp as peaked frost, and my movement is not that of chef Sheng.219 I am inclined to be contrary to reason and alone am frustrated by many doubts. 
This is truly because my expression is poor and my point of argument is not lucid, and severe criticisms are ranged just as stars . 
I, a silly person, think that doubting something obscure, placing one’s mind in what is wonderful, examining through seeing the manifestation, bowing and singing praises, and being moved by [the Buddha who] mysteriously transforms are all guides to reach the Way and a happy occasion to cleanly ascend . 
Therefore, placing one’s mind and examining through seeing may both be recommended, and both doubt and veriﬁcation should be practiced. 
Would it be possible to give up seeing the manifestation , promptly forget the brilliant appearance, equalizes the path with that of the Duke of Zhou and Confucius, take to follow the same pattern as worldly instruction, and think that emitting light and causing the earth to quake are empty speech for nothing? 
The dharmakāya is quiet and still and the wondrous physical form [of the Buddha] is calm. 
Therefore he is able to hide and show himself in accordance with the times, and his course of action is inscrutable. 
When he manifests himself he appears taking advantage of thusness . 
When he hides himself he is well gone . 
When we seek the purpose in conformity with these words, what mistake could there be between and the ten epithets?220 The glow after shines brightly enough for the decadent world. 
How can those who have faith be more doubtful about since is just like the light of a ﬁreﬂy or candlelight? 
Buddhist pagodas, images, scriptures, and books are replete all over the world. 
How can those who learn feel sorry about a lack of testimony? 
Furthermore, in the meanings of the Seven Classics to which you refer, the future is included; “ accumulates wholesomeness is certainly to have superabundant happiness and accumulates evil is surely to have superabundant misery.” even though people are born and die one after another and successively change into a new generation, it is impossible not to receive the reward and retribution for good and evil karma . 
This is extensively clariﬁed in the three periods of existence, which is even clearer than the Seven Classics. 
I have inquired into this in writings and inspected it in reality. 
You say in your previous discussion, “Regarding the Thearchs, the Augusts, the Duke of Zhou, and Confucius, their teachings 71c are limited to this world. 
Matters of the next life were left intact and they did not discuss them. 
Therefore they did not discriminate about hiding or appearing, declining or rising, expedient or reality.” This seems to contradict . 
In my previous letter I gave a rough account of the appearance and latency of the Highest Sage , but the signiﬁcance is unclear and my expressions were vague. 
I would like to propagate the highest Way together with you. 
Sentient beings enjoy a long sleep in the three realms of existence. 
Their consciousness is eternally confused in the six dusts. 
They secretly move and become mere subjects to be preyed upon. 
The body serves as an inn and the spirit is equal to a guest who rests there on its way. 
They suffer transmigration in the three lowest realms of existence. 
They have hardships passing through the eight difﬁculties. 
Happiness and joy are temporary pleasures; anxiety and fear are unending. 
After the body dies and decays they receive another body. 
Even if were to emit light and cause the earth to quake, could [a person in such a condition] see it? 
Consequently, profound scriptures are circulated and expedients wait in array for a chance to take action. 
After sensing it there is a response to it. 
We slacken the reins in the way of purity and tighten them in the streets of evil and falsehood. 
If we plant virtue and remove weeds, virtue will grow densely and luxuriantly. 
If we plant merit and pour right on this, will branch out with a thick foliage. 
How could we not be intimately illuminated by the brilliant luster and see his mysterious transformation? 
Taking examples from what the ears and eyes perceive and what may be seen in a dream, . 
Emperor Ming of the Han dynasty awoke to the Sage on the basis of a dream he had. 
The great Dharma was thereupon transmitted . 
Monarchs sincerely devote themselves to take refuge in virtue. 
Outstanding persons adjust themselves and abide by the ediﬁcation. 
Śramaṇas stand shoulder to shoulder with princes. 
Buddhist monks and nuns do not bow to emperors. 
Who considers the ninety-six to be as lofty as ? 
At the time Emperor Wu of the Song dynasty ﬁrst ascended to the throne, he dreamed of a Buddhist monk, carrying an almsbowl to beg , who then addressed him, “You gave a bowl of food to Vipaśyin Buddha in your previous life. 
you attained the throne in this life.” [The emperor] dispatched a messenger to ask Eminent Huiyan to prove whether was true or false. 
Eminent Huiyan immediately sent the Sutra on the Seven Buddhas to present [to the emperor] for his perusal. 
Sun Quan , a ruler of Wu state, was at ﬁrst doubtful of Buddhism. 
cast bright light in his palace, it could not be broken [by hitting with] metal or iron , and it could not be melted through metallurgy. 
72a Jianchu Temple seen today in the capital was [built in connection with this incident].223 In Wu County there was a stone Buddhist image that ﬂoated on the sea. 
Five or six Buddhist monks and four men whose family name was either Zhu or Zhang approached and respectfully welcomed it. 
remains now at North Temple in Wu County. 
Among those who are extremely sincere there is no one who does not have the receptivity . 
The Zhu and Zhang families believe in Buddhism from generation to generation because they saw this miracle happen.224 Guo Wenju greatly worshiped the Three Treasures. 
He once groped for a ﬁsh bone . He had deep discernment regarding what is safe and what is dangerous. 
Eminent lan brushed off a heavy coat of snow from a ferocious animal.225 Eminent hu moved a dried-up spring, from which water ﬂowed out in response.226 All were equally outstanding in lofty conduct and surpassed ordinary people in pure spirit. 
I feel solitary and uncultivated, with but little information. 
My words are impolite and my expressions are plain. 
I am humbled by shame and awe as a consequence of . 
The Discourse to Clarify Buddhism composed by Layman Zong of Jingzhou says,227 “Bo Yi said in the Book of Mountains and Seas (Shanhai jing), ‘In the country of Shendu the people are very dear to others and love one another.’ In Guo Pu’s commentary on the book it is said, ‘The country we formerly called du is Tianzhu where Futu originated.’” . 
“Liu Xiang’s Biographies of Arrayed Transcendents states that seventy-four are found in the Buddhist scriptures. 
Again, it was not [during the reign of] Emperor Ming of the Han dynasty that began .” “The eminent Buddhist monk Fotudeng was a kindhearted sage at the time of Shi Le and Hu. 
told Shi Hu, ‘In the city of Linzi county there is the old site of Ayuwang Temple where there is still a image, and the dew basin is buried in the earth more than twenty zhang under a big tree in a deep forest.’ An envoy of Hu looked for them, relying on the illustration, and found everything had mentioned. 
Recently, when Yao Lüe’s uncle was a king of Jin, he saw a bright light at the site of Ayuwang Temple, so called by the elders, in Puban of Hedong. 
Seeking he had dig there and obtained relics of the Buddha in a silver case placed inside a stone container. 
Today bhikṣus live in a new temple [where the relics are worshiped]. 
“From the observation of these facts, a long time has passed since Buddhist practices were transmitted to the land of Qi and Jin. 
The reason was not mentioned in the three commentaries (i.e., the Zuozhuan, the Gongyang, and the Guliang) is similar to the reason why in the history books written by Gan Bao and Sun Sheng there are no remarks about the Buddha. 
During the Jin period ﬂourished in the Jiangzuo area .” The Letter of King Wenxuan Given to Kong Zhigui, Palace Aide to the Censor-in-Chief, in Order to Dispel Doubts, together with the Answer I closely read your letter line by line. 
I have long worried that groundless words always impair the right path and drastic measures harm purity and 72b peace. 
The Mengzi says, “A monarch should not be fond of wisdom. 
A monarch should not be fond of courage. 
Excessive courage and wisdom produce trouble and disasters. 
What he abides by is exactly that he should take love and justice as the foundation.”228 Today, since studying Śākyamuni’s teaching I have realized for the ﬁrst time from where this statement derives. By pledging to and practicing , I would like people in both high and low positions to equalize their good points. 
Furthermore, I will use an illustration for liberation: 
“Nothing is gained and nothing is lost. 
The goal of the teaching of the truth and the secular teaching is simply the same. 
Because those who practice have not mastered this, inconsistent views arise indiscriminately. 
You say, “One who accumulates karma stays in faith.” In that case, this would mean that speech and action go against each other. 
Can it be said to be great ﬁlial piety that while attending one’s parents a person respects his parents on the one hand and injures or wounds [his own body, a gift from his parents] on the other?230 I have never heard of such a thing. 
The deeds of a person of virtue are not something to injure heartlessly but something to increase his goodness. 
The moral conduct of an honest person does not form his virtue through greed and theft. 
If things were like this, would it be possible to reject taking refuge in the Three Treasures and observing the ﬁve precepts even for a moment? 
Would it be possible to abandon the ten wholesome acts and the eightfold holy path to enlightenment even for a short time? 
I have not seen a case where the foundation is treated lightly while the branches are valued. 
This is what is called “The root has already been inclined and its branches and leaves follow it afterward.”231 Now you say, “The two paths are separate and different from each other. 
How could it be possible to follow ?” I see that this statement is merely superﬁcial talk. 
Why do you incline your determination only to one side and bury the path ? 
A person of learning does not usually leave the secular world to give instruction. 
The teaching that conforms to the ways of the world can be understood. 
If it is said that this Dharma vainly consists only of deception and falsehood, the doubts of increase and it should be destroyed. 
Would it then be possible to reprimand various instructions and admonitions for the reason that there are not many [such good people], and to burn all the classics, history books, and admonitory works? 
How different is from this example? 
Therefore, those who take refuge in the excellent Dharma originally do not show their minds with decorum and respect, and those who respectfully admire and worship do not, from the beginning, forget other people and think only of themselves. 
Today, those who courteously overcome their own desires are precisely only your group of people. 
Together you now intend to leave behind arrogance, remove haughtiness, restrain sensual desires, control greedy desires, cultivate politeness and modesty, learn how to be respectful, admire benevolence and righteousness, and deepen your ﬁlial piety toward your parents and respect for your siblings. 
Why would you then be ashamed of yourselves in the eyes of spiritual beings? 
To diligently urge yourselves to carry out the practices is exactly seen here. 
Although I am not able to respectfully follow , I do not forget this in my mind. 
glows in the night has not yet been thrown to you but you have already stood up and placed your hand on your sword .232 Even though you seek to hope for morality together, don’t you instead feel more ashamed? 
What I have in my mind is not this. 
The Ofﬁce of the Minister of Education and Cultural Affairs primarily exhorts the teaching of the ﬁve kinds of principles of human relationships.233 Together we earnestly perform these good acts in order to act in accordance with freedom from desire and cause those who deceive and ﬂatter others to reform themselves through merely viewing the gate [of the Ofﬁce of the Minister of Education and Cultural Affairs], or cause those who make an outward show without sincerity and who have loose morals to improve their 72c behaviors only through stepping into the yard [of the Ofﬁce of the Minister of Education and Cultural Affairs], equalize [the Ofﬁce of the Minister of Education and Cultural Affairs] to that mansion which sets our hearts at rest , and make [the Ofﬁce of the Minister of Education and Cultural Affairs] equal to the tower of freedom from desire . 
Wouldn’t this be good? 
First, we respectfully follow the benevolence bestowed by the emperor all over the world. 
Second, we respectfully receive the affectionate wholesomeness granted to us by the crown prince. 
are fond of idly speaking on a great variety of subjects. 
They say they do so because they wish for wholesomeness. They have not been aware of the important point of harming the ediﬁcation. 
If this trouble has not yet spread, I, an old vulgar shallow person, deeply regret it. 
Why do you think that hurts the basis of ﬁlial piety and damages the foundation of principles? 
If this issue can be abandoned I would be happy to hear other good points. 
If a teaching is propagated in this way without fail, Fangxun should have waited for the four wicked ones to reform themselves and attain sagehood [instead of banishing them to the four distant regions],235 and Yu Shun should have waited for Shangjun to become wise and his virtue to become clear. 
Your intention like this should have what is broadly corrected. 
What practice would we then be able to cultivate? 
Generally, when we hear a speech we assuredly judge the behavior. 
When we see a behavior we certainly search for the reason [behind that behavior]. 
If your reason does not contradict and your behavior does not transgress, please do not reach for strange doctrines. 
Truly different paths arrive at the same goal. 
You need not be consistent in a minor point. 
Recently there are many people who agree with you in this intention. 
Today, I convey my opinion in this letter. 
Those who do not concentrate their attention harbor doubt and delusion in their minds. 
His Majesty made this known publicly and widely. I have brieﬂy expressed his thought but it seems that nothing is clear. The issue easily becomes troublesome in a letter. 
I cannot completely express my intention after all. 
Everyone has a mind of his own, just as everyone’s face is unique. 
Could it ever happen that every person’s face is the same and his or her intelligence is equal ? 
Once someone goes against the path, how could be changed by explanation? 
When I saw you, even though you clariﬁed the issue completely in your statement we did not reach this point. 
This is truly because there was already a difference between the two parties, yours and mine. 
It would be fortunate if each party could maintain the same small difference . 
There is simply no need to fruitlessly discuss right or wrong and slander each other without restraint. 
73a As for resting one’s mind and coming to have faith, it is not that the virtuous people of former times did not have this determination. 
I consider now that following wholesomeness is my happiness. 
Therefore I try to take the conceit out of myself when meeting with people. 
If you think that your virtue surpasses those of the ancient wise people, your sacredness exceeds that of former virtuous people, your intelligence excels that of a large number of people, and your rank is the highest of human nobility, then you can enjoy a free and leisurely life outside the mundane world, edify people in your own way, place your mind at a lofty level, have nothing more to seek, and be selfsufﬁcient. 
If we were to meet each other in a leisurely manner I would not have said anything from the beginning. 
Recently I wrote a two-fascicle work, the Explanation on Dispelling Delusions . 
I think you may have already seen it at some other place. 
I now send it and show it to you. 
I would be happy if there is no need for you to further trouble yourself . 
It was written only to dispel my own doubts and delusions. 
When you read this you will surely clap your hands in glee. 
Kong Zhigui’s Letters, together with Answer I, Zhigui, explain. 
I receive with respect your benevolent favor from early on. 
I have deeply enjoyed the instruction given by you together with great mercy. 
Thanks to your kindness I will assuredly complete my life. 
I dare to now show my sincerity and humbly pray to illuminate your mind. 
My family has occupied a noble position for a long time, respectfully following Li Lao . 
We set our minds to become void and calm and make our conduct pure and moderate. 
I revere and hold to the path my ancestors followed and cut off even as tiny as a speck of autumn dust. 
Regarding the brilliant teaching of the Great Awakened One and the right origin of transcendental wisdom, these are what I have come to respect in the course of my life. 
Usually when I infer the ultimate principle, principles come to the same point. 
Since the time I began to respectfully receive your instruction, I rely on and come close to your style. 
You guide me through the right vehicle (i.e., the right teaching), and lead me with the universal precepts. 
You caused me to promptly remove the six kinds of hindrances,238 and to precisely clarify the ﬁve desires. 
I bow with my head to the ground and join my hands . I am willing to abide by this. 
I respectfully take refuge in . I have pure faith from early on. 
Regarding the important precepts and minor articles, I have already observed half of them. 
It would simply be unbearable for me to one day suddenly give up . 
There is an origin in the world of my mind. 
I do not wish to conceal myself with regret throughout the morning. 
Since the two teachings (i.e., Buddhism and Daoism) are almost the same, I originally do not dare be unwilling to transfer my mind . 
How could I not happily think of the Mahayana teaching and cordially make up my mind to pursue the One Vehicle? 
Needless to say, I respectfully rely on you who equally govern propriety and morals. Furthermore, I must recite with reverence your pure faith. 
Even though I think to say something against this, my mind is unconsciously infatuated with it. 
Further, I did not foresee the greatness of your skillful guidance was so wondrous. 
Extensiveness and simplicity are arranged from point to point and the exquisite light shines out. 
Even if I intend to stop this, I am still unable to do so. 
Even if I did want to go against this how could I avoid facing it? 
Until now I was not intelligent indeed but from now on I will make it my business to practice your words.239 My silly mind just adheres to my family law. 
I dare not distinguish Śākyamuni from Laozi in my mind. 
On one occasion, we taught this to Zhang Rong, who then wrote the Discourse on the Way to Reach the Origin [of the Two Teachings] . 
His name is Shaozi. 
What Shaozi clariﬁed is how to combine Daoism and Buddhism. 
Rong’s comprehension of this derives from my family. 
In the beginning I hesitated to take this trace but now I always respect both [Buddhism and Daoism] from the bottom of my heart. 
I do not expect to suddenly attain great awakening one morning. 
[But if I am able to attain] awakening, it will be entirely owing to your guidance. 
Again, I have personally investigated how Daoism differs from Buddhism. 
When Daoists discuss the ultimate they say that it exists in all the heavens, but Buddhists despise this and say that it does not go beyond the three realms of existence. 
Teachings are originally based on the mind and are adaptable to all people. 
employ whatever people see, and then the people follow them. 
On the point of following , both make an exhaustive study of wondrous things. 
Accordingly, if there is a ground at the end of the ultimate, its profundity would certainly tower over Heaven. 
Laozi also says, “There was something undeﬁned and complete, coming into existence before Heaven and Earth.”242 This means that the Way already exists beyond Heaven. 
Rather, does not take Heaven as the Way. 
How is this different from the fact that in the Buddhist school an arhat is indicated as one who has attained the fourth fruition and yet, just as in the Shengman jing , it is known that he still has more steps ? 
Daoists’ worship of the zenith of Heaven is similar to the Buddhists’ the fruit of arhatship. 
The Buddhist intention is not limited to arhatship. 
The Daoist is not conﬁned to Heaven, either. 
Then and only then do I believe that what Daoists consider to be the Way is deﬁnitely connected with the Buddhist Way in origin. 
What my present mind relies on, then, follows the same direction as yours. 
The Daoist school asserts abiding by wholesomeness. 
This is consequently the same as the Buddhist school. 
In the points common to both [Buddhism and Daoism] I do not carelessly abandon the Daoist teaching. 
In the points where Daoism differs , I follow and join your Mahayana teaching. 
I beg you to dare not lay down a further difference [between Buddhism and Daoism] today. 
I have respectfully written of my sincere view. 
I humbly wish for you to take notice of the penitence of an insigniﬁcant person and understand my initial position . 
I will withdraw and repent of my initial . 
73c On the twenty-ninth day of the eleventh month, a man of the province, Palace Aide to the Censor-in-chief Kong Zhigui explains. 
Originally reason is not dual. 
This is something I usually deplore, sighing. 
Prince Xiao’s answer says, “This letter from you is very good. 
You should show it widely to those who have not understood the point.” The Letters of Two Dharma Teachers, Daoheng and Daobiao, Responding to Yao lüe, the Usurper Ruler of the Later Qin Dynasty, Who Exhorts Them to Give up the Way, together with the Letters of the Ruler Yao The Ruler Yao’s Letter Given to Two Eminent Monks, heng and biao You are delighted with the tranquility of the essence of the Way. 
I desire to summon people who live in sylvan seclusion with satisfaction and to search for who live in obscurity at a butcher’s shop. 
Each of you receives the ability to manage the trend of the times, and yet hides yourself in a place to keep yourself clean and pure. 
Does this indicate the most genuine feeling with which I seek the wise and the deep interest by which you both propagate [the Buddhist teaching] together? 
The ancient people had a saying, “There is a very fast horse in the country but no one rides it, and the people only anxiously search for it.”243 This refers to us. 
Today I will make an Imperial edict to Director of the Imperial Secretariat Xian, in order to take up your meritorious minds of the two vehicles. 
I hope you will understand my thoughts about this. 
You cannot make “to remain faithful to your principle” a good excuse. 
We respectfully received the Imperial decree dated the twenty-eighth day of the last month. 
You will make an Imperial edict to the Director of the Imperial Secretariat in order to take the Dharma robes from us, Daoheng and Daobiao. 
Since the moment we received the decree we have been sad in fear. 
We have lost our composure and are ashamed and bewildered in every action. 
We, heng and , are truly stupid and incompetent in natural abilities and endowments. 
It has not been long since we were imbued with the Dharma. 
What we keep in mind is serious and our attachment to [the Dharma] is also deep. 
We humbly received the favorable edict in which we are praised above what we deserve. 
Even though you speak and reason in every possible way, we really feel that we have no moment of ease. 
We made a vow that throughout our lifetimes we will be under Dharma robes. 
Concurrently, we have been learning the Buddhist Dharma since our youth and we are not familiar with worldly affairs. 
Even though we have a reputation for outstanding capability, we are 74a useless to beneﬁt the times. 
Before seeing even a small amount of help there would be a loss as large as a mountain. 
We thus do not accept for your sake, Your Majesty. 
Even Emperor Guangwu [of the Later Han dynasty] could allow the recluse Yan ling to think freely,244 and King Wen of the Wei kingdom kept Guan Ning’s moral principles intact.245 the monarchs controlled their lofty ideas and let an ordinary person fulﬁll his triﬂing determination. 
Lenient with the masses, were content; not to mention Your Majesty who manages the people by means of the Way. 
You concurrently propagate the Three Treasures, gather scholars of philosophical principles from all over the world in the capital city, and circulate new and unfamiliar Buddhist scriptures in remote as well as near places. 
The great Dharma ﬂourishes and prospers upon this. 
You have established a model for the coming one thousand years as a path to guide future generations . 
how could we, Daoheng and , alone submit to this bright time and be unable to appeal to you for our ambition? 
We humbly pray that you will examine our intention, especially bestow the unrestrained principle which is understood by the less educated, grant a brilliant decree again, and concede our insigniﬁcant thought. 
Then we will bear our gratitude to you even in the underworld and appreciate your virtue, kalpa after kalpa. 
We cannot stand trembling with fear. 
We respectfully report to you. 
The reason you have to submit to me now is because you are needed by the times. 
Do not come to this through pushing your true intention. 
Feel vexed about your politeness, expand your horizons, and respond to my interest. 
I will not grumble anymore. 
You are only expected to respectfully accept the current government order and make efforts to follow the bodhisattva path. 
We, Daoheng and , recently presented , hoping you would understand when you examined it. 
We are not favored by your sympathy and benevolence. 
We humbly read it with sorrow and anxiety. 
Your Majesty, your benevolence is as great as Heaven and Earth, and you cause the people to be delighted in their nature. 
We, heng and , received training in Dharma ediﬁcation when we were young. 
What our stupid minds hope is that upon our oath, we will be able to complete our triﬂing lives in the Dharma robes. 
Nevertheless, you bestow on us undeserved favor, kindly forget our ignorance, and encourage us to propagate the bodhisattva way to save [all sentient beings] without distinction. 
There is, however, a limit to our determination and power. 
This is really something for which we are not adequate. 
is not only to excuse ourselves from because we want to live in our remaining years; we personally think that we must live up to what we foolishly keep in mind. 
We humbly pray that you will examine and excuse us for our wholehearted sincerity, and will not blame us for being stubbornly biased, grant us a special benevolent imperial decree, and accede to our triﬂing feelings. 
We repeatedly invite your brilliant decree, and accordingly gasp for breath in fear. 
We report with reverence to you again. 
The situation is just as I explained thoroughly in my previous decree. 
Do not annoy me again and again! 
In our previous petition presented to the throne the issues to which we, Daoheng and , hold with foolish intention have been thoroughly stated. 
But since our purity and sincerity are wanting we were unable to move and awaken Your Majesty’s mind. 
We repeatedly received an Imperial decree in 74b reply but we have not been placed under your benevolence. 
We are anxious and fearful in our everyday life and our minds are not . 
Your Majesty cherishes the Way, you efface yourself and accept everything, and there is no limit to your support for the people. 
We pray that you will reveal your kindness Heaven and Earth and allow us to accomplish one-tenth of our determination. 
If we take part in the offense of breaching an Imperial decree we will contentedly take responsibility for it without resentment. 
We frequently asked you to listen to our winding . 
Report to the Throne by the Three Dharma Teachers Senglüe, Sengqian, and Kumārajīva, in Response to the Letters of the Ruler Yao, who Tried to Suspend [the Monkhood of Dao]heng and biao, together with the Ruler Yao’s Letters The Ruler Yao’s Letter Given to Kumārajīva Several tens of days have passed since I saw you last. 
It is gradually getting warmer and warmer. 
A petty savage tribe started hostilities in a remote area and there is no way to deal with them. 
Everything is mournful. 
I need talented people in order to manage these things. 
Recently I issued an Imperial edict to Daoheng and and ordered them to take off the robes for arhat and seek the bodhisattva’s trace. 
You, Dharma teacher, must persuade them. 
If I only mean to cause them to give up their minds of seeking the Way, why would it be necessary for me to do this (i.e., summon them to join the administration)? 
Since I have too many things to do I am not able to write in detail. 
Please persuade them and cause them to advance in the bodhisattva practice. 
The Ruler Yao’s Letter Given to Sengqian and Others I examined what you have presented in your letter, which gives a detailed account of each matter. 
Ziling emulated Emperor Guangwu, Junping was arrogant in a marketplace of Shu,246 Zhou Dang refused a stipend from the Han court,247 and Du Wei told Zhuge that he was deaf.248 All these people stubbornly esteemed righteousness. 
How sufﬁcient are they to judge the essential points whether to be silent or to speak out, and to understand the tenor of loftiness and excellence? 
At present China is not governed well and the common people have hardships. 
Having little virtue, I alone try to deal with this bad situation. 
I expect to ﬁnd many talented people with whom I might peacefully have the highest level of administration. 
Even though you Dharma teachers have a quiet concentrated mind in the Dharma gate, you also assist the world and propagate the teaching. 
If the nine tributary streams of the Yellow River overﬂowed and all the people were to become ﬁsh, how could you Dharma teachers, who assist the world and propagate the teaching, apply ? 
Furthermore, for a long time Daoheng and have kept the instructions of the Dharma in mind. 
Therefore, I simply wish to remove their determination against their will in order to assist my ignorance in administration. 
If there is a manifestation of meritorious reward and if the Buddha does not lie, then regarding the achievement of delivering the world from an emergency and the honor of beneﬁting the times and peacefully governing the country, the merit exists here , not over there . 
You should instruct and explain this to each other in order to meet my hopes. 
Therefore brilliant monarchs of ancient times discerned that it is difﬁcult to govern if they go against nature, and they became aware of the reason it is easy to let the people conduct affairs without restriction. 
Thus, Yao freed Xu You in Mount Ji, Ling (i.e., Lord Wen of Wei state) allowed Ganmu to retire to his hermitage in Wei state,250 the founder of the Han dynasty released the four bright men to Mount Zhongnan,251 Shudu was summoned for the government during the Han dynasty and yet declined,252 Zai Kui of the Jin dynasty put on coarse clothes in Shan county ,253 and Xie Fu became a recluse on Mount Ruoye with disheveled hair. 
They probably considered that following the nature of the wise is virtuous. 
Therefore, there are a wise ruler above and those who wear a leather girdle (i.e., common people) below. 
The manners of hermits give a lesson today. 
Regarding Daobiao and heng, their virtue is not perfect and prominent now, and their lot lies in remaining faithful to their principle. 
Furthermore, they learned the profound ediﬁcation when they were young and they keep the Buddhist Way in mind and maintain it. 
They are earnestly sincere and their determination is certainly ﬁrm, without agitation. 
As for expounding the subtle Buddhist scriptures and studying what is obscure, they are sufﬁcient to enlighten even children and to help edify about merit. 
When one can cause people to discern what is evil and what is meritorious, he has the beneﬁt to deliver them from suffering. 
If the Buddha does not lie, biao and are propagating the teaching of Vaiśālī. 
We personally heard that recently often received a favorable Imperial decree that aimed to take the Dharma robes from them. 
This indeed indicates Your Majesty’s benevolence and friendliness; you spread kindness that is uncommon in the world. 
Even beings outside the universe are moved by your pure virtue and are widely ediﬁed . 
We, foolish monks, think that although heng and biao are insigniﬁcant individuals and differ a little from others in maintaining their views, they are originally within your net; that is to say, they are subjects for whom Your Majesty ediﬁes the Way. 
Formerly Bei assisted in governing the world for twelve years. 
We have not heard that his Dharma robe was taken away and he worldly opinions about his appearance.254 If a person is helpful for the times he will greatly beneﬁt even if he wears a Buddhist surplice . 
In former times Chao and You upheld their high principles, both Yao and You were lofty, and the four bright men did not surrender to . 
This is the same principle throughout all ages and has been the common manner for one hundred generations. 
They do not deserve having a magniﬁcent carriage in the Tangfu village.255 They are not as intelligent as Kongming. 
Would they be good enough to receive three calls at the thatched cottage [in the way that Kongming was visited by Liu Bei]? 
We pray that Your Majesty will bestow bygone favors on them and comply with their triﬂing determination. 
If a ruler does not give too much kindness 165 and the ruled do not lose their lot, the ediﬁcation of Emperor Tang will reemerge here and the guests near the Ying River and under Mount Ji will appear again today. 
Senglüe and his fellow monks speak. 
The Letter of Dharma Teacher Huiyuan of Mount Lu in Response to Huan Xuan, Who Urges that be Removed from the , together with Huan Xuan’s Letter Huan Xuan’s Letter The ultimate Way is far and remote. The Buddhist principles are subtle and profound. 
How could this be what ordinary people, who spend time idly, can learn and seek? 
Buddhist monks of the present world, even though they disﬁgure their appearance, have more than secular people. 
What they talk about is the boundary between the Buddhist clergy and secular people. 
It can be said that they are similar to the man who tried to learn the art of walking at Handan [but forgot his original way of walking] and crawled back home from there.256 A sage of former times had a saying, “While you do not know life, how can you know about death?”257 however, torment their bodies and minds throughout their lifetimes and seek the imperceptible happiness of the nether world. 
This is all a narrow view. 
If they get lost and yet recognize to return, they will not be far from the right path. 
We will quickly become old [if we waste time]. 
I will be happy if you can accept my words. 
Dharma Teacher yuan’s Response The Great Way is profound and its principles are abstruse. 
I cherish this lofty purpose, which is really as you say. 
Nevertheless, I have renounced the world; accordingly I am a guest from outside this world. 
Even though I have not fulﬁlled the virtue of ancient wise people, I am earnestly determined [to seek enlightenment], remove worldly clothing and dress, decline fame, and seek truth. 
If the other world exists I originally and certainly do not fall short of secular people . 
It can be said that even though you see the appearance you have not yet come to the truth . 
How sad this is! How sad this is! 
fastened with a rope belt and [who live in the mountains] resting their heads on rocks are : they look majestic but they are unsubstantial. 
They are people of a narrow view, not worthy of envy. 
Even though they discipline their original nature in mountains and forests, how different are they from trees and shrubs? 
Bian He wept aloud on Mount Jing because he was troubled by the fact that people could not distinguish .258 Formerly we heard the name [of Bian He] and now we see a person . 
Shouldn’t you make merit for your future life? 
You mentioned that a person who learned the art of walking at Handan had no achievement in the new and lost his original way , so he employed a man of Handan and crawled back to his hometown. 
How can you mix these together to lead to your point? 
167 I already go against worldly affairs. 
I temporarily place myself amid popular customs because among them I would like to edify those who have not yet been ediﬁed. 
glory of one’s lifetime is as momentary as a ﬂash of lightning. 
Whenever things meet, they come to part. 
It is not worthwhile to be greedy. 
People of shallow views are confused on this point. 
It can be said that “The scholars of the lowest class, when they hear about the Way, have a great laugh at it.”260 They can really be said to be people who are confused and do not know how to return . 
Therefore, I disﬁgure my humble appearance (i.e., shave my head) and wear patchwork clothes . 
How could I give up my original ambition and realize your lofty instruction? 
I am growing old with the passing of time and I have not recovered from illness. 
You then graciously bestowed on me your brilliant consolation. 
I have mingled feelings of appreciation and joy. 
Your faith is deep and you serve as one to whom the great Dharma entrusts itself. 
How could you cause even a single wound and damage the foundation ? 
is not the words of Pāpīyas, [the devil king,] who tried to distract . 
I did my best to respond to your lofty order. 
The Letters of Dharma Teacher Sengyan to Decline the Provincial Governor of Qingzhou Liu Shanming’s Recommendation for the Official Appointment of the Cultivated Talent , together with Liu Shanming’s Responses I renounced the world in my youth and separated from secular affairs from my early years. 
I enjoy myself with the Buddhist teaching in my mind and in my determination I have turned my back on the Confucian teaching. 
Even though I have not accorded with the place where the Buddhist Way is practiced I am originally far from the instruction of [Confucius, who was born near] the Zhu River. 
I am just now thinking to feed my body to a beast, hoping to achieve the merit beyond nine kalpas,261 and to share my ﬂesh to feed a dove, intending to ride on clouds . 
How could I let my wings hang down in the middle of agricultural land, turn back the path toward the place of conﬁnement, give up the comfort of being in this path, and hold these nuisances of the Imperial court in my arms? 
Moreover, ofﬁcials are based on ability, and good talent is certainly necessary for ofﬁcial ranks. 
There has not been a case where someone who is favored by an undeserved recommendation can maintain his glory to the end. 
Please do not cause me to make you sigh in lamentation again, just as Lord [Cao, who lamented the talented people who had declined his rewards], and do not make me feel ashamed of myself once more, just as Wang Zhou did. 
The summons for replacement of the Cultivated Talent is not something for which I am ﬁt. 
I, Shi Sengyan, present this. 
Response to the Buddhist Monk Sengyan The book Zhuangzi explains that it is a mistake to leave one’s native place in his youth.262 A Buddhist scripture depicts the confusion of a poor son [who does not know how to return to his father].263 Every time I read these books I heave a long sigh. 
It is important to respectfully care for our own hair and skin, to become famous in future history, and to reverently make well known. 
When we seek sacred words far away, this teaching is superlative. 
When I apply the various familiar matters to me, the reality confuses my reason and feeling. 
If Gautama were to see this he would not oppose indeed. 
Moreover, you possess skill in debating and arguing others down over triﬂing points and knowledge to penetrate ancient and modern times. 
If you tear my cap and do not doubt, or if you pull out my root and 75c are not aware of it,264 the nether world will be surprised and people in both distant and near regions will be startled. 
In ancient times Lü Shang held a ﬁshing rod at the age of eighty and set his mind on ﬁshing. This is because his time had not yet come. You have not yet come to drown and perish. 
If you do not do so, wouldn’t that be sad? 
I am grateful to have been appointed to an ofﬁce in my native place, where I hope to ﬁnd bright people who live in obscurity. 
Therefore I would like to lead those who have not been led and cause those who have not risen to rise. 
If you were to make an absurd statement would this be what I expect? 
Formerly Wang Xiang was a woodman at yi and, at the age of sixty, for the ﬁrst time he assented to a provincial order.265 Gongsun Hong pastured pigs on a beach. 
When he already had gray hair he was only then recommended to serve in the central government as a wise man from a local school. 
What do you think about this? 
I respectfully declare my true thoughts and feelings. 
Please reconsider . 
I, Liu Jun reply to you. 
The basis of your theory is bright. 
When I wish to yield to the principles and argue with my feelings I merely have no ground. 
Even though lofty righteousness appears as a phenomenon and subtle words enter into mind, things in which my despicable mind persists can be still understood. 
The reason is because one who knows people is wise and one who examines oneself is intelligent. 
I truly feel uneasy if I were to forget my lot and rush on recklessly. 
Formerly Wei Zhi complied with an order and had the humiliation of losing his reputation at last, and Zun Zu was invited for service because of his ability and in the end he invited disgrace like that of the swan who tried to perch on a willow branch.267 If I forget my lot and intend to imitate them in order to follow the traces of Wang and Lü 
The ability is the same crime as stealing things. 
Shouldn’t we refrain from this? 
Therefore, even if cut his own ﬂesh , no one jeered at him in former ages, and even if he had his hair cut he still had the chance to join [the administration of the state] in the past. 
Why is this strange? 
I pray that you will pardon my foolish persistence and grant a favor to allow me to achieve my humble ambition. 
I, Shi Sengyan, present this. 
Second Response I received a letter from you again. 
Your clear realization can be said both sides to look at each other and smile. 
You have the knowledge to examine many currents and the wisdom to embrace the innermost of principles. 
Every time you investigate the source of the relationship between receptivity and responsive activity, you look for a theory as thoroughly as if you were sorting stones. 
Why don’t you always come to the point in every sentence and clearly see the foundation of the principles? Furthermore, if your humility makes you more brilliant, you go against the manner of yielding a seat to the wise. You are just like someone who follows an overturned chariot and has no regret about falling in its tracks.269 While it is not difﬁcult to recognize this, it is not easy to practice it. 
76a Three years after a person leaves his country he is happy when he sees someone who looks like a member of his family. 
Today, if you make a vow to let go of the heavy burden from your shoulders and sit idly, you will feel like giving up being a traveler and returning home. 
You will go to the gate of your house joyfully and enjoy great happiness. 
Moreover, this is a time when the civilization controls the movements of Heaven, just as when the Duke of Zhou and Lord Zhao mutually helped in political affairs; thinking of wise people and praising the Way, they forgot to take a meal until the evening came. 
How is it possible to talk at the same level with the disgrace of shaving one’s head and the suffering of being a bachelor? 
We have worked sedulously in deﬁance of hardships; we have wished for a long time to train our deep determination. 
If I hide a wise man like Zhan Qin , I will be reproached for being as disloyal as Zang [Wen Zhong].270 Therefore, I have done my best to quickly inscribe this in my mind and explain it again in my response. 
You should make effort; and do not end up with bitter regrets. 
I, Liu Jun, reply to you. 
Sengyan’s Third Letter The issue I wrote about the other day should have somehow caused you to have fun, and I did not think your favorable purpose was that profound. 
Your kindness to encourage and instruct me extends this much. 
Before I humbly read completely I broke into a cold sweat. 
Now I have already grown old. 
These are beyond comparison. 
Formerly Zitai obeyed order and held his principle against Gongsun .271 Yu , who lacquered his body, took revenge upon on behalf of Zhibo and had no regrets about ruining himself.272 My virtue that you excessively praise today is as good as those of the two wise men. 
Swallowing charcoal or deserting to the enemy camp are eternally far from my wish. 
Facing letter paper, I felt sad. I did not know what to express. 
I would be happy if you can stop your excessive favor of me. 
Please do not write back to me again. 
I, Shi Sengyan, present this. 
Nevertheless, you lost the root of reason when you were young, and now move unsteadily, losing the course when you have gray hair. 
I value highly your talent. Therefore I always sigh in lamentation. 
Even though your mind is above the clouds your body remains in a pit in the ground. 
Since you form a group with titmice I am afraid that you will lose the beauty of a phoenix . 
Therefore I acted in accordance with formal propriety in inviting scholars for service. Compromise and comply with my recommendation for service in which we have a relationship between guest and host. 
You deigned to write to me 76b three times and I have replied to you twice. 
I respectfully defer to your clean breeze and reverently follow what you esteem. 
I decided I am still ashamed of myself and concerned for you. 
I, Liu Jun, reply to you. 
When I make an inquiry, I see that once śramaṇas renounce the world they are not bound by worldly dignities and emoluments. 
Since the time of the Han and Wei periods successive distinguished sages all extended their greetings and no ruler requested them to bow before him. 
Nevertheless, Lord Yu monopolized power and absurdly gave rise to heterodoxy. 
Huan doubted the brilliant and followed Yu’s groundless views. 
If Lord He had not said that , the Dharma would have been hidden eternally. 
If Virtuous Master yuan had not argued about , practical works of the sangha would have suddenly come to an end. 
The section of gu lines of the Book of Changes says, “not to serve either king or feudal lord.”275 The “Chapter on Scholars’ Behaviors” of the Book of Rites says, “not to take the high ofﬁce of being a minister of the son of Heaven.”276 Among the four classes of people (i.e., scholars, farmers, artisans, and merchants) in the secular world, there are people who do not bow , not to speak of those who abandon secular life and follow the Way. 
The Essentials the Dharma and Sunshine are discourses 175 to awaken secular people. 
The hermits’ three written appeals are also statements made in order to destroy devils.277 Therefore I also include them in . 
Letter Given to Shi Daoan by Xi Zaochi On the ﬁfth day of the fourth month of the third year of Xingning , I, Zaochi , bow my head to the ground and worship . 
Those who believe in emptiness realize the tenet of impermanence, and those who preserve themselves in the phenomenal world master the expedient of having a transient body. 
The cool breeze adorns China. 
You have deep taste and a far-seeing plan. 
What is as glorious as these? 
I, your disciple, hear that what causes rainfall throughout the whole world before the dawn are the clouds that ﬁll the sky, and what spreads from the source and moistens the universe are the four great rivers. 
Moreover, sympathizing with [all the sentient beings of] the world, descended to this world and, feeling pity for the times, was reborn. 
Clarifying the Way lies in training secular people. 
rides a carriage free from suffering in order to go to an immensely far place. 
He has the vehicle of a transient body prepared in order to respond to requests from the ten directions. 
Moreover, he is able to obtain enough gems to embellish an entire mountain and enough ice to freeze a whole gorge. 
How could he be someone who rejects this world and would not teach the way to salvation? 
Furthermore, it has been more than four hundred years since the great teaching was transmitted to the East . 
Even though reason changed with the lapse of time, not all people in the secular world were awakened. 
Those who took delight in the great wave were only scholars of the lowest class. 
Only Emperor Ming, Suzu , is truly one upon whom Heaven bestowed virtue. 
He drew the Tathāgata’s countenance with his own hands and appreciated the purpose of samādhi by chanting. 
His practice in compliance with the precepts he had received was more rigorous than that of a hermit in a mountain cavern. 
Since the Great Mass has already chanted, just as myriad apertures began howling,278 all wise people and gentlemen take refuge in the ultimate Way of nature . 
Even though the sun and moon are far away, the light gets brighter. 
Isn’t this like “Moonlight Boy will ﬁrst enter the tranquil state and then be reborn in China”279 or “the mysterious bowl will move to the east and suddenly produce an effect in this place”?280 In addition, I hear that three thousand monks who attained the Way are all in Nanyang and the bodhisattva of brilliant learning expounds words of mystic truth and ediﬁes them. 
In the upper level I examine the instructions to attain the stage of a sage, and in the lower level I survey the effects of Buddhist practice. 
Who else but you could uphold all these profound sutras? 
Therefore, all Buddhist monks in this region admire you wholeheartedly. 
They rejoice to see the golden-hued auspicious and wish to hear the supreme admonitions. 
Both old and young equally wish for this, and Buddhist clergy and laypeople think in the same way. 
If auspicious clouds move to the east, if a maṇi gem rotates and shines, if you even once ascend the seat of the seven treasures, if even for a short time you show the sage’s lamp, if you cause nectar to rain on the grass that 177 grows thick, and if you plant sandalwood trees on a riverbank then the Tathāgata’s teaching will again be revered today and the profound waves and outstanding sounds will cleanse this generation once again. 
I cannot hesitate any more so I decided to write and convey my thoughts. 
I, your disciple Xi Zaochi of Xiangyang, bow with my head to the ground and worship. 
(Yu Chan’s preface to the Hymn for the Hall of Happy Wise People [Lexian tang song] also says that Emperor Ming, Suzu, was very fond of the Buddhist Way and copied a wonderful portrait with his own hands.) The Letter of the King of qiao to Discuss Confucius and Śākyamuni281 In Buddhism, in regard to evil acts and meritorious deeds, the relationship between cause and effect is just like that between and its shadow or between a sound and its echo. 
The sacred words are clear and precise and cause the people to feel their blood run cold. 
Nevertheless, from ancient times—the eras of the Five Thearchs, the Three Augusts, Emperor Wen (of the Han dynasty), Emperor Wu, the Duke of Zhou, and Confucius—the Regulations , Counsels , Instructions , and Announcements have been completely provided. 
There is, however, nothing that gives a clear account of the law of the three periods of existence or that clearly describes reward and retribution. 
All of the sages exhaustively probed the very root of the truth, discerned thoroughly nature, and clearly understood what cause phenomena. 
How is it possible to see without compassion that people are driven into or drowned in yet be unwilling to help them, and to have never spoken even a single word to instruct on the path to the ferry ? 
He shot, but not at birds perching.282 However, when fattened cows and sheep and plump pigs are offered, the Supreme Thearch receives them. 
From this viewpoint, it is probably difﬁcult to understand [the laws of the three periods of existence and of reward and retribution]. 
I hope you will explain the gist and relieve me of my delusions with clear evidence. 
If we are indeed weak in good causes we will give rise to delusions as vast as the Milky Way. 
One who is awakened to what is mysterious or who probes into the very root of the truth is a sage or deity whose light shines throughout the eight directions. 
He can see the nine provinces in an instant. 
Nevertheless, we live at a time when the human life span is only a hundred years. 
It is impossible to clearly seek for the ultimate point of reason and indicate the ultimate principle. 
What is subtle manifests, gently completes, and secretly moves to a far and high place. 
“To be fond of life,” is the origin of the three periods of existence.284 The phrase “to accumulate wholesomeness” follows in the same wake of reward and retribution.285 The fact that [Confucius did not use] a net shows his benevolence. 
“ hunting and hunting” [found in the Zuozhuan] propagates honesty.286 Since the people have been gradually imbued with these teachings and became familiar with them, stinginess and deﬁlement has lessened day by day. 
Then the Way reached the brilliant Han dynasty. 
The teaching spread during the Yongping era . 
We know precisely that in the age of Fang 179 and hua was still not clear, and was not apparent in the time of King Wen and King Xuan [of the Zhou dynasty]. 
It is not the case that take different paths because their purposes are separate from each other. 
Presumably their doctrines are equal, yet both were frustrated. 
I have absurdly made an erroneous statement because I am careless, ambitious, and too hasty. 
Letter Given to Meditation Master to Discuss the Manner of Eating while Squatting with Raised Heels by Zheng Daozi Sages’ instructions are to cultivate the basis and remove nonessentials. 
these come from one’s most sincere heart and there is no difference between Buddhist clergy and laypeople . 
Therefore, when perform puriﬁcation and give a series of lectures, they prepare the Dharma robe. 
There is an order in worship and a system in sequence. 
When respect ﬁlls one’s mind a person pays respects outwardly. 
bowing with one’s head to the ground [is approved of, while] the manner of squatting with raised heels is not. 
The manner of pulling the lapels of the garments together, respectfully saluting, and bowing ten times is not something with which the easy, informal sitting style practiced by Buddhists is concerned. 
I do not see a common aspect in them. 
In the teachings of phenomena, each has signiﬁcance. 
With regard to the Banzhou , the body is tormented in order to maintain the Way. 
dear to the Way neglects his body. 
There is a reason for practicing in this way and a basis for employing . 
Even if we employ it is not to torment the body. 
One who sees the manner but does not reach its essence loses his feeling to pay respect and expresses surprise and disdain. 
Is this the principle that sages establish teachings on the basis of actualities, and that the ceremonial caps were not suitable for the Yue region [where the people cut their hair and tattooed their bodies, and therefore they had no use for a cap]? 
Some come from remediation and indicate that there is something from which one is rescued. 
This is just as when one suddenly falls ill and takes medication as an emergency measure, but not intended to be used for a long time. 
the form and the teaching ﬁt each other and the actualities and principles are systematic. 
have already set up the system of the three robes and perform worship. 
They discipline themselves with the Dharma drum and line up in accordance with their rank. 
When they squat with raised heels in such an environment, how could this be seen as the systematic and rudeness going against each other? 
At most it is just a one-day-only engagement; it cannot be an instruction for a long time. 
Reason is understandable. 
Therefore, many people ask about perfect virtue, which is the foundation to return to propriety.287 Today meditate and reform their minds but they adhere to this custom and never depart from it. 
I, Zheng Jun, bow with my head to the ground. 
Letter Given to Minister of Education and Cultural Affairs Wang and All Others in Order to Discuss Buddhist Monks’ Manner of Eating While Squatting with Raised Heels by Fan Bolun 77c I, Fan Tai , respectfully address the high-ranking ofﬁcials and many wise people. 
Śramaṇas of today have two different sitting styles, .288 It seems that this was not so at Qiyuan Temple in the past. 
Even today foreign languages differ from our language and by which we adapt or reject something differs from theirs, too. 
Sages establish laws complying with secular customs and propagate teachings according to each region. 
We have not yet changed our language. 
Why is it necessary to take the trouble to make our system the same as theirs? 
At the present time, however, each person believes in biased views and thinks that he himself is correct and others are wrong. 
There is no master to control this. 
Consequently, the situation has led to the present state. 
He does not seek the reality of the ﬁsh and the rabbit and vies with others in attacking the insigniﬁcance of stakes and snares . 
The king of the tree, attained right, perfect enlightenment in the sixth year . 
All those in the audience sat with crossed legs; they did not adopt the informal style of squatting with raised heels. 
Meditation aims at stabilizing and its meaning is not to squat with raised heels and wait for someone to come. 
The good point of eating while squatting with raised heels lies in eating not in order to be sated. 
This is entirely the easy, informal method of one country and not the common system of the world. 
In addition, there is no decorum for wearing clothes made of hemp rags in cold rural areas, and there is no rule wearing a felt garment in sunny southern regions. 
Based on this, considering the early time when Great King Yu took off his clothes [to enter the country of the naked people], we cannot say that they had no ceremonial caps. 
I beg each of you to give up altogether and entrust the issue to gentlemen who have compromised their views. 
Harmony is valued in propriety.289 The rules for Buddhist monks esteem equality. 
Presently we ascend to the refectory and face the sacred images, as if spirits exist in them. 
As for the eight sages of the four stages of sainthood , we have no different statement in principle. 
When Eminent Shi resided in Xiangyang the easy, informal squatting style had already been introduced , but he did not think to change . 
He must have had his intention for this. 
Recently, in Meditation Master grand assembly at the seminary, adopted the formal sitting posture. 
Isn’t this because major points are kept and minor points are omitted, and it is not necessary in reason that be practiced concurrently? 
The formal sitting posture is taken regardless of time but the easy, informal squatting posture is done at ﬁxed times. 
If one adopts the formal sitting posture it is difﬁcult to continually adjust to a different way, but it is easy to keep the same way when one experiences an unsual event. 
Moreover, regarding the issue that a host humbles himself and pays respects to his guest, there is a reason for this. 
I have inquired of Eminent yi about this but I have not yet been rewarded with any answer from him at all. 
Therefore I respectfully address you, the people who agree with my opinion, and seek a common opinion. 
I pray that you will kindly give me a surplus of coughs and sneezes to cover my weak and cowardly mind. 
183 Shi Huiyi’s Letter in Response to Fan Bolun Fifty , including Shi Huiyi of Qiyuan Temple, respectfully address all our donors. 
In the conventional way of śramaṇas we should precisely abide by the sutras and Vinaya texts sincerely, and consider faith and obedience [to the Buddhist teaching] as the foundation. 
If a śramaṇa intends to act contrary to sutras and violate Vinaya and considers his own mind as his teacher and that he himself is right, such a case is serious trouble for the great Dharma and the worst in deﬁling the Way. 
In the precepts established by the Tathāgata there are approved and prohibited. 
a precept prevents śramaṇas from touching females with their hands and bodies and from being close to them. 
when all those who observe the precepts met with an accident in which their own mothers were cast adrift and about to drown in deep waters, even if they could see no one ventured to rescue them . 
Thereupon people of the world said, “Śramaṇas have no mercy. 
In such a situation, where is the Way?” So the Tathāgata, the ridicule and suspicion of people of the world, initiated a precept to counterbalance this, which allowed to rescue from difﬁculties . 
The precepts established by the Tathāgata are in a uniform system and we should positively follow them with faith and carry them out. 
Even scholars of shallow learning esteem to follow faithfully the expression “the ﬁfth, summer ” , and they dare not add the Chinese character “month” to it.291 This is intended to seriously prevent people from offering far-fetched explanations and to eradicate those who are fond of new things and pleased with peculiar things. 
Moreover, the precepts were instituted by the one who possesses the three transcendental knowledges . 
How could we venture to recklessly adjust them ? 
Even if you wish for the beauty of harmony, if you do not use the Way to create harmony, this means to exactly seek unity, not harmony. 
Since there is no testimony in sutras and Vinaya texts , it is no trivial matter if you suddenly intend to change the Buddhist Dharma. 
Truly we dare not agree with you. 
It has been a long time since the time this temple received the Mahāsāṃghika-vinaya . 
Furthermore in this Vinaya there are clear descriptions altogether in eight items that stipulate the method of eating while in the easy, informal style. 
If there was originally no establishment of eating while squatting in the easy, informal style, then the full set of two hundred ﬁfty would not exist. 
The descriptions include “Food cannot be placed on a bed [that is also used as a meditation seat],” and “Food you wish to discard should be placed beside your right foot.” It also says “You cannot squat with your knees apart and put one calf over the other.” Aren’t these clear testimonies for eating while squatting in the easy, informal style? 
Buddhist precepts and the Vinaya are śramaṇas. 
No one except the king can participate in hearing them. 
Today you, our donors, all have doubts about the two sitting styles, the formal and the informal, and you wish to make ﬂourish and reject . 
I have brieﬂy given several articles in order to show their basis. 
I will accept the burden of the sin of announcing our precepts publicly. 
When the Buddhist Dharma ﬂourishes we mutually attain the great achievement of protecting the Dharma, but when it declines we all certainly incur the sin of the destruction of the Dharma. 
I pray that you will think of this thrice and not cause yourselves to have regret in the other world as well as in this world. 
185 Response to Eminent yi I reply to you. 
My previous discussion already included all the statements I will make here. 
Precepts are for the prevention of evils. 
Thus I, an ignorant person, am confused about this. The precepts alter rules in accordance with customs. 
We follow the rules against collecting the remains and crossing one’s legs. 
Therefore, can be omitted. 
As for the precept regarding eating with the hands, there is no written instruction for the use of a spoon and chopsticks. 
Why do you value the precept for the easy, informal sitting style and slight the precept for eating with the hands? 
According to the precepts cannot bring their hands close to females, yet subsequently it is allowable for to rescue their mothers from drowning . 
This is a case that causes ordinary people to have doubt. 
As a matter of fact, this was sufﬁcient cause to revise the precepts established by the Sage. 
Increasingly we know that the two hundred and ﬁfty are not spontaneous, permanent laws. 
If this is the case, ﬁrmly observing does not mean to completely attain all and it is unworthy to be very surprised if one takes his own mind as his teacher. 
It is not doubtful for us to adhere to the rule for the omission in the phrase “the ﬁfth, summer.” If clear and prudent views are understandable, how can you be unsettled in minding other people’s opinions? 
As for the signiﬁcance of squatting with raised heels, the intention lies in this posture being suitable to move forward, but if one wants to act quickly things cannot be carried out well. 
When one formally sits up straight, he is uneasy in that posture. 
My party is me alone, without companions. 
Why do I venture to deal with the great lines of ﬁfty ? 
Here I will employ the strategy of “being afraid of an enemy and keeping silence.” I hope this is the best relief. 
Fan Bolun’s Letter Given to the Two Dharma Teachers sheng and guan Foreign customs naturally differ from ours. 
When Saṃghadeva ﬁrst came , monks such as yi and guan all received his favor and admired him with praise. 
thought that this teaching was the ultimate doctrine and said that all Mahayana scriptures of nonarising were the writings of demons. 
The last time Saṃghadeva expounded Buddhist scriptures he did not ascend to a raised seat. 
Faxian later returned to and the Nirvana Sutra was chanted for the ﬁrst time. 
then thought that consists of words of eternality and the best of various doctrines, and that the ultimate fundamentals of the transcendental wisdom entirely derive from this. 
Inferring from this, have no subjectivity within themselves and when they hear they always change . 
If we compare this to shooting , the shooter who shot last was defeated and divests the shooter who shot ﬁrst of the point. 
So we see that foreign precepts are not ﬁxed laws. 
the school that adopts the informal sitting style have no time to sit in the formal style. 
When they expound the Dharma on a raised seat they sit in the style of squatting with raised heels. 
The hands are mostly used in the foreign manner of eating. 
Huiyi’s group of monks is aware of this but they have never converted . 
Regarding the informal sitting style, they have practiced this style for a long time and feel no shame in being in conformity with it. 
They contradict themselves. 
Who can understand this ? I, your disciple, always think that making a mistake along with others is wiser than being proud of my own . 
To infer my mind and be delighted 187 with aligning myself with others is not to venture to allow myself to seek straightness. 
Today’s laypeople who revere the Dharma should never wear foreign clothes. Why do śramaṇas seem to have a hard time in keeping the rule of the informal sitting style? 
Your Majesty acquires mastery of the Buddhist doctrines and you are about to attain its highest perfection. 
With your lofty aspiration you anticipate what is far-reaching. 
I have had faith in the great Dharma since the time I was young. 
I have accumulated the practices for wholesome nature. 
I often hear additional discussions and somewhat understand the profound foundation of the teaching. 
I formerly attended near the Imperial Throne and received unmerited favor and guidance from you. 
So I could not help you understand issues that I tried to convey. 
My regret for this will not come to an end in my lifetime. 
I recently criticized Huiyi’s assertion of eating while squatting with raised heels. 
I strained my ears in a lower seat and heard that [my criticism about eating while squatting with raised heels] had already reached your ears. 
I ask you to understand that this matter is a local manner of one country, and not a universal, eternal system. 
Foreign customs are not the same as ours and languages differ from ours as well. 
Sages do not change their language. 
Why must only trouble themselves to change their actions? 
Language is a means to express one’s thoughts. When a thought has been conveyed the language is forgotten. 
Deportment is a means to keep respect. Once respect has been established, the form [of one’s deportment] is discontinued. 
Therefore, sages establish the precepts in light of actualities and change laws in accordance with customs. 
When one reaches the Way it can be all right if he follows no regulation. 
Isn’t it despicable [to stick to a ﬁxed idea, just like] gluing the bridges , or waiting by a stump [hoping that other hares will come by that spot because a hare was once caught there]? 
Śramaṇas of today guide people skillfully but they do not have a vital point to their way. 
I personally feel ashamed of this; how much more so do your other subjects who are more talented than I am? 
The celebrated people of the present day do not have much sincere faith in the Way. They have decided nothing beforehand in their intentions. 
If we set up the system according to this, would the Yellow River become clear? 
Huiyan and Daosheng originally did not squat with raised heels. 
Huiguan appears to regret his initial standpoint . 
At present I do not hope that you will issue an Imperial decree alone. 
However, if you give the gist of the Imperial decree to a prime minister, the people below him will see this and be educated. 
Who can say that he will not consent to this? 
The august virtue of Your Majesty is about to reach remote areas. 
Writing systems and the width of cart axles will be standardized. 
If we do not cut the fresh green plants now, we will have to look for an ax later. 
Therefore it is proper to cause no one, from the people close to you to those who are far from you, to think of disobeying you. 
79a When was restored in the Jiangzuo area (i.e., Jiangsu province), a raised seat, came . 
He did not say anything about this system (i.e., eating while squatting with raised heels). 
Eminent Shi had the most sincere faith in Buddhism; he did not suffer from the restriction . 
It seems that he had a reason for this. 
When Meditation Master came to for the ﬁrst time, he visited the imperial palace and asked for an audience with the emperor. 
This was unacceptable in principle. 
Consequently, he was not permitted to visit . 
Later, when monks gathered at Dong’an Temple they surely did not eat while sitting in the informal style. 
These are past events of former dynasties that I personally observed. 
I, your subject, speak. 
Your Majesty, you recently made an Imperial visit to Qiyuan Temple, where I insistently begged you for a eulogy to be inscribed on a monument. 
I recall that it seemed to me that you had approved this. 
So soon after the Imperial carriage returned , paying reverence to you I precisely engraved the three Chinese characters huang, di, and zan (i.e., the emperor’s eulogy) on the monument. 
I will submissively accept a demerit for my arbitrary action. 
As for registering merit in the other world, I do not know how to cultivate for salvation. 
If you bestow on me your writing of several Chinese characters, I will die but my body will suffer no decay. 
With , social mores will be greatly encouraged. There will be beneﬁts and no loss. 
If you do not have time to do this because of your heavy workload, please let your intention be known to your subjects who can assist you with this. 
How could your vassal, the Left Scribe or the Imperial Guard, not have the utmost sincerity to render service? 
I left the service a long time ago and my days are drawing to a close. 
I receive deep and signiﬁcant favor from you, as well as a generous salary. 
I bow with my head to the ground, and with sincerity [equal to that of the spirit of the person who] tied grass [in order to help Wei Ke in repayment of his kindness],293 I pray that Your Majesty will take pity on me and will not blame me for my statement. 
I know that you have debated with Huiyi regarding the manner of eating while squatting with raised heels. 
Recently I further heard a rough outline of your opinion, which does not differ from the purpose of your report. 
I, however, have not read Buddhist scriptures. There is simply no way to manage this issue with my views. 
I have no idea what Huiyan thinks. 
Huiguan appears unwilling to repent of his original standpoint . 
Can you yourself seek a point of agreement with all Buddhist monks these days? 
As for the eulogy for the monument at Qiyuan Temple, I do not recall giving you permission. 
Since is not something I have learned and, in addition I have no time to do so, I am unable to grant your request. 
I am terribly sorry about this. 
I, your subject, speak. 
In the Imperial decree of today you order me to further seek a point of agreement 79b . 
Here, following my wild impulse, I will explicate a longcherished thought. 
I think that wherever principles exist it is fortunately possible to not harm an intention by a composition. 
None of the Five Thearchs followed the ceremonies of his predecessor, and none of the Three Kings adopted the music of his predecessor.294 In reforming the world with the mandate of Heaven and following the current of the times, the signiﬁcance is completely great. 
Zhuangzi compared ancient times and the present time to a boat and a carriage.295 Mencius thought that it would be better to be without books than to believe in them exclusively.296 Therefore, testiﬁed a sheep is not upright.297 I have heard that employing these two ways causes the Great Way to be pursued and the whole world to become one family. 
Moreover, is a foreign custom and a local system; it is originally not a reasonable teaching. 
yi, sheng, and guan attained favor and broadly make contact with the Imperial will. 
If they have questions to ask me, I hope that I will respond to them through relying on principles. 
The answers Huiguan gave me all lack a reasonable basis. 
He only praised me excessively and disparaged me as having a thousand faults. 
Inferring from this, I doubt if he is truly remorseful. He has not yet returned to wholesomeness and expressed words of submission. 
Your vassal, Hong, also says that my assertion is correct. 
The lines of Huiyi’s great troops have already collapsed and the paths to ﬂee in retreat and hide are closed. 
He relies on this to rescue them but it is difﬁcult for him to escape from there. 
Moreover, the virtuous person who is in charge of the tallies is above them.298 Even if he explains everything away, he will know that he has gotten into a scrape. 
I recently criticized Huiguan. 
Though I have tried to be intelligent I have reached an extremely old age . 
Not only are my words unsuitable but I fear deeply that I am not aware of my own confusion. 
The Imperial Guard retainers are really in high repute of the day, but they will not be able to sympathize with my inclination and admonish my incompetent points, either. 
These are all my faults that I invited onto myself. 
I personally rely on my old age which, as the classic states, is not subject to punishment.299 Report to the Throne Regarding the Issue that Śramaṇas Should Not Bow [to the King] by Director of the Imperial Secretariat He Chong In the sixth year of Xiankang of the Jin dynasty , Emperor Cheng was still young and Yu Bing assisted him in political affairs. 
[Yu Bing] said that śramaṇas should bow to the king. Ofﬁcials such as Director of the Imperial Secretariat He Chong said that śramaṇas do not have to do so, and ordered the ofﬁcials of the Chamberlain for Ceremonials to debate at length. 
ofﬁcials such as Director of the Imperial Secretariat He Chong, Chief Administrators Chu She and Zhuge Hui,300 and Feng Huai and Xie Guang of the Imperial Secretary made a report that śramaṇas do not have to bow . 
We, Chong , Director of the Imperial Secretariat, Army Commander, General of the Paciﬁcation Army, and Chief Township Marquis; She, Cavalier Attendant-in-Ordinary, Left Supervisor, and Count of Changping; Hui, Cavalier Attendant-in-Ordinary, Right Supervisor, and Count of Jian’an; Huai, Imperial Secretary and Marquis of Guanzhong; and Guang, Probationary, Imperial Secretary, and Viscount of Chang’an, speak. 
Shizu, Emperor Wu, reformed the world with the mandate of Heaven [and established the Jin dynasty] with his abundant intelligence. 
Wouldn’t it have been easy for the śramaṇas of their days to kneel ? 
however, regarded the permanence of the way of doing good acts (i.e., not bowing to the king) to be a reason to facilitate the determination of the world. 
We humbly think that you should follow the historical example of these preceding emperors, which is excellent in reason. 
The Imperial Decree on Behalf of Emperor Cheng of the Jin Dynasty Composed by Yu Bing, Who Admonishes the Purport Again and Thinks that Śramaṇas Should Bow to the King 79c All nations have different customs and the Way of the Spirit is difﬁcult to discern. 
If we take a philosophic view of the object and closely understand it, there is really nothing strange, not to mention the saluting in the kneeling-to-worship style. 
We should trace back to the original intention with which the preceding emperors esteemed it. 
Were they simply fond of this style of bending one’s body and from their seats meeting people circumambulating them ? 
Certainly this was not the case. 
Based on the respect between father and son, the order between the king and his vassals was established, laws and institutions were set up, and considerate treatment was honored. 
Moreover, does the Buddha exist, or not, as a matter of fact? 
If the Buddha exists, his Way is assuredly magnanimous. 
If there is no Buddha, what signiﬁcance can we obtain ? 
, however, deform their physical appearance, avoid ordinary duties, change the statutes of ceremonies, and reject the teaching on morality and ethics . 
This is something by which I am surprised. 
It is not discontinued no matter how many generations pass. 
[The inscription on the tripod of Chan says,] “You may get up early in the morning and become greatly distinguished, but in future generations will still become idle.”301 Regarding the bad aspect that will become idle, it is difﬁcult to discern the cause. 
If today we adore something that is far away and uncertain, rely on something faint and undistinguished, reject our proprieties suddenly, and discontinue the teachings of the present age, we will cause ordinary people to haughtily go against the constitution. 
This is also something by which I am surprised. 
Rules, laws, and magniﬁcent models should assuredly not be discontinued in the Imperial court. 
All these kinds of people (i.e., Buddhist monks) are the nation of the Jin dynasty. 
Speaking of their intelligence, they are only ordinary people, too. 
Nevertheless, because what they assert is difﬁcult to argue against, they avail themselves of outrageous costumes and accessories, set up haughty decorum based on strange customs, and do not bow down even before the emperor who commands ten thousand chariots. 
This is again something I cannot accept. 
You, gentlemen, are all people of talent of our country. 
When you hear reasonable words you will survey what is obscure. 
When you speak of governing the nation you must honor national laws. 
Second Report to the Throne by Director of the Imperial Secretariat He Chong and Officials such as Chu She, Zhuge Hui, Feng Huai, and Xie Guang We, Chong, Director of the Imperial Secretariat, Army Commander, General of the Paciﬁcation Army, and Chief Township Marquis; She, Cavalier Attendant-in-Ordinary, Left Supervisor, and Count of Changping; Hui, Cavalier Attendant-in-Ordinary, Right Supervisor, and Count of Jian’an; Huai, Imperial Secretary and Marquis of Guanzhong; and 80a Guang, Probationary, Imperial Secretary, and Viscount of Chang’an, speak. 
The Imperial decree is just as found above. 
We do not deserve to glorify the Imperial will and to propagate the great righteousness. 
Together we all promptly inquired into the details. The issue of whether or not the Buddha exists is assuredly not something we can determine. 
Nevertheless, when we look into the scriptures that have been left to us and intensively study their essential points, the prescription of the ﬁve precepts truly helps the king’s ediﬁcation for the people. 
despise actions that are taken obviously to seek fame, and they value the imperceptible secret ﬁdelity. 
To practice virtue lies in forgetting oneself. 
To stick to one principle is the purity and wondrousness of the mind. 
Moreover, from the time of the Han dynasty introduced up to the present day, even though the Dharma has risen and fallen there has not been any harm of weirdness and absurdity. 
The Way of the Spirit (i.e., Buddhism) has prevailed for a long time. There is no other case like this. 
One who curses has loss, and one who prays must gain beneﬁt. 
From the bottom of our hearts we truly wish that [Buddhist monks’ prayers, which are] as insigniﬁcant as dust and dew, will increase benefaction, which is as lofty as Mount Song and Mount Tai, and that their unimportant prayers will enable to manage the most important rules to govern the world. 
if you even once order to bow to you, you will consequently destroy the Dharma and cause the custom of cultivating wholesomeness to be discontinued in your holy world. 
We are concerned about these things and our minds quietly grow uneasy. 
Even though we are ignorant, how could we dare confuse and misguide Your Majesty’s ears with our biased views? 
We simply think that has prevailed through the three dynasties and that intelligent and enlightened rulers have appeared one after another. 
Presently, even if we do not create a new law [mandating that śramaṇas must bow to the king], there will be no shortage of the king’s law, and it is possible that there would be no hindrance of the rules of the other world. 
For these reasons, we again express our sincerity. 
Humbly yours. 
Emperor Cheng’s Second Imperial Decree I examined the report in which you fully explained your situation and intention. 
The issue of the other world truly cannot be completely explained with allegories. 
The general idea is, however, simply that conventional rules between human beings and spirits are overstated and classiﬁed examples are brieﬂy added to them. 
Moreover, the minor good conduct outlined in the ﬁve precepts was roughly drawn up and modeled after the principles of human relationships [of Confucianism]. 
Nevertheless, do omit decorum and homage for the ruler of the times? 
Decorum is important and paying homage is signiﬁcant. 
The general rules of government administration reach an extreme at this point. 
The emperor who commands ten thousand chariots is superior not from choice, and the people of his territory are his inferiors not by preference. 
Nevertheless, even if the difference between superiors and inferiors is not arranged, the king’s teaching must be uniﬁed. 
This is why the sage kings of former times established constitutions, and those who assume the responsibility of governing the country should not be misled. 
People of all-around talent extensively collect and they often study the principles . 
They may cultivate themselves [in Buddhism] in private but not on the level of the nation and the Imperial court. 
Wouldn’t this mean to stay away from ? 
Sure enough, you have not been able to determine whether or not exists. 
Third Report to the Throne Regarding the Issue that Should Not Bow [to the King] by Officials such as Director of the Imperial Secretariat He Chong and Supervisor Chu She 80b Even though we are quite ignorant and do not thoroughly understand your profound intention, regarding the thought to follow assiduously, day and night, your virtue and magnanimity, how could we hold fast to narrow biased views and throw important relations into disorder? 
Simply, from the time of the Han and Wei dynasties up to the time of the Jin dynasty, we have not heard that there were objections and there was no case in which the statutes of superior and inferior were damaged even for a short time. 
Today śramaṇas are earnestly prudent in observing the precepts and they exercise decorum. 
Regarding those who seriously observe the precepts, they do not spare even their own lives. 
How could they then dare neglect decorum and homage in order to be particular about their bodies? Every time we see burn incense and pray, they assuredly ﬁrst offer prayers for the country and wish for the prosperity with divine help. 
Their feelings are boundless. 
“The meshes of the heavenly net are large, far apart, yet they let nothing escape.”302 We consider with reverence that even if we do not have bow , no damage is done to the laws of the land. 
If we favor people according to what beneﬁts them, and if we cause none among the wise and the ignorant to dare not exert his mind, then what we have above will be an extensive government, just as “Heaven overspreads all and Earth supports all,”303 and what we have below will be people who preserve one principle and cultivate wholesomeness. 
We have sincerely restated our fatuous and shallow . 
We pray that you will graciously examine . 
At this time, Yu Bing’s opinion came to an end and must bow was not applied after all. 
Letter Given to the Eight Executives to Discuss Buddhist Monks’ Bowing by Huan Xuan I, Xuan, bow twice and speak. 
I bow with my head to the ground. The eighth day of the month is approaching. Formerly śramaṇas did not bow to kings at all. 
Even though He and Yu have already debated this matter and both presented their opinions, neither of them submitted to the other logically. 
Yu intention lies in respecting the ruler, but he has not completely established the basis of his reason. 
Because of his strong inclination toward faith , He consequently lost the essence of his name.304 Even though the Buddha’s ediﬁcation is endlessly vast and infers the world beyond the visual and aural senses, respect is considered to be its foundation. 
I assume that what they aspire for may differ but this does not mean that respect should be abolished. 
In the Laozi , princes are considered equal to the three great elements: 
how could they be referred to as equal to the two polarities, , only for the reason that sages occupy the throne? 
[As the Book of Changes says,] “The great virtue of Heaven and Earth is called life.” to make life all over the country and arrange all things lies in sovereigns. 
Therefore, we respect the throne and we are gloriously courteous to it. 
The reason śramaṇas are born in succession and live with support is also that they are every day under government ordinances . 
How could it be that enjoy the virtue and abandon courtesy , or beneﬁt from kindness but reject paying respect to them?305 Inasmuch as this is not allowed in reason, neither is it tolerable in sentiment. 
For such a serious matter to our generation, we must together seek an appropriate idea. 
Moreover, we should thoroughly study this in a body. 
You should have a complete conclusion by this coming eighth day of the month. 
I, Huan Xuan, bow twice, and bow down with my head to the ground. 
The Eight Executives’ Response 80c We, Huan Qian, General of the Capital Army, Director of the Imperial Secretariat, and Dynasty-founding Marquis of Yiyang, and others, fearing the death penalty, respectfully received your instruction to require śramaṇas to bow to the king. 
Nevertheless, the Buddhist Dharma and the teaching of Laozi and Confucius are separate from each other in tenor and entirely go against each other in terms of ethical education. 
people consider their hair and skin to be valuable, while do not question shaving off their hair. 
renounce the world, abandon their parents, and do not think that being respectfully attentive to their parents is ﬁlial piety. 
They view their bodies a clod of dirt or a piece of wood; they cut off desires and stop competing. 
They do not expect anything in this existence and seek for bliss beyond myriads of kalpas. 
They keep away from all the things that are considered honorable in the secular world, and in their intention they completely cut off what is valued in ethical education. 
“The service due to a father is employed in serving a ruler.”306 the relationship with one’s blood relatives is considered to be the most important . 
How would it be possible that they would bow to the emperor who commands ten thousand chariots? 
Through the three dynasties we have allowed to take its own course. This is because spirits have no set rules, and so they also did not control . 
Furthermore, the fact that the king deferentially follows the Dharma is due to his own respect . It is incomprehensible that he would believe in Buddhist doctrines yet want to change deportment. 
Zhang Chang of Confucius’ kingdom is over there; I think you have already inquired of his face-to-face what they have in mind.308 All Buddhist monks, including Daobao, deserve to requite your lofty purpose. 
We do not know Buddhist doctrines. 
We are ashamed that our statement is unworthy for you to read. 
We, Qian and others, are afraid of being sentenced with the death penalty. 
Letter Given to Secretariat Director Wang to Discuss the Issue that Buddhist Monks Should Bow to the King by Huan Xuan Śramaṇas reject bowing to the Most August. 
I feel that this is an awkward situation and a matter of grave concern of our generation. 
We should discuss this fully together. 
Today I give this letter to you. 
You are the one who is capable of managing this matter. 
Letter in Response to Huan by Secretariat Director Wang 81a Wang Mi, General of the Palace Guard, Minister of the Ministry of Personnel, Secretariat Director, and Baron of Wugang, fearing the death penalty, respectfully received your instruction, which refers to the fact that Buddhist monks reject bowing to the Most August. 
I read your letter, which was given to the Eight Executives at the same time. 
Recently I brieﬂy heard the impartial way but I have not yet completely investigated the issue. 
I examined the two purposes of He and Yu . 
I also regret that they have not fully . 
I think that these two debate has faltered in biased views. 
The Buddhist Dharma arose in and came from India. 
Its foundation is deep and it is difﬁcult to express in words. 
Although what the people are content with varies in each place, as far as the principles by which their ruler reigns over the people are concerned, it is hardly possible that nothing is the same. 
Today, even though śramaṇas are deeply respectful in their minds, they do not consider bending their bodies to be a courtesy. 
are those whose footprints ﬁll this land and yet whose interest goes beyond the boundaries of this world. 
Therefore, every king of a foreign country humbly shows courtesy to them. 
I think that it has been really a long time since the great Dharma began to be circulated . 
It has been more than four hundred years and three dynasties have elapsed. 
Even though our customs have changed and government has shifted, there is no change in the fact that is propagated. 
Wouldn’t this be because the teaching of splendid isolation is beneﬁcial for edifying the people little by little in daily life, and the clean and simple style does no harm to worldly prosperity and peace? 
Therefore kings behave themselves prudently and do not feel sad about having fewer households . 
Śramaṇas protect the truth and make no question of going against worldly affairs. 
I heard that you said, “ to make life all over the country and arrange all things lies in sovereigns.” When I examine what it is to which all principles return, it is really just as you have argued. 
I read your virtuous letter three times and still cannot stop rereading it. 
Even though I wish to respectfully reply to you, I have no words. 
I still think that one whose achievement is lofty is not rewarded, and one whose benevolence is deep is not given grateful acknowledgement. 
Even if were to bow to , would this be enough for them to respond to the kindness with which he aids and leads them? 
I pray that you will not reject my words merely because they are from me. 
Criticism by Huan You wrote in your letter, “Even though śramaṇas are deeply respectful [to the king] in their minds, they do not consider bending their bodies [to bow down] to be a courtesy.” I criticize this, saying, “Regarding śramaṇas’ reverence, how could they all neglect it in their outward form and keep it only in their minds? 
When they repent and worship, they do so in a serious . 
śāstṛ) up to a senior priest who supervises the ceremonies and services of a temple—all . 
Since they cannot forget the form over there, why then do they disregard the style of deportment here? 
“Moreover, , regarding the reason to become a teacher, they consider awakening through helping others to be virtuous. 
The way of the ruler is to make life possible throughout the country. 
How could the meaning of the three most revered people not be the very pinnacle of reason and feeling?” You wrote in your letter, “ every king of a foreign country humbly shows courtesy to . 
This is really to value that the Way exists, not merely to weigh the importance on account of a individual.” I criticize this, saying, “It is not appropriate to compare to those of foreign countries. 
In Buddhism originated we can see its tenor. 
Isn't it the case that since the six barbarian tribes are disobedient and strong and cannot be educated by normal teachings, therefore, by the great establishment of a mysterious and strange aroused awe and they then submitted ? 
This is probably based on the fact that were basically fearful of the reward and retribution of spiritual beings. 
How can this be said to be reverence for the profound and wondrous Way? 
How could it be possible that if one merely puts on a Dharma robe the Way exists within him? 
If the Way ﬁrst exists and only later is deemed valuable, as you said, the way of sages would therefore be the culmination of the Way. 
In the homage paid to a ruler by his subjects courtesy would be deeper. 
In such a situation, how could it be possible that the reason śramaṇas do not bow is because ‘the Way exists’ is considered to be valuable?” You wrote in your letter, “[Since the great Dharma began to be circulated in China] it has been four hundred years and three dynasties have elapsed. 
Wouldn’t this be because the teaching of splendid isolation is beneﬁcial for edifying the people little by little in daily life, and the clean and simple style does no harm to worldly prosperity and peace?” I criticize this, saying, “The fact that has not changed over the duration of cannot be considered as a testimony. 
Formerly there was almost no one among the Chinese who believed in the Buddha. 
All śramaṇas and their followers were various kinds of foreigners. 
Moreover, the kings did not make contact with [foreign śramaṇas and their followers]. 
Presently His Majesty believes in the Buddha and is on intimate terms with in Buddhist services. 
The situation is different from that of former times. 
‘ in daily life’ and ‘the clean and simple ’ is helpful in teaching the people’—this is entirely as you have said, but this is likely the achievement of the Buddhist Dharma, not a beneﬁt brought about by śramaṇas’ boasting. 
If we are sincerely respectful to now there will be nothing more to strengthen their help .” You wrote in your letter, “One whose achievement is lofty is not rewarded, and one whose benevolence is deep is not given grateful acknowledgement. 
Even if were to bow to , would this be enough for them to respond to the kindness with which he aids and leads them?” I criticize this, saying, “The utmost degree of reason is not recompensed. 
Nevertheless, in our sentiments, when is boundless our respect for him naturally follows. 
This is why sages establish courtesy according to human feelings and lead each person to that to which he entrusts himself. 
If gratitude is always to be omitted when the achievement is deep and there is great benevolence, is Śākyamuni’s virtue deep or shallow? 
If it is shallow, we should not throw important relations into disorder his minor ways. 
If it is deep, how could it be possible that seriously pay respect among themselves yet reject bowing ?” Second Response by Lord You criticized, “Regarding śramaṇas’ reverence, how could they all neglect it in their outward form and keep it only in their minds? 
When they repent and worship they do so in a serious .” 81c I reply, “The way of śramaṇas originally takes reverence to be primary. 
Since are simply different from us on the path to ferry , they do not bow according to what is right. 
The reason śramaṇas admire and respect their teachers and senior monks is truly because when they share the same goal younger monks give precedence to elders, and in their relationships with who support and lead them to [the goal] their actions comply with their minds. 
Originally, although the Buddhist Dharma is vast it does not abandon minor wholesome conduct. 
Reward complies with even small merit. 
‘Many a little makes a mountain.’ The meaning of this is apparent here.” You criticized, “The way of the ruler is to make life possible throughout the country. 
How could the meaning of the three most revered people not be the very pinnacle of reason and feeling?” I reply, “The way of the ruler is to make life possible throughout the country; that is to say, it is the same, in reason, as the Creator. 
Nevertheless, it has never been the case that those who receive its blessings are thankful to for them. No one has felt obligated to the foundation of reason . 
The principle of moving [Heaven and Earth] smoothly is wondrous. 
How can we requite it through our poor conduct? 
In Buddhism originated we can see its tenor. 
Isn't it the case that since the six barbarian tribes are disobedient and strong and cannot be educated by normal teachings, therefore, by the great establishment of a mysterious and strange aroused awe and they then submitted ?” I reply, “ established their instructions in accordance with the Way of the Spirit,310 which is really difﬁcult to discern in language. 
I think that shows reward and retribution by the great establishment of the mysterious and strange . 
This is the fundamental essence of Buddhism. 
If we think now that the three periods of existence is false and absurd and weal and woe [as the result of good and bad conduct] is a threat, then what Śākyamuni clariﬁed has nearly no standpoint. 
“I usually think that the ediﬁcation of the Duke of Zhou and Confucius is to rescue from a very harmful situation. 
Consequently, spoken by them are limited to a lifetime and do not explain the path for myriads of kalpas. 
Nevertheless, when we deeply inquire about their purport we can also often ﬁnd [teachings similar to those of Buddhism]. 
Compassion and mercy are certainly observed in the destruction of life according to the four seasons. 
Furthermore, admonished and stopped Zhong You from asking [about death and spirits].311 It also appears that he had a profound purpose . 
The style of the teaching , however, differs from . 
Therefore these points are usually obscure. 
I calmly looked into this issue. 
It is mostly so. 
It is nearly so.” You criticized, “In the homage paid to a ruler by his subjects courtesy would be deeper. 
In such a situation how could it be possible that the reason śramaṇas do not bow is because ‘the Way exists’ is considered to be valuable?” I reply, “I reexamined your lofty discussion. 
You think that the way of the ruler moves smoothly and is the same as the three great elements in reason. 
I think that as far as the way of the ruler and his people is concerned, I personally agree with your lofty purport. 
Regarding the homage paid to a ruler by his subjects, the principle 82a is limited to the teaching on morality and ethics . 
Today śramaṇas are not the subjects of princes and nobles. 
Therefore bow to them is abolished.” You criticized, “The fact that has not changed over the duration of cannot be considered as a testimony. 
Formerly there was almost no one among the Chinese who believed in the Buddha. 
All śramaṇas and their followers were various kinds of foreigners. 
Moreover, the kings did not make contact with . 
I did not mean that there is never a reason to change anything that has been accomplished. 
Foreigners did not make contact with kings. 
This is again just as your lofty discussion. 
The reason the issue was not discussed in former ages probably lies in this fact.” You criticized, “This is likely the achievement of the Buddhist Dharma, not a beneﬁt brought about by śramaṇas’ boasting. 
If we are sincerely respectful to now, there will be nothing more to strengthen their help .” I reply, “I respectfully examined the discussion in your letter. 
It does not bring a false charge against Buddhist doctrines. 
This is truly as you admonished; really, just as you admonished. 
I think that the way of śramaṇas can be said to be peculiar but it is not such boasting. 
“Presently, in these latter days, a thousand years [after Śākyamuni passed away], simple and sincere customs and traditions have declined and those who dishonestly wear robe have become numerous. 
How could I not feel ashamed of them? 
“I simply think to control myself and keep silent now. I should put aside speaking about other human beings and speak only of the Way. 
I wrote in my previous response, ‘ not to weigh the importance on account of a individual.’ My humble intention lies in this point.” You criticized, “If gratitude is always to be omitted when the achievement is deep and there is great benevolence, is Śākyamuni’s virtue deep or shallow? 
If it is shallow, we should not throw important relations into disorder his minor ways. 
If it is deep, how could it be possible that seriously pay respect among themselves yet reject bowing ?” I reply, “I think that the Way of Śākyamuni is deep, indeed profound, and those who look up to him respectfully consolidate their respect more and more. 
This is probably because those who reach the Way must rely on the achievement of practice, and nothing is more esteemed than the virtue of the achievement of practice. 
Just like this, accumulating practice is the base cause, the key to one’s next existence. 
Moreover, it is still difﬁcult to restrain achievement of paying respect to his teachers and seniors. 
Furthermore, in drawing the mind toward the ultimate, is it possible to neglect courtesy? 
Therefore, even if one were to bend or lift his head for numerous kalpas, this does not mean that he expresses his gratitude for the blessings .” Second Criticism by Huan I examined your letter. 
How is it allowable for there to be two different principles for feelings and paying respect? 
Everything is simply from the inside and inﬂuences the outside . 
Since we have already entered the realm of beings who possess feelings and consciousness (sentient beings), it is impossible to do without . 
If, just as you said in your letter, “ the ruler . 
It has never been the case that those who receive its blessings are thankful to for them. 
No one has felt obligated to the foundation of reason ,” this means that achievement is profound, his reasoning is deep, and nothing is greater than this. 
How could the Buddha’s ediﬁcation surpass this? 
What is their goal? If studies are considered to be their goal, what scholars learn originally spring simply from the essential qualities of Nature. 
How is it possible that “actions comply with the mind” applies here but does not over there? 
Moreover, you said, “The ediﬁcation of the Duke of Zhou and Confucius is to rescue from a very harmful situation. 
This is different from the teaching that urges people to practice benevolence and righteousness, which is limited to human affairs. 
Therefore, the followers of the Yellow Turbans who aroused people with wild talk all advanced just as clouds do, . 
If this is the truth and is also easily practiced, why do sages reject the practical way that is easily practiced and take up minor things that are difﬁcult to carry out? 
It is also clear that this cannot be so. 
Furthermore, you said, “ the homage paid to a ruler by his subjects, the principle is limited to the teaching on morality and ethics. 
Today śramaṇas are not the subjects of princes and nobles. Therefore bow to them is abolished.” Why is this so? 
Regarding the principle of respect, I have explained it in detail in my previous letter. 
The homage paid to a ruler by his subjects arises entirely spontaneously and is ﬁrm in the foundation of feeling in reason. 
How could this be a matter of the teaching on morality and ethics? 
In my previous discussion I said, “ ‘The great virtue of Heaven and Earth is called life.’ to make life all over the country and arrange all things lies in sovereigns.” If what makes life possible all over the country lies in these , how could it be possible that is not valued by Nature? 
In addition, you said, “Those who reach the Way must rely on the achievement of practice . 
accumulating practice is the base cause, the key to one’s next existence. 
Furthermore, in drawing the mind toward the ultimate, is it possible to neglect courtesy? 
even if one were to bend or lift his head for numerous kalpas, this does not mean that he expresses his gratitude for the blessings .” Please allow me to follow your purpose in your letter, avail myself of it, and offer criticism. 
According to your letter, paying respect is the beginning of practice, and sincerely paying respect is important. 
The achievement of practice must be simply calculated based on the effort one has made toward its achievement. 
How could it be possible that one merely reveres Śākyamuni and then claims that there is nothing more esteemed than this ? 
Gratitude for blessings is beyond expression. 
This is something about which wise people have no doubt. 
In reason, however, is extremely deeply rooted in feeling. It is simply impossible to go about without respect. 
How could subjects’ paying homage to their king be showing gratitude for blessings? 
I accept your lofty purpose. 
The principle of this issue is profound and it is extremely difﬁcult to discuss. 
Furthermore, it is a matter of grave concern for our generation. 
My talent is not outstanding and I particularly lack the ability for close investigation and analysis. 
Moreover, your wondrous criticism is of an 211 extremely advanced level. 
In this case I will again recklessly respond to your admonition in accordance with my shortsighted view. 
I pray that you will inquire of various Buddhist monks and versatile scholars and remove my imperfect points. 
If studies are considered to be their goal, what scholars learn originally springs simply from the essential qualities of Nature. 
Studies are an expedient that we use daily. 
Therefore, we know that achievement of that we are borrowing is not the utmost point. 
One who goes to the utmost point through the accumulation of learning certainly goes up coarse steps and reaches a wondrous stage. 
After the ﬁsh is caught the bamboo ﬁsh trap is abandoned. 
You think that it is easy to edify by means of the mysterious, and difﬁcult the achievement of benevolence and righteousness. 
“why do sages reject the practical way that is easily practiced and take up minor things that are difﬁcult to carry out? 
It is also clear that this cannot be so.” I think that the Buddha’s teaching is absolutely different from that of the Chinese sages. 
Since it is said that they differ from each other, they are not on the same level as a matter of course. 
At present we are discussing Buddhist doctrines. 
Therefore, we must establish our statements on the basis of its foundation. 
Therefore I simply cited them. 
Nevertheless, as far as my ignorant view is concerned, Buddhism is more difﬁcult. 
Why do I say this? 
According to what the Chinese sages have now clariﬁed, it is believed that when one sends forth his words, if they are good, they will receive a response, just as a shadow and an echo ; and if the are evil, they will be opposed by people as far as a thousand li distant.312 In this way, good or bad conduct soon responds , and fortune and misfortune appear before his eyes. 
There are, however, still those who reject right and comply with evil, and those who go against the Way and follow desires. 
Moreover, in Buddhism one’s lifetime is explained as of very brief duration, like the time it takes to snap one’s ﬁngers, and reaching the essential destination is expected to take place after an eternal kalpa. 
It is said that mysterious things have no ﬁxed status. 
Reward and retribution is provided [in the future, even though] no indication of our existence is given. 
Isn’t it also difﬁcult to accept these and believe ? 
Therefore, the benqi jing says, “Words that are strictly true sound paradoxical.”314 This is what is meant. 
You said, “The achievement of practice must be simply calculated based on the effort one has made toward its achievement. 
How could it be possible that one merely reveres Śākyamuni and then claims that there is nothing more esteemed than this ?” Please let me try to say more about this. 
I think that the Buddhist Way is great and vast, and its doctrines are complicated. 
In the case of someone who has no weariness in his mind and is able to effort to do anything, to revere the ultimate is merely one of the achievements of practice. 
I did not mean 213 that worship counts for nothing as a practice. 
Even if something is very insigniﬁcant, it is certainly what is needed for the closing period. 
How could this be a matter of the teaching on morality and ethics?” I respectfully keep your valued discussion in mind and stick to this. 
Therefore, I said in my previous response, “As far as the way of the ruler and his people is concerned, I personally agree with your lofty purport.” My intention lies in this. 
Regarding the homage between a ruler and his subjects, the issue is limited to the decorum of bowing with one’s hands folded in front. 
Therefore I simply took this to be the teaching on morality and ethics (i.e., Confucianism). 
I did not mean that between [ruler and subjects] is limited to this behavior. 
The forms to show respect of that time are never heard . 
The way of the ruler was openly carried out. 
Consequently, the operation in which do not engage with one another was peaceful. 
The way of the subjects was moved and inﬂuenced imperceptibly. 
Inferring from this point, it is almost clear that the forms to show respect have nothing to do with one’s mind. 
Later, when gave rise to love and praise , this decorum developed. 
Can it be denied that was established by a sage of later ages and developed in accord with the need of the times? 
It is particularly striking. 
I thought it could dispel my doubtful points but it still has not come to [that point]. 
Thereupon, we have attacked and criticized each other but we have not come to a conclusion. 
If we now again consider the essentials, clarify the principle of the three most revered people, and argue with regard to the gravity , then the reason why do or do not bow can be understood. 
I think that the achievement of closely investigating something subtle must lie in going through such trouble and making a judgment. 
The eighth day of the month has already come. I have now written to Right Chief Administrator and ordered him to enforce [the custom that śramaṇas must] bow and revere the way of the ruler. 
I caused no one in the world to not bow . 
Even though the Buddhist Way is the most respectable, can it be acceptable for to not have complete good conduct? 
Although this matter has already been put into operation no one should hesitate to discuss this. 
I think that there are some among you who have analyzed the issue more closely. 
They may show Zhongwen . 
Today I will repeat what I previously thought and go into details. 
I hope that you will rein in a white horse and simply understand that there are rules in debating.315 What is important in Buddhism is to completely value the human spirit. 
For this reason, a teacher and his disciples mutually believe in this incomparable principle. 
Generally, each side of the spirit’s light and darkness has its own part. 
There is the foundation from which each part receives its nature when it arises. 
The teacher’s achievement lies in developing [his disciples’ natural abilities] and awakening them. 
This can be compared to the achievement of polishing a rough jade from Mount Jing until it becomes smooth and glossy. 
If the real substance is not ﬁne jade , what beneﬁt can be expected if one were to chisel and polish it? 
This means that the good and bad dispositions of people exist naturally. 
Profound virtue exists in a 215 person at the beginning of his life. 
The achievement of polishing until it becomes smooth and glossy truly comes at the very end. 
One holds a jade within himself and works on it in order to make vessel. 
Except for the way of the ruler nothing prolongs and completes one’s life and leads one to devote himself to the Way. 
This is why in the importance of the three most revered people, the teacher is at the bottom. 
How can this be said? 
It is because the way of the ruler holds that of the teacher simultaneously, but [the way of] the teacher does not hold the ruler concurrently. 
Isn’t this so? 
How could it be possible for less important in the principle to deprive should be more highly respected, of homage? 
I repeated this reason three times. 
I have even greater suspicions and I am surprised by them. 
The purport that created lies in that , but not in this . 
When we mistakenly employ this the harmful inﬂuence becomes more serious. 
You indicated that the teacher does not have virtue to lead inclusively, but the ruler holds the virtue of the teacher simultaneously. 
You promote the grand decorum to venerate the ruler and analyze the depth of the three most revered people. 
The reason I recently spoke of my humble views impertinently and corresponded with you is this: 
as inquiries gathered around me and I was not allowed to hide them. 
I have already carefully looked again into your wondrous purpose. 
Your reason is quite great and extensive. 
I look up respectfully to the meaning I understand, which lies in encouraging us to adhere to ﬁdelity . 
Letter in Response to Huan Xuan Regarding the Issue that Śramaṇas Should Not Bow to the King by Dharma Teacher Huiyuan of Mount Lu, together with Huan Xuan’s Two Letters Letter Given to Dharma Teacher yuan by Huan Xuan As for the issue that śramaṇas should not bow to the king, this is already not understood in my feeling and not clariﬁed in reason. 
We cannot make this establishment inappropriate. 
Recently I wrote to the Eight Executives. 
Please explain why should not pay homage to . 
This custom must be put into practice. 
I hope that you will certainly have explanations for my doubtful points. 
Commandant Wang seriously intends to take charge of this matter. 
Recently I visited Xie Zhong along with and consulted with about it face to face. 
So we have not dispelled our doubts. 
I will order Guo 217 , Jiangzhou, to accept your response. 
Please deliver your opinion to him. 
Response by Dharma Teacher yuan I carefully examined your proclamation in a separate envelope and the letter given to the Eight Executives. 
You ask me my opinion regarding the issue that śramaṇas are disrespectful to the king. 
In order to prove it, you refer to Laozi and take princes to be the same as the three great elements, [Heaven, Earth, and the Way].318 Since the way is what supports to grow and to move smoothly, we must value the throne. 
If we infer the foundation in order to look for its origin, all beings receive the vapor from the two polarities (Heaven and Earth) and their bodies from their parents. 
That is to say, the way to perpetuate lives and cause Heaven and Earth to move smoothly is magnanimous. 
The principle on which we depend for our existence and which we employ every day is great. 
Consequently, should not abandon showing courtesy to as long as they receive his virtue. They should not reject paying their respects to him as long as they beneﬁt from his kindness. 
When I look into the issue from Buddhism and seek the way of śramaṇas, the situation is not so in reason. 
According to what is clariﬁed in Buddhist scriptures there are two groups . 
One group are those who stay in the secular world and propagate the teaching. 
The other group are those who renounce the world and pursue the Way . 
For those who remain in the secular world, the courtesy to serve the ruler, paying respect to one’s parents, and the righteousness of loyalty toward the ruler and ﬁlial piety toward one’s parents are found in compositions in Buddhist texts. 
The instruction the three most revered people is evident in the sacred books . 
This is the same ordinance as that of the Imperial system; they are just like a pair of tallies. 
A divergent view is not allowable in reason. 
Those who have renounced the world are visitors from beyond the mundane world. 
The teaching for them is to master that afﬂictions are caused by having a body and that afﬂictions are ended by not preserving the body, to know that [the operation of] life after life is derived from receiving the principle of the mutation , and to seek the ultimate law of Nature by not following the principle of the mutation [of birth and death]. 
Since they seek the ultimate law of Nature by not following the principle of the mutation , they do not value the support of manages the movement of . 
Since they bring an end to afﬂictions by not preserving the body, they do not esteem the advantage of welfare . 
Accordingly, in general those who have renounced the world live in seclusion in order to pursue their aspiration and they become different from secular people in order to realize their way. 
Since they are different from secular people, their clothing code must not be the same as in secular rule. 
Since they live in seclusion they must follow a lofty lifestyle. 
On this basis, they are able to save secular people who are drowning in the deep stream , uproot their deep roots for numerous kalpas, profoundly lead to the ferry of the three vehicles, and open the broad path to the realms of heavenly and human beings. 
This kind of person makes a vow for himself by taking the tonsure at the beginning, and his determination is accomplished in his later years. 
If someone completes the virtue , the Buddhist Way diffuses over his family members of the six relations and the beneﬁt spreads to all people. 
Even though are not placed in the rank of princes, is certainly compatible with the fundamental Way by which the emperor rules over the world, and they provide extensive protection for the people. 
Do they receive the favor by doing nothing and vainly beneﬁt from his kindness in the same way as those wise people who receive a stipend without ever rendering any service? 
219 You recently considered that there are who put on robes, yet there is no one . 
This is beyond all description. 
If you remove evil monks by means of the Way, it is appropriate to take away their robes. 
Even if you abolish the Way because of monks you must keep the framework of ceremonies. 
If the ceremonies remain, the purpose for establishing the teaching can be sought. 
If the traces (i.e., the framework of the Buddhist ceremonies) are abandoned, there will be no basis for the pleasure of accomplishing our determination. 
Why do I say this so plainly? 
Even though the śramaṇa’s regulation of clothing and Buddhist implements are not like those found in the rules of the six generations,319 they are themselves the distinguished system for the Buddhist school and they are excellent articles beyond the secular world. 
If such excellent articles are mingled with , phenomena go against the foundation. 
If phenomena go against the foundation, the [framework of the Buddhist] ceremonies loses its function. 
Accordingly, those who love ceremony certainly do not damage such excellent articles. 
What you have attained cannot be lost. There is a reason for this. 
One who abides by the Classics of the distant past still keeps the sacriﬁcial sheep connected with the inauguration of the ﬁrst day of each month.320 If the sacriﬁcial sheep can still preserve the ceremony, how much more so could the Dharma robe of the Tathāgata [preserve the Buddhist ceremonies]! 
Inferring from this, I say that even if the Way does not exist we should certainly preserve the ceremonies. 
If the ceremonies are preserved the Dharma can be promulgated. 
If the Dharma can be promulgated the Way can be sought. 
This is common throughout the ages and it is the immutable great law. 
Furthermore, the Buddhist surplice is not the type of clothing [for monks to wear] when they have an audience with the emperor at court, and [a Buddhist monk’s] earthenware almsbowl is not a vessel to be used in the Imperial court. 
The clothes in military affairs differ from those in state affairs. 
If who shaves his head and disﬁgures himself were to suddenly participate in various Chinese ceremonies, this is a phenomenon in which two different kinds of things are mingled. 
It is also something with which I am personally not content. 
You, our donor, have an outstanding personality, towering over others since the time you were young. 
You still call on and study with wise people of the time in order to seek the truth. 
From this point I infer that you would surely not ignore words just because the person [who expresses those words is ﬂawed]. 
I am in the evening of my life, just goes down in the west. 
I avail myself of my remaining time, awaiting my ﬁnal day. 
If I hold fast to my assertion without yielding, it is likely because I merely wish to restore the Three Treasures in this illustrious time and honorably transmit bright virtue to the coming hundred generations. 
If this issue is enforced even once Buddhism will be ruined for a long time, the Tathāgata's immutable law will vanish without a trace at this point, heavenly and human beings will lament, and Buddhist monks and laypeople will change their minds [and stop following the Buddhist Way]. 
While writing this I 221 felt sad and resentful. I was unaware as my tears and nasal mucus unrestrainedly ﬂowed. 
Response by Defender-in-Chief Huan , together with the Decree to Stop Śramaṇas from Bowing I came to know that abandon their bodies because they are [visitors from] beyond the mundane world, and therefore they do not value the beneﬁt of maintaining their lives. 
If the task of has nothing to do with the support and guidance , they need not again have the signiﬁcance of extending respect . 
If you admit that feelings for the ruler and their own fathers have not come to an end, why then do they reject to convey their feelings? 
Worries exist in mental delusions, not from the form of bowing. 
Probably the form of bowing is simply of the mental function. 
Furthermore, you said that Buddhism is propagated by two groups; there is the teaching for those who stay in the secular world; there is also the teaching the beneﬁts of which spreads to all people of the world; the way diffuses over their family members of the six relations; is assuredly compatible with the fundamental Way by which the emperor rules over the world; and do not vainly beneﬁt from virtue. 
Buddhism exists in acts. By each comply with circumstances. 
There is the origin of cause and condition and there is surely a result, without fail. 
If is like this, how can those who follow the Way disobey ? 
Therefore Śākyamuni’s Way was not able to cause his father, King Śuddhodana, to ride the ferry beyond . 
Just as you said in your letter, there is a reason for this. 
The achievement of profound virtue is assuredly not what “those who should teach ” of today can consider and deliberate. 
I have not been able to seek the reason together with you in your letter. 
Accordingly, I have not yet clariﬁed the issue. 
I hope that you will become free from confusion and the stagnant ideas that you have held for a long time, and not make a mistake in employing feeling and reason. 
Imperial Decree to Allow Buddhist Monks Not to Bow by Huan Chu321 My people! 
The Buddhist Dharma is too vast and unintelligible for me to understand. 
I infer your serious feelings for and purposely join you in your respect for it. 
Today , so the issue [of whether or not śramaṇas must bow to the king] is already at my discretion. 
Everyone, do not force to bow any more, and let all the people know about this. 
[Response to Huan Xuan’s Decree by Bian Sizhi and Yuan Kezhi] On the third day of the twelfth month, we, Palace Attendant Sizhi and Gentleman Attendant at the Palace Gate and Palace Attendant Yuan Kezhi, speak. 
The Imperial decree is just as mentioned above. 
The Way of the Spirit is profound and obscure and the Imperial will is profound and remote. 
What 223 Your Majesty propagates is great. This has accordingly reached Buddhists who believe in the Buddha. 
Within the territory of your state all people are Your Majesty’s lieges. 
Nevertheless, place themselves as equal in courtesy to the emperor who commands ten thousand chariots, because they formerly began wearing the Dharma robe . 
How can practicing the decorum of bowing [to the king] with one’s head to the ground and standing up damage their way? 
The important human relations between the nobles and the humble people should not be discontinued at all. 
If you allow that those except Confucianists may be excused from the deportment of bowing, please reject granting them an audience immediately. 
[Response to Huan Xuan’s Decree by Ma Fan and Bian Sizhi] On the fourth day of the twelfth month of the second year of Taiheng , we, Director of Interpreter-Clerk Ma Fan and Palace Attendant Sizhi, speak. 
Again we received your brilliant Imperial decree. 
You honor the highest degree of deep modesty and walk the way of glorious humility. 
We are always concerned about you and we personally feel uneasy. 
Even though there are various ways to govern the world, all principles come to the same point. 
In revering one’s ruler and parents the Dharma teaching does not go against . 
The four that are great advocated by Laozi are equal in nobility.322 Even though of which śramaṇas avail themselves differs from their traces do not go beyond this world. 
How could it be possible that they are not the same as those whom Heaven made? 
Your Majesty sincerely intends to promulgate [the custom that śramaṇas do not have to bow to the king] above others. 
Nevertheless, the decorum between the humble people and nobles is the statute to govern the world. 
We think you must condescend and follow popular sentiment and uphold [the custom that śramaṇas should bow to the king] as an eternal system for the future. 
Please do as we have stated previously. 
Let each person act in his own way! 
This is also to love the nine schools without distinction and to let each fulﬁll his own way. 
[Response to Huan Xuan’s Decree by Bian Sizhi] I, Palace Attendant and Libationer Sizhi, speak. 
Again I was granted the Imperial decree, as mentioned above. 
Your Majesty’s highest virtue is perfectly free from prejudice. 
You let [the wind] blow so that each of the myriad makes its own sound.323 Each of the nine schools shows its good point. 
Your marvelous kindness secretly ﬂows. There is no one who does not hold this thought in mind. 
I have heard that Buddhism takes spiritual wisdom as the foundation and reaching the goal as the achievement. 
The mysterious principle is obscure. 
If respectfully bow with their heads to the ground and then stand up, there is nothing in this that will damage their observance of precepts. 
I was previously appointed to a post in a foreign land and I was rarely informed of your words. 
Therefore I did not know about your brilliant discussion on this issue last spring. 
Recently I was directly granted the Imperial 85a decree. 
I then frankly stated my silly thoughts, which I was afraid did not meet yours. 
After returning here, I precisely saw the reality of this issue and received your marvelous writings. 
These are not things that I, an incompetent man, am able to praise merely by clapping my hands. 
In former ages it was already practiced that śramaṇas place themselves as equal . 
Today you, a great bright man, ascended and your ediﬁcation of the Way reaches all people without exception. 
In order to rule the country there should not be any deﬁciency in important human relations. 
Humbly yours. 
Again, this is not praise for the way . 
[Response to Huan Xuan’s Decree by Bian Sizhi] I, Palace Attendant and Libationer Sizhi, speak. 
I respectfully received the Imperial decree again. 
Now that both Buddhism and the non-Buddhist teaching are promulgated concurrently, the Imperial decree is deeply understood and way holds the premier position over those of a hundred kings. 
I humbly read and exclaimed with reverence. 
To revere the ruler and respect the law is the ﬁdelity of vassals. 
Your brilliant decree is transcendental and your profound strategy is eternal and fair. 
As a result, I am ashamed of myself. 
I will follow and consign this to the external bureau. I will propagate, regulate, and abide by this. 
Humbly yours. Presented on the twenty-fourth day of the twelfth month of the ﬁrst year of Yuanshi . Letter Given to Huan Xuan to Discuss the Evaluation of Śramaṇas by Huiyuan of Mount Lu, together with Huan Xuan’s Decree Decree Given to the Staff to Intend to Select Buddhist Monks by Regent Huan Xuan The Way of the Spirit is obscure. 
This is something of which sages do not speak. 
Nevertheless, when we think about what their works promulgate, it seems that we will be able to see . 
What the Buddha treasures is wuwei , and his cordial intention lies in cutting off desire. 
In the capital city vie with each other in having an extravagant life. 
Rankings and the proper equipages have become wicked and corrupt due to this fact. 
Absconders ﬁll the Buddhist temples. 
Consequently several thousand gather in every county and form a lawless community. 
The drones of society gather in groups in every town. 
We should immediately issue the following strict orders. 
Among all the śramaṇas in every place, those who are able to explain the teachings of Buddhist scriptures in detail and can ﬂuently expound the Buddhist doctrines; those who orderly cultivate religious practices, who observe the precepts without deﬁciency, and who always reside in a hermitage ; and those who live in the mountains to ennoble their aspirations and who are not deluded by popular custom—all these are worthy to be in charge of propagating the great ediﬁcation. 
Therefore they will show people what the Way is, propagate the teaching, and serve as a model for the people. 
In each place where an institution is located the registers must be managed and strictly controlled. 
This should be promptly decreed and, at the same time, should be listed and reported to me. 
Mount Lu is the only place where virtuous Buddhist monks reside and it is excepted from the investigation for this decree. 
85b Letter Given to Defender-in-Chief Huan to Discuss the Evaluation of Śramaṇas by Dharma Teacher yuan It has been a long time since Buddhism gradually began to decline and became obscene and odd. 
Every time I think about this, my heart ﬁlls with indignation. 
I am always afraid that will unexpectedly encounter bad times, get mixed up , and altogether sink into ruin. 
This is why I lament and worry from early morning until night without sparing myself. 
This truly conforms to my true intention. 
If the Jing River were separated from the Wei River, the clear water will ﬂow separately from the muddy water. 
If what is crooked is straightened by what is upright, those who lack virtue will spontaneously disappear. 
Inferring from this point, I say that once Heaven’s auspicious decree is put into practice we will certainly be able to distinguish between the two principles . 
Most certainly who make a plausible outward show will cut off their false path by themselves, and who believe in the Way and embrace the truth in their minds will not be suspected of turning their backs on the secular world. 
Thus, the Way and the secular world will ﬂourish together and the Three Treasures will again prosper here. 
The reason I live in the Jiangnan area is because I wish to rely on the one who practices the Way in order to maintain the great enterprise . 
The rise and fall of the enterprise truly depends on this person. 
This is the best time for me to restore . 
My secret feeling to rely on you was already formed in our former existences. 
Accordingly, in letters I often sent to you I considered that relying on you is the foremost point. 
Every time I ﬁnd that your letter comforts me, I keep your favor in my mind and never forget it. 
I am simply afraid that as I grow older and older with the change of times I will not be able to see your prosperous ediﬁcation through to the end. 
Therefore, I now confer with you about several articles, as the attached paper. 
According to what is stated in the teachings of the Buddhist scriptures there are generally three classes . 
First is the class of those who enter the subtle through meditation; second are those who recite and appreciate the scriptures left ; last are those who perform meritorious acts. 
These three classes are truly separate from one another but they all make acts based on the Vinaya as the foundation. 
among those who establish meritorious acts there are some who do not violate the precepts in their minds yet live in a place other than a hermitage; there are those who recite many Buddhist scriptures and chant them continually, yet they cannot smoothly explain the doctrines; or there are those who are already aged and do not fall under the three classes , yet whose essential nature is pure and virtuous and who do not do serious evil. 
Generally, people like these are suspect. 
Therefore I clearly state this. 
It is easy to examine outward appearance and manner but difﬁcult to distinguish truth from falsehood. 
Śramaṇas who reside in the metropolitan city and whom you, our donor, can see and 85c hear assuredly have nothing that makes them suspect. 
If government ofﬁces in the border regions are remote and information does not reach them, and do not understand the purpose of your decree, then they may take advantage of Heaven’s auspicious decree and unreasonably include good people in . 
This is my deepest concern. 
If an executive ofﬁcial of each ofﬁce has no detailed idea , and if at that time there are no experienced and reputable śramaṇas who can make a correct judgment, please have the reports sent to the central government ofﬁce in order to be examined by you. 
Then it will be great in reason. 
I think that you, our donor, have wondrous thoughts and already understand this. 
Therefore I could not stop speaking to you about it. 
If among the sons of powerful families there are lineages that are originally exempt from corvée labor, those follow the great Dharma from generation to generation or who are known to be intelligent by nature when they are young and who wish to renounce the secular world, enter the Way, and strive to become a śramaṇa, then when I infer from the regulation [of the decree] and think of the intention, it seems that will not be blocked from their pure path. 
However, you must confer and settle this point and cause those who purify their minds and head toward the goal to have no doubt about themselves. 
In former times many foreign kings applied their minds to sacred scriptures. Moreover, in accordance with the times, some kings helped the propagation of the great ediﬁcation, protected [the Buddhist Way] from danger, and saved it from disadvantage. 
Since you, our donor, often hope to equalize your frame of mind with those of ancient people, I again brieﬂy state what I have learned. 
Letter Given to Huan Xuan to Discuss that the Provincial Office Requests to Register Śramaṇas by Dharma Teacher Zhi Daolin325 On the ﬁfth day of the fourth month of the third year of Long’an , we, śramaṇas of the metropolitan city, bow with our heads to the ground and speak. 
If the law agrees with what is supernatural and profound, we will more deeply receive favor. 
Even though we have an ordinary personality and are frivolous in practice, we respect the Three Treasures and cultivate ourselves with them. 
Our affection came from Heaven and we had faith before learning it. 
As for the merit attained by diminishing day after day,326 however, we place our hands on our chests and increase our lamentation. 
Throwing ourselves under the wings of sage rulers and sagacious kings, we are personally able to further propagate the Way. 
You enable those who live in the mountains to have their own way in cultivation and those who live near a city to be quietly proﬁcient in . 
Nevertheless, the status of śramaṇas in the world may be simply compared to that of unloaded boats that converge at a great gorge. 
When they come they do not think anything, and when they go they take advantage of tranquility. 
If the country is in a troubled state they travel alone, shaking a walking stick. 
When the Way is diffused they gladly gather together. 
You try to raise great disciplines in the period of decadence and extend sincerity for a hundred generations, but these days we are frequently requested by the provincial ofﬁce to present the register of śramaṇas. 
The situation has become acute and very urgent. 
We have not yet understood your lofty purpose for this. 
Rustics easily become fearful and deeply anxious. 
Consequently, this causes people who meditate to lose their calmness and gentlemen who practice diligently to discontinue their practice. 
We lose the essence and vital energy and cannot sleep until dawn. 
We are uneasy and do not know how to calm ourselves. 
We humbly pray that our bright lord will raise the customs handed down from Tang to a high rank and treat Buddhist monks kindly under these conventions. 
Please allow those who hold the Way in mind to attain liberation and all those who have the noble aspiration to achieve their goal. 
Their bodies will perish and they will exhaust their bodies and complete their lives here. 
Report to Emperor Wu of the Qi Dynasty to Discuss the Issue of the Inspection and Examination of Buddhist Monks by Shi Daosheng of Tianbao Temple 86a I, Shi Daosheng of Tianbao Temple, report. 
Formerly Confucius educated three thousand disciples. 
Among them, those who studied astronomy wore a round cap and those who studied geography put on rectangular shoes. 
Zhuang Zhou of Chu state visited Lord Ai [of Lu state] and said, “I have heard that there are quite a few people who are well acquainted with astronomy and geography in this country. 
Please let me test them.” Lord Ai immediately sent out an ofﬁcial announcement through the country, ordered those who were versed in astronomy to wear a round cap and those who were learned in geography to put on rectangular shoes, and commanded all to come to the gate . 
Confucius alone arrived at the gate and answered all the questions. 
Therefore it is known that all the other scholars adopted the dress arbitrarily. 
Śākyamuni emeged into this world, expounded the Four Noble Truths and the six pāramitās, and established various precepts and deportment. 
[His disciples] such as Śāriputra all attained arhatship. 
Accordingly, it is known that the great Dharma is not something that has no fundamental truth. 
Nevertheless, from that time (i.e., the time when the Buddha resided in the world) on people’s faculties have become dull and we have become far removed from the Way. 
If we can leave behind the thought we will be in accord with the precepts and codes of conduct. 
If not, we will be those who arbitrarily put on robes. 
I humbly pray, Your Majesty, that with your holy brightness you will deeply understand this principle and not assume that ordinary people who seek the Way of the Sage. 
In ancient times Zichan of Zheng state was praised as a great wise person but he still was unable to correct his faults and was jeered at by Shentu Jia.327 This goes without saying for bhikṣus of the present time, in the age of the Decadent Dharma. 
If one cannot correct his faults he will certainly give rise to evil intentions. 
How can the three administrative monks of the temple fulﬁll your order? 
There is criminal law in the country. 
I pray that you will decree that the local government ofﬁce should punish according to the offense . 
We would be happy if we do not confuse you . 
Illness due to old age rages within me, but I admire the complaints board of remote antiquity328 and dare to express this. 
I bend down over the paper and break into a cold sweat. 
End of Fascicle Twelve of The Collection for the Propagation and Clariﬁcation Essentials for Believing in the Dharma by Palace Secretary Chi 329 The threefold refuge refers to taking refuge in the Buddha, the twelve kinds of Buddhist scriptures, and the Buddhist order. 
You must always worship and repent your sins to the buddhas of the three temporal worlds of past, present, and future in the ten directions , the doctrine of the scriptures of the three temporal worlds in the ten directions, and the Buddhist order of the three temporal worlds in the ten directions. 
At the same time, we should think of all sentient beings with compassion and benevolence and pray that they will all attain liberation. 
What is called namo in the foreign language means “to surrender oneself to” in the Chinese language. 
“buddha” means “awakened one” and “sangha” means “a group” in the Chinese language. 
When an intoxicant is used for medicinal purposes the dosage must be weighed; it is important to stay within the limit of sobriety. 
Drunkenness causes thirty-six faults and the scriptural teachings take this as a serious precept. 
If there are no acts of killing can live a long time. 
If there are no acts of stealing will always remain peaceful and safe. 
If 235 there is no adulterous conduct, we remain clean and pure. 
If there is no drunkenness our spirits are clear and in good order. 
After observation of the ﬁve precepts, we then perform puriﬁcation for three periods every year and six days each month. 
The three periods in a year for puriﬁcation are from the ﬁrst to the ﬁfteenth day of the ﬁrst, ﬁfth, and ninth months. 
The six monthly days for puriﬁcation are the eighth, the fourteenth, the ﬁfteenth, the twenty-third, the twenty-ninth, and the thirtieth day of each month. 
On all puriﬁcation days ﬁsh and meat must not be offered. 
We eat before noon and must not partake of anything such as sweets and delicious food in the afternoon. 
We cleanse our minds, keep our minds on the Way, take refuge in the three revered ones , repent our sins, reproach ourselves, and practice the four immeasurable minds. 
We stay away from the inner chamber and do not become attached to the six desires. 
We must not whip or curse others, nor ride in an oxcart or horse-drawn carriage, and we must not carry weapons. 
Regarding women, over and above these they must abstain from adorning themselves with perfume, ﬂowers, and cosmetics, correct their minds, rectify their thoughts, and strive to remain docile. 
The puriﬁcation is extensively performed for the sake of one’s acquaintances and relatives, both those who have passed away and those who are still alive, as well as for all sentient beings. 
Everyone will come to awaken the aspiration on the basis of this utmost sincerity. 
Once our minds have become inspired we will ﬁnally avoid the suffering caused by the sins . 
Therefore, loyal and ﬁlial people make effort and encourage themselves to perform . 
On the day of puriﬁcation we must devote ourselves solely to practicing the profound contemplation and recite the words of the Dharma. 
If we are unable to practice emptiness, we must learn the six kinds of mindfulness . 
The six kinds of mindfulness refer to: 
mindfulness of the Buddha, mindfulness of the scriptures, mindfulness of the sangha, mindfulness of donations, mindfulness of the precepts, and mindfulness of Heaven. 
What is meant by “mindfulness of Heaven”? 
The ten wholesome acts and the four immeasurable minds are considered to be the acts to be reborn in Heaven. 
Moreover, it essentially means to exert ourselves to the best of our ability to save all sentient beings. 
The ten wholesome acts refer to not committing the bodily sins of killing, stealing, and adultery, not committing the mental sins of envy, rage, and ignorance, and not committing the verbal sins of telling lies, engaging in idle talk, being duplicitous, and using abusive language. 
What is meant by “not killing”? 
We must always be compassionate toward all living creatures, including vermicular animals. 
Even in desperate circumstances we must never harm them. 
Whenever sentient beings are facing a disaster or danger we must devote all our energies to rescue them and return them to the water or the land, according to wherever they used to live. 
In the case where there is doubt whether was killed for our beneﬁt we must not receive . 
What is meant by “stealing”? 
This generally means to take things that are not our own possessions, regardless of size, as well as to become corrupt when in an ofﬁcial position. 
These are all called “stealing.” What is meant by “adultery”? 
All kinds of attachments are generally called “excessive desires.” As applied to sexual desire, we must not engage in sexual relations with anyone other than our ofﬁcially married spouse. 
In addition, since secret that cannot be made public, it is simultaneously a sin of “stealing.” What is called “envy” is jealousy. 
When we see others’ good points, or we see that other people are virtuous we all must replace with great joy. 
We must not give rise to rivalry or thoughts of jealous hatred. 
What is called “rage” is that the mind harbors wrath and keeps deﬁlement within it. 
What is called “ignorance” is to have no faith in the great Dharma and to doubt the scriptural teachings. 
What is meant by “idle talk” is rhetorical embellishments and sweetsounding words, which may be beautiful but lack substance. 
237 What is meant by “being duplicitous”? 
This means to say different things to one’s face and behind his back, and be self-contradictory. 
What is meant by “abusive language”? 
This refers to reviling . 
Some people say that abusive language also refers to speaking unwholesome things and cause people to blindly follow and commit sin. 
On the whole, we must not give rise in the mind to any of these ten behaviors even for a moment. 
These are the ten wholesome acts and also called the ten precepts. 
The ﬁve precepts regulate bodily acts and the ten wholesome acts serve to protect one’s mind from evil. 
Accordingly, there is a difference between light and heavy reward and retribution . 
Those who completely observe the ﬁve precepts will possess a human form. 
Those who complete the ten wholesome acts will be reborn in Heaven. 
Even those who complete only one precepts will be able to become human beings. 
There are differences among people regarding their social rank or life span. 
These are due to how many precepts one has observed . 
The opposite of the ten wholesome acts are the ten evil acts. 
Those who have committed all ten evil acts will fall into hell.330 Those who are bellicose and obstinate, who disregard sincere remonstrance, whose minds are full of poisonous thoughts, and who deceive others to proﬁt themselves fall either into the realm of animals or are reborn as snakes or vipers. 
Those who are stingy and greedy, who monopolize proﬁts, and who always complain of dissatisfaction fall into the realm of hungry ghosts. 
Those whose sins are somewhat light but who often keep secret, and whose personal feelings are not fair and clear, all fall into the state of spiritual beings . 
Even though they may enjoy a little happiness they cannot avoid suffering from pain. 
These (i.e., hell, the realm of hungry ghosts, and the realm of animals) are called the three lowest realms of existence and also called the three evil paths . 
Form, perception [consisting of pain and pleasure (yang; literally meaning “itch”)], conception , volition , and consciousness are called the ﬁve skandhas . 
Generally all external things that have a shape and are visible are called form. 
Losing this and becoming sad and distressed is of pain. Having this and being greatly delighted is of pleasure. 
Considering beforehand what has not yet taken place is thinking, and looking back at what has already happened is recollection. 
That which formerly was involved , stored there, and never forgotten is consciousness. 
Consciousness still germinates in the mind after having passed through a succession of kalpas. 
Even though its derivation is obscure it is deeply rooted and is secretly linked to . 
The ﬁve hindrances that cover one’s mind are: 
Ignorance is the foundation of the causality of birth and death. 
All kinds of various attachments entirely begin with ignorance. 
Painful torment in hell mostly results from anger. 
Recognition is consciousness of skandhas mentioned above. 
I am inclined to think that the ﬁve skandhas and the six desires are the origins of the transmigration of birth and death and the source of all sin and suffering. 
The methods to remove and control these are set forth in detail in numerous sutras. 
The mind makes one a human being. The mind makes one an inhabitant of hell. The mind makes one an animal. 
Even those who attain the Way owe to the mind.”333 Whenever a thought is impelled by the mind, each and every thought is subject to reward and retribution. 
Even if an action has not yet taken place the hidden response is constituted in the unseen world. 
Thoughts arising from feelings move swiftly and smoothly. 
The mechanism very slightly moves but then ﬁlls the universe. 
Fortune and misfortune and one’s physical form and destination entirely derive from . 
How could they be concerned only with “ words expressed in a house are responded to from a place a thousand li away,”334 or that one is prudent in his bodily actions because “nothing is more visible than what is secret”?335 The second translation of the Sutra of Twelve Gates says,336 “If one has a good point he should always hide it. 
If one has a bad point he should bring it forth.” A gentleman does not set his mind either for anything or against anything.337 If one has faults and does not repent , certainly he will not feel satisﬁed with himself. 
he had better abandon the course of action within the circumstance he has been given. 
When we examine the laws of nature working in evil acts and meritorious deeds, we see that the more leaks out, the lighter will be, and the more is inwardly accumulated, the heavier . 
Once an act is set forth in the human world retribution in the unseen world will certainly be lessened. 
If wholesome conduct is apparent, the achievement becomes known. 
If the achievement becomes known, public praise centers on one . 
If someone is concerned about stopping and encouraging in his feeling, and if public praise centers on him from the outside, he will then harbor greed , which certainly ﬁlls him from within. 
Furthermore, a gentleman among human beings is still a small man of Heaven.338 not to speak of one whose benevolence is immature and whose fame does not match with reality. 
Except for those who possess virtue, we all surely have some incompleteness. 
If one were to frankly expose to everyone will disperse along with . 
If he allows an unjust thought to become imprinted on his mind, harbors it, maintains his honor outwardly in order to avoid others’ reproach and win worldly fame, he then greatly insults the laws of nature. 
If he is blamed, he will be ashamed. 
if one presumes that will not be revealed, he will not reform himself after all. 
In addition, if heavenly blame ﬁlls one’s mind and he fears that it will be revealed, he will inwardly worry 241 about everything and take precautions even more skillfully. 
This is probably because he did not refrain from giving rise to the scheme at the beginning, concealed the fault, and did not praise what is wholesome. 
The Sutra on the Formal Puriﬁcation says,340 “You may simply speak of a hundred good things of others, but you must not speak of even a single evil thing of others.” When we speak of others’ wholesomeness we give rise to a wholesome mind. 
When we speak of others’ evils we give rise to an angry intention. 
Even though intention may be small at ﬁrst, it gradually grows by accumulation. 
Ancient people said, “The prosperity of a military family does not last more than three generations.” Chen Ping also said, “Because I have laid many plots, my descendants will not become prosperous.”341 If we refer to and take them as a teaching, it is truly worthy to propagate . 
Nevertheless, in of Qi state and Chu state [whose founders committed evil deeds], their descendants enjoyed generation after generation, while the descendants of as Yan and Ran , received no prominent reward. 
Since it is already obvious in these cases [that the subject of reward and retribution lies in oneself], this is not a matter that can be clariﬁed logically. 
Xi and Fu were differed from each other in appearance.342 It has been a constant rule for a hundred generations to punish the four criminals (i.e., Gonggong, Huandou, the chief of Sanmiao, and Gun)343 yet not to blame . 
Even when sage kings ruled over the world there was no unjustiﬁable . 
Nevertheless, reward and retribution fall wrongly and good and evil are not made clear, then that person brings a false charge against the laws . 
If a punishment is not inﬂicted on the offender while disasters befall the offender’s kin, and if this practice is legislated, it would not only be allowed in rules made by sages but would also certainly be rejected even by Shen and Han . 
Therefore, the Nirvana Sutra says, “If the father does something evil the son does not suffer for his father. 
If the son does something evil the father does not suffer for his son, either. 
One who does good obtains a reward by himself, and one who does evil receives retribution by himself.”345 How truthful this is! 
If we investigate the worldly teaching [that ancestors’ good or evil conduct results in their descendants’ happiness or misery] originated, isn’t it because feel that the way does not stop even after they themselves have been punished? 
The more widely [reward and retribution] spreads, the deeper the people’s prudence and fear will be. 
If one sticks to written words without understanding thoroughly the expedient way, if one recklessly follows the teaching without reaching the heart of the teaching, and if one measures himself by this way and tries to comply with the truth, aren’t such people misdirected? 
Regarding evil acts and meritorious deeds in right and wrong, there are certainly reward and retribution without fail. 
If one is ignorant of this truth he will have no ﬁxed position for right and wrong and his mind will have no authority in which to trust. 
When we examine only in regard to the present existence, it is truly vague and there is scant evidence. 
There is no mistake or unreasonableness in the law 243 but the actual fact is not constantly apparent. 
How could we not consider it all to be due to conditions from our previous existences that extend to future existences? 
Because we understand that “The meshes of the heavenly net are large, far apart, ,”347 we hope that nothing will escape. 
We realize that time continues without interruption, see ten thousand kalpas to be the same as a brief space of time, lump the three periods of existence together and take them all to be one, and seek the ﬁnal result as that which inevitably comes. 
why should we reform ourselves depending on revealing or concealing [our sins], or why would we have to change our thought depending on whether will come slowly or quickly? 
This is the chief foundation for those who have the initial faith and something that is deeply hoped for by those whose minds are bound by karma. 
The Sutra of the Twelve Gates says, “Sometimes, if you think of yourself that you are correct and good, you must then examine yourself . 
There is nothing in your body but liver, intestines, stomach, lungs, bones, blood, excrement, and urine. 
Moreover, when you observe other people’s bodies, their impurities are all the same as these.”348 If stinginess and greedy intentions arise, you must remember that all your property and jewelry and valuables neither came with you when you were born, nor will they go with you when you die. 
passes and changes; it is even impossible to guarantee that the morning [will be the same in] the evening. 
Your body does not last long and nothing has a permanent possessor. 
In the present existence we should bestow favor on others and show kindness to them, offering money to the poor and saving the sick with medicine. 
We must delightedly live all day long diligently watching over others and providing relief to them. 
If an angry intention arises you must deeply produce equality and concurrently observe the ten precepts. 
The Kṣemaṃkara-paripṛcchā says, “Among the bodhisattva practices forbearance is the greatest. 
If they are beaten they receive and never retaliate. 
If they encounter an angry person they face him with compassion. 
If they are slandered they do not think of the slanderer’s vice.”349 Furthermore, the Dhammapada (Faju jing) says, “When you are disgraced, your mind should be earth. 
When you practice forbearance, you should be like a doorsill.”350 The examples of “earth” and “doorsill” are probably used because these are things that are covered with dust, soiled with mud, and trampled upon all day long. 
The Sutra on the Complete Accomplishment of the Light Samādhi (Chengju guangming dingyi jing) says, “If a person inﬂicts the four kinds of transgression on you, you will be aware of the verbal faults. 
You should respond to such a person with well-intentioned words and peaceful expressions. 
When someone comes to you with evil and you respond with wholesomeness, if his mind is not that of a senseless being he will be moved in reason. 
If you can keep forbearance in mind on every occasion, regret and stinginess will disappear in this life and a happy reward will appear in the future. 
The Sutra on the Virtue of a Wise Person says,352 “If your mind is unstable, never bite at others.” Speaking in familiar language, this is the way of magnanimity. 
If we infer this to the highest point, it is the meaning of the four immeasurable minds. 
What are the four immeasurable minds? 
They are benevolence , compassion , joy , and protection .353 What is meant by benevolence? 
It means to feel pity for sentient beings, to regard all beings as equal to yourself, to be merciful in putting yourself in another person’s position, to pray to be able to provide for all beings to be easy and comfortable, to extend your love even to insects, and to have a feeling of nondiscrimination. 
What is meant by compassion? 
It means to love others universally, to save equally, to let tears fall like rain, and to exhibit innate mercy. 
You must cause a real achievement to reveal itself secretly. It is not to simply have a mind . 
What is meant by joy? 
It means to be joyful, happy, and gentle and to make donations without regret. 
What is meant by 245 protection? 
Those who can practice the four immeasurable minds are the most esteemed in the three realms of existence. 
However, if you are unable to efface yourself in the state of no portent, then your fate is sealed to certainly come to an end. 
Therefore, the benqi jing says, “Although all heavenly beings have a happy time, when their merit is exhausted comes to an end, too. 
When you reach the apex of glory, the way to Heaven is right across from hell.”354 The Sutra on the Complete Accomplishment of the Light Samādhi furthermore says, “Fortune has suffering, deﬁlement, vexation, and coming and going (i.e., the transmigration of birth and death).”355 The Nirvana Sutra says, “In the ﬁve realms of existence there is no peace. 
gain and loss, slander and fame, praise and ridicule, sorrow and joy.”357 are neither pleased when they hear about wholesomeness, nor fearful when they hear about unwholesomeness. 
If one’s faith is spontaneously ﬁrm, neither encouragement nor discouragement can change his will. 
Since the truth has become rooted in him, objects of the external world cannot offend his thoughts. 
Moreover, whatever he encounters in this existence must have been caused by conditions from previous existences. 
Conditions caused in previous existences mysteriously keep moving, and their working is just the same as the operation of the four seasons. 
It is impossible to guard against their advent or to stop their passing away. 
Assuredly we must submit to this, be content with it, and delightedly complete it. 
If we cordially enhance ourselves in the training of Buddhism, expect various things and yet are unmindful of them, since the retribution upon one’s body has ceased one will attain the great peace. 
The truth is founded in the mind, and reward and retribution manifests itself in a factual matter. 
is compared to the fact that if a form is upright then its shadow appears straight, too, or if a sound is peaceful then its echo is agreeable to the ears. 
How could there be one who does this? 
If this is so, those who harmonize their minds with the Way of the Spirit should expect assuredly to lead their minds to the truth, strive to have the far-reaching thought, efface their minds, correct themselves, and have no expectation of obtaining help from others. 
Certainly this has nothing to do with what is dark and abstruse.” When we investigate why the teachings of the scriptures were established, we see that the reason is probably to make us aware of relying on ourselves. 
In the way to rely on oneself, however, there is no awakening that is not based on the teachings. 
If awakening is based on the teachings the merit [one may obtain from relying on oneself] derives from the Way of the Spirit. 
If exultation arises within the mind, certainly takes a deﬁnite form in phenomena. 
It is just like when simply singing a song is not enough [to express an exultant feeling], so one dances for joy. 
If this is so, to admire and respect is probably not necessary in reason but it cannot be rejected in feeling. 
We should efface ourselves and master thoroughly the tenor of the teachings and absorbedly and joyfully think of [the teachings]. 
We must place ourselves in sentient beings’ place in order to lead them with our own bodies. 
Consequently, we can secure the ambitions of new followers and cause them to have the determination to consign their feelings to . 
A sutra says, “Birth is suffering, aging is suffering, sickness is suffering, death is suffering, meeting one’s enemies is suffering, separation from loved ones is suffering, and not obtaining what one wants is suffering.”358 If you encounter any of these types of suffering you should think that such suffering is simply a result from what you have done in previous existences, and concurrently you should realize that this is an evil falsehood. 
You must awake from through a farsighted view and enlarge with the immeasurable minds. 
The number of our successes and failures certainly does not deserve counting. 
If you practice the several ways concurrently, this thought will naturally cease. 
Furthermore, if you do not enter the Way, weal and woe arise alternately. 
In the collecting and dispersing (i.e., birth and death)360 or in going and coming (i.e., transmigration in birth and death), both the wise and the foolish attain the same thing. 
Therefore, sutras say, “If there is peace, then there is danger. 
If there is birth, there is death.”361 This is probably the common force of nature and the ﬁxed rule that inevitably visits you. 
If you infer and pacify , you will be at ease in whatever you do. 
The Vimalakīrtinirdeśa-sūtra says, “All phenomenal things take form following the workings of a mind.”362 If this is so, there is a sign of a activity at the beginning and then a phenomenon responds to it later. 
A thought arises and then there is . 
When your mind is stable you are at ease in whatever circumstance you encounter. 
When your feelings are hindered you are inactive wherever you go. 
If fear arises in the mind, a misfortune from the external world takes advantage of . 
When misfortune from the external world takes advantage, fear increases in the mind. 
In all phenomena there will be nothing that can disturb you and no evils will be able to assail you. 
The four types of impermanent things are impermanence , suffering , emptiness , and non-self . 
The fact that our bodies change as we go from young to old or that a hill and a valley change places is called impermanence. 
That arising and falling away alternate or that joy at its summit certainly turns into grief is called suffering. 
That all phenomena ﬁnally end in nothingness is called emptiness. 
That the spirit does not have a permanent dwelling and transmigrates without cessation is called non-self. 
Therefore, even if you reside in peace you still worry about danger, and if you enjoy a good reputation [during the day] you become anxious in the evening. 
This is to realize that having a mind means to have hindrance, and having hindrance means that suffering exists. 
Even if one were to become the noblest in the heavenly and human realms and concurrently have a high rank, the more signiﬁcant one’s position, the deeper his arrogance. 
The greater one’s pleasurable feeling, the more suffering there will be in the law . 
Therefore, a sutra says, “The three realms of existence are full of suffering; there is nothing pleasurable.”366 Moreover, says, “Sentient beings in the ﬁve realms of existence are all in a large prison.”367 As long as your mind is bound to the world of existence, weal and woe are linked together. 
This is why the three realms of existence are collectively called a large prison. 
The Buddha asked his disciples what impermanence means. 
One answered, “ is unwarrantable even for a single day. 
This is impermanence.” The Buddha told him, “You are not my disciple.” Another said, “ is unwarrantable even for as brief a time as it takes to have a meal. 
This is impermanence.” The Buddha said, “You are not my disciple.” Another said, “One has transited to the next life before even his exhaled breath has returned to him. 
This is impermanence.” The Buddha said, “You are truly my disciple.”368 The evident testimony of impermanence is displayed before every day, yet all generations continue to act in the same ways and no one realizes after all. 
They have no peace even for a moment and yet they make a plan for their whole lifetimes. 
249 If fear does not exist before , they neglect to do everything. 
If they try to improve their virtue in this manner, they will not have even as small an achievement as overturning a basket .369 If they control the mind in this way they will be indolent in what they learn. 
Consequently, gentlemen who have a grasp of the Way pay heed for a few minutes and regret the passing . 
They continually strive for improvement, lashing the laggards, and cultivate themselves through competing with time. 
Because they do not have enough time, deluded thoughts have no cause to arise and the conditioned response to has no derivation from which to arise. 
To be capable of giving away that you have accumulated in order to beneﬁt and save sentient beings is giving. 
To respectfully observe the ten wholesome and ward off evils by sincerity is precepts. 
To not retaliate [for any outrage you have suffered] and to always remain humble is forbearance. 
To practice industriously what you have learned and never be idle, day or night, is diligence. 
Generally, if these ﬁve matters are practiced with thoughtfulness, this is called the worldly pāramitās, and if they are operated with the concurrently forgetting everything,370 this is called the wisdom of the Way, . 
The benqi jing says, “There are ninety-six different teachings. Each believes in what it serves. They all hope for peaceful living. 
Who knows their own delusions?”371 To be delighted with gain, hate losing, enjoy living, and lament over death are probably the ordinary delusions of young wanderers and the common feelings of sentient beings.372 However, once the unseen power secretly responds, no matter how one may strive to attach to he cannot keep them. 
When the response arrives he receives retribution. 
How could be controlled by intellectual functions? 
Accordingly, those who learn must unite their minds in the foundation of transformation and understand and view the profound ultimate. 
When one appreciates and values , all thoughts spontaneously disappear. 
When disappear, one has forgetting . 
When one has forgetting , causation is cut off. 
Retribution due to causation is therefore already cut off and then one will enter nonarising. 
Since he or she is not reborn, he or she will not trouble to die. 
Therefore, the Lalitavistra says, “There is no place from which things arise and they arise everywhere. 
In all places they arise, there is no place where they arise.”373 The Nirvana Sutra says, “When your mind and consciousness cease, you neither die nor are reborn.”374 The mind is like a seed, actions are like the soil, and reward and retribution are like the resulting fruit. 
It is just as one sows each seed according to its kind. When the time has come [the plants] sprout, and no one can stop it. 
The above section gives a minute account of what kind of rebirth one will receive when the precepts of the ten wholesome acts are planted. In addition, when one plants the seed of the four abodes of emptiness in the realm beyond material elements through dhyāna, he or she will receive the noblest position in Heaven. 
From the ﬁrst heaven up to the twenty-eighth 375 merit gradually increases according to what one has done. 
When one plants the truth of impermanence through meditation, goes against the world of existence, and places himself in the world of nonexistence, he is able to enter the nirvana of the arhat. 
Not shunning the world of transience, not being bound by contemplation on emptiness, uniting tacitly with all principles, having no attachment, and depending on nothing results in nothing planted. 
Since there is nothing that has been planted, one is not subject to retribution. 
Being unprejudiced and profoundly extinguished is the nirvana of the Buddha. 
The Vimalakīrtinirdeśa-sūtra says, “Those six masters say their partial teachings are the Way. 
Those who follow these masters are enmeshed in various views, fall into prejudice, and end up in the eight difﬁculties. 
They are unable to leave behind the way of birth and death.”376 Even though the profound mental state is repeatedly practiced, if moves even slightly you will also be detained in limited existence, just as the six masters 251 were. 
Even if their merits go beyond mountains and rivers and they are the most noble in the three realms of existence, fortune and misfortune alternate with each other377 and return to them. They will fall into punitive suffering in the end. 
How can they attain the great achievement of pacifying their spirits calm, restful, profound peace? 
Living creatures inevitably have feelings. This is the natural course of Heaven. 
If they do not settle in wholesomeness they will surely dwell in unwholesomeness. 
Consequently, those who begin to practice the Way need something on which to rely. 
So a sutra says, “If you want to build a mansion in the air, it is impossible to accomplish this after all. 
if you want to take hold of the buddha lands it is not through emptiness.”378 If this is so, the ﬁve pāramitās and the four immeasurable minds cannot be disregarded. 
When you take refuge in the Buddha there is no emancipation in the Buddha. 
When you take refuge in the precepts there is no merit in the precepts. 
Then the truth dhyāna and the ﬁve skandhas will be deeply united. 
Even though numerous practices may be concurrently arranged, this is originally only to practice emptiness within emptiness. 
Some people may think, “In emptiness there is nothing to practice. 
Since there is already practice, isn’t it to lose emptiness?” Emptiness is a term of no-thought, not a designation of a government ofﬁce or a residence. 
Nonbeing is truly nonbeing. 
If we existentialize nonbeing, we will completely remain in the limited . 
Being is really being. 
If we forget both [being and nonbeing] then we will attain profound realization. 
Although physical objects and phenomena are displayed in their practical use , when sensations cease they deeply unite with the principle . 
How could there be nonbeing after the extermination of being? 
How could we reach exhaustion only by means of gradual decrease? 
Speaking from this viewpoint, being is indeed not in itself a hindrance. 
If we reverse the current, return to the origin, and entrust ourselves to the foundation we will spontaneously be without limit. 
In the profound Mahayana sutras the three periods of existence are always combined in one, and the phenomena we see right in front of our eyes are usually not considered to be existent. 
Accordingly, the purpose of “to practice emptiness within emptiness” is seen here. 
Clarification of Two Issues by Chamberlain for the Attendants Yan Yanzhi to discern that [Buddhism, Confucianism, and Daoism] are equally wholesome and to become proﬁcient in divergent subjects. 
First is to speak the Way; next is to discuss the mind; and the last is to examine reason. 
To speak the Way is to talk in conformity with Heaven; to discuss the mind is to argue on the basis of human beings; and to examine reason is to take in phenomena. 
When we distinguish following , we separate them from one another and arrange each by its path. 
When we summarize and understand [these three teachings we ﬁnd that] they all reach the same point in the end. 
253 Things like profound and marvelous scriptures and extremely brilliant doctrines all offer clues of these three signiﬁcances (i.e., the Way, the mind, and reason) and reach the highest point of nonduality. 
The language , however, originates in a foreign region. 
Therefore has been disliked by worldly scholars. 
In the Way bestowed by Heaven there is no difference between foreign countries and China. 
Whenever a person receives the spirit , how could it be that is limited to a speciﬁc place, either outside or within ? 
When we consider this, there can be no arbitrary judgment. 
Those who practice Daoism are of the school that came out of the Way of the Transcendents. 
Therefore, reﬁning the form is considered to be primary. 
Regarding those who worship the Buddha, the origin lies in enlightening the mind. 
Accordingly, controlling the mind is considered to be foremost. 
Those who follow the school of reﬁning form must go to a deep and spacious place, where they try to return to ﬂying spirits. 
Consequently, they become rejuvenated, reject aging, prolong youthful charm, and preserve the bright appearance of youth. 
They intend to unite their bodies with the light red clouds and spread their traces all over the empty sky. 
These are their strong points. 
If false practice this, they fear divine punishment, force people to offer crude prayers, mix male and female together, and throw evil and justice into disorder. 
In the art of controlling the mind, people must part from their relatives and wives, restrain themselves in both body and mind, revere the Pure Awakened One as their teacher, and believe in causality and lives. 
Therefore, they return to nonarising and are able to achieve the sacred enterprise; their intelligence is brighter than the sun and their aspirations are as innumerable kalpas are narrow. 
If those who go against practice this, they take advantage of taking the tonsure, become overly familiar with high-ranking people, attend those who have honor and fame, and seek proﬁt. 
In anything there is a case of not-so; in any matter there is nothing without harm. 
Even if we measure something with a weight and check it every day, we still worry about ﬁnding a difference. 
Moreover, the Way of the Spirit is formless and assuredly something of which numerous matters avail themselves. 
If one is not suspicious that there is no spirit before he is able to comprehend the spirit, I think that this is because the nature of numinous beings is subtle and obscure. 
Great change happens abruptly we can rely on great conformity . 
shines just as the clear sky does, and it is as cautious as when one looks into an abyss. 
Those who can consider that principles and conformity make a person can altogether say that there is the spirit. 
If someone slanders the truth and blames for its disadvantages, he has simply not yet developed discernment. 
Sunshine by Wang Gai When I inquire the scriptures of the highest Way explicate the origin of birth and death, indicate reward and retribution for good or evil conduct, and explain that there is a ferryboat to take us beyond this world. 
The instructions and precepts are clearly stated and fully enumerated, going into particulars. 
Nevertheless, “sincere words are not beautiful.”379 The compositions are complicated and the expressions are vague. 
Waves separate us from the deep pool [in which a pearl worth a thousand ounces of silver is found].380 Therefore, those who learn have not attained its gate or they have not paid attention to it. 
When we avail ourselves of the small in order to reach the great, we may unexpectedly come close to secular customs. 
To assist Heaven and to enhance brightness is called sunshine. 
I investigate exhaustively what is magniﬁcent and do not come to an end. 
I tread on an terrain a small piece of land, and I wear the round sky an overturned bowl. 
I see the boundlessness of the three realms of existence far in the distance, and I encounter the vigorous yin-yang vapors. 
I seek the profound origin of the Grand Creator and survey the deep root of Nature’s nourishing. 
Then the body that avails itself of the four great elements will dissipate like foam, while the spirit that is subtle among all things exists permanently. 
This is the state understood by those good people. 
Consequently, birth is sad and the spirit is pleasing. 
As for all living creatures, the spirit has no set pattern. 
Regarding the species of wriggling living creatures, their disposition is impermanent. 
To come occurs as swiftly as ﬂowing water, and to entrust [one’s life to this world] is a spark. 
It goes and returns, appears and disappears. 
It ﬂows around in the great sea and transmigrates in the great change . 
It rides upon the waves and drifts far away. 
It transmigrates in the three lowest realms of existence and stagnates in the environment of the eight difﬁculties. 
It is pitiful that there is no hope to attempt to break [free from this environment and escape]. 
It is lamentable that there are hired people (i.e., lowly people) who return to . 
We regard respectfully that virtue should be quickly exalted, and we consider that the accumulation of evils must be delayed. 
This is the easy point to see the accomplishment of this undertaking . 
The mental movement of foresight is not weak. 
The ﬁve kinds of happiness arise from performing correct things, and the six extreme evils are formed by following evils.381 It is natural to be moved by the truth. 
Who creates happiness? Who launches disasters? 
Water moves and makes a pool in a lower level. The way of human beings hates arrogance. 
Sins are caused by the accumulation of wealth and blessings are brought about by the promotion of modesty. 
When even a child acts correctly, evil spirits run away. 
When we look at the pair of a form and , or of a sound and , or when we examine a pair of signs such as weal and woe, the principles exactly ﬁt our thoughts. 
With our own eyes we can see that the traces correspond to , just as a round wheel holds a pair of compasses or a carpenter’s ink string is attached to a straight rafter. 
To seek happiness sincerely lies in oneself, and to become a good person truly lies in one’s own . 
Those who breathe have nothing permanent. 
We have no idea to where they arrive after suddenly departing. 
We sympathize with a young beauty who dies at a tender age. 
She might return reincarnated as a pig owned by her former household. 
She was raised with great love and care in her former life but in her current life she will be slaughtered in a sacriﬁcial ceremony. 
The spirit subtly and continually dwells within us but our bodies undergo changes and transform into other bodies. 
Even before ten years have passed after our deaths we will be forgotten. 
We should sigh deeply and weep for this. 
This is not only what one person does—we ignorant people all act like this. 
The latter are restlessly proliﬁc, day after day. 
Who knows how to secretly clear up the cause of this? 
I may be wrong but I have learned as follows. 
Even though the Way of the Spirit is obscure, the law of spirits is particularly clear. 
wander around in the intermediate state between death and a new life , and they go to the iron city [of hell] where Wang Shu is terminated in the night and where there is no sun in the daytime. 
They have to pass through a yard of burning charcoal. 
On the mountain of sharply pointed blades knives are piled up. 
The forest of swords that raise up their sharp tips are awe-inspiring and exquisite. 
There is a vast expanse of melted copper that gushes out like the sea. 
In a huge cauldron boiling water undulates and makes a sound like thunder. 
King Yama supervises inspections , and beside him the wardens of hell hold prongs in their hands. 
There are venomous birds called zhen with sharp beaks, bright and scintillating ﬁery carts, sharply pointed nails, pointed spears, and dogs called jiao that bare their fangs. 
Licentious people are burned on an illusory pole. 
Hungry convicts are laid out to dry up on dirt and sand. 
lasts for numerous kalpas. 
There are a thousand different severe and they cause diverse types of suffering. 
You cannot go through it without gasping for breath. 
You suddenly arrive in and forget your home. 
Thereupon, there are those who observe the ﬁve precepts without failure and who are perfect in performing the way of the ten wholesome acts. 
When they pass away, just as the evening sun sets, they fortunately ascend to the nine heavens where they will see a dazzling holy palace hall and a stately mansion built in the air. 
There are altogether a hundred beautiful buildings and nearly a thousand clean households. 
The Gate of Gold shines as brightly as crystal; the lanes made of gems sparkle as attractively as lapis lazuli; pearl trees line the streets and the fabulous birds luan and phoenixes sing in the tree branches. 
Fragrant ﬂowers are digniﬁed, splendid, and elegant, and an aromatic breeze blows gently, diffusing the aroma. 
If you merely think of clothing, a beautiful garment is put on you. 
If you think of eating, fragrant food appears in abundance before you. 
Xi He goes on a long journey, and one day is as long as ten thousand years . 
No one ever does anything to offend his nature. 
They narrow their eyes and see that beings lightly ﬂy around. 
They master the highest level of music of wonderful sounds. 
They go to the end of existence prolonging their lives. 
They abandon this vulgar world and ascend. 
Accompanying their outstanding peers, they ascend higher. 
If this is so, delicacies are served daily in order to provide a feast for the virtuous people of the past. 
This land is barren; agriculture cannot take place. 
Even if there were a large accumulation of resources, how could they be inexhaustible? 
Even if someone is blessed with longevity, his life will come to an end at last. 
When the three disasters arise even the palace buildings will be lost. 
When the seven symptoms reach there384 the revenues conferred by the Lord of Heaven will cease. 
When the great autumn season comes and having fulﬁlled [their growing season,] wither away, there is no distinction between the legendary tree called dachun, and a fungus. 
Therefore, the Tathāgata, the Great Sage, clearly illuminates us with the three transcendental knowledges, feels compassion for those of us who are in trouble and ignorant, and explains clearly the essentials of the Way. 
A superior person opens wide his mind and forgets what he wished to say,385 but a mediocre person tenaciously holds to his aspiration and sticks to the teaching. 
The teaching has no ﬁxed pattern; it follows whatever people do. 
if one is traveling on land he should go by a vehicle, but when he is traveling on water he requires a boat. 
259 The “Section on Pasture” does not comprise all of the three hundred odes . 
There is nothing unequal in the teaching but there is sharpness and dullness in individuals’ temperament. 
The foolish and the wise are guided equally; dragons and spiritual beings are ediﬁed together. 
Myriad paths come together and return to one through transcendental wisdom. 
This can be compared to the fact that one cannot cross the sea in anything other than a ship. If we urge numerous people to move to a place where the Buddhist Way is studied, they will complete wuwei and cease transmigrating [in the cycle of birth and death]. 
Originally in the beginning, the three vehicles equally returned to one: nonexistence. 
So, for practical purposes, are differentiated. 
Consequently, they are absorbed in emptiness and are peaceful and contented. 
Pratyekabuddhas understand troubles through knowing the minute . 
Accordingly, they move to a profound place and do not dwell . 
Though their subtle traces are lost again [because they have left the world of existence, they still make an impression] as if they remained there. 
How would they need to remove anything? 
They understand clearly before they examine. 
They keep in mind and unite it in their initial intention. 
Their principles are important and deep, beyond words. 
In former times, when ancients met the Imposing One whose light shined upon them, they were able to personally receive the sacred instructions. 
The people who adored respectfully gave their eyes and ears to him. 
Some were enlightened by the sound of a single cough from him and some repented and reformed themselves on account of receiving a single meal . 
one who has attained emancipation extends to today, even as the fortune of the Way has begun to decline. 
The great teaching still exists, but those who appreciate it are rare. 
Moonlight is considered to be as bright as a ﬁreﬂy. 
Yu transcended the secular world and realized the profound tenor . 
He led the life of a recluse in the hills and valleys and his benevolence moved even tigers and water buffaloes. 
When he chanted in a feeble voice in a deep ravine water in the dried-up spring gradually arose and increased. 
Elder Que ascended to the sky and Wei du belonged to the path, but they were both indifferent to nonarising, so they left their bodies and became immortals. 
Today, Zhi Dun is particularly outstanding. 
His great enterprise is deep and pure and his spiritual manner is clean and reverent. 
When he utters a single word the obstructions people have collected disperse. 
To see him is enough to wash away one’s stinginess. 
By hearing his one can leave behind arrogance. 
He fulﬁlled his original and now enjoys composing poems on the eastern mountain. 
What kind of deep appreciation must he have in order to live such a simple life and to consider that the great treasure is as light as a very tiny thing? 
If no one has difﬁculties in his talent, the wise is not valued. 
If the fool is not laughed at, sages are not lofty. 
Profound music seems shallow to vulgar ears. 
Who could forget the taste when he hears the Shao, [the music composed during the time of the sage Emperor Shun]?387 Wherever we go there is the Way. 
There are spirits wherever we go. 
There are exquisiteness and coarseness in principles. 
The great occupies the position of an exquisite lord and the minor becomes a minister of great virtue. 
Winged birds follow the sacred bird called 261 garuḍa. 
The creatures that have a shell belong to the asuras. 
The two polarities take the Grand Terminus as their origin.388 All the stars link to the North Polar Star. 
Therefore, the ninety-six schools abundantly spread their branches, slight and abandon the important root, and rashly reject what is tranquil and great. 
Their followers all claim that they participate in sacredness. 
Some move to a mountain and dwell near a stream, and some are short-lived. 
They command beautiful beings who wear heavenly garments, howl at the savory odors in a numinous kitchen, glorify the atrocity of the orderly returning troops, transform a pebble into a ﬁne piece of jade, exhaust every means of transformation, and tower above others in eccentricity. 
They regret that what they rely on has no perpetuity. 
These are pleasures within the limited world and they are not as good as even the chaff and bran of the highest Way . 
Regarding those found in the Arrayed Transcendents and those who reﬁne the body, they pass their time like a bear, stretch and twist like a bird,389 and breathe in the Grand One. 
In the evening they consume the brilliant moon along with the moisture of an elm tree, and in the morning they take the bright rosy clouds together with the red sun. 
Juanzi ﬂew into the sky by eating glutinous millet. 
An enjoyed longevity by eating pine resin. 
Fengren lightly lifted his body to the sky by eating nuts of the cypress tree. 
What the elixir imbues is enough to support life and sustain the body. 
Inwardly they are not peaceful if they rely on their outward appearance. 
They vainly climbed into the clouds, fell, and died. 
It is esteemed to be able to ﬂy, yet even moths and butterﬂies can ﬂy high. 
It is wonderful that one hardly grows old, yet even turtles and snakes live long. 
While we make ourselves comfortable in this inn (i.e., this transient world) only the mind should be treasured. 
Those who wish to sustain the body are not worthy of discussing the spirit with us. 
Those who are familiar with secular customs cannot talk about the Way with us. 
Those who try to inquire about it are at a loss in asking, and those who try to answer are conﬁned in themselves. 
As for the dark-colored pearl and the explanation of the Way, I would say that has no phenomenon and has nothing to say. 
If we keep still and silent, there are admonitions in the profound response. 
Ever since a man of Ying, died, who can serve as a chopping board for the artisan ?391 (i.e., what can we do without those things on which we have relied?) Even if one [has completed preparations to know the Way, just as one] sets up a bamboo ﬁsh trap in deep water or sets a snare in a dense vegetation, waiting for a ﬁsh in the river or a rabbit in the forest, if he attains the meaning beyond what is spoken then as soon as he has seen it he should abandon the mind. 
We respectfully expect to benevolently edify us. 
Even though the divine reins move swiftly, the mechanism of causality is unending. 
There is no beginning and no end in it , but there is a beginning and end with oneself. 
People temporarily take steps the end of a streak of bright lightning, and they breathe amid violent winds that carry stones and gravel. 
They know to fear a path and to be terriﬁed of bandits, but they puzzle over the fact that the desires caused by objects of the six sense organs have invited the foreign . 
People neglect what is profound and superb yet covet what is familiar to them. 
They think that luxury and frugality are both aspects of wealth. 
After the strong winds have stripped , they think 263 to return to the beginning and try to make more beautiful than before. 
Even if they feel regret myriad times, how could their be satisﬁed? 
Consequently, those who have made a great oath burn their ﬁngers and bore through rocks . 
They secretly expect to attain without to wait for it. 
They draw the divine sword and brandish the halberd of the precepts. 
They weed out the six thieves from their minds and try to put an end to an expedition in the ﬁve paths. 
Folding their hands , they regulate what is internal in themselves and completely have the decisive mind to attain Dharma wisdom (Skt. 
The the three periods of existence will then all be extinguished and their minds will become entirely open. 
Even if they commit their ears to hearing what is not clear and consign their eyes to seeing what cannot be relied on, deﬁlements will fruitlessly fall away following and impurity will futilely dissipate along with them. 
It universally saves people and peacefully ferries them across . Who commiserates with great benevolence? 
People entrust to the lodging house in order to [mingle with the world by] tempering their brightness. 
They customarily ramble about and abide in what is deep and dark. 
They act like Heaven , and they undergo transformation just as things do.393 They are just like someone who treads water with no worry . 
If through the subtle wonders of supernatural transformation one regulates miracles, he can lift up the trichiliocosm on his palm, cause a mustard seed to contain Mount Sumeru394 and the four seas to be held within a single pore of one’s skin,395 and make the seven treasures longer than the period of a kalpa.396 These can be believed but they cannot be sought; these can be followed but they cannot be understood. 
These are not what are propagated through talking or chanting. 
How good are the words expounded by the Buddha of his own accord (Skt. 
Even if the world were full of wise people and one of them had a hundred heads, and one of those heads had a hundred tongues, and one of those tongues explained a hundred meanings with sharp and outstanding oratorical talent, and even if all those people gathered and praised the Way, would still be less than one ten-thousandth . 
Moreover, I, an ignorant bigot, respectfully give an account of under the pretext of being ambitious and too hasty. 
Am I one who tries to raise the brightness of the glow of a ﬁreﬂy and who intends to increase the light of the sun in order to assist the sun? 
The repository of numinous beings outside of this secular world is excessively far and vast. 
Of all that is subtle and wonderful, the innermost is immeasurable. 
Those who have great words unexpectedly lose . 
The virtue of Earth is deep. 
We are startled when we hear about immense gullies. 
Chinese classical books carry in their grasp of them. 
Foreign scriptures record this as if listing doors and windows. 
So he believed in the lowly and disgraceful stories of the Qi Xie.397 He saw the bird called peng and the ﬁsh called kun and indicated that they are large, but he did not see the king of birds or the mother of ﬁshes . 
Unusual and extraordinary things have accumulated but they are too subtle and extensive to record. 
are extensively arranged in the book Huanglan. 
How can we shallowly detest cut jade? 
Furthermore, why would we largely bring a false charge against textiles ﬁre?398 Moreover, below these there is the tenor of the teachings bound together, but these are the expedient baits of Emperor Yao and Confucius. 
I always 265 devote myself to and abide by the law. 
I am afraid to overstep what I am told, to completely reject reason in order to testify to statements, to not understand meanings inferring in accordance with categories, to vainly make things vast and scheme to complicate things, and further to increase suspicion and invite fear. 
I realize that I have skillfully made a display of my wisdom and astonished people. 
Therefore I will lay down my brush and stop thinking. 
I put one corner in my rough purport. 
I will wait for someone who has clear knowledge to embody truthfulness. 
End of Fascicle Thirteen of The Collection for the Propagation and Clariﬁcation Written Appeal to Mount Tai by Zhu Daoshuang I, Śramaṇa Zhu Daoshuang, dare to address the Spiritual Government Office and the messengers of the Overseer of Mount Tai, the Eastern Mountain . 
The god of earth was placed below and guarded by the Five Sacred Mountains. 
The yin and yang spread Nature’s nourishment throughout the eight directions. 
All things were born in this . 
These receive pure vapor, make use of the truth, and have no impurity of evil. 
They are the Way of the Spirit; they are spontaneous, digniﬁed, and not false. 
They follow the laws of Heaven and Earth. 
They are sincere, honest, upright, straight, tranquil, calm, profound, and pure. 
Advancing, they lead the beginning of the operations of the four seasons. 
Retreating, they follow the essence of the teaching of the ﬁve kinds of principles of human relationships.401 They conceal the disposition to understand what is subtle within and clearly show the brightness of the Way and its outﬂowing operation without. 
At the upper level they master absolute vacancy and at the lower level they nourish the masses. 
They cherish virtue and secretly understand it thoroughly. 
They roam around the nine cliffs (i.e., the edges of the world) and ﬂy with a ﬂap of the wings to Mount Xuanque [in 91c the north]. 
The Eastern Mountain is the starting point of the east and springtime, and the vapor of pure yang. 
It is in the rank of king or father, just like the constellation Nanji and the Big Dipper that are the central stars in the nine heavens, or the KingSire of the East and the Queen Mother of the West (Xi wangmu) who are the former rulers of the ultimate of nonbeing .402 ﬂies like a phoenix riding on vapor and goes to this subtle and profound world, which is clearer and more still than the primordial substance,403 and in which human beings do not exist. 
Its Way is spontaneous. 
Nevertheless, why do you use apparitions and other prodigies or specters under the pretext of the Way of the Eastern Mountain, or numinous beings who dwell on the mountain, and mislead the ignorant feelings of secular people on the basis of the wild deceptions of the wandering spirits of the dead? 
You make books about deities and artiﬁcially erect images of them. 
There is originally no record and in the end nothing to ascertain the truth. 
In your appearance there is a poisonous vapor caused by destroying the lives of living creatures, and within you a hundred evil spirits prevail. 
During the day grains and cooked rice are greatly offered to you; during the night numerous evil spirits haunt in the yard. 
These are all spirits of wolves and snakes. 
Owls and pythons vainly cry out. 
From the time the Three Augusts established the foundation up to the present time, when the tradition is transmitted, I have never seen such a divine message among what has been respected for successive generations. 
Therefore, the Records of Minor Conquest says,404 “When the spirit is right, its light is hidden in dimness. 
It goes up high above to the celestial bodies, and plays below at Mount Xuanque . 
It roams around in the clouds’ shadows and soars like a dragon to the eight ends of the universe. 
A wind rises and rain is distributed. Nature’s nourishment is just like thunder and lightning. 
Even though no lunch basket is provided, foods of numerous ﬂavors are spontaneously offered. 
Its kindness is as bright as the morning sunlight. 
If you eat in accordance with Heaven, you will not destroy the life of numerous living creatures.” This is a subtle principle regarding the wonderful soaring and the Way of the Spirit that is pure and free from prejudice. 
If the spirit is not right, it offends all things. 
According to the circumstances or when taking advantage of divine messages, conveys to secular people things that confuse them. 
The lives of numerous living creatures are cut off, living creatures who are in the middle of their lives are unfairly killed and their bones and ﬂesh are put on a cutting board [in order to offer them to the wrong spirit]. 
The people’s minds then become scattered and their primordial energy is painfully injured. 
How could the deity of the Eastern Mountain be considered in this way? 
Therefore, the Zhenzhong jie says,405 “Those who bear vapor, those who wriggle, and numerous insects should not be harmed.406 Never eat the eggs of birds. 
[All living things] receive life from the primordial energy of Heaven and form their bodies in the yard of Earth. 
At their origin they received [their lives and bodies] from the two polarities . 
Many people bear benevolence in mind, so they do not kill others, obeying Heaven. 
It is needless to mention the taking of the lives of pigs and sheep and drinking their blood . 
From this, we can infer that is not the spirit. 
Furthermore, the true deities of the Five Sacred Mountains are the symbols of the spirits. 
They receive the Way, so they are pure and free from prejudice. They have neither voice nor sound. 
They take no pleasure in being respected and they do not feel sadness even if they are disrespected. 
They have no sense of beneﬁt or loss even if they are praised a thousand times or slandered ten thousand times. 
Nevertheless, you falsely say, “, disguised as living people, become angry groundlessly and eat butchered 92a . 
Those who follow them are granted favors, but those who disobey them receive misfortune.” Your course of action is unjust and false. 
You defame and disgrace the true deities. 
It is not their Way. 
Therefore, the section called the “Record of the Midst of Profundity” of the Huangluozi jing says,407 “One who claims to be the deity of a mountain is most certainly a python or a snake. 
One who calls himself the deity of a large river or the sea must be a sea turtle, an alligator, a ﬁsh, or a freshwater turtle. 
One who represents himself as the parent deity of Heaven and Earth is certainly a wild animal such as a cat or raccoon dog. 
One who assumes the title of the deity of generals must be a bear, brown bear, tiger, or leopard. 
One who calls himself the deity of ofﬁcials must be a small or large monkey. 
One who refers to himself as the deity of a household is most certainly a dog, sheep, pig, or cow.” Mischievous spirits incarnate themselves as categories such as a door, a well, a furnace, or broken utensils. 
They all call themselves deities but they are only vapor of vicious spirits that frighten people. 
The energies of obscene spirits are all recorded in scriptures and clearly analyzed in commentaries. 
More than six years have passed from the time you made the assertion of fortune and misfortune. 
You invite people from remote places in the four directions. There is no one who does not promptly respond to you. 
Those who escort a sick person and come to you, are like a small stream ﬂowing to the sea, but the grief of those who take their dead back from you ﬁlls the road. 
A person with a minor illness easily recovers; you then praise yourself your good fortune to him. 
If it is difﬁcult for you to save someone with an advanced disease, you have no favor. 
The disease of the ancient state of Zhongrong was not cured by you.408 You had no efﬁcacy in these two cases. 
You try to cause a large number of people to join themselves to you and take refuge in you. 
Without a good physician and good medicine, even those who take the tonsure cannot subdue [the demon of disease]. 
Even after ten days or a month have passed, there would be no sign and response . 
Furthermore, at the great beginning of the country King Huan was installed as a feudal lord.409 He bestowed virtuous relationships on the six states, restrained the assistance of the Three Communicating Agencies , and gloriﬁed the Imperial house. 
Heavenly calamity, accidentally befell him and his body was attacked by a minor illness. 
He thought that your god of the land could reveal the mysterious virtue. 
Consequently, he propagated your virtue and believed in your command. 
He visited your sanctuary, offered three kinds of livestock , and gave an additional gift of rare and precious things. 
If you represent the sacred Way, if you can communicate with Heaven, and if you can achieve what is subtle, why is it that you could not remove his illness and attain peace for him by informing the Nine Augusts above, consulting with the god of the earth below, gathering a hundred numinous beings, manifesting a miracle, or utilizing the good assistants of the country? 
Since there was no prompt efﬁcacy , suddenly passed away. 
We have veriﬁed these kinds of falsehoods. 
Moreover, in ancient times the stones on Mount Tai stood by themselves and the altar of the god of the land moved. Divine spirits sent down omens. This legend has been passed down for ten thousand generations. 
You claim the sacredness [of Mount Tai] for yourself. 
You are not able to manifest supernatural virtue by raising clouds and causing rain at all. 
You plot evil in order to damage the true Way. 
Even if you are able to move chopsticks along the surface of a tray and completely drink wine by lifting a cup, it is similar to performing supernatural magic. 
Moreover, there is no evidence that you do. What deity is there? 
Furthermore, Mount Tai is ruled by King Yama. 
His domain is dark and obscure, different from this world in its mysteriousness. 
The messengers of the Overseer send down in the same manner as deities do. 
Myriad evils are all recorded, even if they are triﬂing. 
Trivial acts of wholesomeness 92b are unimportant but nothing is left out . 
All spirits are completely collected ; it is not a government ofﬁce with which living people must comply. 
Nevertheless, why do harmful spirits falsely state this purpose, throw off all restraint at will among human beings, and deceive and jeopardize people in all respects? 
Among the trees of a dense forest or in a ﬁeld full of magpies, they draw together or move around. 
They are enumerated in books of ceremonies from remote to the present . 
They assemble men and women and plant earthly desires in their minds. 
Their foul vapor invites misfortune from the external world. The hooting of an owl spreads out into the distance. 
Their poisons accumulate in the king’s territory, become harmful, and increase exceedingly. 
Clouds and fog cover the sky. Various kinds of evil conceal what is right. 
Many things are harmed through your weird and peculiar means. 
Even though I am but an insigniﬁcant follower, I fully step up to the rank of the Three Seasonal Tailoring Groups . 
I often read classic books and commentaries and now I see these calamities. 
Inferring from ancient matters and examining present matters, evil does not go along with good. 
I will wash away impurity and brightly raise the sacred Way. 
I inform you that I will strictly investigate the faction of mischievous spirits and make them return to the graveyards to roam about there. 
If they eat fruit and drink spring water, it is enough for them to open a path to living. 
This then causes the masses to cut off the trouble of exhausting their wealth and the birds and animals to not be killed in snares. 
If there are still some spirits that turn their heads around, feel a persistent attachment , and do not leave here, hoping for food, then I will summon deities such as the divine king Vaiśravaṇa and Rāṣṭrapāla, to whom I will grant vajra. 
I will station a military division of true that are brave and sternly powerful. They will rigorously move the trichiliocosm. 
The mere posture of couching their shining spears or drawing their bright swords can break a mountain into pieces, subdue dragons, and bring demons to their knees. 
You are a minor spirit. 
I think of benevolence and feel pity for you for what you do. 
When I warn you of this danger and worry about you, my heart hurts. 
Quickly appear before me and return to your original form! 
Go on a long journey myriad miles back to blue waves on the seashore! 
Do not stay here any longer! 
Show your submission and do as I have ordered! 
Written Appeal to the Demon by Shi Zhijing410 I, Shi Zhijing, repeatedly bow to you with my head to the ground. 
Your Excellency and I have traveled on different ferries in the profound path, but human beings and Heaven are uniﬁed. 
Even though our most honored masters differ from each other, we are fundamentally the same in terms of being in the three realms of existence. 
At the present time the Dharma King manages the world and everyone in the ten directions desires to follow him. 
The marvelous net is precisely spread and the large rope of the net is seized completely. 
There is the tide for the Great Pervader to prevail411 and the lofty assembly will soon be held. 
I cannot stand up eagerly longing for it, so I am simply writing this to make my intention clear. 
The times that are blocked have a way to be opened. 
A thousand sages hand on from one to another. A great number of teachers inherit this in succession. 
In ancient times, our great founder, the heavenly king Ultimate Source , embodied the functions of all changes and ascended the throne in the original region in accordance with an auspicious omen sent down from Heaven. 
He relied on the expedient form and subjugated all countries. 
He powerfully washed away the four evils412 and cleansed the three realms of existence. 
He brought calmness to the remote backward regions in the seven directions and paciﬁed and uniﬁed the nine lands . 
92c Nevertheless, the profound laws of nature were not sympathetic to him. His true appearance became tranquil. 
The double brightness [of the sun and moon] stopped the luminosity and waves capsized an empty boat. 
Consequently, this caused evil to arise one after another, just as when ants , and views like an owl to develop ﬁercely. 
The true path was dimmed and polluted. Pure people became stained and confused. 
Cruelty accumulated among the masses. Poison ﬂowed for myriad kalpas. 
Sentient beings who cherish the Way in mind have different thoughts from one another but they come to anger in the same way. 
Our Dharma King received the mandate [of Heaven, appeared in this world] as occasion demands in order to rectify confusions. 
He was born as an heir of a noble house of the upper level , and charged himself with numerous people’s minds on the lower level. 
He held in hand the star called the Heavenly Banner and encompassed the trichiliocosm. 
He took a ﬁrm grip of the sacred chart and caused the great enterprise to prosper. 
Clouds arose in the four palaces and the auspicious bird luan ﬂew to India, when the spirit descended to Kapilavastu and made the moat of time around the city. 
He encouraged and led people’s minds and offered comfort and instruction to the sick. 
He adorned his heart with the axe of wisdom, wore the wondrous armor on his body, sympathized with the eighteen innocent people,413 and felt sad that the path to the three kinds of emptiness was cut off. 
He was determined to relieve in the end of the world and had to conquer many difﬁculties. 
You are unafraid that serious delusions may cover you; you are deeply attracted by silly thoughts; so you stick to false views; like a wolf, you occupy a heaven of the realm of desire; like an owl, you hoot at a mysterious watchtower; you betray and leave [your allies] at national borders; you oppose the divine principle; and you think that you are able to ascend the Throne and change great laws. 
Looking at even just two or three of these issues causes me to draw a deep breath. 
Formerly Mahābhijñājñānābhibhū governed the world and all regions depended on him, just as a shadow follows . 
There was a deceitful idiotic heavenly demon who did not observe the right principles, disobeyed the will of Heaven, and disturbed deities’ minds. 
Soldiers led ﬁlled the empty sky, took temporary forms, and variously transformed. 
Their ﬁne armor gleamed in the sunlight and their pointed spears wiped out the area. 
Mysterious drums vied with one another in their loud pounding. 
vigorously walked about or ran around, thinking themselves to be strong and energetic. 
Once King army rose in force the group of evil spirits was brought to an end. 
Needless to say, you are only a single general and try to be valiant. 
Nevertheless, you intend to go against , usurp and oppress the splendid capital city, seize the powers of the spiritual world, and ﬂy over the Supreme One . 
If you disgrace truth with falsity, you are really wrong. 
Today Śākyamuni governs the world. 
His subtle ediﬁcation is vast and his supernatural net is stretched even in remote places. 
Intelligent people are harmonious. They are counted as numerous as clouds; they cover the world. 
Warriors leap like dragons. 
Sadāprarudita, Commissioned with Extraordinary Powers, Vanguard General-in-Chief, Commander-in-Chief of Jambudvīpa, and the Marquis who Pledges Allegiance to Justice, you alone received the heavenly wonder and ﬂew from the capital Mysterious Mirror . 
Your spirit is as lofty as Mount Sumeru. Your brave energy encompasses the world. 
You are skilled in military affairs and you have completed literary arts. Your loyalty is famous in the Imperial palace. 
Lead forty trillion people, collect your horse, and go to battle! 
Guru ,414 Commissioned with Extraordinary Powers, General-in-Chief of the Subjugation of Remote Lands, Commander-in-Chief of the Four Heavens, and Duke of Trāyastriṃśa, you are preeminent in military skill and your literary skill surpasses great schemes. 
93a You are concerned about the times and forget yourself. 
Lead a hundred trillion people and ﬂy like the great bird luan to the thoroughfare of Heaven! 
Vimukticandra, Commissioned with Extraordinary Powers, General-inChief of the Expeditionary Force Against Demons, Commander-in-Chief of the Six Heavens, and King of Tuṣita Heaven, your subtle thoughts are very profound, and you loftily walk outside of this world. 
kumāra-bhūta) and your merit is equal to that of in the ninth stage. 
You mournfully feel compassion for beings in the three lowest realms of existence. 
You think to rise up in force, going around and around just like a dragon . 
Lead four hundred trillion people and revolve around the heavenly gate just as clouds do! 
Vajragarbha, Commissioned with Extraordinary Powers, Proﬁcient in Subtlety General-in-Chief, Commander-in-Chief of the Seven Heavens, and King of the Four Meditation Heavens, your bright disposition shines and reﬂects. 
Your golden face illuminates even remote places. Your kindness is greater than the place where the sun rises. 
You have the physical strength to overthrow mountains and seas. 
When you glance to your right, waves splash in the Meng and Fan Rivers. 
When you gaze to your left, even the gleam of the divine tree called fusang is diminished.415 There is no place that your virtue does not illuminate. 
Lead seven hundred trillion people and glare ﬁercely, just like a tiger, on Mount Sumeru! 
Great Vimalakīrti, Commissioned with Extraordinary Powers, Garrison General-in-Chief, Commander-in-Chief of the Nine Heavens, and King of the Bodhisattvas of the Eighth Stage, your outstanding schemes are marvelous. 
You grieve for innocent people who have many hardships. 
Lead nine hundred trillion people and let the horses drink water at a ferry of the sky! 
Great Mañjuśrī, Commissioned with Extraordinary Powers, General-inChief of Illuminating the Coming Age, Commander-in-Chief of the Thirteen Heavens, Military Supervisor of the Small Thousand Worlds , and King of the Bodhisattvas of the Ninth Stage, you are a descendant who has received the origin from remote times. 
You are descended from [the Celestial Thearch of] the Palace of Purple Tenuity (the constellation to which the polar star is central). Your mind is lofty and your physical body is great. 
Your profound schemes number in the tens of thousands. 
You deeply hold benevolence in mind and possess all the four methods of winning people over in your heart. 
Lead people as numerous as particles of dust and soar up from this land! 
Avalokiteśvara, Commissioned with Extraordinary Powers, General-inChief of Reforming the World with the Teaching, Military Supervisor of Recording of Demons, Commandant Against Various Evils, and King of the Middle Thousand Worlds , your resources are profound. 
With the axe of wisdom you invigorate in remote lands. 
You clearly master the four ways to enlightenment and brightly examine the three kinds of deﬁlements. 
You sometimes appear among numerous evil beings and rise with irresistible force to perform a feat. 
When you wave your hand the iron rocks of Mount Iron Surroundings (Skt. Cakravāḍa) are smashed. 
When you exhale a single breath from your mouth the drifting clouds break apart on a cliff. 
In all directions you are able to be a friend who helps people without being asked to do so. 
Great Maitreya, Commissioned with Extraordinary Powers, General-inChief of the Promulgation of Ediﬁcation, Commander-in-Chief of the Three 93b Realms of Existence, and King Who Will Take Up a Buddha’s Place [in the Next Life], you have an excellent body with which you cast the net [of the law]. 
Your natural constitution is outstanding. 
Your body is stronger than vajra and your mind encompasses the world beyond this world. 
Your brave energy soars into the clouds and with the axe of wisdom you invigorate in remote lands. 
With the wisdom of expediency you conform to the outside of this phenomenal world. 
Regarding what you plan with your determination, you are successful wherever you go. 
Lead eightyfour thousand people and wait for our order, taking strict precautions! 
The trichiliocosm is brimful of brave warriors. 
Vajra ﬁghters ﬁll the eight ends of the universe . 
They ride the honorable chariots of all the pāramitās, guard the long eightfold holy path to enlightenment, sit astraddle on the divine horses of the six supernatural powers, and control the spiritual reins of the ultimate law of profound emptiness. 
They draw the powerful bows of the four stages of meditation and shoot the sharp arrows of a temporary manifestation (i.e., an incarnation of a buddha or bodhisattva). 
receive orders from the Imperial court. They have never failed. 
The guru of your domain has only ﬁve hundred distinctive people. 
You should deeply examine the mandate of Heaven and come to submit to our king’s ediﬁcation. 
His Majesty will open his heart to you, be moved by your intention to submit, confer ofﬁcial positions and titles of nobility upon all of you, and award ﬁefs as well. 
Your achievement will be considered equal to that of vassals of long service. 
Nevertheless, what frame of mind do you possess? You unreasonably give rise to a peculiar plot. You are haughty in a deserted border region and scheme to strengthen a permanent position. 
harmful inﬂuence will break out among the masses and disasters will ﬂow eternally. 
How sad this is! 
It is really wrong! 
Formerly, according to circumstances, you were misled by objects. 
Your mind was unrestrained and confused. You plunged yourself into danger and escaped to the non-Buddhist teaching. 
If someone makes a single mistake out of a hundred acts, even though he may be wise and virtuous he loses his normal state . 
Why do you choose ignorance, cling to absurdity, and seek merely temporary ease in an evil position? 
You commit yourself to the mountain of ignorance and consider yourself to be lofty. 
You rely on the grove of wrong views and rest in comfort. 
You indulge in the deﬁlements of the six desires, amuse yourself with evil delusions, and please your spirit. 
You raise the standard of arrogance aloft, lead the ferocious battle array of ignorance, stride along a deserted path, and make light of the sacred treasures. 
You try to usurp the heavenly palace and compete with the sun and moon. 
I am afraid that you will not be successful. 
Your splendid features are bright and shining and you are the center of public attention. 
You should apologize for your faults at the red gate . 
When everything is set in order by the Way, family and nation coexist, the sovereign and his vassals are equally eminent, your body and fame are secure, you are able to understand with a philosophic eye, and your dependents are peaceful and easy. 
The King’s army now sets the time to take the ﬁeld. In the ten directions the reins are raised. 
carry trumpet shells in their hands. A group of sages dance in unison. 
The axe of the Way glitters in the vanguard and mysterious drums roar in the rear guard. 
Once the spiritual bell has been struck the ten directions will be overturned, 93c the waves of the sea will splash, and lands will quake, just like a boiling . 
At this moment, Mount Sumeru is enclosed within a particle of dust and Heaven and Earth revolve within a millet grain. 
Akṣobhya is put in the left palm and wondrous happiness shines in the right palm. 
Given that the supernatural power is like this, how could you face it? 
Our Dharma King who has mastered the Way is benevolent. 
He has scruples about easily attacking you, temporarily stops all military forces, and collects the reins of divine for the moment. 
At the very moment to go to the front, he had me send this letter to you, hoping that you will order your deluded vehicles to about-face. 
Your gloriﬁed name will then shine within you and your freely moving body will sojourn in the external world. 
Who else but you, then, could take an ofﬁcial post of the celestial realm? 
Wisdom is to clearly know a crucial point; intelligence is to value avoiding calamities. 
This is precisely the best time to turn misfortune into a blessing and a good opportunity to secure merit. 
In ancient times, when King Jie of the Xia dynasty was a tyrant, King of the Yin dynasty subjugated him; when King Zhou of the Shang dynasty was the principal of disorder, King Wu of the Zhou dynasty took up arms against him. 
These are exactly that were divined with stalks and tortoise shell, and they serve as comprehensible lessons for generals . 
Even though you and I are against each other in these years, our intellectual style in the sense of the Way should be the same. 
Human and heavenly beings are uneasy and troubled, but why is it worth causing a separation between us ? 
Why I secretly feel sad about these words and yet still send a letter describing all this in full detail is that I do not wish to cause a fragrant orchid to wither in summer or cut its stalk until it is destroyed (i.e., I do not want to cause you to come to ruin in the prime time of your life). 
Deeply think about my statements! 
Make a good consideration by yourself! 
Do not cause yourself to fall into the three lowest realms of existence! 
Do not cause the six heavens to raise worthless grass! 
I feel anxious when I take a quick sidelong look at your situation. 
I send you this letter on the verge of taking the ﬁeld. 
Written Appeal to Destroy Demons Composed by Shi Baolin On the ﬁrst day of the month when the ﬁve deﬁlements vigorously arise, just as water in a cauldron boils up, and the current life span of people is a hundred years, in the year of the minutest particle of the trichiliocosm in the Auspicious Kalpa , your vassal Vajragarbha, Commissioned with Extraordinary Powers, Commander-in-Chief of All Military Affairs in the World of Gaṅgānadīvālukā, General-in-Chief of an Expeditionary Force Against Demons, Regional Inspector of the Pure Province, and King of the Bodhisattvas of the Tenth Stage; your vassal Vimukticandra, Commissioned with Extraordinary Powers, Commander-in-Chief of All Military Affairs in the World of Eighty Thousand Pāramitās, General of Destruction of Deﬁlements, Commandant of Leading Demonic Barbarians, Minister of War, Regional Inspector of the Brahman Province, and Duke of the Bodhisattvas of the Eighth Stage; and others bow with our heads to the ground, bow with folded palms, and present to the Imperial Secretary of the Imperial Court. 
We think respectfully that the whole world is equally illuminated by the numinous mirror , numerous streams return to the king of all the valley streams ,416 myriad transformations are equal to what is empty and profound, and all wonders take absolute intelligence as the foundation. 
Therefore, the Tathāgata went beyond the serious darkness of confusion and alone arose. 
With regard to the fact that his distinguished appearance is outstanding and extraordinary and his supernatural light is glorious, even if a thousand suns shine at the same time, is assuredly unparalleled. 
manifests in myriad forms but this does not mean that are too numerous. 
His true form unites with what is the most subtle but this does not mean that it is the same. 
He manifests in the ﬁve realms of existence corresponding to but this does not mean that he is born . 
He demonstrated entering through physical death but this does not mean that he was extinguished. 
His depth is immeasurable and his breadth is unknown. 
He responds to many people’s feelings yet he is not troubled. 
He provides for myriad movements but he is always tranquil. 
He quickly goes through as many kalpas as there are grains of sand in the Ganges River. 
Even if the two polarities (i.e., Heaven and Earth) were to fall down he can never be harmed. 
If he is visited by a disastrous ﬁre he will not be not burned. 
If he is immersed in a torrent he will not drown. 
Someone who possesses profound literary knowledge is still unqualiﬁed to clarify the Way. 
The enormity contains the whole world, but this cannot describe his greatness. 
His ﬁneness goes into inﬁnitesimal space between things but this cannot describe his minuteness. 
His ediﬁcation holds both the Originator and the Mother of all things. 
He does nothing [just for the sake of doing it], yet there is nothing that he does not do.418 He soars on the path of complying with mutation and saunters about in the world beyond existence and nonexistence. 
He is peaceful in the state of nirvana. 
The two vehicles conceal their thoughts in the tenor of emptiness as emptiness. 
The Brahmā King sighs with praise and takes refuge in the virtue. 
Śakra-devānām-indra keeps in mind and detests being in the rank . 
went out of the ﬁve realms of existence and rose just like a dragon. 
He is prominent in the world beyond emperors. 
His Way is the most powerful in the three realms of existence and his virtue covers the ten directions. 
The areas near the capital are as numerous as grains of sand in the Ganges River and his capital city is the trichiliocosm. 
He is at rest in the comfortable room of the nine kinds of meditation , ascends the lofty mansion of the seven factors of wisdom , washes in the clean pond of the eight kinds of meditation leading to liberation , and roams about in the spacious garden of dhāraṇī. 
Thereafter he resides in the palace of benevolence, places himself on the seat equal to emptiness, wears the minor marks of physical excellence as his imperial ceremonial dress, and has a topknot as his heavenly cap. 
He appoints the one who belongs to Maitreya as Minister of the Left and a peer of Mañjuśrī as Minister of the Right. 
Graceful hymns of Mahayana sutras are sung before him and the bells and whisks of the four methods of winning people over dance behind him. 
He is guarded by ofﬁcers who have mastered the contemplation for bodhisattvas of the eighth stage, and he is attended by numerous eminent transcendents who have attained the four fruits. 
Ofﬁcials of the Three Communicating Agencies are all sages and the Six Tax Supervisors have only wise people.419 Thereupon, the Duke of Zhou and Confucius propagate the teaching. 
Yao and Shun preside over . 
King Tang and King Wu elevate the great authority. 
The Regional Governors are the Three Augusts. 
When ediﬁcation is accomplished the level thoroughfare of the eightfold holy path to enlightenment becomes evener, the ferries of the three vehicles are opened to all directions, the wonderful residences of wuwei are arranged, severe suffering are liberated from deﬁlement, the crooked paths of the three lowest realms of existence are closed off, pleasure is opened to heavenly and human beings, the stage of fruition is considered a 94b title of nobility, and the meal of nectar is taken as ofﬁcial pay. 
Those who have great merit are rewarded with a ﬁef of the Pure Land. 
Those who have small merit are directed to the peace of the city created by supernatural powers . 
This is what goes beyond the great enterprises of all kings and the highest administration of the world of great peace. 
The ﬁve realms of existence are the pure Imperial court for government ofﬁcials. 
The four modes of birth are the culmination for those in the ofﬁcers’ ranks. 
They are pleased by familiar satisfaction, just as that keep one another wet by tiny bubbles on the surface of water completely forget about distant rivers and lakes.420 Therefore Devil King Pāpīyas planted the root of ignorance in himself at the very beginning, accumulated delusions in his mind in the illusory world, drifted on the turbulent waves of the three major evil passions,421 and entered the dense forest of perverted views. 
Consequently he has come to stealthily make sport of the sacred treasures, avail himself of falsehood, and profane the truth. 
He boastfully reigns over the heavenly palace and divides the high mountains and lands . 
He issues a command to the six heavens of the realm of desire as he likes and indulges in the power of prejudice. 
Internally he designates various poisons as the three dukes and the nine kinds of deﬁlement as ministers. 
Externally he employs the six coverings (greed, breaking precepts, anger, indolence, distraction, and ignorance) as his generals and the four kinds of deﬁlement (delusion regarding the self, the view that the self exists, self-conceit, and attachment to the self) as soldiers. 
Internally he rampantly acts in deﬁance of authority; he is not afraid of ordinances of the August . 
His light is as feeble as the glow of a ﬁreﬂy yet he still competes with the sun for brightness. 
Consequently he has recently challenged the divine authority and risen in arms against the bodhi tree. 
He raises his voice just as Lord Thunder makes a sudden peal of thunder, and he arranges people in a line just as Mount Khadiraka belches out ﬁre. 
He has caused disorder in China for a long time. 
The Sage King laments that confused people are deaf and blind . 
He is saddened by the fact that a young person who has lost his way grows more homesick. 
He will unite numerous evil people in order to equalize their views, and will assemble the nine heretical schools in order to cause them to get on board the same ferry. 
Hereupon, orders his followers who have great powers to be his generals and selects soldiers from among the vajra ; these are men who eat gold and chew iron and people who can break up ice or walk through ﬁre. 
Brave soldiers are as numerous as particles of dust and sand. 
They move like a shooting star, rise like a wind, and prance like a dragon in the devils’ territory. 
The corps is stationed according to a carefully thought-out plan and press their enemies to the ﬁeld of inevitable death. 
Nevertheless, the devil rebels do not behave themselves prudently. 
They oppose us by ignoring the order, just as the states of Zong and Kuai did,424 unfurl a commanding ﬂag in the land of self-conceit, and solidify deﬁlement on the steep mountain of a multitude of delusions. 
The soldiers of deﬁlement alternately watch for just like jackals in a border region. 
The generals of the six coverings walk just like tigers on a long thoroughfare. 
When you gaze into the distance, it looks just as it does when clouds rise and cover the sky and fog envelops the whole world. 
The vigor of is a rare case since the creation of the world. 
Skilled cavalry and foot soldiers surround a thousand or ten thousand times over. 
Covering the battle ﬁeld, the reserve forces are stationed at positions of strategic importance. 
General Dāna in the front line watches the ﬂag of parsimony and advances straight ahead. 
General Vīrya in the rear pushes soldiers of indolence to the back. 
Dhyāna captures the cavalry of sloth on the left. 
Śīla defends against [the soldiers of] wickedness on the right. 
Upāya of the outer army moves the cavalry to a steppe and causes the soldiers of frivolity to run swiftly to the point under cross-examination and submission. 
We set up the dangerous machinery in hidden places. 
Prajñā of the central army grasps the subtle mirror of the profound pivot, handles the wonderful art of victory, controls myriad powerful generals, and possesses as many strong soldiers as there are particles of dust and sand. 
Hereupon all our forces act in concert and vie with each other in advancing on myriad paths. 
Their minds move the world and their voices shake Heaven and Earth. 
The brightness of their drawn swords dazzles people’s eyes even more than sunshine. 
The sound of the Dharma drums mixes with thunderclaps. 
Swift elephants jump and run around. 
The bow of meditation is like smoke going up or clouds rising. 
The arrows of wisdom ﬂy like a shower and drift into the air. 
wield the whip of provisional name and tread onto the steppe of does-not-exist . 
They burnish themselves through the lion’s roar (i.e., the Buddha’s exposition of the Dharma), pierce with the sound that suffering is emptiness, wield Ganjiang and cut [the enemy solders] to pieces, and brandish spears and lances, vying with each other to win victory. 
We lay the corpses of deﬁlement down and cover the ﬁeld with them. 
The blood of the deﬁlement runs just as a long river does. 
We demolish the high and steep mountain of ignorance, dry up the great stream of lust, drive those who defy to the cave of various wrong views, and crush impertinence in the nest of the seven kinds of self-conceit. 
Thereupon, even if the devil rebels can make their way, they have lost the spirit to oppose. 
Even though they try to retreat, they have no hiding place where they hope to escape . 
They run about anxiously but there is nothing on which they can depend. 
Devil King ’s hands are tied behind his back and he is brought before the military tribunal. 
All heavenly beings arise just as lightning ﬂashes and take refuge in ediﬁcation. 
Confused people come swiftly as the wind to receive their ﬁrst light of the sun (i.e., the Buddhist teaching). 
The power of the August wipes out just as the sun melts morning frost or the whole water of a great stream is poured to extinguish a bonﬁre. 
Therefore, in the morning we cause the enemies who have absconded for myriad generations to collapse just like a landslide and purge the difﬁculties from ancient times in China within a brief moment. 
This is truly the wonderful achievement of the spiritual assembly by the holy August , and an excellent meritorious deed that is rare in the world. 
Formerly King Tang of the Yin dynasty [defeated King Jie of the Xia dynasty and] established merit as great as a cloud in the outskirts of the Xia dynasty; King Wu of the Zhou dynasty exterminated [King Zhou of the Yin dynasty] and cleansed the atmosphere in the pasture of the Shang dynasty. 
How could it be possible to view as equal to the achievement of our Sage? 
Thereupon, I reverently propagate the Imperial plan and pacify those who adhere to for the ﬁrst time. 
I content them with the house equal to emptiness, ﬁll them with the stream of the eight kinds of meditation leading to liberation , defend them from through the propriety of the precepts and the wholesome acts, and cause them to follow the breeze of the six pāramitās. 
Old people understand to follow the truth in a new song, and young wanderers hear for the ﬁrst time the sound of “Let me return !”425 To be punished in accordance with Heaven’s decree is the way of the Spring and Autumn era. 
To render a meritorious deed and suppress a rebellion are acts that are praised by former kings. 
The profound breeze incites remote areas. Those within the territory of our state have joy in their minds. 
In the imperial court there is the song of “ will be happily performed!”426 and outside the government there is the song of “happy borders!”427 merits are high and his Way is great. 
His sacred thoughts are deep and profound, and they cannot be described in words. 
I have brieﬂy itemized the Imperial authority and the methods of wonderful schemes. 
Moreover, I have displayed the vigorous power of our military. 
Our courier who travels as fast as lightning goes quickly, like a shooting star, . 
We, the vassals , sincerely humble ourselves and clap our hands in joy. 
Having become free from giving sermons, I again somehow prolong the day . 
I hope that those who are fond of the wrong way will return before they go too far. 
A sutra says, “Nirvana is nonarising and yet there is nothing that is not brought into existence. 
The most genuine intelligence is non-illuminating and yet there is nothing that is not illuminated. 
Only the Tathāgata [possesses both of these].”428 Victory is not won through the merit of shields and spears. 
To invade territory is not achieved through a powerful army that is well known in the world. 
An emperor or king is not esteemed just for being in that rank. 
Regarding supreme rulers’ vassals, not only those of Lord Huan or Lord Wen are noble. 
The teaching of Confucius and the Duke of Zhou is far at this point. 
The words of Laozi and Zhuangzi appear to be similar to but they are not equal to . 
Therefore, we know that the foundation of truth exists beyond the views of the common people, and that the most August is the king within the true mirror. 
Middle-class people hesitate between existence and nonexistence. 
The ignorant people of the lowest class are surprised and laugh in a state of permanent confusion. 
I hope now that those who read this will abandon their conceit, which is just like that of Hebo, who was happy about the abundant water in the river in autumn, [showing that he had no knowledge that there is more water in the Northern Sea], and that they will go to a distance and enjoy themselves at the profound gate of Ruo, of the Northern Sea who ruled over vast expanses of water].429 We should not bind our minds with the familiar teaching or frighten our spirit with absurd doctrines. 

This is the case when a person has not cultivated the body, has not cultivated virtue, has not cultivated the mind, has not cultivated wisdom, and his life span is very short. This is the case of a person who, having done an unwholesome action, must experience suffering as its fruit by hell as a result Again, there is a person who has done an unwholesome action and must experience suffering as its fruit by the result in this life. 
Why must a person who has done an unwholesome action experience suffering as its fruit by the result in this life? 
This is the case when a person has cultivated the body, has cultivated virtue, has cultivated the mind, has cultivated wisdom, and his life span is very long. This is the case of a person who, having done an unwholesome action, must experience suffering as its fruit by the result in this life. 
It is just as when a person owes another person a hundred coins, yet is not arrested by the creditor, and would not be arrested by him even for owing a thousand or ten thousand coins. 
Why is it that a person who owes another person a hundred coins is not arrested by the creditor, and would not be arrested by him even for owing a thousand or ten thousand coins? 
This is the case when the debtor has property beyond measure and is extremely powerful, and because of that, despite owing 67434a another person a hundred coins, is not arrested by the creditor, and would not be arrested by him even for owing a thousand or ten thousand coins. 
This is the case of a person who owes another person a hundred coins, yet is not arrested by the creditor, and would not be arrested by him even for owing a thousand or ten thousand coins. 
It is the same with a person who has done an unwholesome action, he must experience suffering as its fruit by the result in this life. 
Why is it that a person who has done an unwholesome action must experience suffering as its fruit by the result in this life? 
This is the case when a person has cultivated the body, has cultivated virtue, has cultivated the mind, has cultivated wisdom, and his life span is very long. This is the case of a person who, having done an unwholesome action, must experience suffering as its fruit by the result in this life. He experiences the result for wholesome and unwholesome actions in this life, and only to a moderate degree. 
This is what the Buddha said. 
Having heard the Buddha’s words, the monks were delighted and remembered them well. ****** 12. The Discourse to Vappa ****** Thus have I heard: 
At one time, the Buddha was staying among the Sakyans at Kapilavatthu, in the Nigrodha Park. 
At that time, after the midday meal, Venerable Mahā Moggallāna was sitting in the assembly hall together with a company of monks for some purpose. 
Then a Sakyan by the name of Vappa, a disciple of the Nigaṇṭhas, wandering around after noon, approached Venerable Mahā Moggallāna and, after exchanging greetings, sat down to one side. 
Then Venerable Mahā Moggallāna asked about this matter: What do you think, Vappa? 
If a monk is restrained in body, speech, and mind, do you see any possible cause owing to which unwholesome taints might arise, leading to future existence? 
Vappa replied: 
Mahā Moggallāna, if a monk is restrained in body, speech, and mind, I do see a possible cause owing to which unwholesome taints might 68 arise, leading to future existence. 
Mahā Moggallāna, if someone has done unwholesome actions in a previous existence, then owing to that, unwholesome taints will arise, leading to future existence. 
after this the World-honored One, who was meditating in a solitary place, heard with the purified divine ear, which surpasses that of human beings, the conversation between Venerable Mahā Moggallāna and Vappa the Sakyan, a disciple of the Nigaṇṭhas. 
Hearing it, the World-honored One rose from his afternoon meditation, went toward the assembly hall, and sat down on a prepared seat in front of the assembly of monks. 
Having sat down, the Worldhonored One asked: 
Moggallāna, what matter were you discussing with Vappa the Sakyan, a disciple of the Nigaṇṭhas? 
For what matter were you sitting together in the assembly hall? 
Venerable Mahā Moggallāna replied: 
World-honored One, today after the midday meal I was sitting in the assembly hall together with a company of monks for some purpose. Then Vappa the Sakyan, a disciple of the Nigaṇṭhas, wandering around after noon, approached me and, after exchanging greetings, sat down to one side. I asked him this: “What do you think, Vappa? 
If a monk is restrained in body, speech, and mind, do you see a possible cause owing to which unwholesome taints might arise, leading to future existence?” Then Vappa the Sakyan, a disciple of the Nigaṇṭhas, replied: 
“If a monk is restrained in body, speech, and mind, I do see a possible cause owing to which unwholesome taints might arise, leading to future existence. 
Mahā Moggallāna, if someone has done unwholesome actions in a previous existence, then, owing to that, unwholesome taints will arise, leading to future existence.” World-honored One, that was the discussion I was having with Vappa the Sakyan, a disciple of the Nigaṇṭhas. 
Because of this matter, we were sitting together in the assembly hall. 
Then the World-honored One said to Vappa the Sakyan, a disciple of the Nigaṇṭhas: 69434bIf you agree with what I say, you should say “yes”; if you disagree, you should say “no”; and if you have any uncertainty, you should ask me further thus: “Renunciant Gotama, how is this? 
What is the meaning of this?” If you can accept what I have just proposed, I could discuss this matter with you. 
Vappa replied: 
Renunciant Gotama, if I agree with what you say, I will say “yes”; if I disagree, I will say “no”; and if I have any uncertainty, I will ask you further thus: “Renunciant Gotama, how is this? 
What is the meaning of this?” As the renunciant Gotama has just proposed, I accept it. May the renunciant Gotama discuss this matter with me! 
The World-honored One asked: What do you think, Vappa? 
Suppose that a monk has given rise to unwholesome bodily activities,  taints, vexation, and worry, that at a later time he ceases unwholesome bodily activities. Creating no new karma, and having abandoned old karma, he, in this very life, attains the goal and, free from vexation, remains permanently and unchangingly , which is spoken of as “something to be seen by noble wisdom and to be known by noble wisdom.” he gave rise to unwholesome verbal activities… , unwholesome mental activities… , unwholesome activities based on ignorance, that at a later time he ceases unwholesome activities based on ignorance. 
Creating no new karma, and having abandoned old karma, he in this very life attains the goal and, free from vexation, remains permanently and unchangingly , which is spoken of as “something to be seen by noble wisdom and to be known by noble wisdom.” What do you think, Vappa? 
For a monk who is restrained in body, speech, and mind in this way, do you see a possible cause owing to which unwholesome taints might arise, leading to future existence? 
434c Vappa replied: 
70 Gotama, if a monk is restrained in body, speech, and mind in this way, I see no possible cause owing to which unwholesome taints might arise, leading to future existence. 
The World-honored One praised him, saying: 
Very good, Vappa! 
Why is that, Vappa? 
If in a monk ignorance has been extinguished and knowledge has arisen, then with ignorance extinguished and knowledge arisen, when there arises the feeling of the body nearing its end, he knows that there has arisen the feeling of the body nearing its end. When there arises the feeling of life nearing its end, he knows that there has arisen the feeling of life nearing its end. And when the body breaks up and life ends, the life span having expired, then all that is felt in this life will be exhausted and come to an end. It should be understood that it will end and become cold. 
Vappa, it is just like a shadow that exists in dependence on a tree. Suppose that someone comes with a sharp axe and chops down the tree at its root, cuts it into pieces; then breaks into ten or a hundred fragments, burns them in a fire so that they become ash, which is then blown away by a strong wind, or carried away by water. 
What do you think, Vappa? 
That shadow existed in dependence on the tree, so once the cause of the shadow has been cut off, will the shadow disappear and not arise again? 
Vappa replied: 
“Indeed, Gotama.” Vappa, it should be understood in the same way in the case of a monk in whom ignorance has been extinguished and knowledge has arisen. With ignorance extinguished and knowledge arisen, when there arises the feeling of the body nearing its end, he knows that there has arisen the feeling of the body nearing its end. When there arises the feeling of life nearing its end, he knows that there has arisen the feeling of life nearing its end. And when the body breaks up and life ends, the life span having expired, then all that is felt in this life will be exhausted and come to an end. It should be understood that it will end and become cold. 
71 Vappa, a monk whose mind has been rightly liberated like this attains six wholesome abodes. What are the six? 
Vappa, on seeing a form with the eye, a monk is neither pleased nor displeased; he remains equanimous and unaffected, with right mindfulness and right attentiveness. 
Vappa, a monk whose mind has been rightly liberated like this attains the first wholesome abode. 
Similarly, the ear … the nose … the tongue … the body … on cognizing a mental phenomenon with the mind, he is neither pleased nor displeased; he remains equanimous and unaffected, with right mindfulness and right attentiveness. 
Vappa, a monk whose mind has been rightly liberated like this attains the sixth wholesome abode. 
Vappa, a monk whose mind has been rightly liberated like this attains these six wholesome abodes. Vappa replied: Indeed, Gotama. 
A learned noble disciple whose mind has been rightly liberated like this attains six wholesome abodes. 
What are the six? 
Gotama, a learned noble disciple, on seeing a form with the eye, is neither pleased nor displeased; he remains equanimous and unaffected, with right mindfulness and right attentiveness. 
Gotama, this is the first wholesome abode for a noble disciple who has learned much and whose mind has been rightly liberated. 
Similarly, the ear … the nose … the tongue … the body … on cognizing a mental phenomenon with the mind, he is neither pleased nor displeased; he remains equanimous and unaffected, with right mindfulness and right attentiveness. 
Indeed, Gotama, a learned noble disciple whose mind has been rightly liberated like this attains the sixth wholesome abode. 
Indeed, Gotama, a learned noble disciple whose mind has been rightly liberated like this attains these six wholesome abodes. 435a Thereupon, Vappa said to the World-honored One: 
Gotama, I have known it! Well-gone One, I have understood it! 
Gotama, 72 it is just as when someone with clear vision uncovers what was covered, exposes what was covered, or shows the way to one who was lost, or offers a light in the darkness, so that those with eyes can see forms. 
In the same way, the renunciant Gotama has taught me the Dharma using countless skillful means to reveal its meaning in various ways. 
World-honored One, I now go for refuge to the Buddha, the Dharma, and the community of monks . May the World-honored One accept me as a lay follower! From this day forth until life ends I go for refuge. 
World-honored One, just as a person who raises a bad horse, expecting to get benefit from it, only tires himself and gets no benefit—World-honored One, I was like this. 
Those foolish Nigaṇṭhas lack right knowledge; they are unable to understand and know. Not recognizing the fertile field , and not examining for myself, revered them for a long time, made offerings, and paid them homage, expecting to get benefit from it; but I only suffered in vain. 
World-honored One, for a second time I now go for refuge to the Buddha, the Dharma, and the community of monks. May the Worldhonored One accept me as a lay follower! From this day forth until life ends I go for refuge. World-honored One, formerly I was ignorant. 
Whatever faith and respect I had for those foolish Nigaṇṭhas has today been cut off. 
Because I was deceived. 
World-honored One, for a third time, I now go for refuge to the Buddha, the Dharma, and the community of monks. May the World-honored One accept me as a lay follower! From this day forth until life ends I go for refuge. 
This is what the Buddha said. 
Having heard the Buddha’s words, the Sakyan Vappa and the monks were delighted and remembered them well. ****** 13. The Discourse on Transcended ****** Thus have I heard: 
At one time, the Buddha was staying at Sāvatthī, in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s Park. 
At that time, the World-honored One said to the monks: 73 There are three tenets to be transcended, of different affiliation, different appellation, different school, and different doctrine that, despite being well accepted, firmly held, and declared to others by socalled wise men, are not beneficial. 
What are these three? 
There are renunciants and brahmins who hold this view and declare: “All that a person does is caused by what was done in previous lives.” Again, there are renunciants and brahmins who hold this view and declare: 
“All that a person does is caused and created by a supreme divine being.” Again, there are renunciants and brahmins who hold this view and declare: 
“All that a person does is without any cause or condition.” Herein, if there are renunciants and brahmins who hold this view and declare: “All that a person does is caused by what was done in previous lives,” then I approach them and, having approached them, I ask: 435b Venerable friends, is it true that you hold this view and declare: 
“All that a person does is caused by what was done in previous lives?” They reply: 
“Yes.” Then I say to them: If that is so, venerable friends, then you all endorse killing living beings. 
Why is that? 
Because all is caused by what was done in previous lives. 
In the same way, venerable friends, you endorse taking what is not given, sexual misconduct, false speech …  wrong views. 
Why is that? 
Because all of that is caused by what was done in previous lives. 
Venerable friends, if the view that all is caused by what was done in previous lives were true, then it would follow logically that all that one does or does not, takes place without desire, without effort. 
Venerable friends, if in doing a deed or not doing it, a person lacks true understanding, then he has lost right mindfulness and lacks right attentiveness, and hence is unteachable. If renunciants proclaim such a teaching, then those renunciants and brahmins can be refuted by such reasoning. 74 Herein, if there are renunciants and brahmins who hold this view and declare: “All that a person does is caused and created by a supreme divine being,” then I approach them and, having approached, I ask: 
Venerable friends, is it true that you hold this view and declare: “All that a person does is caused and created by a supreme divine being?” They reply: 
“Yes.” Then I say to them: If that is so, venerable friends, then you all endorse killing living beings. 
Why is that? 
Because all is caused and created by a supreme divine being. 
In the same way, venerable friends, you endorse taking what is not given, sexual misconduct, false speech …  wrong views. 
Because all of that is caused and created by a supreme divine being. 
Venerable friends, if the view that all is caused and created by a supreme divine being were true, then it would follow logically that all that one does or does not, takes place without desire, without effort. 
Venerable friends, if in doing a deed or not doing it, a person lacks true understanding, then he has lost right mindfulness and lacks right attentiveness, and hence is unteachable. If renunciants proclaim this teaching, then those renunciants and brahmins can be refuted by such reasoning. Herein, if there are renunciants and brahmins who hold this view and declare: “All that a person does is without any cause or condition,” then I approach them and, having approached, I ask: 
Venerable friends, is it true that you hold this view and declare: “All that a person does is without any cause or condition?” They reply: “Yes.” Then I say to them: 
If that is so, venerable friends, then you all endorse killing living beings. 
Why is that? 
Because all is without any cause or condition. 
In the same way, venerable friends, you endorse taking what is not given, sexual misconduct, false speech … wrong views. 
Because all of that is without any cause or 75435c condition. 
Venerable friends, if the view that all is without any cause or condition were true, then it would follow logically that all that one does or does not, takes place without desire, without effort. 
Venerable friends, if in doing a deed or not doing it, a person lacks true understanding, then he has lost right mindfulness and lacks right attentiveness, and hence is unteachable. If renunciants proclaim such a teaching, then those renunciants and brahmins can be refuted by such reasoning. The Dharma I teach to you, which I have known and realized by myself, cannot be refuted, cannot be defiled, and cannot be prevailed over by any renunciant, brahmin, gods, Māras, Brahmās, or anyone else in the world. 
Why can the Dharma I teach to you, which I have known and realized by myself, not be refuted, defiled, or prevailed over by any renunciant, brahmin, gods, Māras, Brahmās, or anyone else in the world? 
There is the teaching on the six sense bases, which, having known and realized it by myself, I have taught to you; it cannot be refuted, cannot be defiled, and cannot be prevailed over by any renunciant, brahmin, gods, Māras, Brahmās, or anyone else in the world. 
Again, there is the teaching on the six elements, which, having known and realized it by myself, I have taught to you; it cannot be refuted, cannot be defiled, and cannot be prevailed over by any renunciant, brahmin, gods, Māras, Brahmās, or anyone else in the world. What is the teaching on the six sense bases, which, having known and realized it by myself, I have taught to you? 
are the eye sense base, the ear … nose … tongue … body … the mind sense base. This is the teaching on the six sense bases which, having known and realized it by myself, I have taught to you. 
What is the teaching on the six elements which, having known and realized it by myself, I have taught to you? 
are the elements of earth … water … fire … air … space … and the element of consciousness. This is the teaching on the six elements which, having known and realized it by myself, I have taught to you. Because of the combination of the six elements, there is rebirth from a mother’s womb; because of the six elements, there are the six sense bases; because of the six sense bases, there is contact; and because 76 of contact there is feeling. 
Monks, one who has feeling will know suffering as it really is, know the arising of suffering, know the cessation of suffering, and know the path to the cessation of the suffering as it really is. 
What is knowing suffering as it really is? 
It is this: birth is suffering, old age is suffering, disease is suffering, death is suffering, association with what is disliked is suffering, dissociation from what is liked is suffering, not getting what one wants is suffering; in brief, the five aggregates of clinging are suffering—this is called knowing suffering as it really is. 
What is knowing the arising of suffering as it really is? 
It is craving for and clinging to future existence, with delight and desire, seeking after this and that existence—this is called knowing the arising of suffering as it really is. 
What is knowing the cessation of suffering as it really is? 
It is the cutting off without remainder, abandoning, disgorging, fading away, cessation, stopping, and disappearance of this craving for and clinging to future existence, with delight and desire, seeking after this and that existence—this is called knowing the cessation of suffering as it really is. 
What is knowing the path to the cessation of suffering as it really is? 
It is the noble eightfold path: right view … right concentration, these eight—this is called knowing the path to the cessation of suffering as it really is. 
Monks, you should know suffering as it really is, you should cut off the arising of suffering, you should realize the cessation of suffering, and you should cultivate the path to the cessation of suffering. 
If a monk knows suffering as it really is, cuts off the arising of suffering, realizes the cessation of suffering, and cultivates the path to the cessation of suffering, then that monk, having abandoning all taints, having loosened all fetters, is able through right attentiveness to attain the end of suffering. 
This is what the Buddha said. 
Having heard the Buddha’s words, the monks were delighted and remembered them well. 77436a ****** 14. The Discourse to Rāhula ****** Thus have I heard: 
At one time, the Buddha was staying at Rājagaha, in the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrels’ Sanctuary. 
At that time, Venerable Rāhula was also staying at Rājagaha, in the Hot Spring Grove. 
Then the World-honored One, when the night was over, at dawn, having put on his robes and taken his almsbowl, went into Rājagaha to beg for food. Having finished begging for food, he went to the Hot Spring Grove, the place where the venerable Rāhula was staying. 
When Venerable Rāhula saw the Buddha coming in the distance, he forthwith went to greet him, took the Buddha’s robe and bowl, made a seat ready, and set out water for washing feet. The Buddha, having washed his feet, sat down on the seat prepared by Rāhula. 
Then the World-honored One took the water vessel and, having poured out the water until only a little was left, asked: 
“Rāhula, did you see me taking this water vessel and pouring out the water until only a little was left?” Rāhula replied: 
“Yes, I saw it, World-honored One.” The Buddha told Rāhula: In the same way, the practice of those who knowingly speak falsehood without embarrassment or regret, without shame or scruple, is of little , I say. 
Rāhula, there is no evil they would not do. 
“Even in jest I shall not speak falsehood.” The World-honored One again took the water vessel containing a little water and, having completely discarded the water, asked: 
“Rāhula, now again, did you see me take this water vessel containing a little water, and completely discard the water?” Rāhula replied: 
“Yes, I saw it, World-honored One.” The Buddha told Rāhula: In the same way, the practice of those who knowingly speak falsehood without embarrassment or regret, without shame or scruple, is completely discarded, I say. 
Rāhula, there is no evil they would not do. 
“Even in jest I shall not speak falsehood.”436b78 The World-honored One again took the empty water vessel, tipped it over on the ground, and asked: 
“Rāhula, now again, did you see me take the empty water vessel, and tip it over on the ground?” Rāhula replied: 
“Yes, I saw it, World-honored One.” The Buddha told Rāhula: In the same way, the practice of those who knowingly speak falsehood without embarrassment or regret, without shame or scruple, is tipped over, I say. 
Rāhula, there is no evil they would not do. 
“Even in jest I shall not speak falsehood.” The World-honored One again took the tipped water vessel and, having turned it bottom up, asked: 
“Rāhula, did you see me again take the toppled water vessel and turn it bottom up?” Rāhula replied: 
“Yes, I saw it, World-honored One.” The Buddha told Rāhula: In the same way, the practice of those who knowingly speak falsehood without embarrassment or regret, without shame or scruple, is turned bottom up, I say. 
Rāhula, there is no evil they would not do. 
Therefore, Rāhula, you should train yourself like this: 
“Even in jest I shall not speak falsehood.” Rāhula, it is just as if a king had a great elephant who, when going into battle, uses his forefeet, his hindfeet, his tail, shoulders, back, flanks, neck, head, ears, and tusks— everything except his trunk, which he keeps protected. Seeing this, the elephant trainer would think in this way: The king’s great elephant still cherishes his life. 
Why so? 
Because when going into battle, the king’s great elephant uses his forefeet, his hindfeet, his tail, shoulders, back, flanks, neck, head, ears, and tusks—everything except his trunk, which he keeps protected. 
Rāhula, if when going into battle, the king’s great elephant uses his forefeet, his hindfeet, his tail, shoulders, back, flanks, neck, head, ears, tusks, and also his trunk—if he uses everything—then on seeing this the elephant trainer would think in this way: 79 The king’s elephant no longer cherishes his life. 
Why so? 
Because when going into battle, the king’s great elephant uses his forefeet, his hindfeet, his tail, shoulders, back, flanks, neck, head, ears, tusks, and also his trunk; he uses everything. 
Rāhula, if the king’s great elephant, when going into battle, uses his forefeet, his hindfeet, his tail, shoulders, back, flanks, neck, head, ears, tusks, and also his trunk—if he uses everything—then Rāhula, I say that when going into battle, there is no evil that the king’s great elephant would not do. 
So too, Rāhula, those who knowingly speak falsehood without embarrassment or regret, without shame or scruple, Rāhula, I say that there is no evil they would not do. 
Therefore, Rāhula, you should train yourself like this: 
“Even in jest I shall not speak falsehood.” Then, the World-honored One uttered the following verses: He who transgresses this one law Against speaking falsehood: Not fearing the next world, There is no evil he would not do. 
Better to swallow an iron ball, Burning hot like fire, Than to transgress the precepts While accepting the offerings of the faithful. 
436c If you fear suffering, Not even wishing to think of it, Whether secretly or openly, Perform no evil deed. 
An unwholesome deed, Already done or being done, Can never be escaped; One cannot hide from . 
Having uttered these verses, the Buddha asked Rāhula further: “What do you think, Rāhula? 
For what purpose do people use a mirror?” 80 Venerable Rāhula replied: 
“World-honored One, they wish to examine their face, to see if it is clean or not.” Similarly, Rāhula, if you are about to perform a bodily action, then examine that bodily action: 
“I am about to perform a bodily action. Is this bodily action pure or impure? 
Am I doing it for myself or for another?” Rāhula, if on examining it you know: 
“I am about to perform a bodily action, and that bodily action is impure, either for myself or for another; it is unwholesome, has suffering as its fruit, and will result in the experience of suffering”—then, Rāhula, you should abandon that bodily action that you are about to perform. 
Rāhula, if on examining it you know: 
“I am about to perform a bodily action, and that bodily action is pure, either for myself or for another; it is wholesome, has happiness as its fruit, and will result in the experience of happiness”—then, Rāhula, you should approve of that bodily action that you are about to perform. 
Rāhula, if you are performing a bodily action, then examine that bodily action: 
“I am performing a bodily action. Is this bodily action pure or impure? 
Am I doing it for myself or for another?” Rāhula, if on examining it you know: 
“I am performing a bodily action, and this bodily action is impure, either for myself or for another; it is unwholesome, has suffering as its fruit, and will result in the experience of suffering”—then, Rāhula, you should abandon that bodily action that you are performing. 
Rāhula, if on examining it you know: “I am performing a bodily action, and this bodily action is pure, either for myself or for another; it is wholesome, has happiness as its fruit, and will result in the experience of happiness”—then, Rāhula, you should approve of that bodily action that you are performing. 
Rāhula, if you have performed a bodily action, then examine that bodily action: 
“I have performed a bodily action. That bodily action, which is already past, having ceased completely or changed, was it pure or impure? 
Did I do it for myself or for another?” 81 Rāhula, if on examining it you know: 
“I have performed a bodily action, which is already past, having ceased completely or changed. 
That bodily action was impure, either for myself or for another; it was unwholesome, has suffering as its fruit, and will result in the experience of suffering”—then, Rāhula, you should approach a good friend, a companion in the holy life, and wholeheartedly reveal that bodily action that you have done. 
Rāhula, if on examining it you know: 
“I have performed a bodily action, which is already past, having ceased completely or changed. 
That bodily action was pure, either for myself or for another; it was wholesome, has happiness as its fruit, and will result in the experience of happiness”—then, Rāhula, you should dwell happily day and night, with right mindfulness and right attentiveness. 
“With a past deed as its condition, a mental action arose. Was that mental action pure or impure? 
Did I do it for myself or for another?” Rāhula, if on examining it you know: “With a past deed as its condition, a mental action arose. 
That mental action, which is already past, having ceased completely or changed, was impure, either for myself or for another; it was unwholesome, has suffering as its fruit, and will result in the experience of suffering”—then, Rāhula, you should abandon that past mental action. 
Rāhula, if on examining it you know: “With a past deed as its condition, a mental action arose. 
That mental action, which is already past, having ceased completely or changed, was pure, either for myself or for another; it was wholesome, has happiness as its fruit, and will result in the experience of happiness”— then, Rāhula, you should approve of that past mental action. 
Rāhula, if with a future deed as its condition a mental action will arise, then examine that mental action: 
“With a future deed as its condition, a mental action will arise. Will that mental action be pure or impure? 
Will I do it for myself or for another?” Rāhula, if on examining it you know: 
“With a future deed as its condition, a mental action will 437a82 arise. That mental action will be impure, either for myself or for another; it will be unwholesome, will have suffering as its fruit, and will result in the experience of suffering”—then, Rāhula, you should abandon that future mental action. 
Rāhula, if on examining it you know: 
“With a future deed as its condition a mental action will arise. 
That mental action will be pure, either for myself or for another; it will be wholesome, will have happiness as its fruit, and will result in the experience of happiness”—then, Rāhula, you should approve of that future mental action. 
Rāhula, if with a present deed as its condition a mental action arises, then examine that mental action: 
“With a present deed as its condition, a mental action is arising. Is this mental action pure or impure? 
Am I doing it for myself or for another?” Rāhula, if on examining it you know: 
“With a present deed as its condition, a mental action is arising. This mental action is impure, either for myself or for another; it is unwholesome, has suffering as its fruit, and will result in the experience of suffering”—then, Rāhula, you should abandon that present mental action. 
Rāhula, if on examining it you know: 
“With a present deed as its condition a mental action is arising. 
This mental action is pure, either for myself or for another; it is wholesome, has happiness as its fruit, and will result in the experience of happiness”—then, Rāhula, you should approve that present mental action. 
Rāhula, whatever renunciants and brahmins in the past have repeatedly examined and repeatedly purified their bodily, verbal, and mental actions, all of them have repeatedly examined and repeatedly purified their bodily, verbal, and mental actions in this very way. 
Rāhula, whatever renunciants and brahmins in the future will repeatedly examine and repeatedly purify their bodily, verbal, and mental actions, all of them will repeatedly examine and repeatedly purify their bodily, verbal, and mental actions in this very way. 
Whatever renunciants and brahmins in the present repeatedly examine and repeatedly purify their bodily, verbal, and mental actions, all of them repeatedly examine and repeatedly purify their bodily, verbal, and mental actions in this very way. 
Rāhula, you should train yourself 83437b like this: 
“I too repeatedly examine and repeatedly purify my bodily, verbal, and mental actions in this very way.” Then the World-honored One uttered further verses, saying: Bodily action, verbal action, And mental action, Rāhula, Whether wholesome or unwholesome by nature, You should constantly examine them. 
Knowingly to speak falsehood, Do not do it, Rāhula. Shaven-headed, you live off others, How could you speak falsehood? 
Overturning the law of renunciants, Empty, without truthfulness, Such is speaking falsehood, With an unrestrained mouth. 
Therefore, not to speak falsehood, O son of the rightly Awakened One, This is the law of renunciants, you should train, O Rāhula. 
Prosperity and happiness all around, Safety and fearlessness, Rāhula, to attain that, Do not harm others. 
This is what the Buddha said. 
